(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Check out the interview above.”
“But there was nothing for me to actually come and say because it was already done before this article came out.”Justice League opens Friday and is expected to rake in $325 million-$355 million globally in its first weekend at the box office.”
“Everyone knew what was the right thing to do.”
““But the truth is, there’s so many people involved in making this movie, and they all echo the same sentiments.”
““At the end of the day, a lot has been written about my views and the way that I feel, and everyone knows the way that I feel because I’m not hiding anything,” Gadot told Guthrie.”
“Ratner subsequently said he was stepping back from Warner Bros; the studio moved fast to end its relationship with the producer-financier.”
“During an appearance today on Today to promote this weekend’s release of Justice League, Savannah Guthrie asked whether she was making such demands, after Ratner had been accused by several women of sexual harassment in a Los Angeles Times report November 1.”
“Deadline cleared up this noise Monday: Gadot was already committed to Wonder Woman 2, and Ratner’s RatPac Dune isn’t committed to co-finance the sequel.”
“Rumors swirled over the weekend that Gal Gadot would not sign on the dotted line for Wonder Woman 2 if Brett Ratner was involved.”


"Look at the interview above."
"But I have nothing to say, because this article was finished before it was published." "Justice alliance" will be released on Friday, and the global box office is expected to reach 325 million to 355 million US dollars by the first weekend. "
"Everyone knows what to do."
"But the fact is, there are so many people involved in making the film that they all have the same idea."
"At the end of the day, I've written a lot about my opinions and feelings, and everyone knows how I feel, because I'm not hiding anything," gadote told Guthrie
"Ratner later said he would quit Warner Bros.; the studio moved quickly to end its relationship with producer financiers."
Savannah Guthrie asked in an appearance today whether she had made such a request after Ratner was accused of sexual harassment by several women in a November 1 Los Angeles Times report
"The deadline Monday eliminated the noise: gado has promised wonder woman 2, while Ratna's ratpark dune has not promised to co fund the sequel."
"It was rumored last weekend that Gail gadote would not sign the dotted line of wonder woman 2 if Brett Ratner was involved."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2 Season 8 on Monday nights at 9 p m on MTV”
“As fans will recall MTV shocked the audience by adding a fifth girl to the series for the first time in franchise history To see more of Briana DeJesus and her co stars including Leah Messer Jenelle Evans Chelsea Houska and Leah Messer tune into new episodes of Teen Mom...”
“...her first child and was added to the cast of Teen Mom 2 Season 8 earlier this year...”
“...hopes that she and Hernandez would be able to co parent the child in a civil manner Briana DeJesus is also mom to 5 year old Nova who she shares with ex boyfriend Devoin Austin Briana DeJesus starred on the fourth season of 16 Pregnant as she prepared to welcome...”
“She also said that Hernandez had no excuse for not seeing their baby girl Briana DeJesus conceived her second child with Luis Hernandez a very short time into their short lived fling and while she considered the possibility of giving the child up she ultimately decided to keep her in...”
“...she let him know that Stella Star needs a father in her life...”
“Meanwhile as DeJesus explained Stella Star s heart was working so hard that it may have given up Although Luis Hernandez eventually showed up his efforts to prove that he had a future plan to get more involved in their child s life weren t enough for Briana DeJesus and...”
“...slammed her daughter s father Luis Hernandez for failing to go to the hospital to see their child and for failing to ask about Stella Star at all...”
“...in her heart On October 17 Radar Online shared details of last night s show explaining that while the holes in Stella Star s heart aren t expected to grow they are certainly something that will need to be monitored for years to come Also during the episode Briana DeJesus...”
“Description Tags Briana DeJesus received some heartbreaking news about her daughter on last night s episode of Teen Mom 2 Just days after Stella Star was born the reality star discovered that her child was facing a terrifying medical crisis when doctors revealed she had not one but three holes...”


"2 season 8 Monday 9pm at MTV"
"Fans will remember that MTV shocked the audience, added a fifth girl to the series for the first time in franchise history, and saw more Briana deyessos and her co stars, including Leah Messer, Janel Evans, Chelse hosca and Leah Messer, adapting" teenage Mom "into a new series..."
“… Her first child, who joined the cast of "teen Mom 2" Season 8 earlier this year
“… I hope she and Hernandez can raise their children together in a civilized way. Briana deyesus is also the mother of 5-year-old nova. She and her ex boyfriend Devon Austin Briana deyesus starred in the 16-year-old fourth season pregnancy, and she is ready to meet... "
"She also said that Hernandez had no reason not to visit their baby girl, Briana deyesus. In their short indulgent life, she was pregnant with her second child and Louis Hernandez in a short time. When she considered the possibility of giving up her child, she finally decided to leave her in..."
“…… She let him know that Stella Starr needed a father in her life... "
"At the same time, dejes explained that Stella Starr's heart is working hard and may have given up. Although Louis Hernandez finally demonstrated his efforts to prove that he has a plan for the future and more involvement in their children's lives, it is not enough for Briana dejes, and..."
“…… She lashed out at her daughter's father, Louis Hernandez, for not going to the hospital to see the child, or asking about Stella sta. "
“…… On October 17, radar online shared the details of last night's program, explaining that although the holes in Stella Starr's heart are not expected to grow, they will definitely need to be monitored in the next few years in the episode of Briana DeJesus... "
"In" young mother 2 "last night, Brianna deyessos received some heartbreaking news about her daughter. Just the day after Stella Starr was born, the reality TV star discovered that her child was facing a terrible medical crisis. The doctor revealed that she was not one but three holes..."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“God, we miss those days.”
“Even messier still, Lucy had got Mark’s sister, and her neighbour, Jess to lie to Mario about where she was the night she stayed with Mark.”
“This was legit painful to watch.”
“Lillie had started seeing Bear at this point in the series so Bear, of course, decided to cheat on her with the SAME GIRL, Chrysten.”
“Lillie Lexie Gregg/ Gaz Beadle/ Chrysten Zenoni/ Stephen BearMTV/GettyAfter Gaz and Lillie had split, they both appeared on Ex On The Beach where it came out that Gaz had cheated on her with Chrysten when he was in Australia.”
“3.”
“Woah.”
“Orlando rejected him and a furious Justin ‘mumbled something about Miranda’ leading Orlando to try and punch him.”
“After the picture surfaced of the pair hanging out, Justin and Orlando came face to face in Ibiza and onlookers claim JB tried to shake his hand.”
“In 2014, Biebs' ex Selena was spotted getting well cosy with Miranda’s ex-husband Orlando at WeDay in California.”


"God, we miss those days."
To make matters worse, Lucy tricked Mark's sister and her neighbor Jess into telling Mario where she was that night with mark
"It's so painful."
"Lily started dating bell at this time of the series, so bell, of course, decided to cheat her with the same girl, Kristen."
"After Lily Lexy Greg / gaz Beadle / chrysten zenoni / Stephen bearmtv / gettygaz and Lily split up, they both showed up on the beach. It turns out that gaz and chrysten cheated her together when they were in Australia."
“3.”
"Wow."
"Orlando refused him, and the angry Justin" mumbled about Miranda ", which led Orlando to try to beat him."
"Justin and Orlando face to face in Ibiza after the photos of the two together came to light. Onlookers said JB tried to shake hands with him."
"In 2014, Bibbs' former Serena was found to be in harmony with Miranda's ex husband Orlando on Wednesday in California."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even though Colton told Becca he was falling in love with her, she sent him home after he made the final four.”
“ADADThat, combined with Colton’s virgin revelation (although Becca was more concerned with the fact that he had only been in one serious relationship), basically sealed his fate.”
“They must feel Colton is the closest thing they’ll get to Sean.”
““My thoughts are Sean Lowe has been their only successful Bachelor.”
““I’m hearing that they will be announcing the next ‘Bachelor’ soon and it will be Colton,” he tweeted.”
“Last week, blogger Reality Steve leaked the news early.”
“Colton could be a very interesting Bachelor.”ADUnfortunately, plenty of viewers feel otherwise.”
“...he’s also a guy who is surprisingly funny and charismatic.”
“.”


"Although Colton told Becca that he was in love with her, she sent him home after he entered the semi-finals."
"Adat believes that, together with Colton's virginity revelation (although Becca is more concerned that he has only experienced a serious relationship), it basically determines his fate."
"They must think Colton is the closest to Sean."
"I think Sean law is their only successful bachelor."
"I hear they're going to announce the next bachelor soon, and that's Colton," he tweeted
"Last week, blogger Steve leaked the news ahead of time."
"Colton could be a very interesting bachelor." Fortunately, many viewers have different feelings
“…… He is also a surprisingly interesting and attractive person
“.”



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“>> On AJC.com: Read the full recap of Monday's season finale...”
“Poppe will appear on ABC's “Good Morning America” Tuesday morning, followed by “Live With Kelly and Ryan."”
“The versatile singer came in third.”
“>> Read more trending newsAt 10:16 p.m., the show eliminated Gabby Barrett.”
“She is also the first quirky singer-songwriter type to take home the prize.”
“Poppe is the first female to win since season 12 and only the second in the past 10 seasons.”
“They share a lot in common.”Indeed, they are both from small towns and are the same age.”
““Their characters melded together.”
““They just made this connection during Hollywood week,” Stell said.”
“Keith Stell, Hutchinson's pastor, said in an interview Monday night that he had kept the secret for weeks and was surprised that they chose to reveal it on air.”


"> > on AJC.com Website: read the full summary of Monday's last episode of the season... "
Pop will appear on ABC's "Good Morning America" Tuesday morning, followed by "living with Kelly and Ryan."
"The versatile singer came in third."
"> > read more popular news at 10:16 p.m. and the show eliminated Gaby Barrett."
"She was also the first eccentric singer and songwriter type to go home with a prize."
"Pop is the first woman to win since season 12 and second in the last 10 seasons."
"They have a lot in common." In fact, they are all from small towns and of the same age
"Their roles are fused."
"They just got in touch during Hollywood week," stell said
"Hutchinson's Pastor Keith stell said in an interview Monday night that he had kept the secret for several weeks and was surprised that they chose to reveal it on the radio."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You’ll repeat this method until you reach your ends—leave them relatively straight for an unfinished (yet cool) look.”
“Holding your flat iron at an angle, insert an inch-wide section of hair between the clamps and turn the iron away from your face to create your first bend.”
“Check out one of my personal faves, below:Flat-Iron Beach Waves Hack #3: Twirl and PullNomi Ellenson | Lauren AhnNomi Ellenson | Lauren AhnFor beachy waves that are slightly more defined, try the twirl-and-pull method.”
“Not sure your hair-straightener is up to the task?”
“You’ll repeat this motion throughout your hair, focusing on your ends for a natural-looking finish.”
“Then, with that same section, clamp your flat iron in the shape of an “S” to finish off the piece.”
“Start by picking up a section of your hair and dropping it (yup, drop it—bear with me) into the mouth of the flat iron to create your first bend.”
“These top-rated formulas are a great place to start:Flat-Iron Beach Waves Hack #2: Create "S" WavesKathleen Kamphausen/Lauren AhnIf you’re after soft, lived-in waves (basically, the opposite of bouncy, Victoria’s Secret-esque curls), you’ll love this flat-iron technique.”
“And as with any heat styling, you’ll want to follow with a few spritzes of heat protectant to keep your hair nice and healthy.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"You have to repeat this method until you achieve your goal of making them relatively straight for an unfinished (but cool) look."
Hold the iron at an angle, insert an inch of hair between the clamps, and move the iron away from your face to make the first bend
"Take a look at my hobbies, below: waves hack#3: twirl and pullnomi ellenson | Lauren ahnnomi ellenson | Lauren ah. For more defined beach waves, try the twirl and pull method."
"Not sure your hair straightener is up to it?"
"You're going to repeat this throughout the hair, focusing on the end of the hair for a natural finish."
Then, with the same part, clamp the flat iron into an "s" shape to complete the task
"First pick up a piece of hair and put it (yes, put it on me) into the flat iron mouth to form your first bend."
"These top formula are a good choice: waves hack#2: create" s "waves Kathleen kamphausen / Lauren Ahn if you pursue softness and live in waves (basically the opposite of bouncy, Victoria's Secret style curly hair), you will like this iron technology."
"As with any heat setting, you should also spray a few drops of heat protectant after it to keep your hair beautiful and healthy."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thank you for choosing me @lukekennard5,” the former Miss Teen Tennessee captioned her photo along with the hashtag “#myboyfriendishot.””
““Yep y’all…he’s my guy could not be more proud of him!!”
“Image zoom Credit: Desiree Navarro/WireImageWATCH: ‘He’s My Guy’: Savannah Chrisley Dating Newly-Drafted NBA Player Luke KennardSavannah made her relationship with Kennard, 21, Instagram official in June when he was selected by the Detroit Pistons as the 12th pick of the 2017 NBA draft.”
““@lukekennard5 @savannahchrisley I hope you guys are having an amazing time.” Alongside the message, Todd shared a photo of the young couple, who were vacationing in the Cayman Islands for Savannah’s birthday.”
““So proud of these two and how they NEVER listen to the noise,” Todd, 48, wrote on Instagram.”
““I will forever love the Kennard family.”Image zoomImage zoom Credit: Savannah Chrisley/InstagramTheir split comes a week after Todd Chrisley defended his daughter’s relationship amid reports that the pair had broken up.”
“I’m 20 now and so excited to live my life as beautifully as God intended,” she continued.”
““I was brought up to know my worth.”
“...you are the only one Savannah 20 shared in a statement to the outlet...”
“The last 4 months I ve been dating Luke have been great but as a young woman of faith I made the decision that with where Luke and I both are in our careers it was best to part as friends rather than deal with the pressures of wondering if...”


"Thank you for choosing me @ lukekennard5," the former Tennessee teenager tagged her photo as "my boy friend hot."
"Yes, you He's my man, and I'm very proud of him! "
"Credit for image zooming: Desiree Navarro / wireimagewatch:" he's my man ": Savannah crisley's date with rookie Kennard, a new NBA player. Savannah established a relationship with 21-year-old Kennard in June, and Kennard was named 12th in the 2017 NBA draft by the Detroit Pistons."
“@ lukekennard5@savanahchrisley I hope you have a good time. " Todd also shared photos of the young couple, who spent their holiday in the Caymans on Savannah's birthday
Todd, 48, wrote on instagram: "I'm proud of these two people who never listen to noise."
"I will always love the kennards." Photo source: a week before Savannah and Chris ley / instagram broke up, it was reported that they broke up and Todd Chris ley defended their daughter's relationship
"I'm 20 years old now, and it's so exciting to live as God wants me to," she continued
"I've known my worth since I was a child."
“… You're the only Savannah 20 share in a statement of export... "
"In the past four months, my date with Luke has been very happy, but as a young woman with faith, I decided that in the career of Luke and me, it's better to break up as friends rather than under such pressure, that is, to know if..."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For a list of participating theaters — there are a few in the Los Angeles area — visit GetOutOneYearlater.com.”
““The success of his stunning vision would not have been possible without the audience’s passion for both ‘Get Out’s’ groundbreaking storytelling and its deft use of art as society’s mirror,” he added.”
““When Jordan approached us about a way to thank fans one year after the release of ‘Get Out,’ we thought a Presidents’ Day screening during Black History Month would be a wonderful way to commemorate the film’s impact,” Jim Orr, Universal Pictures’ president of distribution, said in a statement.”
““Get Out” will screen at 55 theaters nationwide and each movie-goer who requests a ticket the day of the screening will be given one free admission to the 7 p.m. showing, up to theater capacity.”
““It’s all about that theatrical experience, so please go.”The film, starring Daniel Kaluuya and Allison Williams, has been nominated for four Academy Awards, including best picture, lead actor (Kaluuya), directing and screenplay.”
““Believe me, ‘Get Out’ is a movie best seen in theaters,” writer-director Jordan Peele said Tuesday in a video on Twitter.”
“For free.”
“That’s right, the horror satire will be back in select theaters on President’s Day.”
“To mark the anniversary — and most certainly to stir more emotions before the Oscars next month — Universal Pictures has teamed up with AMC Theatres to offer free screenings of the film on Feb. 19.”
“It’s been almost a year since “Get Out” stunned audiences in theaters.”


"To see the list of participating theaters - there are several in the Los Angeles area - visit GetOutOneYearlater.com Website. "
"His amazing vision would not have been successful without the audience's enthusiasm for the groundbreaking storytelling of going out and the clever use of art as a social mirror," he added
"A year after going out, Jordan has offered us a way to thank fans. We believe that a presidential day screening during black history month is an excellent way to commemorate the impact of the film," Jim orr, Universal's distribution president, said in a statement
"Going out" will be shown in 55 cinemas across the country. Everyone who asks for tickets on the same day will get a free ticket to attend the screening at 7 p.m., which can accommodate up to the cinema audience
The film, starring Daniel Kaluuya and Allison Williams, has received four Academy Award nominations, including best picture, Kaluuya, director and screenplay
"Believe me, going out is the best movie to watch in a cinema," Jordan Peele, writer and director, said in a twitter video on Tuesday
"Free."
"That's right, the horror satire will be back in the select cinema on President's day."
"To mark this anniversary - and, of course, to inspire more emotion before next month's Oscars - Universal works with AMC cinema to show the film for free on February 19."
"It's been almost a year since going out stunned the audience."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...giving this whole thing a rest for awhile.”
“...i love you guys!”
“...not everything i post has to do with thomas.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“2018 This content is imported from Twitter...”
“...no we are not broken up yes we are still together no we are not fighting we are madly in love and better than ever please stop speculating spreading rumors when you have absolutely no basis all smooth sailing over here thanks for checking innnnnn Dove Cameron DoveCameron June 11”
“PSA: THOMAS AND I ARE FINE.”
“...byeThis content is imported from Twitter.”
“...my life isn’t a reality show?”


“… Give the whole thing a break. "
“… I love you
“… Not everything I post is about Thomas
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from twitter..."
“… No, we didn't break up. Yes, we are still together. No, we don't fight. We love each other crazily. It's better than ever. Please stop guessing and spreading rumors. When you have no foundation at all, everything goes well. Here, thank you for checking the innnnnn pigeon and Cameron pigeon
"Thomas and I are fine."
“… Byethis content is imported from twitter. "
“… My life is not a reality show? "



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“24 tickets are available on CountessLuann com...”
““It’s all very new, but like most things with Luann, it’s been all-consuming.”
“You can tell they re having a lot of fun together says the second source who adds that they re very hot and heavy together The second source shares Luann s happy to have something lighthearted in her life after...”
“He’s very aggressive and she goes toe-to-toe with him.”
““Their chemistry was instant.”
“They’ve been a great team since,” a second source tells PEOPLE.”
“He was reluctant to sign her at first because of The Housewives, but her work ethic surprised him in many ways and sealed the deal.”
“They only started working together a few months ago.”
“...in the source explains...”
“...noeldelesseps victoriadelesseps onedayatatime lovemyfamily grateful rhony countess De lesseps who debuted her CountessAndFriends cabaret show at New York City s Feinstein s 54 Below in February will be performing at the Paramount on Aug 4 and the Borgata on Aug...”


"There are 24 tickets on countessluan com..."
"It's all fresh, but like most things in Luan, it's exhausting."
"You can see that they had a good time together," the second source added, adding that they were very hot and heavy together. The second source shared LuAnn's happiness, after some light and pleasant things in her life... "
"He's very aggressive, she's fighting him."
"Their chemistry is fast."
"They have been a great team since then," another source told people
"At first, because of the housewife, he didn't want to sign her, but her professional ethics surprised him in many ways and facilitated the deal."
"They just started working together a few months ago."
“… Explain in the source... "
“… Noel delesseps Victoria delesseps onedayatatime lovemyfamily grateful Countess de Lesseps, who made her debut in February at Feinstein s 54 in New York, will perform at Paramount theatre on August 4 and Borgata theatre on August 8. "



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Hydrating, no big deal, on the couch,' Cabrera said as Patridge was cozied up next to him.”
“On Thursday, Joey posted a video on her Instagram story of the trio getting IV drips together.”
“But on Saturday, the couple fueled dating rumors when they were spotted attending Stagecoach in Palm Springs together.”
“The 32-year-old actress was definitely in the honky-tonk spirit as she posed denim clad in front of an old Chevy pickup truck.”
“Country music festival On Saturday Audrina Patridge and Ryan Cabrera fueled dating rumors when they were spotted attending Stagecoach in Palm Springs together Southern belle The 32 year old actress was definitely in the honky tonk spirit as she posed denim clad in front of an old Chevy pickup truck...”
“Just yesterday PEOPLE reported that Patridge and Cabrera had officially reunited...”
“'They're dating,' a source told the magazine.”
“'They've been spending a lot of time together recently and are having a good time.'”
“And that seems to be true as the two were seen cuddled up in lawn chairs at the country music festival.”
“Together again: Audrina and Ryan were seen cuddled up in lawn chairs at the country music festival after PEOPLE reported on Friday that they were once again 'dating'Strike!”


"It's no big deal to rehydrate on the sofa," Cabrera said, with partridge comfortable next to him
"On Thursday, Joey posted a video on instagram that tells the story of three people getting infusions together."
"But last Saturday, when the couple were found out to be in a Palm Springs stagecoach together, there were rumors of a date."
"The 32 year old actress is absolutely impressive when she poses in jeans in front of an old Chevy pickup truck."
"At the country music festival on Saturday, audienne partridge and Ryan Cabrera were photographed together in the palm springs stagecoach. The two 32 year old actresses put on a cowboy look in front of an old Chevy pickup, which intensified the rumors of dating..."
"Just yesterday, it was reported that Patric and Cabrera were officially reunited..."
"They're dating," one source told the magazine
"They've been together for a long time recently and have a good time."
"At the country music festival, people see two people cuddling on lawn chairs, which seems to be true."
"Together again: at the country music festival, Audrey and Ryan were seen cuddling on chairs on the grass. Last Friday, it was reported that they were on strike again!"



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Paramount has announced the show as “delayed,” the move raises a question: If the contents of the show are not appropriate to air now, why would they be appropriate to air later?”
“The showrunner defended that move to EW last month.”
“Previously, Heathers drew controversy for reimagining its trio of bullies as all from traditionally marginalized groups.”
“Paramount has likewise canceled the show’s premiere screening in New York.”
“It’s not clear how many of these original elements made their way into the new show.”
“The climax involves the male lead, revealed to be rather deranged, trying to blow up the school.”
“The film’s romantic lead brings a gun to school, shoots blanks at his classmates, and the female lead kills a classmate by shooting him in the chest.”
“...of two high school classmates who fall in love and exact revenge on bullies...”
“While we stand firmly behind the show in light of the recent tragic events in Florida and out of respect for the victims their families and loved ones we feel the right thing to do is delay the premiere until later this year The original 1988 film told the story...”
“The new cable network — formerly Spike TV — has issued the following statement:“Paramount Network’s original series Heathers is a satirical comedy that takes creative risks in dealing with many of society’s most challenging subjects ranging from personal identity to race and socio-economic status to gun violence.”


Although paramount announced that the play was "postponed", this raised the question: if the content of the play is not suitable for broadcasting now, why is it suitable for broadcasting later? "
"Last month, showrunner defended the move to EW."
"In the past, Heathers caused controversy by imagining three bullies from traditional marginalized groups."
"Paramount also canceled the show's premiere in New York."
"It's not clear how many of these original elements have entered the new program."
"The climax involved the hero, revealed quite crazy, trying to blow up the school."
"The romantic protagonist in the film comes to school with a gun and shoots his classmate. The heroine shoots a classmate in the chest and kills him."
“… Two high school students fall in love and retaliate against the bully. "
"In view of the recent tragic events in Florida, we firmly support the show. Out of respect for the victims, their families and relatives, we think it's right to postpone the premiere to later this year. This 1988 original tells the story..."
"The new cable network, formerly spike, made the following statement:" Paramount's original series Heather is a satirical comedy that risks creativity in dealing with many of society's most challenging topics, from personal identity to race, socio-economic status to gun violence. "



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Is there any part of this place that’s not falling apart?” she asked Jerry (rhetorically).”
“‘THIS WORLD COULD USE A FEW MORE DREAMERS’ | Meanwhile, in the Kingdom, Carol, her hair now long and white, marveled at the state of the community.”
““If they don’t go,” she declared, “I don’t go.” So back to Alexandria, they all went.”
“Though bringing along the newbies would break mom Michonne’s security protocol, Judith put her little foot down.”
“Despite his heroics, they still had to beat a hasty retreat.”
“When they found her with Yumiko, Magna, Connie, Kelly and Luke — and the herd not far behind — Eugene gave us a sense of how much things had changed over the course of the time jump by turning into an impressive walker-killing machine.”
“From there, we returned to the woods where Rosita, Eugene, Aaron and others were searching frantically for Judith.”
“And maybe most importantly, Michonne kept dreaming.”
“...flower Carol spotted blooming in concrete...”
“But it hasn t gotten any easier If anything the path ahead has only grown darker Yet she everyone clung to the little things like a toy cowboy that resembled Rick like the bird Daryl watched pluck a worm from a walker s ear to feed its babies like the...”


"Is there anything in this place that doesn't fall apart? "She asked Jerry back."
"The world needs more dreamers; meanwhile, in the Kingdom, Carol, whose hair is now long and white, is amazed at the state of the community."
"If they don't go," she said, "I won't go." So back in Alexandria, they all went
"Judith put her little foot down, even though bringing the new baby would break the safety agreement with her mother
"Despite his bravery, they had to retreat in a hurry."
"When they found out that she was with Yumiko, Magna, Connie, Kelly and Luke - and the cattle not far behind - Eugene made us feel how much things had changed over time and turned into an impressive walking killer."
"From there, we went back to the woods where Rosita, Eugene, Aaron and others were frantically searching for Judith."
"Perhaps most importantly, Michael has been dreaming."
“… Flowers blooming in concrete
"But if the road ahead gets darker and darker, it doesn't get easier, but everyone of her holds on to some small things, like a toy cowboy, like Rick, like a bird. Daryl looks at a bug pulled out of the walker's ear to feed his baby, like..."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in the video above.”
“Watch her play What’s Behind Me?”
“This Saturday will mark her sixth time hosting, and she’ll be accompanied by Nicki Minaj as the musical guest.”
“A former writer and cast member for the late-night sketch comedy series, Fey is already a member of the elite Five-Timer’s Club.”
““That’s his job.”The comedienne will return to her old Saturday Night Live stomping grounds this weekend to host the season finale.”
““That guy’s at work right now,” she joked, pointing to the hot dog.”
“As Fallon said, “You can’t unsee that.” But, Fey joked, “It’s surprisingly sexy.”Fey, a Tony nominee for her Mean Girls Broadway musical, didn’t realize there would be actual actors acting out these ridiculous scenes.”
“The first round saw King Kong holding a hot dog in a top hat, and the second round saw this Ghost-ly monstrosity.”
“...bit from way back when, Fallon and guest Tina Fey had to take turns getting the other to guess what absurd thing was standing behind them.”
“Reminiscent of a Who’s Line Is It Anyway?”


“… In the video above. "
"Watch her play with what's behind me?"
"This Saturday will be her sixth hosting and she will be accompanied by Nicky Minagi as a music guest."
"Fay used to be a screenwriter and actor in the late night comedy series, and now he's a member of the elite five."
"That's his job." The comedian will return to her old live show on Saturday night this weekend to hold the season's finale
"That guy is at work now," she joked, pointing to the hot dog
"As Fallon said," you can't see it. " But, Fei joked, "it's incredibly sexy." Fei, her Tony nominees for the Broadway musical mean girl, didn't realize that there would be real actors performing these ridiculous scenes
The first round saw King Kong wearing a hat with a hot dog, the second round saw the ghost
“…… Since a long time ago, Fallon and her guest, Tina Fey, have had to take turns asking each other to guess what's ridiculous behind them
"It reminds people of whose lines, doesn't it?"



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As an actor, to have an opportunity to have a writer of that caliber say, ‘We’re going to work on a new story every year and find a new character to play every year for the next few years,’ that’s just a bit of a dream, really.””
“Depp’s titular casting in The Crimes of Grindelwald has been a divisive flashpoint issue for the sequel due to his ex-wife Amber Heard’s claim he emotionally and physically abused her during their whirlwind marriage.”
“EW asked the actor about the uproar over Depp playing the infamous wizard Gillert Grindelwald in the upcoming film after the abuse allegations made by his ex-wife Amber Heard.”
“The film’s writer J.K. Rowling, director David Yates, and studio Warner Bros. have all issued statements defending the casting.”
“Some fans have been supportive of Depp’s involvement, while others are rather outraged.”
“It s a very hard thing for me Radcliffe said noting he wants to be supportive of the film s producers who gave me a great start in life and an amazing job But he added I can see why people are frustrated with the response that they were given...”
“...from that I m not saying anything that anybody hasn t already said and this is a weird analogy to draw but in the NFL there are lots of players arrested for smoking weed and there is other people s behavior that goes way beyond that and it s tolerated...”
“...because they re very famous players...”
“I suppose the thing I was struck by was we did have a guy who was reprimanded for weed on the original Potter film essentially so obviously what Johnny has been accused of is much greater than that Radcliffe is referring to actor Jamie Waylett who played Hogwarts bully Vincent...”
“Crabbe...”


"As an actor, it's a small dream to have such a talented writer say," we have to write a new story every year and find a new role to play every year in the next few years. "
"Depp's nominal role-playing in the crime of Greenwald has always been a divisive hot issue in the sequel, because his ex-wife amber Hurd claims that he abused her emotionally and physically in their whirlwind marriage."
"EW asked the actor about the uproar caused by Depp's role as the infamous wizard gillert Grindelwald in the upcoming movie, after his ex-wife amber heard about his abuse charges."
"The film's screenwriter J.K. Rowling, director David Yates and Warner Bros. studio all issued statements defending the cast."
"Some fans have always supported Depp's participation, while others are quite angry."
"It's a very difficult thing for me, Radcliffe said. He wants to support the filmmakers, who have given me a good start in life and a great job, but he added," I understand why people are frustrated with the response they get... "
"From this point of view, I have not said anything that anyone has not said. This is a strange analogy, but there are many players arrested for smoking marijuana in NFL, and other people's behavior goes far beyond this, which is tolerable..."
“… Because they are very famous players... "
"I want to be impressed that we did have a guy who was reprimanded for the weeds in the original Harry Potter movie, so it's obvious that Johnny's accusation is far more serious than the actor Jamie Willett who played the Hogwarts bully Vincent as Radcliffe pointed out..."
"Crabbe..."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It comforts me as a mother — because when you, as a mom, can’t give your kids what they need, it is a huge comfort to find people who can.””
““Obviously the difference is that Collin wasn’t there.”“I am comforted with the fact that my kids, all of them, each unique child, is receiving exactly what they need and that hasn’t changed,” she said.”
“On Monday’s episode, Kate Gosselin treated Aaden, Alexis, Hannah, Leah and Joel to a day of camping and glamping.”
“The kids played a slew of games together including archery tag before enjoying a bonfire, s’mores and cake.”
“Kate and her 16-year-old daughter Mady, who is twin to Cara, put their creative skills to the test decorating a large tent for the family.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But there was one notable absence: Kate’s 13-year-old son Collin, who has been enrolled in a program away from home to help him reach his full potential since last summer.”
““Thirteen — need we say more?” said Kate, 42, during an on-camera confessional after the sextuplets, minus Collin, gathered around the table to blow out their candles on their separate cakes.”
““The photos around the cake, I have them for every year, every child, every birthday,” explained Kate.”
““It’s definitely an iconic moment.”“This year [was] much like last year,” she continued.”


"It comforts me as a mother - because when you as a mother can't give your children what they need, it's a great comfort to find someone who can give them."
"The difference, obviously, is that Colin is not there." "I'm glad that my children, all of them, every unique child, have got what they need, and that hasn't changed," she said
"On Monday's show, Kate Gosselin invites Eden, Alexis, Hannah, Leah and Joel to go camping and have a day."
"The children played a lot of games together, including archery, and then enjoyed the bonfire, s'mores and cake."
"Kate and her 16-year-old daughter, Maddy, are Kara's twins. They tested their creativity when decorating a big tent for their home."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"But there is one obvious absence: Kate's 13-year-old son Colin, who started a runaway project last summer to help him reach his full potential."
"Thirteen - do we need to say more? Kate, 42, said at a public confession that there was no Colin in the sextuples and that they gathered at the table to blow out the candles on their respective cakes
"I have pictures around the cake every year, every child, every birthday," Kate explained
"This is definitely a landmark moment." "This year is very much like last year," she continued



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please share!”
“Did you like Vanessa’s look?”
“Step 4: Dust Schwarzkopf essence Ultime Diamond Color & Radiance Shine Boost Tonic over the hair for added shine and glimmer.”
“Apply a shine spray like Schwarzkopf styliste Ultime Crystal Shine & Hold Laminating Shine Hair Spray to secure the look.”
“Repeat with remaining hair on other side of the face; creating a full braid crown.”
“Once complete, bring the braid to the opposite side of the face and secure above the ear with bobby pins.”
“Step 3: Take the remaining pieces of hair left in the previous step and create a braid on either side of the face.”
“Prep and finish the curls with a spray such as Schwarzkopf styliste Ultime Biotin+ Volume & Texture H2O-Free Hair Spray for added texture and hold.”
“Step 2: Leaving a few thick pieces around the face, use an inch curling iron to begin creating soft, deconstructed waves.”
“Collins used Schwarzkopf styliste Crystal Shine & Hold Heat Protection Shine Spray throughout Vanessa’s hair.”


"Please share!"
"Do you like Vanessa?"
The fourth step: apply the Dust Schwarzkopf essence Ultime Diamond Color&Radiance Shine Boost supplements to the hair to increase the luster and luster.
"Use bright spray such as Schwarzkopf styliste Ultime Crystal shine&Hold laminate spray to ensure appearance."
"Put the rest of your hair on the other side of your face and repeat; create a complete braid crown."
When you're done, pull the braid to the other side of your face and clip it over your ears
"Step 3: braid the remaining hair on both sides of your face."
"Schwartz coppf styliste Ultime Biotin+Volume&Texture does not contain H2O hair spray and other sprays to prepare and modify curls to enhance texture and retention."
"Step two: leave some thick pieces on your face and start to create soft, deconstructed waves with a one inch curler."
"Collins used Schwarzkopf stylist crystal lustre and heat preservation spray in Vanessa's hair."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO:”
“Hargitay and Ice T Terri Bindi and Robert Irwin and Academy Award winners Emma Thompson Sally Field and Jane Fonda...”
“The first month of the 22nd season will include guests such as Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States Sonia Sotomayor former Secretary of State John Kerry Senator Charles Schumer Stormy Daniels Wendy Williams actors such as Kristen Bell America Ferrera Ricky Gervais Taraji P Henson Mariska...”
“It also marks Behar’s 20th season on the show.”
“...premieres Tuesday Sept 4 at 11 a m on ABC”
“We can t wait to return to the Hot Topics table with Abby joining our panel of incredibly talented women whose diverse voices have always played a significant role in the national conversation The 22nd season of the talk show that dives into politics pop culture celebrity interviews and news...”
“...culture to politics to parenthood...”
“Joining the women at The View really is a dream come true Senior executive producer Hilary Estey McLoughlin was also excited to welcome Huntsman to the show saying She brings her unique life and professional experiences and has a smart relatable and distinctive point of view on everything from pop...”
““I look forward to adding my own point of view to the most interesting and successful talk show on television today.”
“She comes from Fox News, where she most recently served as co-host of “Fox & Friends Weekend.”“I couldn’t be more be excited to return to my professional roots at ABC News,” said Huntsman, who began her journalism career at ABC.”


Related videos:
"Haggerty and Bing t. tribendi and Robert Owen and Oscar winners Emma Thompson, Sally Field and Jane Fonda..."
"Guests in the first month of season 22 will include Sonia Sotomayor, deputy justice of the Supreme Court of the United States, John Kerry, former Secretary of state, Charles Schumer, Tommy Daniels, Wendy Williams, actor Christine bell, Ferreira Richie gervis, taraji Henson Mariska..."
"It also marks the 20th season of Bihar."
“… Premiere at ABC on Tuesday, September 4, at 11 a.m
"We can't wait to get back to the hot topic table. Abby joined our group of talented women whose voices have always played an important role in the national dialogue. This is the 22nd season of the talk show, involving politics, popular culture, celebrity interviews and news... "
“… From culture to politics to parenthood. "
"It's a dream come true for women to join the viewing. Hilary Estey McLoughlin, senior executive producer, is also very excited to welcome Huntsman to the show. She said that she has brought her unique life and professional experience and has a smart, reliable and unique view on all aspects of pop music..."
"I'm looking forward to adding my own perspective to the most interesting and successful talk show on TV today."
"She's from Fox News, where she recently co hosted Fox and friends weekend. "I can't be happier to go back to my career as ABC News," Huntsman said



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Veep is expected to return next spring.”
“I look forward.”
“Saks Fifth Avenue asked if I wanted to be their Key to the Cure ambassador and it seemed like a good fit and the timing worked out well said Louis Dreyfus adding that the money raised will benefit the AiRS Alliance in Reconstructive Surgery Foundation which offers financial support to...”
“The Seinfeld alum has signed on to her first cancer awareness initiative, helping Carolina Herrera designer Wes Gordon design a T-shirt for Saks Fifth Avenue's 20th year raising money through its Key to the Cure program.”
“Part of the "next thing" for Louis-Dreyfus is advocating for other breast cancer patients.”
““I’m always just moving on, you know?"”
“We’ll finish an episode, and I am just ready for the next thing," she added.”
“That’s how I operate.”
“"I’m not someone who likes looking back.”
“Season six of Veep, which aired its finale in June 2017, ended with Meyer deciding to run for president again and rescinding her plan to settle into life as an ex-president.”


"Veep is expected to return next spring."
"I'm looking forward to it."
"Saks Fifth Avenue asked me if I wanted to be the key to their healing ambassador, which seemed appropriate and well timed," Louis Dreyfus added, adding that the funds raised would benefit the airs Alliance for reconstructive surgery foundation, which provides To provide financial support. "
"Seinfeld's alumni has signed her first cancer awareness program, helping Carolina ereira's designer Wes Gordon design a T-shirt to raise money for Saks Fifth Avenue through its" cure key "program for 20 years."
Part of Louis Dreyfus's "next thing" is advocacy for other breast cancer patients
"I'm always moving on, you know?"
"We're going to finish one episode and I'm ready for the next," she added
"That's how I do it."
"I'm not the kind of person who likes to look back."
With the last episode of veep Season 6 broadcast in June 2017, Meyer decided to run for president again and canceled her plan to settle down as the current president



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Everybody spoke, everybody got to know each other and it was just an amazing night."”
“"We all sat at one table, in a little quiet room; no press, no nothing.”
“"James put this amazing dinner together and it just humanized the entire thing," said the Call Me by Your Name star.”
“Everyone picked one year and said what they were doing at that point in their life.”
“Franco made the big toast of the night, but all of the men went around the room to address the group, Hammer added when speaking to Seacrest on the red carpet.”
“The men commemorated the event with a group photo that several shared on social media.”
“Franco broke bread with Tom Hanks, Gary Oldman, Sam Rockwell, Timothee Chalamet, Steve Carell, Richard Jenkins, Hugh Jackman, Ansel Elgort, Armie Hammer and Daniel Kaluuya.”
“Franco said, adding that he asked himself, "How many times has this happened?"”
“"Why not?"”
“Inspired by her event, Franco threw a celebratory party of his own and invited all of the male Golden Globe nominees for best actor and best supporting actor to a dinner the night before the big event.”


"Everyone said it, everyone got to know each other, it was a wonderful night."
"We all sat at a table, in a quiet little room, with no reporters, nothing."
"James put this wonderful dinner together to make the whole thing more human," said the star who called me your name
"Everyone chose a year to say what they were doing at that moment of their life."
Speaking to Seacrest on the red carpet, hammer added: "Franco gave a toast that night, but everyone was talking around the room."
"These people commemorate the event with a few pictures they shared on social media."
Franco has bread with Tom Hanks, Gary Alderman, Sam Rockwell, Timothy chalamit, Steve Carrell, Richard Jenkins, Hugh Jackman, Ansel elgott, Amy hammer and Daniel carua
Franco said, and he asked himself, "how many times has this happened?"
"Why not?"
Inspired by her, Franco held his own celebration party and invited all the male nominees for best actor and best supporting actor of the Golden Globe awards to have dinner the night before the big event



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The controversial dress code caused many to speak out in fury in 2015 after a group of women wearing flat shoes were reportedly turned away from seeing a screening of Carol.”
“It does not appear she was sanctioned for her rebellious act - although she took them off, she did wear her high heels for part of the red carpet and was photographed in them.”
“After taking off her shoes on the red carpet in front of photographers, she proceeded to climb the stairs barefoot.”
“Ms Stewart kicked off her black Louboutins on the "BlacKkKlansman", turning heads and causing some to wonder whether it was done as a show against the footwear rule.”
“The Cannes red carpet has become infamous in recent years for its high heels only policy, with actresses speaking out against it.”
“Kristen Stewart made a statement on the Cannes red carpet on Monday night, removing her heels seemingly in protest at the strict dress code.”


"It is reported that this controversial dress code caused a lot of anger after a group of women in flat shoes were refused to watch the screening of Carol in 2015."
"It seems that she has not been punished for her rebellious behavior - although she took off her high heels, she did wear some high heels on the red carpet and was photographed wearing high heels."
After taking off her shoes on the red carpet in front of the photographer, she began to climb the stairs barefoot
Ms. Stewart kicked off her black louboutin shoes on "black Lansman" and turned her head to make some people wonder if it was a violation of footwear rules
"In recent years, Cannes red carpet has become infamous for its policy of wearing only high heels, and actresses have expressed their opposition."
In a statement on the red carpet in Cannes on Monday night, Kristen Stewart appears to have taken off his high heels in protest against the strict dress code



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact Tom Schad at tschad@usatoday.com or on Twitter @Tom_Schad.”
“More Olympic world not better off after USOC s Scott Blackmun resigning Related American gymnasts detail sexual abuse to legislators on Capitol Hill Larry Nassar case Parents lash out You violated our daughters Moore s sister Kamerin also is a victim and spoke during her victim impact statement in January...”
“A male gymnast alleges in a lawsuit filed Wednesday that he was sexually abused by Larry Nassar, becoming the first known male victim to file suit against the former USA Gymnastics and Michigan State team doctor.”
“In one of six amended complaints filed in federal court Wednesday as part of a civil suit against Nassar, USA Gymnastics and Michigan State, Jacob Moore claims that he was sexually abused and harassed by Nassar in 2016.”
“According to the amended complaint, which was obtained by USA TODAY Sports on Thursday night, Moore alleges that he went to Nassar's home to receive treatment for a shoulder injury when he was 16 years old.”
“After a female gymnast, who was also a minor at the time, entered the basement where Nassar was treating Moore, the doctor pulled down Moore's pants and exposed him to the female, according to the complaint.”
“Nassar told Moore that he would treat the gymnast's shoulder injury "through acupuncture in his pubic area and in and around his genitalia," then proceeded to do so.”
“"There is no known medical connection between shoulder pain which can be treated through acupuncture in the area of a male’s genitalia," the complaint states.”
“The amended complaint first was reported by International Gymnast Magazine.”
“Moore, who now is a gymnast at the University of Michigan, joins the more than 260 women and girls who have told law enforcement that they were sexually abused by Nassar.”


"Contact Tom shad tschad@usatoday.com Or in Twitter@Tom \On Schu Schad
"After the resignation of Scott Blackman of the US Olympic Committee, more Olympic world has not become better. The relevant US gymnasts explained the case of sexual abuse of Larry Nasar to members of Congress in detail. The parents strongly criticized you for violating our daughter Moore's sister carmeline, who was also a victim, and spoke in her victim impact statement in January..."
A male gymnast filed a lawsuit on Wednesday claiming that he was the first known male victim of sexual abuse by Larry Nasar, suing the former U.S. gymnast and Michigan team doctor
"Jacob Moore filed six amended appeals in federal court on Wednesday, including a civil lawsuit against Nasr, the American Gymnastics Association and Michigan, claiming that he was sexually abused and harassed by Nasr in 2016."
"According to a revised complaint obtained by today's American sports on Thursday night, Moore claimed that he went to Nasar's home for shoulder treatment when he was 16 years old."
"According to the complaint, a female gymnast, who was also a minor at the time, entered Nasser's basement where Moore was treated, and the doctor pulled down Moore's pants and exposed him to the female gymnast."
Nasar told Moore that he would treat the gymnast's shoulder injury "by needling his pudenda and genitals inside and outside" and then continue to do so
"There is no known medical link that shoulder pain can be treated with acupuncture in the male genital area," the complaint noted
The revised complaint was first reported in the international gymnastics journal
Moore, now a gymnast at the University of Michigan, told law enforcement along with more than 260 women and girls that they had been sexually abused by Nassar



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know all about it in the comments section, below.”
“Have you ever had this kind of experience in Galway?”
“...ed got a galway girl tattoo and it actually says 'galway grill' :)) pic.twitter.com/yQ0jUSJZVY — amy (@leg0_h0use) April 16, 2017What do you think of Ed Sheeran’s Galway Girl video?”
“You may remember that the singer wished to have “Galway Girl” in the the 23-year-old actress’s handwriting tattooed on his arm but in the spirit of the fun-loving, slightly reckless character she was playing, the New-York born Carlow woman gave him “Galway Grill” instead.”
“Most importantly, however, “Galway Girl” also shows off the now infamous tattoo that Ronan pranked Sheeran into acquiring.”
“...video...”
“Read more Ed Sheeran s Irish granny hears his song about her for the first time VIDEO The campaign worked down to a tee and the Hession School dancers who have regularly featured alongside Fusion Fighters this year look more than excited to dance for the English singer in the...”
“The dancers were taking part in a campaign run by Irish dance influencers Fusion Fighters, who started off #Step4Sheeran to get the global Irish dance community involved in the bid for Sheeran to include dancers in the video.”
“Not only that, but the dancers in question were none other than the Hession School of Dance and World champion dancers Matthew Gardiner and Claire Greaney who wowed us earlier this year with their choreography to Sheeran’s songs.”
“The 26-year-old Grammy-award winner was even spotted taking a selfie with some Irish dancers and stopping on Shop Street in Galway to watch a busker, all of which was caught on camera and featured in the video.”


"Please give us all the information in the comments section below."
"Have you ever had such an experience in Galway?"
“… ED has a Galway Girl Tattoo that says "Galway barbecue":) pic.twitter.com/yq0jusjvy -Amy (@ leg0 / u h0use) April 16, 2017, what do you think of ED Sheeran's Galway girl video? "
"You may remember that the singer wanted to tattoo the 23-year-old actress's handwriting" Galway girl "on her arm, but in the spirit of her funny, slightly reckless role, the New York born Ms. Carlo gave him" Galway barbecue "
"But most importantly, Galway girl also shows the now infamous tattoo that Ronan's prank got to Sheren."
“… Video... "
"To learn more, ed Sheeran's Irish grandmother heard his song about her for the first time. The campaign lasted to a tee. The dancers from hayson school often appeared next to fusion fighters this year. They seemed very excited to dance for the British singer..."
"The dancers participated in an event sponsored by fusion fighters, an Irish dance influencer. They launched step4sheeran, which involved the global Irish dance industry in bidding for Sheeran to include dancers in the video."
"Not only that, but the dancers involved are none other than the Hessian school and world champion dancers Matthew Gardner and Claire greyne, who surprised us with their choreography for Sheeran's songs earlier this year."
"The 26 year old Grammy winner was even photographed with some Irish dancers and stopped at the store street in Galway to watch the buskers perform, all of which were captured by the camera and shown in the video."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I love you so much!””
“Thank you so much for your support with this album and to my entire career,” she says.”
““Wow, I just heard that we won the Best Latin Pop Album of the Year, and this is unbelievable.”
“RELATED: Shakira Opens Up About Son Sasha’s Illness After Canceling Performances: ‘Everything Is Under Control Now’While the Colombian pop star was unable to make it to the show, she took to Instagram to thank all of her fans in two video messages in English and Spanish.”
“Last month, the singer made Grammy history when she became the first female artist to win twice in the Best Latin Pop Album category for her album El Dorado.”
“Muy bien, Milan!” Shakira, 41, compliments in the background.”
““Muy bien, Sasha!”
““Training with mom,” she captioned an adorable video of her boys practicing on the court with their instructor.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The “Perro Fiel” singer showcased her up-and-coming tennis pros on Instagram Friday, featuring Milan, 5, and 3-year-old Sasha‘s impressive racket skills while sporting mini versions of soccer star dad Gerard Piqué‘s jersey.”


"I love you so much!"
"Thank you very much for your support for this album and for your support for my entire career," she said
"Wow, I just heard that we won the best Latin Pop Album of the year. It's unbelievable."
"Related reports: after canceling the performance, Shakira disclosed her son Sasha's condition:" everything is under control ". Although the Colombian pop star was unable to attend the performance, she left two video messages in English and Spanish on instagram to thank all fans."
Last month, the singer made Grammy history by becoming the first female singer to win the best Latin Pop Album award twice for her album El Dorado
"Meibian, Milan! "Shakira, 41, set in praise."
"Meibian, Sasha!"
"Train with mom," she wrote in a lovely video of her children practicing on the court with their teachers
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The "Perot Phil" singer showed off her budding tennis pro on instagram on Friday, showcasing the impressive racket skills of five-year-old Milan and three-year-old Sasha, as well as the mini version of football star dad Gerard Pique's shirt



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They also say there's no evidence she was distracted by an electronic device.”
“Police say in the report there was no evidence Venus was under the influence of drugs or alcohol.”
“According to the police report, "[Venus] is at fault for violating the right of way of [the other driver]."”
“Cops say Venus caused the accident.”
“Barson's wife was also taken to the hospital with broken bones and other injuries, but survived ... according to her attorney Michael Steinger.”
“He never recovered and died 2 weeks later.”
“The driver's husband, Jerome Barson, suffered head trauma and was taken to a hospital and placed in ICU.”
“Venus told cops she was trying to make it through the intersection but there was a traffic backup and she had to slow down to a crawl, with her car exposed in the intersection.”
“The other driver says there was no time to stop and she T-boned Venus' vehicle.”
“The driver of the other car -- the wife of the victim -- told cops she was approaching an intersection westbound in Palm Beach Gardens, Florida on June 9 when Venus' northbound SUV suddenly darted into the intersection.”


"They also said there was no evidence that she was distracted by electronic devices."
"Police said there was no evidence in the report that Venus was affected by drugs or alcohol."
"According to the police report," Venus violated (another driver's) right of way at fault. "
"The police said Venus caused the accident."
"Basson's wife was also sent to the hospital due to fracture and other injuries, but survived... Her lawyer, Michael steinger, said
"He never recovered and died two weeks later."
"The driver's husband, Jerome Basson, suffered head injuries and was taken to hospital and placed in intensive care unit."
"Venus told the police that she was trying to cross the intersection, but there was a traffic backup, she had to slow down and crawl, and her car was exposed at the intersection."
"Another driver said there was no time to stop. She crashed Venus' car."
"The driver of the other car, the victim's wife, told police that on June 9, she was approaching a westbound intersection in Palm Beach Garden, Florida, when Venus' northbound SUV suddenly rushed into the intersection."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementIn reality, Princess is supposed to give birth in the summertime.”
“Even her pals were in on it, as they made sure to spill some water onto the floor to make the whole thing more convincing.”
“Princess Love pranked Ray J on April Fools’ Day, and it was epic!”
“Check out his reaction that was caught on camera here.”
“To mark the first day of April, the woman pretended to go into labor, and she really got her husband good!”
“Princess Love took to social media to share the video with her followers, and everyone loved the man’s crazy reaction to her water supposedly breaking.”
“‘Got @RayJ good after his show last night #APRILFOOLS,’ she captioned the post.”
“The video shows The Love and Hip Hop: Hollywood star in an elevator alongside her hubby and a few friends.”
“At some point, Princess Love fools Ray J that her water broke and, like any first-time-father-to-be, he freaks out big time.”
“‘Her water just broke,’ they pretended to notice.”


"In fact, the princess should be born in summer."
"Even her friends were involved because they had to pour some water on the floor to make the whole thing more convincing."
"Love princess in April Fool's Day prank RAY J, this is Epic!"
"Look at his reaction to the camera here."
"To commemorate the first day of April, the woman pretended to give birth. She really made a good job of her husband!"
"Princess love shared this video with her followers on social media, and everyone liked the man's crazy reaction to her water cut-off."
"Reggie did well after last night's show April flower," she wrote in the title of the post
"This video shows love and hip-hop: Hollywood stars in the elevator with their husbands and a few friends."
"At some point, love Princess fooled RAY J, because her water broke, and, like any first-time father, he lost his temper."
"Her water just broke," they pretended to notice



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on Kim Kardashian:Now, check out Kim Kardashian's style evolution:Follow Devon Abelman on Twitter and Instagram.”
“KKW Beauty officially launches Wednesday, June 21, on kkwbeauty.com.”
“Over the past week, people made up stories about them being in competition, but the reality is nothing like that.”
“Two sisters can have their own makeup companies without malicious intent.”
“In a recent interview with Women's Wear Daily, Kardashian broke down the differences between KKW Beauty and Kylie Cosmetics.”
“Spoiler alert: They are completely different — just take their ages and audiences as the biggest indicator.”
“Even though KKW Beauty and Kylie Cosmetics are produced by Seed Beauty (the parent company for ColourPop as well) and they both started off with kits, the beauty brands have different focuses.”
“Kylie Cosmetics has firmly marked its territory in the lip category with the popular Lip Kit (and Jenner's infamous plump pout).”
“KKW Beauty, on the other hand, will focus on what the Kardashians are known for: contouring.”
“That's where the new beauty brand's first product, a cream contouring kit, comes in.”


"More about Kim K. adashan: now, take a look at Kim Kardashian's style evolution: follow Abelman on German twitter and instagram."
"Kkw beauty was officially launched on Wednesday, June 21 kkwbeauty.com Website. "
"In the past week, people have made up stories about their participation in the competition, but that's not the case."
"The sisters can have their own make-up company, no malice."
"In a recent interview with women's wear daily, Kardashian analyzed in detail the differences between kkw beauty and Kelly cosmetics."
"Spoiler Alert: they're totally different - just their age and audience as the biggest indicators."
"Although both kkw beauty and Kylie cosmetics are produced by seed beauty, the parent company of colorpop, and both start with suits, the two beauty brands have different focuses."
"Kylie cosmetics is a popular label for lipstick (and Jenna's notorious repute), which is a symbol of its status in the lip area."
"Kkw beauty, on the other hand, will focus on what the kardashians are familiar with: silhouette."
"This is the first product launched by the new beauty brand, and it is the cream of the cream."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The road to their "Fuller House" is a show we can't stop watching!”
“We can only imagine the beautiful babe these two will make ... and the elaborate social media post they'll make to announce his or her birth.”
“The exciting journey for the couple is enough to make us say, "Have mercy!"”
“In fact, he revealed, the news prompted him to make their relationship engagement-official.”
“Stamos explained to People magazine that McHugh became pregnant shortly before the pair were engaged.”
“Rachel Murray / Getty ImagesIn December, the couple shared the happy news that they were expecting a baby.”
“Could they be any cuter?”
“The "Fuller House" star got engaged to McHugh in October and later declared their intention to start a family, saying it would be "a tragedy" if they didn't have kids together.”
“If that's not the very definition of glowing, we don't know what is!”
“"Good morning baby of mine," McHugh wrote, captioning the photo apparently taken by Stamos.”


"The road to their fuller house is a show we can't stop watching!"
"We can only imagine that these two people will become a beautiful baby... And the elaborate posts they will post on social media announcing his or her birth. "
"The couple's exciting journey is enough to say: 'be merciful!"
"In fact, he revealed that the news prompted him to make their relationship a formal engagement."
"Stamos explained to people that McHugh was pregnant shortly before their engagement."
Last December, the couple shared the good news that they were pregnant
"Can they be more lovely?"
"The star of Fuller's house got engaged to McHugh in October this year, and later announced that he planned to start a family, saying that if they didn't have children together, it would be" a tragedy. "
"If that's not the definition of luminescence, we don't know what luminescence is!"
"Good morning, my baby," McHugh wrote, noting in the title that it was apparently Stamos



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jackson, 58, wore a black suit that had been tailored during his wardrobe makeover, in addition to a shirt given to him by France!”
“...his big day...”
“We have always loved each other that never stopped whether we were together or not While the fab five Bobby Berk Antoni Porowski Jonathan Van Ness Tan France and Karamo Brown didn t attend the ceremony the groom s appearance on Queer Eye played a part in his attire for...”
“We have been best friends for 12 years and we have known each other for 12 years,” Parr told Us at the time.”
““Thomas and I, we have never really been apart, apart.”
“Following the episode airing, he later announced on Twitter that not only had he and Parr had gotten back together, but they were now engaged!”
““Tom was grinning from ear to ear!”As previously reported, Jackson was transformed on the Netflix reboot of the hit series, during which the demise of his first marriage to Parr was explained.”
“Tom looked happy and excited as I walked down the aisle – I was looking at him looking at me and he was smiling as I walked down the aisle!” the bride, 52 — who wore an Oleg Cassini dress and a matching jeweled headpiece — tells Us.”
“I was marrying the love of my life.”
““I was excited and happy!”


"Jackson is 58 years old. Besides a shirt given to him by France, he is also wearing a black suit customized during the transformation of the wardrobe!"
“… His big day... "
"We love each other all the time, whether we are together or not, and we never stop, while five-year-old Bobbie Burke Anthony Borowski, Jonathan van nistein France and kalamo Brown did not attend the wedding, and the groom's appearance in strange eye played a role in his dress..."
"We've been best friends for 12 years, and we've known each other for 12 years," Parr told us at the time
"Thomas and I, we've never really separated, separated."
After the episode, he later announced on twitter that he and PAL are not only reunited, but they are engaged now! "
"Tom couldn't shut his mouth! "As previously reported, Jackson changed when Netflix restarted the hit show, during which the end of his first marriage with Parr was explained."
"When I walk down the aisle, Tom looks happy and excited - I look at him, I look at me, when I walk down the aisle, he smiles! "The 52 year old bride told us that she was wearing an Oleg Cassini dress and a jewel on her head."
"I married the love of my life."
"I'm excited, I'm happy!"



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET on MTV.”
“Teen Wolf will launch its final season on Sunday, July 30 at 8 p.m.”
“And while they were there they shared yet another trailer with the audience and this one showed a bit more of Gerard who s building an army to kill all the werewolves gave fans a few more glimpses at a Scott Malia romance and showed just how powerful fear can...”
“...be...”
“But Scott and his pack aren’t backing down from who/whatever this new villain is, and from the looks of it, it’s not pretty.”
“In addition to the trailer, cast members Tyler Posey, Shelley Hennig, Khylin Rhambo, Dylan Sprayberry, Cody Christian, Charlie Carver, and surprise guest Dylan O’Brien joined showrunner Jeff Davis for a panel moderated by fellow cast members Linden Ashby and Melissa Ponzio.”
“The panel kicked off with a video message from Tyler Hoechlin and Ian Bohen, who introduced a clip of Derek Hale’s big return.”
“(Spoiler: Gerard is back to hunting, and, for some reason, he wants Derek.)”
“The cast then boarded the stage to talk about six years of life in Beacon Hills.”
“Within minutes, both Posey and O’Brien got emotional when discussing their journeys on the show.”


"Et on MTV."
"Little wolf" will launch its final season at 8 p.m. on Sunday, July 30
"When they were there, they shared another Trailer with the audience, which showed more of Gerrard's story. He was building an army to kill all the werewolves, and let fans see more of Scott Maria's romantic stories, and showed how powerful fear was..."
“… Yes... "
"But Scott and his team didn't flinch because of who / what this new villain is, and from the outside, it's not beautiful."
"In addition to the trailer, actors Taylor Posey, Shelley Hennig, kylin Rambo, Dylan spreberry, Cody Christian, Charlie Carver and surprise guest Dylan O'Brien also joined the program hosted by other actors Linden Ashby and Melissa Ponzio."
"The group meeting opened with a video of Tyler hodgling and Ian bohen, who introduced Derek Hale's return."
"(spoiler: Gerald's hunting again, and for some reason, he wants Derek.)
"The actors then stepped on the stage and talked about their six-year life in Beacon Hill."
"Within minutes, Posey and O'Brien were excited when they discussed their journey on the show."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Noel’s next album is coming out a month later in November.”
“It’s like Prince’, I was like, ‘Without even hearing it, I can assure you it’s not like Prince!’”AdvertisementLiam is expected to release his debut solo album ‘As You Were’ in October.”
“Which, quite frankly, my cat could have written in about 10 minutes!”He added: “I don’t mind the song, my wife was falling over herself, ‘Have you heard Harry Styles’ new song?”
“They sit in their garage and write shite like ‘Sign of the Times’ for Harry Styles.”
“...star saying People of my age have let themselves go they re fat balding idiots with fading tattoos...”
“Speaking to Pitchfork Gallagher said I may look stupid but wouldn t dare get on the wrong side of One Direction fans Despite Liam s warm words about Styles brother Noel Gallagher has spoken less favourably of the ex 1D”
“Did they flip a coin and he said, ‘Listen, I’m doing the rap one’.”Liam recently said that he “wouldn’t dare” anger One Direction fans.”
“How did that happen?”
“...change his direction Advertisement He then alluded to Payne by saying At least he s not gone rap like the other one...”
“Having recently praised Harry Styles in interview with NME former Oasis frontman Gallagher has now told The Sun on Sunday I can spot a fake a mile off and Harry Styles seems like he wants to bring real music and...”


"Noel's next album will be released in November in a month's time."
"Just like a prince," I said, "never heard of it. I can assure you it's not like a prince! "Advertising Liam is expected to release his first solo album," so it is, "in October
"Frankly, my cat can write it in about 10 minutes! He added: "I don't mind the song. My wife is just dumping herself on it." have you heard Harry stiles' new song? "
"They're sitting in the garage, writing a shitty time symbol for Harry stiles."
“… The star said that people of my age let themselves go. They are fat bald idiots with faded tattoos... "
"In an interview with pitchfork Gallagher, he said that I may look stupid, but I dare not stand on the wrong side of one-way fans. Despite Liam's passionate words about fashion, my brother Noel Gallagher's evaluation of the top 1D is not so good."
"When they tossed coins, he said," listen, I'm singing rap. " Liam recently said he "dare not" infuriate fans
"How could that be?"
“… Change his direction, and then he alludes to Penn saying, at least he didn't go rap like another... "
"In a recent interview with NME, I praised Harry stiles. Former oasis band leader William Gallagher told the sun on Sunday that I could find a fake one a mile away. Harry stiles seemed to want to bring real music, and..."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Though they never addressed it, stars like Beyoncé, Rihanna, Eva Longoria, Lil' Kim and Jennifer Lopez were suspected of altering their complexion to appear lighter.”
“Sosa isn't the only celebrity to be accused of lightening his skin.”
“The former athlete has sported a lighter skin tone for years, but his most recent picture further confused netizens: Not only was Sosa's skin lighter, he was wearing a red cowboy hat and a country Western shirt.”
“Barstool Sports podcast host Dan Katz was a fan of "cowboy Sammy."”
“"The craziest part about the Cowboy Sammy picture is that I just assumed it was an old picture because the 'weird Sammy Sosa picture' catalogue has gotten so big nothing new shocks me," he tweeted.”
“Cowboy Sammy is such a God Damn G. #BringSammyBack pic.twitter.com/lhSLPGuIz8 — Big Cat (@BarstoolBigCat) February 11, 2018While Katz might be numb to Sosa's new look, not many Twitter users shared the same opinion.”
“Plenty were still shocked to see the former Chicago Cubs star with lighter skin.”
“Sammy Sosa outchea looking like a peppermint in the bottom of my purse.”
“...https t co PXWOB05PWK April ReignOfApril February 11 2018 Sammy Sosa looking like Peter Griffin pic twitter com MGgxetHeiK â Cameron Grant coolcam101 February 11 2018 I need a 30For30 documentary on the decline of Sammy Sosa mental health cuz this is ridiculous pic twitter com ckyXR2axIp Desmond James james_desmond...”
“February 11 2018 So why is Sosa in a cowboy getup...”


"Although they never mentioned it, stars like Beyonce, Rihanna, Eva Longoria, lil king and Jennifer Lopez are suspected of changing their skin color to make them look lighter."
"Sousa is not the only celebrity accused of turning white."
"The former athlete has maintained a lighter complexion for many years, but his recent photo has made netizens even more confused: Sosa is not only lighter complexion, but also wearing a red cowboy hat and a country western shirt."
Barstool sports podcast host Dan Katz is a fan of Sammy the cowboy
"The craziest thing about Sammy the cowboy is that I thought it was an old picture, because the catalogue of" strange Sammy Sosa pictures "has become so huge that nothing new has shocked me," he tweeted
"Sammy the cowboy is a damned g. # brin samyback picture: twitter.com/lhSLPGuIz8 -Big cat (@ barstoolbigcat) February 11, 2018 although Katz may be numb to Sosa's new look, not many Twitter users have the same view
"A lot of people are still shocked to see that the former Chicago Cubs star has a lighter complexion."
"Sammy Sosa Ochia looks like a mint in my wallet."
“… HTTPS t Co pxwob05pwk April 11, 2018 Sami Sosa looks like Peter Griffin pic twitter com mggxetheik – Cameron grant coolcam101 February 11, 2018 I need a 30 minute documentary about Sami Sosa's mental health decline because it's so ridiculous pic twitter com ckyxr2axip Desmond James è Desmond... "
"On February 11, 2018, why is Sosa wearing jeans..."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At the Healers camp, Cole and Jessica bonded over a fishing trip, while Joe began looking for a hidden immunity idol.”
“At the Hustlers camp, Simone was pleased with her conquering of the outdoors, but her bragging and laziness set most of her tribemates off, while Ali approached Simone about working together.”
“At the Hustlers tribe, Patrick and Ali aligned, while Ryan learned his "secret advantage," was a "super immunity idol" that can be played after the votes are read.”
“At the Heroes tribe, a majority formed between Alan, Ashley, Ben, and JP, but Alan was at odds with Ashley and JP over their closer bond, calling them a "power couple" before accusing JP of having an idol.”
“The next day, Mike decided to look for a hidden immunity idol, but Joe became suspicious of Mike's absence and confronted him over what he had been doing.”
“The Healers tribe had no problem creating fire with their kit, while Jessica developed an attraction towards Cole.”
“The Healers and Heroes came in first and second, respectively, while the Hustlers went completely off course.”
“During the challenge, Ryan found a secret advantage.”
“The losers will go back to camp with no fire-making tools.”
“The second tribe to light their torch will win flint.”


"In the convalescent camp, Cole and Jessica got married on a fishing trip, while Joe began to look for a hidden idol."
"At the swindler camp, Simone is happy to conquer the outdoors, but her boasting and laziness make most of her tribal partners unhappy, and Ali asks Simone to work together."
"In the swindler tribe, Patrick formed an alliance with ALI, while Ryan learned his" secret advantage ", which is a" super immunity Idol "that can be played after the vote is read out."
"In the hero tribe, Alan, Ashley, Ben and JP form a majority, but Alan, Ashley and JP have differences because of their closer relationship, calling them" power couple ", and then accusing JP of having idols."
"The next day, Mike decided to find a hidden idol, but Joe began to doubt Mike's absence and confront him about what he had been doing."
"It's OK for the healers to make a fire with their equipment, and Jessica has an attraction for Cole."
"The healer and the hero come first and second, respectively, while the swindler is completely off track."
"In the challenge, Ryan found a secret advantage."
"The loser will return to the camp, no fire tools."
"The second tribe to light the torch will win flint."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In addition, a petition was created on Change.org, titled “Somebody Save Meek Mill,” that called for Tom Wolf, Governor of Pennsylvania, to reevaluate the rapper’s sentencing.”
“Image zoom Meek Mill | Credit: Pennsylvania Department of CorrectionsAfter news of the November 2017 sentencing, many celebrities, including JAY-Z, voiced their support for Mill while criticizing the legal system.”
“After serving five months in prison at Pennsylvania State Correctional Institution at Graterford in Montgomery County, the rapper, born Robert Rihmeek William, was released on Tuesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Hours later, he shared a video of an awaiting helicopter and was spotted leaving the correctional facility in the chopper.”
“Not long after, Mill had a homecoming-like reception at the Wells Fargo Center ahead of the hometown team’s Game 5 against the Miami Heat.”
“(Mill also served as the pregame bell ringer.)”
“Mill, 30, was sentenced in November 2017 for a minimum of two years for violating probation in a 2008 gun and drug case by getting arrested twice.”
“I d like to thank God my family my friends my attorneys my team at Roc Nation including JAY Z Desiree Perez my good friend Michael Rubin my fans The Pennsylvania Supreme Court and all my public advocates for their love support and encouragement during this difficult time Mill said...”
“...in a statement obtained by PEOPLE which was also tweeted by the hitmaker...”


"In addition, a petition is changing. Org's save the meek mill, calling on Pennsylvania governor Tom wolf to reassess rapper's verdict
"Picture zoom meek mill | credit: many celebrities, including Jay-Z, expressed their support for mill while criticizing the legal system after the release of the sentencing by the Pennsylvania Department of correctional services in November 2017."
The rapper, born Robert rimick Williams, was released on Tuesday after serving five months at Pennsylvania State correctional institution in graftford, Montgomery
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A few hours later, he shared a video of waiting for a helicopter and was found leaving the penitentiary by helicopter."
"Soon after, mill held a homecoming reception at the Wells Fargo center to welcome home team's fifth game against Miami Heat."
(mill also works as a bell ringer before the game.)
"Mill, 30, was arrested twice in November 2017 for violating probation in a 2008 gun and drug case and sentenced to at least two years."
"I want to thank God, my family, my friends, my lawyers, my team in the Republic of China, including jay z Desiree Perez, my good friend Michael Rubin, my fans, the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania, and all my public supporters for their love, support and encouragement during this difficult period," mill said
“… In a statement obtained by people, the killer also tweeted... "



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Lip Kit maven and the “Antidote” entertainer went public with their new romance on April 25, when they cozied up while sitting courtside at an NBA game.”
““Travis is telling friends that he and Kylie are the real deal,” an insider told Us last month.”
““He’s her first big love and they still speak every day.”Just weeks after Tyga packed his bags, Jenner moved on to rapper Travis Scott.”
““Tyga does really make Kylie happy, and when they break up it makes Kylie super sad,” a source told Us at the time.”
“Us Weekly exclusively reported in April that the hip-hop star moved out of the reality star’s $6 million mansion in Hidden Hills, California.”
““You cut her legs off / She crawls right back to me / I call it playboy tenacity.”Tyga and Jenner, 19, called it quits on their four-year relationship earlier this year.”
““She a superstar / She got it bad for me / If I hang up, she call right back to me,” Tyga, 27, raps on the three-minute track, which features Vince Staples.”
“The rapper released a new song titled “Playboy” on Saturday, June 3, and fans think the lyrics take digs at his ex-girlfriend.”
“Did Tyga just drop a Kylie Jenner diss track?”


On April 25, oral expert Marvin and the "antidote" artist announced their new love affair. At that time, they sat on the sidelines of an NBA game and were very comfortable
"Travis told his friends that he and Kelly were real deals," an insider told us last month
"He's her first love, and they still talk every day." Just a few weeks after TEGA packed, Jenner switched to rapper Travis Scott
A source told us at the time: "TEGA really makes Kelly happy. When they break up, it makes Kelly super sad."
The hip-hop superstar moved out of the reality TV star's $6 million mansion in hidden hill, California, according to an exclusive report by us weekly in April
"You cut off her leg / she crawled back to me / what I call Playboy tenacity." Earlier this year, TEGA, 19, and Jenna ended their four-year relationship
"She's a superstar / she's very bad to me / if I hang up, she'll call me back right away," 27 year old TEGA rapped on a three minute track featuring Vince staples
The rapper released a new song called Playboy on June 3 (Saturday), which fans believe is a satire on his ex girlfriend
"Did TEGA lose Kelly Jenner's track?"



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The bright piece resembled her late mother-in-law, Princess Diana's, Moschino jacket, which she wore in 1990.”
“Princess Diana VibesKarwai Tang/WireImageMiddleton sported a red houndstooth print double-breasted coat from Catherine Walker while visiting the Karolinska Institutet in Stockholm, Sweden.”
“Bright in YellowYui Mok - WPA Pool/Getty ImagesThe Duchess was simply stylish in a sleek canary yellow midi by Brandon Maxwell while attending the Your Commonwealth Youth Challenge reception in London in July.”
“Middleton wore a white polka-dotted dress, while Markle opted for a trouser look via a white wide-leg pant and striped shirt by Ralph Lauren, Altuzarra handbag and Maison Michel fedora.”
“Chic in StripesKarwai Tang/WireImageMiddleton and Markle enjoyed a girls' day out at Wimbledon in July.”
“She chose Givenchy again for the occasion -- this time, an ivory caped dress, cinched with a thin leather black belt, styled with matching pointed-toe pumps -- when the duo visited Chester, England.”
“Out With the QueenNeil Mockford/GC ImagesThe former Suits star had her first royal engagement with Queen Elizabeth in June.”
“...to color...”
“Pretty in Pink Chris Jackson Getty Images Markle opted for a light pink hue again the following month via an off the shoulder Carolina Herrera buttoned dress and matching Philip Treacy hat similar to the one she wore previously at the Trooping the Colour making the shade her unofficial go...”
“Blushing BeautyDominic Lipinski - Pool/Getty ImagesThe newly minted royal looked romantic and feminine in a sheer blush pink dress by Ghost and dome hat by Philip Treacy for Prince Charles' 70th Birthday Patronage Celebration at Buckingham Palace in May.”


"It looks like the MOSCHINO jacket that her late mother-in-law, Princess Diana, wore in 1990."
Princess Diana, vibeskarwai Tang / wireimagemiddleton, was wearing Catherine Walker's red dog tooth print double breasted jacket during a visit to Karolinska college in Stockholm, Sweden
"The Duchess of bright yellow YUI Mok WPA swimming pool / Getty Images, dressed in Brandon Maxwell's canary yellow and sleek MIDI, was very fashionable to attend the Commonwealth Youth Challenge reception in London in July."
"Middleton was wearing a white polka dot dress, while Marcel chose the trouser look through Ralph Lauren's, altuzara's handbags and Maison Michel Fedora's white wide leg pants and striped shirt."
"Trendy strippers calvay Tang / wiremege Middleton and Markle enjoyed a girls' day at Wimbledon in July."
When they visited Chester, she chose Givenchy again, this time an ivory Cape dress with a thin black belt and pointed heels
"Date with a picture of Queen mockford / GC, the former suit star has his first royal engagement to Queen Elizabeth in June."
“… To color... "
"Beautiful pink Chris Jackson Getty picture Marcel chose a light pink hue again through a off shoulder Carolina Herrera buttoned tuxedo and matching Philip Tracy's hat with similar colors in her former army colors to make the shadow her informal go..."
"Dominic Lipinski pool / Getty Images, a newly born Royal, looks romantic and feminine in a pale pink dress designed by a ghost and a bowler hat designed by Philip Treacy at the patronage ceremony for Prince Charles' 70th birthday at Buckingham Palace in May. ”



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Kim Kardashian and Kylie Jenner Congratulate Khloe Kardashian After Birth of Daughter This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Just hours after sharing pics and videos from the tarmac before taking off on their private plane, Kourtney Kardashian and Kylie Jenner have arrived at Coachella.”
“The sisters were photographed picking up their VIP passes at the festival with their respective boyfriends, Younes Bendjima and Travis Scott, as well as Kylie's BFF, Jordyn Woods.”
“Kourtney beat the heat in a sheer black tank top and Adidas jogger pants, while her little sister and new mom sported a full-on denim ensemble.”
“The 20-year-old reality star hid her face from cameras while walking inside, but looked relaxed as she was spotted by fans as she waited in line.”
“Backgrid Kylie who is set to make her first post baby public appearance to host a Kourt x Kylie makeup launch party on Friday took to Instagram to preview her look for the night and prove that after giving birth to daughter Stormi on Feb 1 she s a cool...”
“...mom...”
“"I’m not a regular mom I’m a cool mom," she captioned a shot of her "cotton candy cream kylighter" hair.”
“The sisters' Indio adventure kicked off just one day after Khloe Kardashian gave birth to her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson at a Cleveland-area hospital.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Kim Kardashian and Kylie Jenner congratulated Khloe Kardashian after the birth of their daughter. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"Just hours after sharing photos and videos from the tarmac, Courtney Kardashian and Kelly Jenner arrived in cochella just before they took off in a private plane."
"The sisters were photographed collecting VIP passes at the festival with their boyfriends, yones benjima and Travis Scott, and Kelly's boyfriend, Jordan woods."
Courtney beat the heat in a black vest and Adidas jogging pants, while her sister and new mother wore jeans
"The 20-year-old reality star hid her face in front of the camera as she walked inside, but she looked relaxed when fans found her waiting in line."
"Kylie will make her public debut on Friday, hosting a Kourt x Kylie make-up conference. She previewed the look of that night on instagram and proved that she was a cool person after giving birth to her daughter, stormi, on February 1..."
“… Mom... "
"I'm not a normal mom, I'm a cool mom," she wrote on a piece of "marshmallow cream" hair
"The sisters' independent adventure began one day after Carol Kardashian and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson gave birth to their first child in a Cleveland area hospital."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She and Prince Philip, who will turn 96 in June, just returned to the palace after celebrating a long Easter holiday.”
“The Queen, who turned 91 last month, was recently in the public eye when she met with British prime minister Theresa May to mark the dissolution of Parliament due to the general election.”
“"But at the moment, only those closest to her genuinely know what on earth this is all about."”
“"Although meetings involving the entire royal household are occasionally called, the way this has been done at the eleventh hour is highly unusual and suggests that there is something major to be disseminated," a source told the Daily Mail.”
“Senior royal officer Lord Chamberlain and private secretary Sir Christopher Geidt are expected to address staff, but the subject of that meeting is currently unknown.”
“According to the Daily Mail , staff from across the country have been summoned to the royal palace for the meeting.”
“Several news outlets are speculating it could be concerning Queen Elizabeth or her husband, Prince Philip, the Duke of Edinburgh.”


"She and Prince Philip will turn 96 in June and have just returned to the palace after the long Easter holiday."
"The queen, who turned 91 last month, recently met with British Prime Minister Theresa May to commemorate the dissolution of Parliament due to the general election, which has attracted public attention."
"But at the moment, only those closest to her really know what's going on."
A source told the Daily Mail: "although meetings involving the whole royal family are occasionally called, it is very unusual to do so at the last moment, indicating that there are some important things to spread."
"Senior royal officials Lord Chamberlain and private secretary Sir Christopher gate are expected to address the staff, but the subject of the meeting is not known yet."
"According to the daily mail, staff from all over the country have been called to the palace for a meeting."
Several news organizations speculated that this may be related to Queen Elizabeth or her husband Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Love you guys.”In an earlier episode of Long Island Medium, Theresa revealed that her marriage was going through a “strain.””
“We’re in divorce proceedings.”
“TMZ caught up with the 61-year-old reality personality on Tuesday in Santa Monica, California, where he revealed that he’s in a new relationship.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I have moved on,” Larry said.”
““I’m fortunate enough to say that I have met someone special.”
“But I’ll just leave it for that now.”Theresa and Larry were married for 28 years before they announced their separation in December.”
“Back in April Theresa told Extra that the two were living on opposite coasts he in L A and she in New York and were taking their relationship and the possibility of a reconciliation day by day Image zoom Larry and Theresa Caputo Credit Charles Sykes Bravo NBCU Photo Bank...”
“Getty But now Larry says divorce is in their future...”
““I’ve been here 9 months now,” he told TMZ.”


"I love you." In the previous issue of Long Island media, Theresa revealed that her marriage was experiencing "stress"
"We are in divorce proceedings."
"TMZ met the 61 year old realist in Santa Monica, California, on Tuesday and revealed that he was in a new relationship."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I've gone," Larry said
"I'm very lucky. I met a special person."
"But I won't say it now." Theresa and Larry, who have been married for 28 years, announced their separation last December
"As early as April, Theresa told extra that they were living on the opposite coast of Los Angeles and New York, and they were talking about the possibility of love and reconciliation day by day. Picture zooming Larry and Theresa Caputo credit Charles Sikes Bravo nbcu Photo Bank..."
"Getty, but now Larry says divorce is their future..."
"I've been here for nine months," he told TMZ



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I never understood that depth of that feeling or the reality of that because I was naturally a very happy person.”She revealed she overcame her troubles using positive thinking and mindfulness, realising that “every thought you have affects your reality and only you have control of your mind.””
““When Orlando and I separated I actually fell into a really bad depression,” she told Elle Canada .”
“...depression after her breakup with Bloom in 2013”
“To an amazing mother co parent and friend HAPPY BIRTHDAY to an amazing mother co parent and friend A post shared by Orlando Bloom orlandobloom on Apr 20 2017 at 6 14pm PDT While she s now happily engaged just last year Kerr admitted she fell into a really bad...”
“Just three weeks ago, the actor posted a photo of his son’s birthday present for her, along with the caption: “HAPPY BIRTHDAY!”
“Bloom orlandobloom on May 14 2017 at 10 15am PDT It s not the first time he s publicly praised Kerr s parenting skills...”
“So blessed and grateful we came across this billboard in china while he was visiting me on set he loves his mum and what s not to love she s a wonderful mother a great friend and co parent so blessed and grateful mirandakerr happymothersday A post shared by Orlando...”
“He loves his mum and what’s not to love — she’s a wonderful mother, a great friend and co parent.”
“Alongside an Instagram photo of his son hugging the poster, he wrote: “We came across this billboard in China while he was visiting me on set.”
“While the romance may be over, the Pirates of the Caribbean star still had plenty of nice things to say about his supermodel ex-wife when he and Flynn came across one of her billboards in China.”


"I never understood the depth of that feeling or the reality of that feeling, because I was born to be a very happy person." She revealed that she overcame her troubles with positive thinking and mindfulness, realizing that "every thought you have will affect your reality, and only you can control your thoughts."
"When Orlando and I separated, I was really in a very serious depression," she told Elle Canada
“… Depression after breaking up with bloom in 2013
"Happy Birthday to a great mother, CO parents and friends happy birthday to a great mother, CO parents and friends Orlando Bloom shared a post on PDT, and now she's happily engaged. Last year Kerr admitted that she's in a very bad situation... "
Just three weeks ago, the actor posted a picture of her son's birthday present with a note: "Happy Birthday!"
"Bloom Orlando Bloom PDT at 10:15 am on May 14, 2017, this is not the first time he has publicly praised Kerr's parenting skills..."
"When he came to see me on set, we saw this billboard in China. He loves his mother, what else doesn't love, she is a very good mother, a very good friend and common parents. We are very lucky and grateful to Milan dakel for sharing a post with Orlando every day... "
"He loves his mother, and there's nothing he doesn't love - she's a very good mother, a very good friend and a common parent."
He posted a poster of his son hugging on instagram and wrote, "when he came to see me on set, we saw this billboard in China."
"Although the relationship may be over, the Pirates of the Caribbean superstar and Flynn met one of her billboards in China, and he still has a lot to say to his supermodel ex-wife."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thank you so much.””
“And sometimes change is about something small, sometimes change starts in a room like this with people like all of you.”
““I wanted to be in more projects where I wasn’t just playing the wife or the girlfriend of some famous dude,” she shared.”
“She also launched a new production company, Hello Sunshine, which produced the eight-time Emmy winning series Big Little Lies as well as the films Gone Girl and Wild.”
“Image zoom Credit: Craig Barritt/GettyThe exclusion of women at the top has led to a lack of female-driven roles, according to Witherspoon, which she said motivated her to start looking at books to adapt into films.”
“Her 18-year-old daughter, Ava Phillippe, watched as her mom spoke to the crowd in a passionate 9-minute address.”
“Yang and Alex Zhu of musical ly Technology...”
“For that we respect her admire her and love her Witherspoon delivered her inspired speech in front of a room full of innovators including fellow honorees Mark Bradford Art Stephen Alesch and Robin Standefer of Roman and Williams Design Raf Simons Fashion Ryan Heffington Performing Arts and Alex Hofmann Luyu...”
“And as a mother with her sight set on the future, she is well on her way to leaving Hollywood a much richer place than she found it.”
““As an actress and reader of almost prophetic insight, she’s given us some of the most memorable female characters of the past three decades.”


"Thank you very much."
"Sometimes change is for small things, sometimes change starts in people's rooms like you."
"I want to be involved in more projects than just playing a celebrity's wife or girlfriend," she said
"She also set up a new production company, hello sunshine, to produce the eight time Emmy winner series big lies and the film Gone Girl and wild."
Witherspoon said the exclusion of women at the top led to a lack of female leading roles, which prompted her to read books and adapt films
Her 18-year-old daughter, EVA Phillips, watched her mother speak to the audience in a passionate nine minute speech
"Yang and Alex Zhu Music Technology..."
"To that end, we respect, admire and love her, and Witherspoon delivered inspirational speeches in front of a room full of innovators, including award winners Stephen alesch and Roman and Williams of mark Bradford art Design's Raf Simons fashion's Ryan Huffington performing arts
"As a future oriented mother, she is on her way out of Hollywood, a place much richer than she found out."
"As an actress and reader with almost predictive insight, she has given us some of the most memorable female characters in the past three decades."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please attempt to sign up again.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”
“...she explained...”
“I don t know who you re talking about really Under wraps In a May interview with InStyle Turner admitted that she was intent on keeping the details of her love life pretty private I found it easier to date someone who understands the industry or is in that world...”
““I’m not saying anything.”
“I’m very happy,” she told Extra when asked about Jonas.”
“However, Turner evaded questions about their relationship on the red carpet leading up to the awards show.”
“The two were photographed at the CAA talent agency’s pre-Golden Globes 2017 party later that week.”
““Miami daze,” she captioned the shot, which Jonas left a winky face comment on.”


"Please try to register again."
"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."
“… She explained that
"I don't know who you're talking about. In an interview in May, InStyle Turner admitted that she intended to keep the details of her love life secret. I found it easier to date someone who knows the industry or lives in the world..."
"I didn't say anything."
"I'm happy," she said when asked about Jonas
However, Turner avoided questions about their relationship on the red carpet before the awards ceremony
"The two were photographed at the pre Golden Globe 2017 party held by CAA talent agency later this week."
"Miami's crazy," she said, adding a caption to the camera, and Jonas commented with a wink on his face



**Something goes wrong**
“...friends who have campaigned for his release and promised to fight to change the criminal justice system that keeps innocent people in jail and to also help others in his situation that do not have the same resources to fight for their freedom...”
“When I was in jail I couldn t give him an answer I didn t know what to say to him but now I m going to be spending all this time with him Meek added he also wanted to take the time to thank all the supporters fans and...”
“I can’t wait to see my son, it’s his birthday on May 13 and he had been asking how we were going to celebrate.”
“Papi had been seen at a previous rally holding up a sketch of his father that read “Free Meek Mill” and adorably told a reporter, “I miss my dad very much.”Meek explained, “I am going to watch the game with my son and my family tonight.”
“The team is going to advance, and I came home.”He said his greatest joy will be to be reunited with his 6-year-old son, Papi, who he has barely seen during his five months in jail, because he didn’t want him to see his dad in jail.”
““We are on to see the Sixers game, and its going to be a big night for Philly.”
“But for tonight, he was ready to celebrate at the 76ers game.”
“...criminal justice system...”
“I immediately said a quick prayer and got ready to go He added that he still had work to do to get his original conviction overturned given that it was based on the evidence of an alleged corrupt cop and to shine a light on others trapped in a failing...”
“Meek said of the moment he learned of his freedom, “I was in my cell and I was watching the news, and they said I’m free.”


“…… Those friends who run for his release promise to fight for the change of the criminal justice system that keeps innocent people in prison, and to help those who do not have the same resources to fight for their freedom in his situation... "
"When I was in prison, I couldn't give him an answer, I didn't know what to say to him, but now I'm going to spend this time with him, meek added, and he also wants to take the time to thank all the supporters and fans..."
"I can't wait to see my son. May 13 is his birthday. He has been asking us how to celebrate."
At a previous rally, Papi was seen holding a sketch of his father, which said "free and gentle mill". He lovingly told reporters, "I miss my father very much." "I'm going to watch the game tonight with my son and my family," he explained
"The team is going through, I'm going home." He said his greatest joy would be to be reunited with his six-year-old son Papi, whom he hardly saw in prison for five months because he didn't want him to see his father in prison
"We're going to see the 76ers. It's going to be a big night for Philadelphia."
"But tonight, he's going to celebrate in the 76ers."
“… The criminal justice system... "
"I immediately made a short prayer, ready to go. He added that since his initial conviction was based on evidence from a police officer suspected of corruption, he still has work to do to overturn his initial conviction and provide clues to other people who have fallen into failure... "
"I was watching the news in my cell and they said I was free," Mick said of the moment he learned he was free



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sorkin’s awards-season schedule with the film “Molly’s Game,” which marked his feature directorial debut, made it hard for the multi-hyphenate to focus on his teleplay adaptation of the courtroom drama that put him on the map as a scribe in 1989.”
“NBC has also been working on plans for a live staging of the Aaron Sorkin play “A Few Good Men.” That project, also exec produced by Zadan and Meron, is unlikely to surface before 2019.”
“NBC’s planned live event production of the classic musical with Jennifer Lopez in the lead role has been delayed for a second time due to the difficulty of coordinating with Lopez’s busy schedule, Variety has learned exclusively.”
“The project was originally slated to be NBC’s holiday musical event for winter 2017 but was pushed to 2018 last May because of Lopez’s schedule.”
“Lopez is shooting two movies later this year, plus she has a host of other commitments to NBC.”
“She s the exec producer and a judge on the Peacock s summer unscripted series World of Dance and she stars in the police drama Shades of Blue On top of her film and TV work Lopez is committed to finishing the last lap of her Las Vegas residency at...”
“Planet Hollywood Resort and Casino in September...”
“NBC is gearing up for the ambitious April 1 live staging of “Jesus Christ Superstar Live in Concert” with the hope of drawing a big crowd on Easter Sunday.”
“That production has also complicated planning for “Bye Bye Birdie” because it is being shepherded by Craig Zadan and Neil Meron, the executive producers behind all of NBC’s live musicals to date.”
“By the time the work on “Superstar” is finished, the producers would have less than six months to get “Birdie” on its feet if the show were to stick with its targeted December airdate.”


"With the award season of Molly's game, Sorkin marks his debut as a special director, which makes it difficult for many hyphenators to focus on his adaptation of the TV series, which is adapted from the court play in 1989, making him a recorder."
NBC has also been making plans for the live performance of Aaron Sorkin's play the move good men. The project, also produced by zadan and Meron, is unlikely to surface before 2019
Variety exclusively learned that NBC's live production of a classic musical starring Jennifer Lopez has been delayed for the second time because it is difficult to keep pace with Lopez's busy schedule
"The project was originally planned to be NBC's festival music event in the winter of 2017, but due to Lopez's schedule, it was pushed to 2018 in May last year."
"Lopez will make two films later this year, and she has a lot of other commitments to NBC."
"She is the executive producer and judge of peacock's playless summer series the world of dance. Based on her film and television work blue shadow, she starred in the police drama Lopez, committed to completing her last lap in Las Vegas..."
"Hollywood planet resorts and casinos in September..."
"NBC is preparing for the ambitious live performance of" Jesus Christ Superstar live concert "on April 1, hoping to attract a large audience on Easter Sunday."
"It also complicates the plan for" Bye bird "because it's hosted by Craig zadan and Neil Mellon, executive producers of all NBC's live musicals to date."
"By the time superstar is finished, if the show is to stick to its December target date, the producers will have less than six months to bring bird back to life."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You got that long hair slicked back white T shirt...”
“Styles song Two Ghosts off his recent solo album is rumored to be a direct response to Swift s Style because of his lyrics Same lips red same eyes blue Same white shirt couple more tattoos In Style she sings I got that red lip classic thing that you like...”
“Though she’s never confirmed the rumors, many believe her hit songs “Style” and “Out of the Woods” off her 1989 album were written about the former One Direction singer, who is 23 years old.”
“Just as many fans, however, are positive the song was inspired by Harry Styles.”
“Alwyn, 26, is seven years younger than Calvin Harris and 10 years younger than Tom Hiddleston, whom Swift dated before the British actor.”
““Some boys are trying too hard / He don’t try at all though / Younger than my exes but he acts like such a man, though,” sings Swift, 27, on the track.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...saying it was written about her boyfriend Joe Alwyn whom Swift has been dating since late last year...”
“See Why Her Swifties Are Split Taylor Swift dropped the second song off her upcoming album Reputation on Sunday morning causing a massive debate amongst her Swifties on social media over the inspiration behind Ready for It Many immediately went wild for the catchy tune read the full lyrics here...”
“Swift's loyal fanbase is split over whether the song was inspired by Joe Alwyn or Harry StylesIs Taylor Swift's '...Ready for It' About Joe Alwyn or Harry Styles?”


"You have that white T-shirt with long smooth hair..."
"It's rumored that the two ghosts in Swift's recent album are a direct response to Swift's style, because his lyrics are the same as lips, red eyes, blue shirt, white shirt, lovers, more tattoo style, and she sings me red lips classic things, do you like..."
Although she has never confirmed these rumors, many believe that the hit songs "style" and "out of the woods" on her 1989 album are about the 23-year-old former one-way singer
"But, like many fans, they're sure the inspiration for the song came from Harry stiles."
Alvin, 26, is seven years younger than Calvin Harris and 10 years younger than Tom sidleston, whom swift dated before the British actor
Swift, 27, sang on the track: "some boys work too hard / he doesn't work at all / younger than my predecessor, but he acts like such a man."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“… It's about her boyfriend Joe Alvin. Swift has been dating since the end of last year
"To see why her swimsuit is split, Taylor Swift gave up her second song on the upcoming album reputation on Sunday morning, which caused a large-scale debate. The inspiration behind her swimsuit on social media prepared it. Many people immediately read the complete lyrics crazily here..."
"Did Swift's fans get the inspiration for this song from Joe Alvin or Harry stele? Is swift ready for Joe Alvin or Harry stele?"



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fox Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“39/88 SLIDES © Ron Galella/Getty Images Sarah Jessica Parker and Michael J.”
“18/88 SLIDES © Ron Wolfson/Getty Images Michael Bolton and Ashley Judd Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“17/88 SLIDES © Paul Mounce/Corbis via Getty Images Josh Groban and January Jones Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“16/88 SLIDES © Moviestore Collection/Shutterstock Drew Barrymore and David Arquette Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“Slideshow continues on the next slide15/88 SLIDES © Alex Berliner/BEI/Shutterstock Edward Norton and Courtney Love Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“14/88 SLIDES © LUCY NICHOLSON/AFP/Getty Images Matt Damon and Winona Ryder Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“13/88 SLIDES © Ron Galella, Ltd./WireImage/Getty Images Sarah Jessica Parker and Robert Downey Jr. Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“12/88 SLIDES © Time Life Pictures/Getty Images Julia Roberts and Lyle Lovett Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“11/88 SLIDES © Francois Guillot/Getty Images Sandra Bullock and Ryan Gosling Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”


"If you buy certain products through the recommended links in this article, fox Microsoft may get a membership Commission."
"39 / 88 slides ■ Ron galella / Getty Images, Sarah Jessica Parker and Michael J."
"Slide 18 / 88} Ron Wolfson / Getty Images Michael Bolton and Ashley Judd if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive an affiliate commission."
"Slide 17 / 88} Paul mount / Corbis via Getty Images Josh Groban and January Jones if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive a affiliate commission."
"16 / 88 slides} movie collection / shutterstock Drew Barrymore and David Arquette Microsoft may receive affiliate commission if you purchase something through the recommended links in this article."
"The next slide continues with 15 / 88 slides} Alex Berliner / Bei / shutterstock Edward Norton and Courtney love. If you buy something through the recommended links in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"Slide 14 / 88} Lucy Nicholson / AFP / Getty Images Matt Damon and Winona Ryder if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"Slide 13 / 88} Ron galella, Ltd. / WireImage / Getty Images, Sarah Jessica Parker and Robert Downey Jr. if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"12 / 88 slides ■ time life pictures / Getty Images Julia Roberts and Lyle Lovett Microsoft may receive affiliate commission if you purchase something through the recommended links in this article."
"Slide 11 / 88} Francois Guillot / Getty Images Sandra Bullock and Ryan Gosling if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We live in a society that has treated women as disposable playmates for far longer than Mr. Weinstein has been meeting ingénues in luxury hotel rooms.”
“I dress modestly.”
“1 sitcom in America.”
“I am honored to depict a feminist who speaks her mind, who loves science and her friends and who sometimes wishes she were the hot girl.”
“I can relate.”
“I’ve wished that, too.”
“And yet I have also experienced the upside of not being a “perfect ten.” As a proud feminist with little desire to diet, get plastic surgery or hire a personal trainer, I have almost no personal experience with men asking me to meetings in their hotel rooms.”
“Those of us in Hollywood who don’t represent an impossible standard of beauty have the “luxury” of being overlooked and, in many cases, ignored by men in power unless we can make them money.”
“I still make choices every day as a 41-year-old actress that I think of as self-protecting and wise.”
“I have decided that my sexual self is best reserved for private situations with those I am most intimate with.”


"We live in a society that treats women as one-time playmates, much longer than Mr Weinstein meets women in luxury hotel rooms."
"I wear plain clothes."
"America's first sitcom."
"I'm honored to be able to portray a feminist who speaks her mind, loves science and her friends, and sometimes wants to be a hot girl."
"I understand."
"I hope so, too."
However, I have also experienced the benefits of not being "perfect.". As a proud feminist, I don't want to go on a diet, have plastic surgery or hire a personal trainer. I've hardly experienced men asking me to their hotel rooms for meetings
"Those of us in Hollywood who do not represent the impossible standard of beauty have the luxury of being ignored. In many cases, they are ignored by those in power unless we can make money for them."
"As a 41 year old actress, I still make what I think are self-protection and wise choices every day."
"I've decided that it's best to keep my sexual self in private with the people I'm closest to."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“],” he concluded.”
“Queen please help me’,” he said referring to the late Salsa legend Celia Cruz, whom he asked for inspiration to find the right words.”
“The Grammy-winning Cuban power couple was honored with PLN’s Excellence Award during the televised music award show, which aired on Univision.”
“The tribute included a video collage of their Miami Sound Machine days and special greetings from Shakira, Quincy Jones and Andy Garcia.”
“Bachata singer Leslie Grace, Italian trio Il Volo and salsa crooner Victor Manuelle sang some of Gloria’s hit songs, including “Mi Tierra” and “Rhythm is Gonna Get You,” which brought the crowd, including the famous duo, to their feet to dance.”
“In an emotional speech that left the singer, 60, and the producer, 64, teary-eyed, fellow Cuban American star and Miami resident Pitbull thanked the Estefans for being role models.”
““Back there they were telling me that they wrote me something to say to Gloria and Emilio,” the rapper said.”
““But I’m here to speak from the heart so I looked up and I asked: ‘Celia, please help me.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“[What’s up?”


"]," he concluded
"Queen please help me," he said, referring to the late salsa legend Celia Cruz, who he asked for inspiration to find the right words
"At Univision's TV music awards ceremony, the Grammy winning Cuban electric couple won the Excellence Award from Indonesia's state power company."
The memorial included a video collage of their Miami sound day and special greetings from Shakira, Quincy Jones and Andy Garcia
"Baccata singer Leslie grace, Italian trio IL Volo and salsa chorus lead singer Victor Manuel performed some of Gloria's popular songs, including" mitiella "and" rhythm will make you happy ", which made audiences including famous duets dance."
The 60 year old singer and 64 year old producer burst into tears in a touching speech, and the Cuban American star and Miami resident Peter bull thanks his fans for being role models
"There, they told me that they wrote something to Gloria and Emilio," said the rapper
"But I came to speak from the bottom of my heart, so I looked up and said," Celia, please help me. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"What's the matter



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We have these tiny points of truth, and you try to connect the tissue between them, but I would never use the term ’embellish,’” Smith said.”
“...in gaps in certain parts of the story such as the events surrounding the deaths of Cunanan s other victims but pushed back against the idea that the events of the series were exaggerated...”
“It is based in part on Maureen Orth s 1999 book Vulgar Favors Andrew Cunanan Gianni Versace and the Largest Failed Manhunt in US History During the show s panel at the Television Critics Association winter press tour executive producer Tom Rob Smith acknowledged that the writers had to fill...”
“Edgar Ramirez will play Versace, while Darren Criss will play Cunanan.”
“...explore the death of Versace at the hands of Andrew Cunanan in 1997”
“Since Versace did not authorize the book on which it is partly based nor has it taken part in the writing of the screenplay this TV series should only be considered as a work of fiction The second season of executive producer Ryan Murphy s critically acclaimed anthology series will...”
““The Versace family has neither authorized nor had any involvement whatsoever in the forthcoming TV series about the death of Mr. Gianni Versace,” the family said in a statement via the fashion house.”
“Ahead of the premiere of “American Crime Story: The Assassination of Gianni Versace,” the family of the legendary fashion designer has finally broken their silence on the show.”


"We have these tiny points of truth, and you try to connect them, but I would never use the word 'embellishment'," Smith said
“… In the blanks of some parts of the story, such as the incident surrounding the death of other victims in kunanan, but against the idea that the series of incidents have been exaggerated... "
"It's based in part on Maureen orth's 1999 book the boon of vulgarity, Andrew kunanan Jennie Versace and the biggest failed raid in American history, which was admitted by Tom rob Smith, executive producer of the TV Critics Association's winter news tour, that the writers had to fill in..."
"Edgar Ramirez will play Versace and Darren Chris will play kunanan."
“…… "Versace died at the hands of Andrew Cunanan in 1997"
"Because Versace didn't authorize part of the book and didn't participate in the production of the script, the TV series can only be regarded as a fiction, so the second season of executive producer Ryan Murphy's highly acclaimed Anthology Series will
"The Versace family has neither authorized nor participated in the upcoming TV series on the death of Mr. Jennie Versace," the family said in a statement through the fashion house
"Before the premiere of American crime story: the assassination of Gianni Versace, the legendary fashion designer's family finally broke their silence on the show."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Standing at the height of 5’5”, Brittany has good physique with a surprise of the first degree black belt.”
“Short Bio And WikiThe American singer was born on June 19, 1988, in North Carolina, the USA making her the age of 30 years old.”
“For one way or another, Brittany’s love started when it ended for Jessica as for many spectators.”
“Jason was already married to Jessica Aldean sharing two daughters.”
“It was the year of 2012 when her then-boyfriend, Jason Aldean was seen flirting romantically Brittany at The Den on the Sunset Strip.”
“She had to deal with the labels of ‘homewrecker’ making her delete her twitter account.”
“Rough Start in the RelationshipIt may not be the best start for Brittany’s dating life, to begin with.”
“She got in the top 80 and made her mark in the hearts of fans.”
“She used her charm in modeling in 2010 when she entered in Victoria’s Secret Model Search contest.”
“Given her perfect physique with killer looks, she already has the photogenic charm as per her attitude.”


"Standing at the height of 5'5", Brittany's physique is very good, the surprise of a black belt
The American singer was born in North Carolina on June 19, 1988. He was only 30 years old
"In any case, Brittany's love begins with Jessica's love with many audiences."
"Jason is married to Jessica aldian and has two daughters."
"In 2012, her then boyfriend Jason Aldean flirted with Brittany in his study on sunset strip."
"She had to face the label of" family Destroyer "and ask her to delete her twitter account."
"A difficult start to a relationship. First of all, it may not be the best start for Brittany's dating life."
"She entered the top 80 and left her mark in the hearts of her fans."
"She used her charm as a model when she took part in Victoria's Secret model search contest in 2010."
"In view of her perfect physique and attractive appearance, from her attitude, she already has the charm of being on camera."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As far as I’m aware it went fine.”This article originally appeared on The Sun and has been republished here with permission.”
““Good luck with the first dance.”
“Justin Johannsen left around 300 posh guests, including Pippa’s sister Kate and Prince William — squirming at his racy routine, The Sun reports.”
“One joke suggested groom James Matthews’ TV star brother Spencer had given clues over their honeymoon.”
“Johannson went on: “With the wedding shrouded in secrecy, I would like to reveal and wish the bride and groom a wonderful honeymoon in North Wales.”
““At least that’s where I presume they’re going, since I overheard Spencer saying that James will be, after the wedding, going to Bangor for two weeks.”
“Enjoy the Welsh coast, guys.”James, 41, and Pippa, 33, actually fly off today for a week in a $A5,200-a-night resort on the French Polynesian isle Tetiaroa.”
“Another joke involved Pippa and her new husband’s pet dog Rafa.”
“The best man said: “Now, to the love of James’s life.”
“Beautiful energetic loyal soft mouth comes on command great behind that s enough about James spaniel Rafa However the quip fell flat and the crowd at the Middleton s A10 3 million mansion in Bucklebury Berkshire looked on in stony...”


"As far as I know, it's going well." The article first appeared in the sun and was reprinted here with permission
"Good luck with your first dance."
Justin Johansen has left about 300 fashionable guests for Pippa's sisters Kate and Prince William, who are obsessed with Pippa's lively lifestyle, the Sun reported
"There's a joke that the groom James Matthews' TV star brother Spencer gave them clues during his honeymoon."
"The wedding is shrouded in secrecy and I want to reveal and wish the bride and groom a wonderful honeymoon in North Wales," Johnson added
"At least I guess they're going there because I overheard Spencer say James is going to Bangor for two weeks after the wedding."
"Enjoy the Welsh coast, guys." James, 41, and Pippa, 33, flew to a $1200 a night resort on the island of teyaro in French Polynesia for a week today
"Another joke involves Pippa and her new husband's pet dog, Rafa."
The best man said, "now, to James the love of his life."
"The beautiful, energetic, loyal and soft mouth appears on the podium behind the greatness. It's enough about James Spaniel Lafayette. However, the witticism has plummeted. The crowd in Middleton's 103 million mansion in bucklebury Berkshire, Berkshire, is watching in stone city..."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...base point of view and he s saying we thought of this great story and we always saw you doing it you know and it s not the compliments necessarily but it s like all the Avengers against you...”
“So I kind of stayed away from that thing but you know there s something that happens when you have the opportunity first when Kevin Fiege sic is talking to you and from a really like a fan you know...”
“So I was like, you know, I had an intention for that movie and I didn’t reach it.”
“...so well...”
“I was like I just don t see that you know and I like doing these other types of movies and whatever that means and we kind of dipped our fingers into Jonah Hex and that didn t turn out...”
“I was the kind of the same way.”
“I mean, a good story is a good story and I never told myself… I agree with you.”


“… Basic point, he said, we think of this great story, we always see you do it, you know, it's not necessarily a compliment, but it's like all the Avengers to you... "
"So I'm a little bit far away from that, but you know when you have a chance to talk to Kevin Fitch for the first time, something happens, just like a fan you know..."
"So I thought, you know, I wanted to make that movie, but I couldn't make it."
“… So good... "
"I'm like I don't understand, you know, I like to make other kinds of movies, no matter what that means, we dipped our fingers in Jonah Hicks, and it didn't..."
"It's the same with me."
"I mean, a good story is a good story, and I've never told myself I agree with you



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For many, it’s an issue which causes a lot of embarrassment.”
“Her mother, Jada, goes on to talk about what it’s like to deal with hair loss as an aging woman.”
“AdvertisementThe 19-year-old wasn’t the only one to talk about her daily struggle with self-esteem.”
“Demonstrating wisdom far beyond her years, Willow said mean comments are mostly just reflections of themselves.”
“When reading a question from Facebook, a question asking as to why women are “so mean” when it comes to appearances, Willow said it’s “all about envy.”“Because they wished they had what the other person has,” the daughter of Jada and Will Smith explained.”
“People always want what they can’t have, or maybe her friend’s statements are just passive-aggressiveness.”
““Is my body just not what society likes?”Willow went on to state that it’s difficult when her friends say to her that it must be great to wear revealing clothing and not have people react to her differently.”
“It started happening over and over again as she got older, and she began to seriously consider if she’s just not that desirable.”
““Curvier girls have always gotten more attention from the boys that I’ve liked,” the daughter of Will Smith explained.”
“She couldn’t help but feel jealous because of it.”


"For many people, it's a problem that causes a lot of embarrassment."
"Her mother, Jada, went on to talk about how, as an old woman, to deal with the problem of losing her hair."
"This 19-year-old girl is not the only one to talk about her daily struggle with self-esteem."
"The wisdom Yang Liu shows is far beyond her age, she said, and most of the harsh comments are just her own reflection."
When reading a question from Facebook about why women are "so mean" in appearance, willow said it was "jealousy.". Jada and Will Smith's daughter explained, "because they want to have what each other has."
"People always want something they can't have, or her friend's words are just passive attacks."
"Isn't my body what society likes? "Yang Liu goes on to say that it's difficult when her friends say to her that it must be great to wear revealing clothes instead of making people react differently to her."
"As she grew older, it began to happen again and again, and she began to seriously consider whether she was less popular."
Will Smith's daughter explained, "curvy girls always get more attention from boys I like."
"So she couldn't help being jealous."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Keep scrolling to see her best looks!”
“Here at Stylish, we’ve been keeping tabs on her most, well, stylish moments both at home and abroad.”
“Oh, and we will forever be amazed by her ability to have a rainbow-hued stiletto (Christian Louboutin is her fave) to match just about any outfit.”
“...pastel Burberry coat to read to children at the annual White House Easter Egg Roll the First Lady s wardrobe creatively and tastefully embraces color texture and design...”
“Whether she was hosting her first state dinner for French President Emmanuel and First Lady Brigitte Macron in a sparkling Chanel Haute Couture gown which originally appeared on the brand s spring 2018 runway as a jumpsuit or sporting a...”
“Though, much like former first lady Michelle Obama before her, Melania’s outfits keep Us guessing.”
“...ever since...”
“For the inauguration in January 2017 she wore a pale blue Ralph Lauren cashmere coat dress with matching suede pumps and gloves that called to mind Jackie Kennedy s chic style and she s continued to rock high fashion designs...”
“It became clear from the onset that the Slovene-born beauty was taking wardrobe cues from previous trendsetting first ladies.”
“...the White House).”


"Keep rolling and see what she looks like most!"
"In fashion, we have been paying attention to her most fashionable moments at home and abroad."
"Oh, we'll always be surprised by her ability to have rainbow heels (Christian Louboutin is her favorite), because she can go with almost any outfit."
“… The light red Burberry coat read to children on the annual White House Easter egg roll. The first lady's wardrobe creatively and elegantly integrates color, texture and Design... "
"Whether she's holding her first state dinner for French President Emmanuel and first lady Brigitte Malone, or wearing a glittering Chanel haute couture dress, which first appeared on the brand's 2018 spring runway as a one-piece dress, or wearing a sweatshirt..."
"But just as before the former first lady, Michelle Obama, Melania's costume keeps us guessing."
“… Since then... "
"At her inauguration in January 2017, she wore a light blue Ralph Lauren cashmere dress with suede high heels and gloves, reminiscent of Jackie Kennedy's chic style. She continued to rock high fashion design..."
"It's clear from the beginning that this Slovenian born beauty was inspired by the wardrobe of the first lady who used to lead the fashion."
“… The White House. "



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Us Weekly reports that Affleck offered to pay for Mukuta's mother to fly from Africa to Atlanta so the two could be reunited during his final days.”
“A source also tells People, "This call lifted M’s spirit so much he asked to leave the facility to go to Target for a new outfit--so they took him!"”
“...the hospice tweeted along with a pic of the boy, who's a refugee from the Congo, FaceTiming with Affleck from his bed.”
“"Such a memorable day for Mukuta, who’s a super #Batman fan!"”
“On Thursday, a hospice in Atlanta shared on social media that the 45-year-old actor connected with a young fan who hoped to meet Batman as he battles terminal cancer.”
“Ben Affleck knows how to answer the call when the Bat signal goes up.”


Meanwhile, US Weekly reported that Affleck was willing to pay for mukuta's mother's flight from Africa to Atlanta so that the two could be reunited in the last days of his life
A source also told people: "the call cheered M. he asked to leave the factory and go to target for a new suit - so they took him away!"
“…… The shelter tweeted a picture of a boy who is a refugee from Congo and confronts Affleck in bed. "
"It's an unforgettable day for super Batman fan mukutta!"
"On Thursday, a hospice in Atlanta revealed on social media that the 45 year old actor is in contact with a young fan who wants to see Batman as he struggles with terminal cancer."
"Ben Affleck knows how to answer the phone when the bat signal goes up."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“And that wasn’t my fault -- that was his.”
“I don't let people mess with me.”
“"I've been in the business so long, and I've worked with the best.”
“"I want to be a full-on girl boss," she exclaims.”
“While she seems to be head-over-heels for the equestrian, she's also focusing on running her own production company, Yes, Norman Productions.”
“Jason Kim/CosmopolitanClearly, Cuoco has moved past heartbreak and found love again with Cook, who she started dating in late 2016.”
“I knew I just had to be patient…I had to go through a lot of things, but it brought me to Karl."”
“I knew how much I had to give and how much I wanted to receive.”
“"The person I ended up with was not the person I originally met.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"It's not my fault - it's his fault."
"I don't want to be provoked."
"I've been in this business for so long, with the best."
"I want to be a real woman boss," she exclaimed
"Although she seems to know nothing about equestrian, she also focuses on running her own production company, yes, Norman production company."
"Jason Kim / cosmopolitan cleary, cuoco has got rid of heartbreak and found love with cook again. She started dating at the end of 2016."
"I know I have to be patient I had to go through a lot of things, but it led me to Carl. "
"I know how much I have to give and how much I want to get."
"The people I finally met are not the people I first met."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Visit Bustle Digital Group's YouTube page for the next three episodes, launching Mondays in December.”
“Watch how a doula supports a military mom who's determined to have a home birth in Episode One of Romper's Doula Diaries, Season Two, below.”
“There are typically two seasons of The Challenge in a year, so fans are likely already wondering: has The Challenge Season 33 finished filming?”
“Regardless of when filming ended or will end, chances are, viewers will get to see the new season at the beginning of 2019 sometime.”
“According to Reality Blurred, however, filming was still underway in Namibia at the end of October.”
“In order to properly edit the season and hopefully allow the competitors to finish up before the holidays, there’s a good chance that filming is now over.”
“Part one of the Final Reckoning reunion promised a sneak peek into Season 33, so at the very least, most of the season has wrapped.”
“This is good news for fans who may have gotten attached after the explosive recent season, but it’s also good to know for new viewers.”
“Final Reckoning marked the end of a trilogy in the franchise, so there will be some newbies introduced come Season 33.”
“Reality Blurred also reported that among the newcomers, Paulie, Da’Vonne, and Natalie could return from Season 32, so it’s going to be a gloriously mixed bag of contestants next season and I can’t handle it.”


"For the next three episodes, please visit the YouTube page of the bubble digital group, which will be released on Monday, December."
"See how a doula supports a military mom who's determined to have a baby at home. Next season, the first episode of Romper's doula diary."
"There are usually two challenges a year, so fans may have been thinking: is the 33rd season of the challenge finished?"
"No matter when the shooting ends, the audience is likely to see a new season sometime in early 2019."
"However, according to the reality, Namibia is still filming at the end of October."
"In order to edit the season properly, we hope that the contestants can finish the competition before the festival, and now it is very likely that the shooting has ended."
"The first part of the final liquidation reunion promises to peek into season 33, so at least most of the season is over."
"It's good news for fans who may have feelings after the recent season's explosive shows, but it's also good news for new audiences."
"The final liquidation marks the end of the series trilogy, so there will be some newcomers in season 33."
"Reality bewilderment" also reported that among the newcomers, Paulie, Daphne and Natalie may return from the 32nd season, so the contestants for the next season will be various, I can't stand it



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is required to wear an ankle bracelet for monitoring is due in court next week for a preliminary hearing...”
“Investigators are looking into who drove Soules away and whether alcohol, speed or texting played a role in the crash.”
“Soules is charged with leaving the scene of a deadly accident, a felony that carries up to five years in prison, in Monday night’s crash near his farm in northern Iowa that killed 66-year-old Kenneth Mosher.”
“Authorities say that Soules’ truck rear-ended Mosher’s tractor, throwing him into a ditch.”
“Police audio shows that Soules called 911 to report that he had “rear-ended a guy on a tractor” and sought medical help for Mosher before he left the scene in another vehicle.”
“Authorities say that Soules was located at his home about 10 miles away but that he initially refused to answer his door for officers.”
“He was arrested five hours after the crash after they obtained a warrant to enter the home.”
“Soules was released on bond Tuesday after 10 hours in jail.”
“The sheriff says alcoholic beverages were found at the scene and police are trying to determine who had possessed them.”
“His attorneys are confident that once all the evidence is made public it will show Soules acted reasonably and did everything in his power to provide aid to Mr Mosher the statement said adding that everyone in this close knit farming community is mourning Mr Mosher s passing Soules who...”


“…… They are required to wear ankle bracelets for monitoring, and the first trial will be held in court next week.... "
"Investigators are investigating who drove sol away and whether alcohol, speeding or texting played a role in the crash."
Suers was charged with leaving the scene of a fatal accident, a felony that carries a maximum sentence of five years in prison. On Monday night, he had a car accident near his farm in Northern Iowa, killing Kenneth Mosher, 66
Authorities say sules' truck hit Mosher's tractor and threw him into the ditch
Police audio showed that sules called 911 to report that he "rear ended a man on a tractor" and sought medical help for Moshe before he left the scene in another car
"Authorities said sours was at his home about 10 miles away, but he initially refused to open the door for the police."
"He was arrested five hours after the crash when they were given an entry order."
"Sules was released on bail on Tuesday after being jailed for 10 hours."
"The sheriff said alcoholic beverages were found at the scene and police are trying to determine who is holding them."
"His lawyers believe that once all the evidence is made public, it will show that sules' behavior is reasonable and do his best to assist Mr. Mosher. The statement added that in this closely connected agricultural community, everyone is mourning for Mr. moshir's death. Who... "



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her partner, Dominic “Sonny” Carisi, (Peter Scanavino), who comes from a large family, sometimes assists Rollins with the baby.”
“While Rollins is in labor, she suffers a placental abruption, almost resulting in her death, but she survives and gives birth to a baby girl she names Jesse.”
“[7]In the season 14 episode "Poisoned Motive", Rollins is shot by a sniper in front of the precinct.”
“She nearly falls victim to him while trying to flush him out; the rapist has a preference for blonde, athletic women like her.”
“Rollins tries to prove to Detectives Olivia Benson (Mariska Hargitay) and Nick Amaro (Danny Pino) that the rapist originated in Atlanta and has come to New York for new prey.”
“Shortly after transferring to the 16th Precinct, Rollins investigates a series of rapes that she believes are being committed by a suspect in one of her cases in Georgia.”
“She shares a good rapport with her partner, Detective Odafin Tutuola (Ice-T).”
“[6] Over time, however, she grows into the job.”
“Character within SVU [ edit ]The character is at first portrayed as wet behind the ears and over-eager, and is frequently chastised by Captain Donald Cragen (Dann Florek) for getting ahead of herself.”
“[4][5] This has sometimes affected her interactions with domestic abuse victims.”


Her partner, Dominic carrisi (Peter scannavino), comes from a large family and sometimes helps Rawlings look after the children
"When Rawlings was in labor, she had placental abruption and almost died, but she survived and gave birth to a baby girl named Jesse."
[7] In Season 14 episode "poison motive," Rawlings is shot by a sniper in front of the precinct
When she tried to drive him out, she almost fell victim to him; rapists preferred blonde women like her
"Rawlings tries to prove to detectives Olivia Benson (Mariska Hargitay) and Nick Amaro (Danny Pino) that the rapist comes from Atlanta and comes to New York in search of new prey."
"Shortly after moving to Bureau 16, Rawlings investigated a series of rapes that she believed were committed by suspects in one of her cases in Georgia."
"She has a good relationship with her partner, detective ice-t."
However, as time went on, she gradually adapted to the job
"The character [editor] in SVU was initially portrayed as wet behind the ears, eager, and often punished by Captain Dan Florek for being outstanding."
"[4] [5] this sometimes affects her interaction with domestic abuse victims."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kristina...”
“We’ll give him the benefit of the doubt though because we know Dorinda is not exactly the kind of woman who’d put up with shady business!”
“To be fair, he tried to make up with Bethenny and does seem to treat Dorinda well, but the fighting with the women and showing up drunk at girls’ nights isn’t cool.”
“...her friends on camera...”
“John Mahdessian We put John Mahdessian in the last spot on this list because he s never really did anything too terrible to Real Housewives of New York City star Dorinda aside from getting into a tiff with her and...”
“12.”
“From infidelity to incarceration, here are 12 of the shadiest significant others who’ve appeared on the show!”
“We’ve watched many relationships come and go over the years as the women have dated (or even married) some pretty interesting characters!”
“What fans love the most about this show is that many of the women completely open up their lives to viewers, including their sometimes tumultuous love lives.”
“Bravo’s most successful franchise is undeniably the Real Housewives reality series.”


"Christina..."
"But we'll reassure him, because we know that Dorinda is not the kind of woman who will put up with a dark business!"
"To be fair, he wants to make up with Bethany and seems to be nice to Dorinda, but it's not cool to fight with women and get drunk on a girl's night."
“… Her friend is in the camera... "
"John madeshan, we put John madeshan at the bottom of the list, because he has never done anything too terrible to the star of" New York City Housewives "except fighting with Dorinda..."
“12.”
"From infidelity to imprisonment, here are 12 of the darkest and most important people on the show!"
"Over the years, we've seen a lot of relationships come and go, because these women date (or even marry) some pretty interesting characters!"
"What fans love most about the show is that many women are completely open to the audience about their lives, including their sometimes chaotic love lives."
"Bravo's most successful series is undoubtedly the Real Housewives reality series."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“@PaulaAbdul @RowanBlanchard @SabrinaAnnLynn @Lavernecox @JessieJSOURCE WE DayRelated Linkshttp://www.WE.org...”
“Grammy winning actor rapper and producer DaveedDiggs Tony and Grammy winning actor rapper and producer Daniel Fernandez Danfer22 YouTube creator magician Danfer22 YouTube creator magician Fozzie Bear World s funniest stand up comic bear World s funniest stand up comic bear Giacomo Gianniotti GiacomoKG Actor musician writer director and philanthropist...”
“Over 875,000 youth were inspired to take steps to improve the world through WE Schools, raising more than $825,500 in support of local and global organizations.”
“In the 2015/2016 school year, students and teachers from across California participated in remarkable social change.”
“WE Schools encourages students to further their curricular learning, develop life skills for success beyond the classroom and become change-makers in their communities.”
“The program is designed to enhance a school's existing social initiatives or spark new ones.”
“...record producer More than a one day event WE Day is connected to the free yearlong educational program WE Schools providing schools and community groups with curriculum educational resources and action campaigns...”
“Multi platinum Juno award winning recording artists TenorsMusic Multi platinum Juno award winning recording artists Grace VanderWaal GraceVanderWaal Singer songwriter and winner of America s Got Talent GraceVanderWaal Singer songwriter and winner of Casey Veggies CaseyVeggies Rapper and songwriter CaseyVeggies Rapper and songwriter Xzibit xzibit Multi platinum rapper actor and...”
“GiacomoKG Actor musician writer director and philanthropist Evan Goldberg Screenwriter producer and director Screenwriter producer and director Jessie J JessieJ Award winning singer and songwriter JessieJ Award winning singer and songwriter Shonduras Shonduras Social media artist Shonduras Social media artist Statler and Waldorf Professional hecklers Professional hecklers The Tenors TenorsMusic...”
“RowanBlanchard Actress and activist RowanBlanchard Actress and activist Sabrina Carpenter SabrinaAnnLynn Singer songwriter and actress SabrinaAnnLynn Singer songwriter and actress Laverne Cox Lavernecox Emmy nominated actress and Emmy winning producer Lavernecox Emmy nominated actress and Emmy winning producer CyreneQ cyreneq Snapchat artist cyreneq Snapchat artist Daveed Diggs DaveedDiggs Tony and...”


“@ PaulaAbdul@RowanBlanchard@SabrinaAnnLynn@Lavernecox@JessieJSOURCE  "We dayrelated" link http://www.WE.org 。。。”
"Grammy award winning rapper and producer David digstoni and Grammy award winning rapper and producer Daniel Fernandez Denver 22 YouTube creator magic Denver 22 YouTube creator magician fouz bear world's funniest stand up comic bear world's funniest stand up comic bear Giacomo gianiotti giacomock actor musician writer director philanthropist... "
"More than 875000 young people are encouraged to take steps to improve the world through our school, raising more than $825500 to support local and global organizations."
"In the 2015 / 2016 school year, students and teachers from all over California participated in significant social change."
"Our school encourages students to further study in the curriculum, cultivate students' life skills for success outside the classroom, and become the change creators of the community."
"The plan aims to enhance existing social initiatives in schools or to stimulate new initiatives."
“… Record producers, our activities more than one day a day are related to our school's free one-year education plan to provide school and community group curriculum education resources and action activities... "
"Multi platinum Juno award winning recording artist Tenor Music multi platinum Juno award winning recording artist grace vanderwaal grace vanderwaal singer songwriter and American talent grace vanderwaal singer songwriter and Casey veggies rapper and songwriter
Giacomokg actor musician screenwriter director and philanthropist Evan Goldberg screenwriter Producer Director screenwriter Producer Director Jessie J Jessie J award winning singer songwriter Jessie J award winning singer songwriter shonduras shonduras social media artist shonduras social media artist Statler and Waldorf professional questioner professional question tenor tenor music.... "
"Rowan Blanchard actress and activist Sabrina carpenter Sabrina Ann Lynn singer songwriter and actress Sabrina Ann Lynn singer songwriter and actress Laverne Cox lavernecox Emmy nominating actress and Emmy winning producer lavernecox Emmy nominating actress and Emmy winning producer Cyrene Q Cyrene Q Snapchat artists cyreneq snapchat artists Daveed diggs Daveed diggs Tony and



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think my decision might have been different (otherwise).””
““But we don’t want to be viewed as victims.”
“Ross and Kocian both leaned on her before deciding to join the army of survivors.”
“Until she stood in front of Nassar, Wieber had never spoken publicly about her abuse.”
“The group included Jordyn Wieber, who competed alongside Ross at the 2012 London games and now serves as an assistant coach with the Bruins.”
“The turning point came in January as they watched nearly 200 women come forward to read victim impact statements to Nassar.”
“They both say they were in denial about their abuse.”
“Ross and Kocian, a member of the Final Five that won team gold at the 2016 Olympics, have retired from elite gymnastics and now compete collegiately as teammates at UCLA.”
“I’ve come to the point in my life this is something I want to share my story and move on,” Ross told the Associated Press.”
““It doesn’t matter how old you are and what happens to you.”


"I think my decision may be different (otherwise)."
"But we don't want to be seen as victims."
"Ross and cosine relied on her before they decided to join the survivors."
"Until she stood in front of Nasar, Webb never talked publicly about her abuse."
"The team includes yoldine Webb, who played alongside rose at the 2012 London Olympics and is now assistant coach of Bruins."
"The turning point came in January, when they saw nearly 200 women come forward and read the victim impact statement to Nasar."
"They all said they denied being abused."
"Ross and corxian are among the last five to win team gold medals at the 2016 Olympics. They have retired from the elite gymnastics team and are now playing in College as UCLA teammates."
"I've reached a critical moment in my life, which is something I want to share my story and move on," Rose told the associated press
"No matter how old you are, what happens."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Adam Levine and James Corden Get Pulled Over by a Cop During Carpool KaraokeAdam Levine Says 'Girls Are Better Than Boys,' Reveals How ‘The Voice’ Prepared Him for Fatherhood (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Adam Levine Plays It Cool (As James Corden Panics) While Getting Pulled Over on 'Carpool Karaoke' - Watch!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Check it out:Adam Levine Says Being a Dad to Girls 'Is Better Than Boys' (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Music aside, Levine recently opened up to ET about being a father to two growing girls.”
“After all the that, the "Girls Like You" music video ends with all of the featured stars striking a pose while side-by-side.”
“The family moment was missing one member, the couple's 3-month-old daughter, Gio, but there's still plenty of time for her to star in her dad's music videos!”
“As for Prinsloo, 29, she sports a simple white T-shirt and ripped jeans while leaning into her hubby’s embrace.”
“Little Dusty is seen adorably squirming in her supermodel mom’s arms while she rocks a black dress.”
“The sweetest moment, however, comes at the end when Levine stops singing and turns to hug his wife, Behati Prinsloo, and their 1-year-old daughter, Dusty Rose.”


"Adam Levin and James cordon were stopped by the police when they were carpooling. Adam Levin said that" girls are better than boys, "revealing how" voice "prepared him for his father's (exclusive) related gallery..."
"Embedded code restart" content: Adam Levin had a cool time when he was stopped in "carpool karaoke" (James Corden panicked), look
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Check out: Adam Levin's" being a girl's dad is better than a boy's "(exclusive) video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"Music aside, Levin recently opened up to ET and said he was the father of two growing girls."
After all this, the music video of "girls like you" ends with all the stars posing side by side
"The family is short of a member, the couple's 3-month-old daughter, GIO, but she still has enough time to play in her father's music video!"
"As for Prinsloo, 29, she was wearing a simple white T-shirt and ripped jeans, leaning in her husband's arms."
"Little dusty squirms lovingly in the arms of her supermodel mother, shaking a black dress."
"However, the sweetest moment came at the end, when Levin stopped singing and turned to embrace his wife, behatie prinslow, and their 1-year-old daughter, dusty Ross."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m blessed with lots of answers to that question,” she says.”
“It should be your own unique individual expression RELATED Ellen DeGeneres Confirms Stand Up Special On Netflix Okay I m In When talking about her style moments from the past the one she s most proud of is of her most memorable wearing the Bjork swan dress when I was...”
“Over the years, DeGeneres has also become known for her growing sense of style.”
“In a new interview with Footwear News, the star covers the magazine and talks about her style evolution.”
““If you’ve seen me in the 1970s and ’80s, you’ll agree with me that my style has gotten better.”
“But also that’s more confidence too,” she admits.”
““I got more comfortable in dressing in the way I want to dress instead of what I think I’m supposed to dress like.”
“That’s what is great about fashion.”
“...hosting the Emmys in 2001 Outside of her style DeGeneres finds influence from fellow women like Oprah and Michelle Obama...”
“Getting married and marrying my wife was a big moment in my life.”


"I'm lucky that there are many answers to this question," she said
"This should be your own unique personal expression. Ellen DeGeneres confirmed her special stand on Netflix. When I was talking about her past fashion moments, she was most proud of her most unforgettable Bjork Swan dress when I was..."
"Over the years, DeGeneres has also been known for his growing sense of style."
"In the latest interview with shoe news, the Star reported on the magazine and talked about her style evolution."
"If you've seen me in the '70s and' 80s, you'll agree that my style has changed for the better."
"But it's also greater confidence," she admits
"I'm wearing what I want to wear instead of what I think I should wear, which makes me more comfortable."
"That's the greatness of fashion."
“… When hosting the Emmy Awards in 2001, Denise discovered the influence of fellow women like Oprah and Michelle Obama... "
"Getting married is an important moment in my life."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the full Ellen DeGeneres clip above.”
“Avengers: Infinity War arrives in theaters Friday.”
“"It's all I've done for 10 years," Hemsworth joked after watching the footage.”
“Those moments, it turns out, were all moments when the god of thunder happens to not be wearing a shirt.”
“Hemsworth couldn't confirm or deny anything, of course, but juuuuuust in case Thor ends up worse off than just losing an eye, she made him a video celebrating his "best-of" moments from the franchise.”
“DeGeneres noted that with the stakes in this film being so high, there's a good chance not every hero makes it out alive.”
“That last bit is what Ellen DeGeneres highlighted when Chris Hemsworth appeared on her show Thursday to promote the latest MCU installment, Avengers: Infinity War.”
“And on a few glorious occasions, really good-looking men named Chris have been shirtless.”
“Planets and galaxies have been in jeopardy, saved, and put in jeopardy again.”
“Heroes have been tested.”


"Look at the complete Alan DeGeneres clip above."
Avengers: Infinite War will be released on Friday
"It's all I've done for 10 years," Hemsworth joked after watching the video
"Those were the moments when Raytheon happened not to wear a shirt."
"Of course, Hemsworth can't confirm or deny anything, but in order to prevent Thor from eventually losing an eye, euwus made a video for him to celebrate his' best 'moment in the film."
"DeGeneres pointed out that because the risk of the film is so high, it is very likely that not every hero will be able to act alive."
"This last point was highlighted by Ellen DeGeneres on Chris Hemsworth's show on Thursday, when she was working on the latest issue of MCU's Avengers: Infinite War（ Avengers:Infinity War ）Do publicity. "
"On some glorious occasions, the really handsome Chris is naked."
"Planets and galaxies have always been in danger, rescued, and once again in danger."
"The heroes have stood the test."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She enthusiastically took on the challenge of guessing what the ball wasHeadbanger: Eva surprised viewers as she confessed that her first ever concert was the heavy metal band Megadeth band on the chat show...”
“Disco ball: Eva and James also attempted to guess the identity of a disco ball while blindfoldedUp close: The brunette beauty was seen rubbing her chin against the ball to get a feel for itWhat's this?”
“Fear: Eva did not look like she was enjoying the blindfold challenge, pulling a range of facial expressionsIt's a lizard!”
“...before shouting 'Oh god, oh god!'”
“Is it a raccoon?'”
“She asked 'Is it a squirrel?”
“...before crying out a series of different guessesBlindfold challenge: The 42-year-old looked terrified as she put her face against the creature, while host James attempted to sniff the lizard'Oh god!'”
“Eva then shouted out in horror 'Is it animal, is it an animal?'”
“'Is it a possum?'”
“Oh god, oh god!'”


"She enthusiastically accepted the challenge of guessing what the ball was: EVA surprised the audience by admitting that her first concert was Megadeth, the heavy metal band in the chat show..."
"Disco ball: EVA and James also try to guess the identity of a disco ball, but blindly approach: someone sees this dark haired beauty rubbing her chin against the ball to touch it. What's this?" "
"Fear: EVA doesn't look like she's enjoying the blindfold challenge, pulling a series of facial expressions. She's a lizard!"
“… "Oh God, oh god!"
"Is it a raccoon?"
"She asked," is it a squirrel? "
“…… Before calling out a series of different guesses, the blindfolded challenge: the 42 year old looks scared when she puts her face on the lizard, while the owner James tries to smell the lizard's nose "Oh, my God!"
"Is it an animal? Is it an animal?" EVA exclaimed
"Opossum?"
"Oh God, oh god!"



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...when the timing is right we will find our way to each other In the end Grimaldi came out of this a stronger person and wants nothing but the best for Viall...”
““It wasn’t the distance that was ever an issue.”
“...moving past her heartbreak...”
“Six months ago, fans of ABC’s The Bachelor watched Nick Viall and the Canada native fall in love and get engaged on last season’s finale.”
“Five months later, the duo announced their split, saying in a statement, “We gave this relationship our all and we are saddened that we did not get the fairytale ending we hoped for.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Now, the 29-year-old is opening up about why things didn’t work out and how she plans on moving forward.”
““My relationship with Nick and experience on The Bachelor has given me so many amazing and memorable moments in my life, and I am forever grateful,” Grimaldi exclusively tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue.”
““Nick and I were always transparent about the challenges in a relationship.”
“We certainly had ours.”
“I fell for him hard and when you fall in love that hard your heart breaks even harder Image zoom Credit David Crotty Patrick McMullan via Getty Images In the end as much as we loved each other and tried to make it work we just realized we were different...”


“…… When the time is right, we will find our way to each other. Finally, Grimaldi will come out of this and become a stronger person. He just wants to fight for the best thing for Villar.... "
"Distance is never an issue."
“… Over her heartbreak... "
"Six months ago, fans of ABC's Bachelor saw Nick Villar fall in love and get engaged with this Canadian native in the finale of last season."
Five months later, the two broke up and said in a statement: "we've given everything for this relationship and we're sad that we didn't get the fairy tale ending we wanted." Get news, feature, etc
"Now, at 29, she's starting to say frankly why things didn't work out and how she plans to move on."
"My relationship with Nick and my single experience have given me many amazing and unforgettable moments in my life, and I will always be grateful," Grimaldi told people exclusively in this week's People magazine
"Nick and I are always transparent about the challenges in love."
"Of course we have our own."
"I'm deeply in love with him. When you fall in love, your heart breaks even more. Finally, David crotti Patrick McMullen thanks through Getty Images, just as we love each other and try to make them work, we just realize that we are different... "



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just one day ago, the star wished her new love a happy birthday by sharing a sexy photo of Falchuk.”
“...three years...”
“We really genuinely wanted our kids to be as unscathed as possible Paltrow debuted her massive sapphire engagement ring in late January weeks after she and Falchuk officially confirmed their engagement by announcing the news on the cover of Goop Magazine s Sex Love issue after dating for more than...”
“Divorce is terrible, it was very painful, it was really hard.”
““It’s nice, it’s great.”
“We’re very familial,” she told Colbert about Martin, who’s now dating actress Dakota Johnson.”
““He’s really like my brother.”
“Earlier this year, the Goop founder — who’s engaged to producer Brad Falchuk — opened up about her relationship with Martin on The Late Show with Stephen Colbert.”
“Thank you for giving me these two,” she captioned the post along with a heart emoji.”
““Happy birthday my brother.”


"Just one day ago, the star wished her new sweetheart a happy birthday by sharing a sexy picture of falchuk."
“… Three years... "
"We really hope that our children will be as safe as possible. Paltrow first launched her huge sapphire engagement ring in late January, after she and falchuk officially confirmed their engagement, after dating more than Five years later, she announced it on the cover of Google magazine sex
"Divorce is terrible, it's painful, it's really hard."
"Great, great."
"We're very close," she told Colbert Martin, who is now dating actress Dakota Johnson
"He's really like my brother."
Earlier this year, the Google founder, who was engaged to producer Brad falchuk, revealed her relationship with Martin on an evening show with Stephen Colbert
"Thank you for these two," she added a heart emoticon to the title of the post
"Happy birthday, my brother."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!” — of herself and Tyler sitting beside each other on a couch.”
“Earlier this week, Catelynn shut down divorce rumors on Twitter, writing, “@tylerbaltierramtv and I are not getting a divorce,” Catelynn captioned a photo — which featured overlaying text that read “#BreakingNews Divorce?”
“...firstborn daughter on her 9th birthday...”
“The couple posted sweet new photos of Carly, the daughter they placed for adoption in the first season of MTV’s 16 and Pregnant in 2009, and their second daughter, Novalee Reign, on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Tyler, 26, shared a photo on Friday of the girls together, with Carly’s face turned away from the camera as she carried Nova.”
““Happy Birthday to my beautiful first born!”
“I can’t believe Carly is 9 years old today & I’m just so blessed because I may not have the luxury of seeing her everyday but I have the peace of mind knowing I will see her one day a year (sometimes 2),” he wrote in the caption.”
““I have learned a lot throughout this adoption journey & I have made mistakes in the past regarding that relationship,” he continued.”
“But I feel like I have grown up matured through all of that I now realize that I need to count my blessings I am proud to say that I have 9 blessings 9 years of seeing her grow through visits pictures 9 birthday cakes ONE child to forever impact...”


"!" she and Tyler are sitting side by side on the sofa. "
Earlier this week, catelynn closed the divorce rumors on twitter, saying, "Tyler baltierramtv and I are not going to divorce," catelynn wrote under the title of a photo, which was covered with a paragraph that said, "divorce in breaking news?"
“… On her ninth birthday... "
"The couple posted a sweet new photo on instagram of Carly and their second daughter, novalee reigne, who they adopted in the first quarter of MTV season 16 and got pregnant in 2009."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Taylor, 26, shared a picture of two girls together on Friday, with Carly taking her face away from the camera as she carried Nova behind her back
"Happy Birthday to my beautiful eldest son!"
"I can't believe Carly is 9 years old today & I'm so lucky, because I may not have the luxury of seeing her every day, but I know calmly that I see her one day (sometimes two days) every year," he wrote in the title
"I learned a lot during the adoption process, and I've made mistakes in this relationship in the past," he added
"But I feel like I've grown up. Through all this, I now realize that I need to count my blessings. I'm very proud to say that I have 9 blessings for 9 years to see her grow up. Through visiting pictures 9 birthday cake, a child will always be affected..."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kate Winslet, who as recently as December sang Allen’s praises, said at the London Film Critics’ Circle Awards on Sunday that she has “bitter regrets” from working with “men of power” who are associated with sexual harassment and assault.”
“Alec Baldwin has also advocated for Allen, saying it’s “unfair and sad” that actors are denouncing the filmmaker.”
“Timothée Chalamet and Rebecca Hall have pledged to donate their salaries from Allen’s upcoming film “A Rainy Day in New York” to various charities, including the Time’s Up Legal Defense Fund.”
“Many stars, including Colin Firth and Greta Gerwig, recently said they would not work with the director again.”
“...s recent interview with CBS regarding the alleged assault...”
“...https t co QVQIUxImB1 Diane Keaton Diane_Keaton January 29 2018 The allegations against Allen regained national prominence in the wake of the sexual abuse scandal centered around Harvey Weinstein whom Allen referred to as a sad sick man that rocked Hollywood the MeToo and Time s Up movements and Farrow...”
“It might be of interest to take a look at the 60 Minute interview from 1992 and see what you think.”
“Keaton has starred in a number of Allen’s films, including “Annie Hall,” “Interiors,” and “Manhattan.”Woody Allen is my friend and I continue to believe him.”
“Farrow has accused Allen of sexually assaulting her in 1992 when she was seven years old, though he has never been charged.”
“It might be of interest to take a look at the ’60 Minute’ interview from 1992 and see what you think,” she tweeted, linking to the interview with Steve Kroft in which Allen discussed the allegations waged against him by his adopted daughter, Dylan Farrow.”


"Kate Winslet, who sang Alan's Hymn just last December, said at the London Film Critics' Circle Awards ceremony on Sunday that she felt" strong regret "for the" dignitaries "working with them in connection with sexual harassment and abuse
Alec Baldwin also backed Allen, saying the actors condemned the filmmaker as "unfair and sad."
"Timothy chalamit and Rebecca hall have promised to donate the salary from Allen's upcoming film" New York for a rainy day "to various charities, including time's Legal Defense Fund."
"Many stars, including Colin Firth and Greta Gerwig, have recently said they won't work with the director any more."
“… He was recently interviewed by CBS about the so-called attack... "
“… HTTPS t Co qvqiuximb1 Diane Keaton Diane Keaton on January 29, 2018, the accusation against Allen regained national attention after Harvey Weinstein's sexual abuse scandal. Allen said that he was a sad patient and shocked Hollywood's metoo and time up movement and Farrow... "
"Take a look at the 60 minute interview in 1992 and see what you think."
Keaton has starred in many of Allen's films, including Anne hall, interior design and Manhattan. Woody Allen is my friend and I still believe in him
"Farrow accused Allen of sexually assaulting her in 1992, when she was only seven years old, but he was never charged."
"It might be interesting to look at the '60 minutes' interview in 1992 and see what you think," she tweeted, linking to an interview with Steve Kroft, in which Allen discussed the accusations of his adopted daughter Dylan farrow



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pedestal putting an exclamation point on the superstar charged opener...”
“Regret In Your Tears another cut she released in a trilogy earlier this year that also included Frauds and the Wayne assisted Changed It rounded out her four song medley and saw the MC rapping singing while rising on a...”
“Minaj, seductive and sexy as always, delivered her verse while gyrating in a chair, but she still had more to come.”
“Derulo then emerged, sporting long dreads and a chain over an all-black ensemble, to kick into "Swalla."”
“Drake, who is also featured on the song, did not appear (though he watched from the crowd), but Minaj had plenty more guests to come, moving seamlessly into "Light My Body Up" with Guetta manning the boards behind her.”
“...run through his verse...”
“After an introduction that included snippets of previous hits like Beez in the Trap Starships and Moment For Life Minaj ripped into a forceful rendition of her much discussed Remy Ma diss track No Frauds with Weezy on hand to...”
“...a solo run through her recent single Regret In Your Tears...”
“The multi talented MC opened the 2017 Billboard Music Awards with a bang bringing out high profile guests Lil Wayne No Frauds David Guetta Light My Body Up and Jason Derulo Swalla for a four song medley that concluded with...”
“Nicki Minaj certainly knows how to create a moment.”


“… Add an exclamation mark to the superstar's opening remarks... "
"Regret another cut in your tears, her trilogy released earlier this year, which also includes fraud and Wayne helped change the mix of its four songs, and saw the host rap while rising one..."
Minagi is as seductive and sexy as ever, reading poetry as she spins around in her chair, but she has more to do
Then drew appeared, wearing an all black necklace and a long fear, and jumped into "svara."
"Drake also appeared in the song, he did not appear (although he watched in the crowd), but Minagi had more guests coming and seamlessly entered" light up my body ", and Gaeta was responsible for the Kanban behind her."
“… Read through his lines... "
"In an introduction that includes moments like pitching the Starship biz and life, Minagi rips to a powerful deductive clip of her much discussed rami madiss orbit without the deception of weiz's hands..."
“… In your tears alone through her recent single regret... "
"This versatile host was brilliant at the opening ceremony of the 2017 Billboard Music Awards, bringing out the well-known guest Lil Wayne no frauds David Guetta to light up my body. Jason Derulo swalla had a mix and match of four songs, and finally
"Nicky Minagi certainly knows how to create a moment."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 2018 Oscars ceremony will be held at the Dolby Theatre at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4 and will be televised live on ABC at 7 p.m. ET/4 p.m. PT.”
“And Gill says that this white gown included all the “traditional trademarks” of Fonda’s style.”
“Whether she wears a stop-and-stare jumpsuit or head-turning hairstyle, the 80-year-old actress (and 2018 Academy Awards presenter) isn’t afraid to stand out.”
“And she continued that bold style streak at the Oscars, arriving in a special Balmain gown that shows off her “youthful physique.”Fonda hit the carpet wearing a white long-sleeve beaded Balmain gown that’s part of the brand’s first “44 François premier ” collection.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““This is the very first red carpet collection for Olivier Rousteing, honoring Mr. Balmain and the heritage of the house,” her stylist, Tanya Gill tells PEOPLE.”
““Using all codes of Balmain, this collection was designed for celebrity friends of the house.”Watch People & Entertainment Weekly Red Carpet Live this Sunday, March 4 at 5pm ET/2pm PT.”
“Download the PeopleTV app on your favorite mobile or connected TV device, or stream the show on People.com, EW.com, Twitter, Facebook Live and YouTube Live.”
““It is structured and sophisticated with a strong modern silhouette that shows off her youthful physique.” (Case in point: The design looks similar to the high-collar, body-skimming white gown with gloves she wore to the 1993 ceremony.)”
“She also carried a Perrin Paris clutch and wore a Time’s Up pin to support the fight against sexual harassment and workplace inequality in the entertainment industry and beyond.”


"The 2018 Oscars will be held on March 4 at the Dolby theatre in Hollywood and Highland Center, and will be broadcast live on ABC at 7:00 p.m. EST / 4:00 p.m. Pacific time."
Jill said the white dress contained all of Fonda's "traditional trademarks"
"The 80 year old actress (who is also the host of the 2018 Oscars) is not afraid to stand out, whether she is wearing a stunning Jumpsuit or a twisted haircut."
She continued this bold style at the Oscars, showing her "young physique" in a special Balmain dress. Fonda stepped onto the carpet in a white Long Sleeve pearlescent Balmain dress, part of the brand's first "44 Fran ˊ OIS premier" collection
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This is Olivier rostan's first red carpet series, a tribute to Mr. balman and the tradition of the house," her stylist Tanya gill told people
"Using all of Balmain's code, this series is designed for celebrity friends." Watch people and entertainment weekly live on the red carpet, Sunday, March 4, 5pm EST / 2pm Pacific time
"Download the peopletv app on your favorite mobile or connected TV device, or play programs on people.com, EW, twitter, Facebook live and Youtube live."
"This dress is compact and exquisite, with a strong modern outline, showing her young physique." (for example: This design looks like a high necked tight white jacket with gloves she wore at her wedding in 1993.)
"She also wears Palin's Paris handbag and time badge to support the fight against sexual harassment and workplace inequality inside and outside the entertainment industry."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her third outfit is a Stella Jean Resort striped top and colorful skirt with Casadei shoes.”
“She then changed into a Mary Katrantzou polka-dotted dress with Casadei shoes.”
“FYI: Zendaya is wearing a Giuseppe di Morabito gold coat dress and a Bienen-Davis bag.”
“...with Kelly & Ryan.”
“Zendaya changed into two more outfits that morning while continuing her press day, which included an appearance on Live!”
““Today’s accidental reference…Golden Globes✨,” Zendaya captioned photos of her in the outfit.”
“The 21-year-old actress was dressed appropriately as her new movie The Greatest Showman just received three Golden Globes nominations, including one for Best Picture – Musical or Comedy.”
“Zendaya steps out in a gold outfit while leaving The Today Show on Monday morning (December 11) in New York City.”


"Her third outfit is Stella Jean resort striped top and colorful skirt with Casadei shoes."
"Then she changed into a Mary katrantzou polka dot dress and casadi shoes."
"For reference only: zendaya is wearing a Giuseppe di Morabito gold coat and a bienen Davis bag."
“… With Kelly and Ryan. "
"Zendaya put on two more outfits that morning and continued her press day, including a live appearance!"
"Today's unexpected reference Golden Globe Award ✨ "Cendaya marked the photo of her wearing the suit on the photo."
"The 21-year-old actress is well dressed because her new film" the greatest performer "has just won three Golden Globe nominations, one of which is best picture - Musical or comedy."
"On Monday (December 11) morning, zendaya left the today show in New York City and appeared in a gold suit."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At the time, Hurwitz said that the fourth season was just the beginning of the show's second act.”
“The entire nine-person ensemble returned for season four, which consisted of 15 episodes.”
“The streaming giant Netflix first brought back the comedy in May 2013.”
“— Jason Bateman (@batemanjason) May 12, 2017An Emmy winner for best comedy series in 2004, Arrested Development originally ran on Fox from 2003-2006.”
“Just officially signed on to more ARRESTED DEVELOPMENT today.”
“Look very probable I'm going to put some miles on the Stair Car this summer.”
“Netflix declined to comment.”
“Sources tell The Hollywood Reporter that creator Mitchell Hurwitz's deal was done weeks ago, with the writers room starting up shortly thereafter.”
“The actor tweeted Friday that he has officially signed on for more of the cult hit, which formerly aired on Fox.”
“Netflix is bringing back Arrested Development for season five, and Jason Bateman is returning.”


"At the time, herwitz said that the fourth season was just the beginning of the second act of the play."
"The entire fourth season of the nine ensemble, including 15 episodes."
"Streaming giant Netflix brought the comedy back for the first time in May 2013."
——Jason Bateman (@ Bateman Jason), winner of 2004 Emmy Award for best comedy series, was broadcast on Fox TV from 2003 to 2006 on May 12, 2017
"More development projects have just been officially signed today."
"It seems likely that I'll run a few more miles on the staircar this summer."
"Netflix declined to comment."
"Sources told Hollywood reporters that the deal for creator Mitchell hewitz was completed a few weeks ago, and soon after that, the playroom opened."
The actor tweeted Friday that he has officially signed up for the cult hit previously broadcast on fox
"Netflix is bringing new developments for the fifth quarter, and Jason Bateman is coming back."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[wdi_feed id=”1″]”
“Marc and Shannon continue to enjoy their friendship because last year the friendly exes also hung out for a boat day.”
“Well, I’m just here with the king”, she wrote.”
“Then, she posted a photo with Smith on the same yacht and captioned it: “How was your weekend?”
““Spring Break”, she captioned the photo.”
“Earlier in the day, she shared a photo sporting a one-piece bathing suit and the stunning Miami skyline behind her.”
“That’s because Anthony’s ex-wife was a guest at the amazing yacht party along with her son.”
“Olivia Anderson – World Stars MagWhile Marc Anthony gave Will Smith an epic salsa lesson, Shannon de Lima was there cheering them on.”


“[wdi_ feed id=”1〃]”
"Mark and Shannon continue to enjoy their friendship because last year two friendly ex girlfriends went out for a day on a boat."
"Well, I'm just with the king," she wrote
Then she posted a picture of Smith on the same yacht and added the title: "how was the weekend?"
"Spring break," she added a title to the photo
"Earlier in the day, she shared a photo of her in a one-piece swimsuit with the amazing Miami skyline behind her."
"That's because Anthony's ex-wife and her son went to this amazing yacht party together."
"Olivia Anderson - the world star magson, Mark Antony gave Will Smith an epic salsa lesson, and Shannon Delima was there to cheer them on."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My heartfelt condolences to her & to all of Scott’s friends the world over.”See a few others below:”
“He played George Wilson opposite Robert Redford in 1974’s The Great Gatsby and earned a Golden Globe nomination in 1980 for his turn in The Ninth Configuration.”
“He was 76.”
“Wilson’s rep Dominic Mancini confirmed the news to PEOPLE Saturday evening.”
““Scott was one of the most genuine, inspirational, and truly beloved people,” Mancini said.”
““His amazing legacy will live on through his timeless performances.”
“He will be missed deeply by his wife, family, and friends.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Scott will always be remembered as a great actor and we all feel fortunate to have known him as an even better person,” AMC said in a statement.”
““The character he embodied on The Walking Dead, Hershel, lived at the emotional core of the show.”
“Like Scott in our lives, Hershel was a character whose actions continue to inform our characters’ choices to this day.”


"I extend my heartfelt sympathy to her and all of Scott's friends around the world." See below:
"He played opposite George Wilson and Robert Redford in 1974's the Great Gatsby and was nominated for the Golden Globe in 1980 for his performance in group 9."
"He was 76."
"Wilson's representative, Dominic Mancini, confirmed the news on Saturday night."
"Scott is one of the most sincere, inspiring and loved people," Mancini said
"His amazing legacy will continue through his eternal performance."
His wife, family and friends will miss him deeply. "Get push notifications for news, topics, etc."
"Scott will always be remembered as a great actor and we all feel lucky because we know he is a better person," AMC said in a statement
"Herschel, the character he plays in the walking dead, is the core of the emotion in the play."
"Just like Scott in our life, Herschel is also a character, and his behavior is still constantly influencing our choice of roles."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Parisa Fitz-Henley; Meghan Markle | Credit: A+E Networks; Max Mumby/Indigo/GettyThe first aired on Lifetime, and the other on Hallmark — a channel that Meghan worked with multiple times throughout her acting career.”
“Both were released around the time of the couple’s wedding and depicted their relationship, which started when they were both students at the University of St. Andrews in Scotland.”
“Image zoom Murray Fraser and Parisa Fitz-Henley | Credit: Parisa Fitz-Henley/InstagramBefore Meghan and Harry, Prince William and Kate Middleton were also the focus of not one, but two TV movies.”
“Looking forward to sharing everything with you,” the star said in a video shared on Instagram Story Thursday.”
“I’m heading into my trailer for the first time.”
““We’re here for day one of Harry & Meghan: A Royal Romance!”
“With her dark locks, sparkling brown eyes and Audrey Hepburn-inspired brows, Fitz-Henley is a dead ringer for Meghan.”
“The TV movie will start with the couple’s first date, which was set up by a mutual friend, and continue through their engagement.”
“Earlier this month, it was announced that Meghan and Harry’s whirlwind love story was officially getting the Hollywood treatment with a Lifetime movie, set to air this spring.”
““Sweet Dreams to you Love, #HarryandMeghan #ARoyalRomance @Lifetimetv Day 1 #gingerlove,” Fitz-Henley, 41, captioned the behind-the-scenes photo of her cozying up with actor Murray Fraser, who plays the spare heir.”


"Image zoom, palissa Fitz Henry; Megan markel | credit: a + e network; max Moby / indigo / Getty first aired on" in life "and another on" hallmark "- a channel Megan has worked with many times in her acting career."
"Both photos were released before and after their wedding, describing their relationship, which began when they were both students at the University of St Andrews in Scotland."
"Image zooming Murray Fraser and palissa Fitz Henry | image source: palissa Fitz Henry / instagram before Megan and Harry, Prince William and Kate Middleton are not one, but the focus of two TV movies."
"I'm looking forward to sharing everything with you," the star said in a video shared on instagram story on Thursday
"I walked into my trailer for the first time."
"We're here for Harry and Megan's first day: Royal Romance!"
"With her dark hair, shining brown eyes and Audrey Hepburn's eyebrows, Fitz Henry is a brilliant person for Megan."
"The TV movie will start with the couple's first date, which is arranged by a mutual friend and continues until their engagement."
"Earlier this month, it was reported that Megan and Harry's whirlwind love story would be broadcast this spring, and this lifelong movie will officially win the favor of Hollywood."
Fitz Henley, 41, wrote in this behind the scenes photo of her with actor Murray Fraser, who plays the role of alternate successor: "honey, have a dream, Harry and Meghan ARoyalRomance@Lifetimetv  Day 1ţgingerlove。”



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This post has been updated to include a statement from B&B, new information from NYPD, and a newly reported incident.”
“She later called a crisis hotline and went to a hospital to be examined, but ultimately, she chose not to file a police report.”
“The New York Police Department tells 60 Minutes that it has an ongoing investigation into the celebrity chef for potentially criminal behavior.”
“NYPD tells Eater that it’s looking at the assault allegations raised in the 60 Minutes report.”
“Update: The Daily News reports that police are also looking into another, similar incident.”
“The 60 Minutes segment on Sunday took a look at several allegations against Batali, which first became public in a December Eater investigation.”
“Anderson Cooper speaks with women who worked at the Spotted Pig, where Batali was an investor and allegedly groped staffers as a diner there.”
“The CBS newsmagazine show also spoke with an anonymous former Babbo employee who alleges Batali assaulted her in 2005 — claiming that she woke up after a party at the Spotted Pig with a “very deeply wounded” leg and something that looked like semen on her skirt.”
“Batali denied the incident.”
“...disturbing The company also noted that the terms of Batali s divestment from two dozen restaurants across the country will finalize on July 1”


"This article has been updated to include a statement from B & B, new information from the New York Police Department, and a newly reported incident."
"Later, she called the crisis hotline and went to the hospital for examination, but in the end, she chose not to call the police."
"The New York Police Department told 60 minutes that they are investigating the potential criminal activities of the famous chef."
"The New York Police Department told eater that they were investigating the attack charges in the 60 minute report."
"Update: the daily news reports that the police are investigating another similar incident."
"The 60 minute section on Sunday reviewed several charges against Batali, which were first made public during a diner investigation last December."
Anderson Cooper talks to a woman who works for spotted pig, an investor in the company where she is said to be hunting for employees as a diner
"CBS News magazine also interviewed an anonymous former Gbagbo employee who accused Batali of assaulting her in 2005 - claiming that she woke up after the spotted pig party with a" deep wound "to her leg and a piece of semen on her skirt."
"Batali denied the incident."
“…… The company also pointed out that the terms of Batali's divestment from more than 20 restaurants across the country will be finalized on July 1. "



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Love, King and Dreams Mommy"Chyna had been spotted by witnesses taking off her pink coat and picking up a plastic stroller in the shape of a bright pink car, dragging it along the ground by its long handle then throwing it at a group of people nearby.”
“They added: "Rob feels she needs to have a chaperone when Dream is in her custody to ensure that she is safe."”
“...was filmed lashing out at a woman...”
“Over the weekend, Chyna launched her stroller at a woman who 'touched' daughter Dream while they enjoyed a day out at a Six Flags theme park in California.”
“Following the incident, a source told E!”
“News: "Rob is furious with Chyna for putting Dream in danger.”
“"He plans to file papers to try and get more custody of Dream and to reduce Chyna's child support.”
“"He hopes the judge will see that he wants what's best for Dream and that he is putting her safety and best interest before anything else."”
“(Image: WENN.com)(Image: Instagram)According to TMZ, Rob also wants 'clear rules' set about what his ex 'can and can't do when the child is present'.”
“(Image: Instagram/ybnalmightyjay)"I do not condone violence nor am I a violent person but shout out to all the amazing mothers out there that will protect their children at all cost.”


"Love, the king and mummy." kina was found to take off her pink coat, pick up a bright pink car shaped plastic pram, drag it to the ground with her long handle, and then throw it at a group of people nearby
"Rob felt that when the dream was in her custody, she needed an escort to ensure her safety," they added
“… Being photographed slamming a woman
Last weekend, Gina launched her baby stroller to a woman who "touched" her daughter's dream. They enjoyed a day in Six Flags Theme Park in California
"After the incident, a source told e!"
News: "rob is angry at Zina for putting her dream in danger."
"He plans to file in an attempt to get more custody of the dream and reduce Zina's child support."
"He wants the judge to see that what he wants is the best for the dream, and he puts her safety and best interests first."
(image: Wenwang) (image source: instagram) according to TMZ, rob also wants to make "clear rules" on what his predecessor can and cannot do when children are present
"(picture: instagram / ybnalmightyjay)" I don't condone violence, and I'm not a violent person, but I want to shout to all great mothers that they will protect their children at all costs. "



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But it's selling out fast with only one size left in stock.”
“( Angie Dress, £1,250 (Stella McCartney ) / Stella McCartney )The dress is also available on Matches Fashion, which has aptly renamed it the 'Amal tie-back crepe dress'.”
“The 'Angie Dress', of course, comes with a luxury price tag and will set you back £1,250.”
“The dress also stays true to McCartney's ethical principles and is made out of sustainable viscose, acetate and silk lining.”
“( Amal Clooney and George Clooney at Prince Harry and Meghan Markle's wedding / AFP/Getty Images )Now, finally, you can recreate the look, as the designer behind the show-stopping number, Stella McCartney, has released the design.”
“A sartorial success indeed!”
“Just days after the wedding Google searches for 'Amal Clooney Royal Wedding' had already racked up over 479,000 results.”
“She finished off the statement outfit with a matching hat complete with net veil by Stephen Jones.”
“The midi dress featured cap sleeves and an elegant side drape, making it the perfect mix of classic and contemporary.”
“The human rights lawyer stole the show in a canary yellow ensemble by Stella McCartney.”


"But it sold out quickly, leaving only one size in stock."
"(Angie dress, ￡ 1250 (Stella McCartney) / Stella McCartney) is also available on matches fashion, which aptly changed its name to" Amal lace up crepe dress. "
"Of course, this Angie skirt has a luxury price tag that will bring you back to 1250."
"This skirt is also in line with McCartney's code of ethics and is made of sustainable viscose, acetate and silk lining."
"(Amar Clooney and George Clooney at the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel / AFP / Getty Images) now, you can finally recreate the look, because Stella McCartney, the designer behind the parking number, has released the design."
"What a success in the clothing industry!"
"Just a few days after the wedding, Google's search for 'Amar Clooney Royal Wedding' has yielded more than 479000 results."
"She did it with a hat that matched Stephen Jones's mesh veil."
"Featuring cap sleeves and elegant side pendants, MIDI skirt is a perfect combination of classic and modern."
"The human rights lawyer took the lead in Stella McCartney's canary yellow ensemble."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They’ve been thinking about it for months and they want to make sure it’s right.””
““They still don’t have a name,” an insider previously told PEOPLE.”
“Fans may have a while to wait until they find out the name of the couple’s little one, as they are still deciding themselves.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Looking for more style content?”
“Jones’s Fall 2018 runway show on Thursday will be his last for Louis Vuitton, according to Vogue.”
“Image zoom The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star recently showed off her Louis Vuitton-inspired trash cans | Credit: Kim Kardashian/SnapchatOn Wednesday, it was announced that Kim Jones, the artistic director of men’s wear at Louis Vuitton, would be stepping down after seven years.”
“However, Kardashian’s cryptic Instagram is far more likely to be in honor of the label’s artistic director.”
“Don...”
“In addition West has been a longtime fan often making Louis Vuitton references in his music including Stronger Runaway Love Gold Digger Can t Tell Me Nothing The Glory and Pinocchio Story RELATED VIDEO Kanye and Kim Kardashian West Welcome a Daughter After all he is nicknamed the Louis Vuitton...”


"They've been thinking about it for months, and they want to make sure it's right."
"They still don't have names," an insider told people earlier
"Fans may have to wait a while to know the name of the couple's baby because they are still making their own decisions."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Looking for more style content?"
According to vogue, Jones' 2018 autumn runway show on Thursday will be his last show in Louis Vuitton
"Recently, the star who followed Kardashian showed off her garbage can inspired by Louis Vuitton. Photo source: Kim Kardashian / snapchat on Wednesday, it was reported that Louis Vuitton men's art director Kim Jones will step down in seven years. "
"But Kardashian's mysterious instagram is more likely to commemorate the brand's artistic director."
"Don..."
"In addition, West is a long-term fan, often referred to in his music Louis Vuitton, including the more powerful escape love nuggets can't tell me what the glory and Pinocchio story related video Kanye and Kim kardashan West welcome daughter after all, he is nicknamed Louis Vuitton..."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mission: Impossible - Fallout hits theaters on July 27.”
“'Henry Cavill, Angela Bassett, and Vanessa Kirby also join the dynamic cast with filmmaker Christopher McQuarrie returning to the helm.'”
“But Tom Cruise has steered clear of Instagram...until now.”
“The 55-year-old kicked off his own social media page with two snaps on Thursday, including one of a clapperboard revealing that Mission: Impossible - Fallout is the title of the sixth film in the action franchise.”
“He s in Tom Cruise opened his very first Instagram account on Thursday with this snap revealing Mission Impossible Fallout is the title of the sixth film in the action franchise The second snap showed the star who famously does his own stunts desperately hanging on to the side of...”
“...a helicopter as it banks over a body of water...”
“In summer Tom, who has been filming in London, fractured an ankle during a stunt, holding up production for a couple of months.”
“But that didn't stop him.”
“'We've upped the ante for the sixth #MissionImpossible.”
“I can’t wait for you guys to see more,' Tom captioned the action shot.”


"Mission: Impossible - on July 27, radioactive dust was shown in cinemas."
"Henry Carville, Angela Bassett and Vanessa Kirby also joined the action group, with producer Christopher mcquarie back at the helm."
"But Tom Cruise has been avoiding instagram Until now. "
"The 55 year old released two snapshots on his social media on Thursday, one of which is the screen that reveals the title of the sixth film in the action series mission: Impossible - dust settled."
"He opened his first account with Tom Cruise on instagram on Thursday, and this photo reveals that the title of impossible task is the sixth film in the action series. The second photo shows a famous star, who is doing his stunts desperately, standing in the On the other side of the road. "
“… The helicopter is leaning on the water
"This summer, Tom, who has been filming in London, broke his ankle in a stunt performance, which delayed production for several months."
"But it didn't stop him."
"We've increased the stakes for the sixth impossible mission."
"I can't wait for you to see it again," Tom said under the title of the action movie



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I don’t think he’s there right now.””
““I would love to see Ben as the Bachelor again, but I think he’s like someone who takes it very serious and he wants to go on it when his heart’s ready.”
“Becca Tilley opened up about her split from boyfriend Robert Graham while attending the End-of-Summer Bachelor Party, which benefited the Restore Dignity charity, in L.A. on Wednesday, September 6.”
“The reason that Robert and I aren t together is because I felt like I was really busy with work and traveling a lot so it wasn t a sense of like Oh I want to be free and date...”
“...as many guys as possible It was more of me just wanting to take this time for myself and focus on me and what I m doing the Bachelor alum exclusively told Us Weekly...”
““It just ended.”
“It wasn’t like one of us cheated or there was this bitterness,” she explained.”
““I still care a lot about him and there’s no hard feelings.”
“Hopefully on either side, but I can say that for me.”Us broke the news in May that Tilley and the fellow Bachelor Nation star broke up after a couple of months of dating.”
“Tilley revealed that she’s now “extremely single” and that “the dating world terrifies” her.”


"I don't think he's here now."
"I'd love to see Ben become a bachelor again, but I think he's like a very serious person who wants to go on when he's ready."
Becca Tilly broke up with her boyfriend Robert Graham on Wednesday, Sept
"The reason why Robert and I are not together is that I feel that I am very busy at work and travel a lot, so I don't have that feeling. Oh, I want to date freely..."
“…… As many boys as possible, I want to spend more time on myself and focus on me and what I am doing. This single alumni will tell us exclusively every week... "
"It's just over."
"It's not like one of us has been cheated or suffered," she explained
"I'm still concerned about him. There's nothing bad about him."
"I hope that's true on both sides, but I can say that." In the United States, it was reported in May that Tilly and the bachelor national team star broke up after a few months of dating
Tilly revealed that she is now "extremely single" and "the dating world has scared her"



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It is creating a lot of arguments for Kanye.’AdvertisementKanye and Kim are also fighting over the fact that Kim is reportedly already looking forward to a fourth baby via surrogate again.”
“An insider said that ‘Kanye and Kim’s sisters think she is acting completely different with baby Chicago than she did with her past kids.”
“According to Radar Online, Kanye West and the rest of the family members are not thrilled with Kim’s behavior.”
“It’s already a known fact that Kim suffered from infertility issues and therefore turned to a surrogate to carry her third child.”
“It’s real.’This major change comes after a new report has surfaced online claiming that Kim and many of her sisters are arguing because she is treating little Chi a bit different to her other two kids, North and Saint.”
“After that, she made sure to answer fans who were probably thinking that this is a just a wig: ‘I don’t really do wigs.”
“In a filtered video on social media, Kim asked her fans whether they love her new pink hair or not.”
“This came right after she tweeted the following words: ‘I can’t even tell you how over my blonde hair I am!’Kim is a natural brunette and she has been sporting a platinum blond hair for quite a while.”
“She posted the new look on her Instagram Stories during last weekend.”
“Kim Kardashian likes to play with lots of looks, and this time she chose to change her hair.”


"It creates a lot of controversy for Kanye." Kanye and Kim are also arguing over the fact that Kim is already expecting to have a fourth child through surrogacy
"One person familiar with the matter said," Kanye and Kim's sisters think that her behavior with baby Chicago is totally different from that of her and her former children. "
"Kanye West and other family members are not excited about Kim's behavior, according to radar online
"As we all know, Kim Jong Il is infertile, so he turned to a surrogate mother to have a third child."
"It's true." The big change comes after a new report on the Internet claimed Kim and many of her sisters were quarreling because she treated Xiaoqi differently from her other two children, Bei He Sheng
"After that, she had to answer fans who might think it was just a wig: 'I don't actually wear a wig.'"
"In a filtered video on social media, Kim asked her fans if they liked her new pink hair."
Just after she tweeted the following, she said, "I can't even tell you how much I like my blonde hair! "Kim is a natural brunette. She's had platinum hair for quite a long time."
"Last weekend, she posted a new image on instagram."
"Kim Kardashian likes to play with a lot of styles. This time she chose to change her hairstyle."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News, Nicole, who grew up sewing, reveals she started working on the line about two years ago and did all the sketches herself.”
“In an exclusive interview with E!”
“Even though we’re on the brink of winter, the bronzed babes have us in heat with their nearly naked looks!”
“The duo rock different designs, including low cut one-pieces and itsy bitsy two-piece bikinis, while frolicking on the beach and exploring a tropical destination.”
“The video shows Nicole and another model flaunting their hot bods in barely there swim wear.”
“...has the exclusive first look at the WAGS star’s steamy commercial!”
“Nicole Williams is starring in a sexy new ad for her bikini line Nia Lynn Swim and E!”
“Hot damn!”


"News, Nicole, who grew up sewing, revealed that she started working on lines about two years ago, all sketching herself."
"Accepting e!"
"Even though we are on the verge of winter, we are excited by the almost naked appearance of those bronzes!"
When they play on the beach and explore a tropical destination, they have different design styles, including a one-piece low cut swimsuit and a sexy two-piece bikini
"The video shows Nicole and another model showing off their sexy body in swimsuits."
“… At the first glance, I saw the steaming ads of wags stars
Nicole Williams is starring in a sexy new commercial for her bikini series NIA Lynn swime and E! "
"Damn it



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Anderson and the former co-star David Hasselhoff did secure cameos in the anticipated comedy starring Zac Effron and Dwayne Johnson.”
“Earlier this week she also attended the Global Gift Gala at the Hotel George V in Paris.”
“She traded her signature bombshell style for a slick look.”
“Anderson sported a slicked-back hair in her Vivienne Westwood frock, and the f0rmer babe from Baywatch caused many reactions online.”
“After her new look had flooded the Internet, there came lots of voices saying that she drastically changed her appearance.”
“The 49-year-old actor is known for her famous voluminous blonde hair and her bombshell style.”
“Now, she chose some dramatic changes for her film festival attire, including the well-structured and ruched navy-blue dress which highlighted her trim waist and a pair or large diamond-encrusted statement earrings.”
“Her slicked-back hairstyle definitely caught lots of attention from the people, and she caused some chatter with her whole Cannes appearance.”
“At the glittering gala, she was awarded Philanthropist Award, and during her acceptance speech, she said that “I never wanted to be an actress.”
“AdvertisementIn the forthcoming movie which is due out on May 25, Kelly Rohrbach will suit up in Anderson’s iconic bathing suit.”


"Anderson and former co star David Hasselhoff made a guest appearance in the comedies starring Zach Efron and Dwayne Johnson."
"Earlier this week, she also attended a global gift event at the George V Hotel in Paris."
"She replaced her signature explosive style with a sleek one."
Anderson, dressed in Vivienne Westwood's robe and smooth back hair, has caused a lot of repercussions on the Internet
"After her new image flooded the Internet, a lot of voices said that she had completely changed her appearance."
"The 49 year old actor is famous for his thick blonde hair and explosive style."
"Now she has chosen some dramatic changes for her Festival costume, including a well structured and pleated Navy dress that highlights her trimmed waist and a pair or a large diamond set statement earring."
"Her sleek hairstyle has attracted a lot of attention, and her appearance in Cannes has also attracted some people's comments."
At the glittering party, she was awarded the philanthropist award. In her acceptance speech, she said, "I never wanted to be an actor."
Kelly robach will wear Anderson's signature swimsuit in the movie, which will be released on May 25



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Neilson Barnard / Getty ImagesTo see even more of the night's hottest looks, check out the gallery below.”
“Gomez's bright magenta eye makeup added a pop of punk to her pretty look.”
“This year's Met Gala theme honored revolutionary designer Rei Kawakubo and her avant-garde fashion brand, Comme des Garçons.”
“So it was no surprise that the night was filled with dramatic dresses and seriously cool silhouettes.”
“RELATED: Met Gala 2016: Kate Hudson, Beyoncé and beyondJennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez lit up the red carpet by making their first public appearance as a couple.”
“For the occasion, Lopez chose a Valentino gown in subtle robin's egg blue.”
“The flowing cape sleeves played into the night's theme in a very JLo way.”
“Lopez's winged eyeliner and voluminous hairstyle added to the vintage vibe of the ensemble.”
“Neilson Barnard / Getty ImagesTom Brady and Gisele Bundchen were two of the event's co-chairs, and they looked incredible doing it!”
“Instead of structured shapes, they chose to break the rules in figure-hugging outfits.”


"Nelson Barnard / Getty Images to see more of the night's hottest looks, check out the gallery below."
"Gomez's bright magenta eye makeup adds punk flavor to her beautiful appearance."
"The theme of this year's Metropolitan evening is to honor revolutionary designer REI Kawakubo and her avant-garde fashion brand comme des Gar à ons."
"So it's not surprising that the night was full of dramatic costumes and very cool silhouettes."
"Related reports: the 2016 metropolitan Party: Kate Hudson, Beyonce and Beyonce, Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez make their first public appearances and light up the red carpet."
"On this occasion, Lopez chose a Valentino dress, the color is Robin's egg blue."
"The elegant Cape sleeves blend into the theme of the night in a very JLO way."
"Lopez's winged eyeliner and plump hairstyle add the charm of the ensemble."
"Nelson Barnard / Getty eagstrom Brady and Giselle bunchen are co chairs of the event, and their performance is incredible!"
"Instead of choosing structured styling, they chose to break the rules of tights."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Also Read: Guess Who WWE Superstar John Cena Wants to Slime at Nickelodeon's Kids Choice Awards?”
“It’s our own special sauce!”
“He is so likeable, he is really good at it, kids love him and he’s like a big kid himself.”
“Jay Schmalholz: It’s a no-brainer.”
“TheWrap: Why is Russell Wilson the perfect three-peat host?”
“Also Read: Nickelodeon 'Kids' Choice Sports': 9 Things You Didn't See on TVSee highlights from our pre-sliming chat below.”
“...filled show which features Julian Edelman Von Miller Michael Strahan and many others this year...”
“Also Read Julian Edelman Von Miller Michael Strahan Set to Appear at Nickelodeon Kids Choice Sports Awards Earlier before being nearly drowned in green gunk by his crew TheWrap spoke with Jay Schmalholz SVP of unscripted development and live events at Nickelodeon about what viewers can expect from the star...”
“But of course, you have green sticky remnants in your shoes, clothes, hair and other orifices for days to come as a reminder of the epic experience.”
“Similar to a roller coaster ride, the buildup to a sliming is far worse than the actual experience, and the exhilaration afterwards lasts far longer.”


Also read: guess who WWE superstar John seiner wants to get muddy with Nickelodeon's children's Choice Award
"This is our own special sauce!"
"He's very likable, he's really good at it, the kids like him, and he's like a big kid himself."
"Jay schmarkholtz: it's a no brainer question."
The wrap: why is Russell Wilson the perfect host of the triple crown
"Also read: Nickelodeon's children's choice movement: 9 things you can't see on TV. Here are the main points of our conversation before slimming down."
“…… Full of Julian Edelman von Miller Michael Strahan and many others this year's performances... "
"I also read that Julian Edelman von Miller and Michael Strahan would appear earlier at the Nickelodeon children's choice Sports Awards when he was nearly drowned in the crew's green mud. The wrap talked to Jay schmalholz, senior vice president of screenless development and live events at Nickelodeon about the audience's expectations of the star... "
"But of course, there will be green sticky residue in your shoes, clothes, hair and other holes, which will remind you of this epic experience."
"It's like riding a roller coaster, accumulating mud is much worse than the actual experience, and then the excitement lasts much longer."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I believe in being open and trusting each other and respecting each other completely.”Congrats to the happy couple, and may they forever take each other’s breath away.”
““I’m in a happy relationship ― that’s all that matters … I believe in commitment.”
“I love taking care of people,” she said.”
““I absolutely want to have children, whether I have my own or adopt.”
“Speaking with Women’s Health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that while kids were part of her game plan, marriage wasn’t “important” in her eyes.”
“A post shared by Enrique Iglesias (@enriqueiglesias) on Dec 15, 2017 at 2:02pm PSTA post shared by  Anna Аня (@annakournikova) on Dec 15, 2017 at 1:38pm PSTThe couple did, however, share some posts from Miami over the last few days looking happy in the sun.”
“While Kournikova sported some serious bling on her ring finger in a snap from 2016, they’ve never confirmed that they are married.”
“The two have been together since 2001.”
“Despite making themselves mighty comfortable in that public bathroom for Iglesias’ “Escape” music video all those years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are famously private and rarely appear in public together.”
“Representatives for Iglesias and Kournikova did not return HuffPost’s request for comment.”


"I believe in honesty, mutual trust and mutual respect." Congratulations to this happy couple and may they hold each other's breath forever
"I'm in a happy relationship - that's what matters I believe in commitment. "
"I like to take care of people," she said
"I absolutely want children, whether they're my own or adopted."
In an interview with women's health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that although children are part of her game plan, marriage is not "important" in her eyes
"An article shared by Enrique Iglesias (@ Enrique Iglesias) at 2:02 p.m. on December 15, 2017, and an article shared by Anna a я (@ annakournikova) at 1:38 p.m. on December 15, 2017. The couple did share some posts from Miami in the past few days and looked very happy in the sunshine."
"Although Kournikova put some serious jewelry on her ring finger for a moment in 2016, they never confirmed that they were married."
"The two have been together since 2001."
Although Iglesias' escape video made him comfortable in the public bathroom a few years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are known for their privacy and rarely appear in public together
"Representatives of Iglesias and Kournikova did not respond to requests for comment from the hofpost post."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thankfully, it seems that they've been able to adjust to their separation pretty well.”
“It can be difficult for any child to process their parents' separation, particularly when their parents are as famous as Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan.”
“They want this difficult transition is as smooth as possible for the young child.”
“They admit that, above all else, they're concentrating their attention on their 5-year-old daughter, Everly, who is their primary concern.”
“...down separate paths on this journey we know as life...”
“Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan announced their break up earlier this year by releasing a statement to their fans assuring them that absolutely nothing has changed about how much they love each other but they were simply planning to travel...”


"Thankfully, they seem to be able to adapt well to separation."
"It's hard for any child to accept their parents' divorce, especially when their parents are as famous as Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan."
"They want this difficult transition to be as smooth as possible for young children."
"They admit that the most important thing is that they focus on their five-year-old daughter, and evry is the person they care about the most."
“… Take a different path in this journey we call life... "
"Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan announced their breakup earlier this year, and they issued a statement to their fans, assuring them that their love for each other has not changed in any way, but they just plan to travel..."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s incredible.””
““(Being a part of this campaign) is the greatest thing I’ve ever done in my entire life.”
“For example, in a July 24 email, Lara Trump offered a “top patriot” the chance to win a backstage VIP pass to the president’s upcoming rally.”
“Her name also is affixed to a steady stream of emails that go out to supporters, in which she often solicits for donations in small amounts — $1, $5, $10 or $20.”
“She has put herself out there as one of Trump’s most reliable advocates, making regular appearances on Fox News or at rallies to tout his agenda.”
“...kind of public defense probably is unfamiliar territory for Lara Trump even though she is regarded by some as the face of the Trump 2020 campaign...”
“She referred to their time campaigning together for Trump in 2016 and said she had come to regard Manigault Newman as a friend and a campaign sister Lara Trump concluded I am absolutely shocked and saddened by her betrayal and violation on a deeply personal level Having to issue this...”
“In a written statement to the Washington Post, she declared the recording “a fraud” and claimed that the snippets that were aired “took place in numerous phone calls over the course of several weeks.”Lara Trump also said she had felt betrayed by the former “Celebrity Apprentice” villain.”
“For probably the first time as a Trump loyalist and family member, the 35-year-old former “Inside Edition” producer and mother of one found herself in the middle of a white-hot controversy.”
“People made jokes: “That money is meant for silencing porn stars.” But they also raised concerns about whether the Trump campaign was using donations raised from “working class” supporters to fund hush money payments to disgruntled former employees.”


"It's incredible."
"(as part of this movement) is the greatest thing I've ever done in my life."
"For example, in an email on July 24, Laura trump offered a 'top patriot' the opportunity to win a backstage VIP pass to the president's upcoming rally."
"Her name is also posted on a steady stream of emails to supporters, in which she often asks for small donations - one dollar, five dollars, ten dollars or twenty dollars."
"She puts herself in the position of one of Trump's most reliable supporters, appearing regularly on Fox News or at rallies to promote his agenda."
“…… For Laura trump, this kind of public defense may be an unfamiliar field, even though she is seen by some as the spokesman of Trump's 2020 campaign... "
"When she mentioned that they were running for trump together in 2016, she said that she had regarded manigalt Newman as a friend, and the conclusion of running for nun Laura trump was that I was absolutely shocked and saddened by her betrayal and aggression on a personal level, and had to publish this article..."
In a written statement to the Washington Post, she declared the recording "fraudulent" and claimed that the footage "took place in weeks of multiple phone calls.". Laura trump also said she felt betrayed by the former "Celebrity Apprentice" villain
"As a loyal supporter and family member of trump, the 35 year old former insider producer and the mother of one child may be the first to find herself in a heated dispute."
People joked, "the money is for porn stars to shut up." But they are also worried about whether Trump's campaign will use donations from "working class" supporters to pay sealing fees for disgruntled former employees



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bryan watches as Mejia slices her throat telling Bryan, “You choose.”
“And since she has already proven to have none of Bryan’s skills, Mejia wrestles the knife to her throat as Bryan arrives.”
“Apparently Elena’s ninety-pound frame falling against the wall is enough to collapse the tunnel.”
“Inside the tunnel Bryan shoots Elena, who falls into a wall.”
“Granted, Asha’s lackluster attempts at escaping may have eaten up two minutes of screen time, but I don’t think it would make up for the difference in time Bryan would have needed to get in the tunnels at that exact moment.”
“Even though Bryan’s journey would take longer than Mejia – who had a head start, had people helping him, and knew exactly where he was going – somehow Bryan ends up in the tunnel at the same time as Mejia.”
“Bryan is further delayed when Hart’s team shows up and tries talking him down.”
“He then manipulates Mejia’s ex-wife to give him information on the tunnels leading to Mexico.”
“Bryan then strong arms Mejia’s business contacts to find out where Mejia might seek help.”
“As Bryan hitchhikes across country to stay off the grid, we need reminding of what Bryan is after, with an escape attempt by his damsel and a phone call.”


Bryan watched Meijia cut her throat and told Bryan, "you choose."
"Now that it has been proved that she doesn't have any of Brian's skills, Meijia puts a knife on her throat when Brian arrives."
"It's clear that Elena's 90 pounds fell on the wall, enough to collapse the tunnel."
"Bryan shot Elena in the tunnel, and Elena fell into the wall."
"Of course, Asha's insipid attempt to escape may have consumed two minutes of screen time, but I don't think it can make up for the time that Brian needed to get into the tunnel at that moment."
"Although Brian's journey is longer than Meijia's - Meijia has the opportunity, someone to help him, and knows where he's going - for some reason, Brian and Meijia finally get into the tunnel at the same time."
"When Hart's team appeared and tried to convince Brian, Brian was further delayed."
"Then he manipulated Meijia's ex-wife to provide him with information about the tunnel to Mexico."
"Then Brian puts pressure on Meijia's business contacts to find out where Meijia might be looking for help."
"When Brian hitchhikes across the country, away from the grid, we need to remind him of his purpose, including his teenage girl's attempt to escape and a phone call."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was recently revealed that Sheeran will next make a cameo in The Simpsons, as a character caught up in a love triangle with Lisa Simpson.”
“This year we finally did it."”
“...showrunner David Benioff previously explained We knew that Maisie Williams was a big fan of Ed Sheeran and for years we ve been trying to get him on the show so we can surprise Maisie...”
“Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Co...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors...”
“The episode's director has since defended the cameo, saying the Glastonbury headliner did a 'lovely job'.”
“Sheeran's scene also left an opportunity for him to return in the next episode, although he did not appear in the trailer.”
“...difficult to spot in their scenes...”
“Game of Thrones S7E1 Dragonstone in pictures The Watchers on the Wall HBO Much of the criticism was around the fact that there seemed to have been little attempt to disguise his cameo whilst other artists such as Coldplay drummer Will Champion and Gary Lightbody of Snow Patrol were more...”


"Recently, it has been reported that Sheeran will guest star in the Simpsons and play a role in a love triangle with Lisa Simpson."
"This year we finally did it."
“…… Host David Benioff previously explained that we know that Messi Williams is a big fan of ED Sheeran and we have been trying to get him on the show for many years so that we can surprise Messi. "
"Thank you for signing up for the independent cultural communication verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent. Please check the box if you would like to contact us. Please read our complete mailing list agreement terms here..."
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
"The best movie music TV broadcast of independent cultural communication is sent directly to your mailbox every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering with verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors..."
"The director of the episode later defended the Cameo by saying that Glastonbury's headlines did a 'lovely job.'
"Sheeran's scene also left him a chance to return to the next episode, even though he didn't appear in the trailer."
“… It's hard to find in their scenes... "
"The power of the game s7e1 Longshi in the picture of the observer on the wall HBO's many criticisms are centered around the fact that few people seem to try to hide his cameo, while other artists such as Coldplay drummer will champion and Gary lightbody's Snow Patrol more..."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Instagram: @bosco_eng; salon instagram @instahairloomALSO READ: THE BEAUTY TREND EDIT: NYFW AW’18 & 5 WAYS TO KEEP YOUR SKIN IN TIP TOP CONDITION”
“From $80 for hairstyling services.”
“Find him at Hairloom, #01-50 Shaw Tower, tel: 6295-2088.”
“Because it’s not easy turning brown hair purple without damaging it.”
“Another customer raves about his skill in colouring.”
“Her haircut lasted six months without looking like an unruly mop as it grew out.”
“He’s a good cutter too.”
“Eng’s customer of three years, Haley Chow, says it’s not just hairstyling skills he has.”
“He creates looks for models and magazine covers, and for local actresses Oon Shu An’s and He Ying Ying’s red-carpet showings, where having the right hair is as important as what you wear.”
“He’s a familiar face in the fashion, editorial and celeb scenes.”


“ Instagram:@bosco  d eng；salon  Instagram@instahairloom Also read: beauty trends editor: NYFW aw'18 & 5 ways to keep your skin in the best condition "
"Hair service starts at 80 yuan."
"Find him at hairroom, Shaw tower? 01-50, 6295-2088."
"It's not easy to dye brown hair purple without damaging it."
"Another customer was full of praise for his coloring technology."
"She had her hair cut for six months and didn't look like an unruly mop when she grew up."
"He's a good cutter, too."
"Haley Chow, eng's client for three years, says he has more than just hairstyle skills."
"He created models and magazine covers, as well as red carpet shows by local actresses Weng Shuan and he Yingying, where having the right hair is as important as wearing it."
"He's a familiar face in the world of fashion, editorials and celebrities."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The couple premiered their latest film, Everybody Knows, at the Cannes Film Festival on Tuesday, where Cruz revealed that she and her husband received the same salary for their work on the movie.”
“"Actually, yes," she said when asked about receiving equal pay, breaking out a smile, according to Variety.”
“The spouses have worked on several films together since co-starring in 1992's Jamon Jamon -- and Cruz said that their private relationship helps their working one.”
“Pascal Le Segretain/Getty Images"We don't take the characters home at the end of the day.”
“We have similar ways of work.”
“The fact that we know each other and trust each other helps," Cruz said, according to the outlet, noting that fans shouldn't expect them to exclusively work together.”
“"That will be once in a while, if we feel it's right.”
“I don't think it will be too often."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"As you all know, the couple premiered their latest film at the Cannes Film Festival on Tuesday, and Cruz revealed that she and her husband got the same salary for their work on the film."
"Actually, yes," she said when asked about equal pay for equal work, smiling, according to the variety magazine
"The couple have worked together on several films since 1992 when jamon jamon co starred - Cruz said their personal relationship helped their working relationship."
We don't take people home at the end of the day
"We have a similar way of working."
"The fact that we know each other and trust each other is helpful," Cruz said, according to the exit, noting that fans should not expect them to just work together
"If we think it's right, come once in a while."
"I don't think it's too frequent."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When the cameras rolled, we would start to do that game.”
“It was for a show I was producing, so I was not at all a victim.”
“And according to actress Rose McGowan, who has heavily implied that Weinstein raped her without actually naming him, Affleck knew exactly what Weinstein was allegedly up to with the women he surrounded himself with.”
“While Affleck has been publicly ambivalent about their relationship — “They’re a nightmare to make a deal with,” he told Vanity Fair in 2004 of Miramax, Weinstein’s film studio at the time — Affleck and Weinstein continued to work together on projects like Shakespeare in Love and Jersey Girl.”
“Weinstein produced Affleck’s breakout movie, 1997’s Good Will Hunting, and they’ve collaborated multiple times since then.”
“It also doesn’t help Affleck that he’s spent his own career so close to Weinstein.”
“...made a statement condemning Weinstein...”
“Ben appeared at parties and premieres with Casey in what looked like an attempt to whip up support for Casey s Best Actor run and he certainly never made a public statement condemning Casey s alleged sexual harassment a fact that many observers were quick to point out when he...”
“...year helping his brother Casey Affleck successfully campaign for an Oscar even as the story emerged that Casey had faced two sexual harassment lawsuits in the past...”
“Affleck s past includes a lot of time spent around men facing sexual harassment accusations and a lot of time on camera groping women One reason that Affleck has become something of a secondary target as fallout from the Weinstein scandal spreads is that he spent much of the last...”


"When the camera turns, we start to play the game."
"It's a show I made, so I'm not a victim at all."
According to actress rose McGowan, Affleck clearly knew that Weinstein was with the woman next to him. Weinstein was said to have raped her, but she did not disclose his name
"Although Affleck has been openly ambivalent about their relationship -" they're a nightmare, "he told Vanity Fair in 2004, referring to Weinstein's then studio Miramax - Affleck and Weinstein continue to work in Shakespeare in love Love) and Jersey Girl. "
Weinstein made Affleck's breakout film, good hunting in 1997, and they've worked together many times since then
"Alfred's career is so close to Weinstein that it doesn't help him either."
“… Issued a statement condemning Weinstein... "
"Ben and Kathy appear at parties and premieres together, which seems to be an attempt to arouse support for Kathy's best actor campaign. Of course, he has never issued a public statement denouncing the fact that Kathy is suspected of sexual harassment. Many observers are watching him..."
“…… Over the past year, he helped his brother Kathy Affleck run for the Oscars, despite reports that Kathy faced two sexual harassment lawsuits in the past... "
"Affleck's past includes spending a lot of time with men facing sexual harassment charges, and a lot of time stroking women on camera - one of the reasons Affleck became a secondary target as the Weinstein scandal spread is that he spent most of the past..."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brother had to work.”
“"She starts running through Koreatown, and I start running along with her.”
“"I snuck in and I saw his audition, and I thought to myself, 'If this man can do this at 17 years old, my God.”
“We were both freshmen in college," she told the publication.”
“"I saw Sterling audition for Joe Turner's Come And Gone.”
“Bathe recalled in an interview with People that she was wowed by his talent even then.”
“Bathe and Brown first met while studying at Stanford University in 1998, where they lived in the same dorm and starred in plays together.”
“How Did Sterling K. Brown Meet His Wife?”
“Here's exactly how the pair got together.”
“Though their marriage seems solid now, their relationship has had twists and turns that rival the drama played out on their respective TV shows.”


"Brother has to work."
"She started running in Koreatown, and I started running with her."
"I sneaked in, saw his audition, and thought, if this guy can do it at 17, my God."
"We are all freshmen," she told the journal
"I've seen Stirling audition for Joe Turner's come and go."
"Even then, Buss recalled in an interview with people magazine, she was shocked by his talent."
Buss and brown met for the first time when they were studying at Stanford University in 1998. They lived in the same dorm and acted in a drama together
"How did Sterling K. Brown know his wife?"
"How did the two get together?"
"Although their marriage now looks very solid, their relationship has gone through twists and turns, which is on a par with their respective TV dramas."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I always wanted to be the good-looking version of Michael Jackson,” he added.”
“Even though he went over the top with it and he knew that himself.”
“This was Navi’s acting debut, but he has a long affinity to the king of pop.”
“Navi has been performing as MJ for over 20 years and also worked with the artist as his decoy and was the only impersonator to be invited to Neverland Ranch on the pop icon’s 45th birthday.”
“Read Michael Jackson s Kids Grandma Katherine Raised The Late Pop Icon s Three Children On Navi s official website his biography proclaims that he s the world s number one Michael Jackson impersonator His website also states Navi is the ONLY Michael Jackson tribute that Jackson has applauded on...”
“...several occasions given a standing ovation to invited to his home Neverland and personally chosen to work as a decoy over a period of many years Searching for Neverland portrays the king of pop at the end of his life before he died in 2009”
“The movie is based on “Remember The Time: Protecting Michael Jackson in His Final Days” by Bill Whitfield, Javon Beard and Tanner Colby.”
“Whitfield and Beard were Jackson’s bodyguards during the last two years of the pop icon’s life.”
“The book focuses on helping Jackson and his children stay out of the paparazzi’s eyes.”
“Navi told ABC News that he had worked for Jackson as a decoy and the pop icon sometimes has even used him as a body double in order to escape the paparazzi’s eyes.”


"I always wanted to be the handsome version of Michael Jackson," he added
"Even though he has gone too far, he knows it himself."
"It's Navi's debut performance, but he has a long-term affinity for the king of pop."
"Navi has been acting as MJ for more than 20 years, working with the artist as his bait, and is the only copycat invited to Neverland on the pop idol's 45th Birthday."
"I read about Michael Jackson's children on Navi's official website. Catherine's grandmother mentioned the three children of the late pop idol on Navi's official website. His biography claimed that he was the world's first imitator of Michael Jackson. His website also said that Navi was the only work of Michael Jackson that Jackson praised..."
“…… On several occasions, people stood up and applauded, invited him to his home in Neverland, and personally chose to act as bait during the years of searching for Neverland, depicting the scene of the king of pop music dying before his death in 2009. "
The film is based on bill Whitfield, Javin beard and Tanner Colby's "remember the time: protect Michael Jackson's last days."
"Whitfield and Bild were Jackson's bodyguards for the last two years of his life."
"The focus of this book is to help Jackson and his children stay out of the paparazzi's sight."
"Navi told ABC news that he used to work for Jackson as a bait, and pop idols sometimes even used him as a stand in to escape the paparazzi's eyes."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Eight years later and Kristin Cavallari might be a mom, but she still hits up the club when she wants to dish.”
“...what you did the bar was where all the magic of The Hills happened...”
“Sound familiar?”
“The gang’s all hereThe ladies of Nashville are relentlessly dramatic and the dudes are either total cheeseballs or totally mean.”
“Herewith, all the ways Kristin Cavallari’s new show—which airs Sundays on E!—is scratching my itch for Lauren Conrad and co.”
“And yet, I am glued to my screen for each hour-long episode—and I think it’s because I’m so damn nostalgic for The Hills.”
“The storylines are slow moving, the characters are largely one-dimensional and by the end of episode 1, everyone has looked directly into the camera at least once.”
“If it sounds extremely mediocre, that’s because it is.”
“Instead, the show focuses on Kristin trying to jumpstart her jewellery/home goods store Uncommon James, interspersed with some weirdly mean “banter” between her and the always-bored looking Jay.”
“In the first Very Cavallari episode, which is available in its entirety on YouTube, we learn that Kristen and Jay don’t want their kids to be on TV against their will.”


"Eight years from now, Christine Cavallari may be a mother, but when she wants to do the dishes, she still goes to the club."
“… Everything you do in a bar is magic that happens in the mountains... "
"Does that sound familiar?"
"The gangs are here. The women in Nashville are indomitable dramatists. The men are either cheese balls or cheapskates."
"Enclosed is Christine cavalari's new show, which will be on e! -It's scratching Lauren Conrad and his colleagues. "
"However, I stare at the screen every hour of the episode, and I think it's because I miss the mountains so damn much."
"The plot is slow. The characters are basically one-dimensional. By the end of the first episode, everyone looks directly at the camera at least once."
"If that sounds very mediocre, it's because it's mediocre."
"Instead, the show focuses on James, who Christine is trying to revive her jewelry / household goods store, with some weird and mean" jokes "between her and Jay Chou, who always seems bored."
"In the first episode of cavalari, we learned that Christine and Jay didn't want their children to be on TV against their will."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You’re like, ‘You just chose such an unbelievable collection of words that beautifully articulate what you say.’”
“Slate gushed about Evans on the The Secret Life of Pets‘ red carpet, telling Entertainment Tonight, “It’s kind of like I got my dream seventh grade boyfriend.”
“Chris Evans, 36, and Jenny Slate, 35, are not together anymore after rekindling their relationship late last year, according to a new profile of the Infinity War actor in the New York Times.”
“As Evans recalls a book he read while they were still together, the article states that the two called it off recently.”
“Evans says he learned to listen more while reading Rebecca Solnit s The Mother of All Questions The hardest thing to reconcile is that just because you have good intentions doesn t mean it s your time to have a voice the actor now starring in Lobby Hero on Broadway...”
“...told the Times...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Emma McIntyre/GettyThe rumors gained more steam when Evans posted several videos of his beloved dog appearing to sing along to music while a woman who sounded suspiciously like Slate laughed in the background.”
“PEOPLE later confirmed the rekindling in late November.”
“Slate spent Christmas with Evans and his family.”


"You're going to say, 'you've chosen so many incredible words and made your words clear.'"
Slater talked about Evans on the red carpet of pet's secret life, telling Entertainment Tonight: "it's a bit like I got my dream seventh grade boyfriend."
Chris Evans, 36, and Jenny Slater, 35, rekindled their relationship at the end of last year and are no longer together, according to the New York Times
"When Evans recalled a book they had read while they were still together, the article said they had recently cancelled the book."
"Evans said he learned to listen more when he read Rebecca Solnit's mother of all problems, and the hardest thing to reconcile is that just because you have good intentions doesn't mean it's time for you to have a voice - the actor is playing in the big hall on Broadway..."
“… Tell the times... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Image scaling credit: Emma Macintyre / Getty when Evans released several videos in which his beloved dog seemed to sing along with the music, and a woman who sounded like Slater laughed in the background, the rumors became more convincing."
"It was later confirmed that there was a resurgence in late November."
"Slater spent Christmas with Evans and his family."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We were certainly lucky to have him in the film.”
“I think he is one of the best actors working today.”
“So, I was already familiar with lowriding, but not to the extent I was when we started making the film.”
“I was also invited to some of the lowrider events they had.”
“I was curious.”
“On his experience with lowrider culture in East LAI went to some of the lowrider galleries.”
“It’s a very animated and vibrant melting pot of art and Mexican American culture.”
“I wanted to take the opportunity to take a picture of what East L.A. looks like.”
“It’s a universal story.”
“This movie explores that idea.”


"Of course we're lucky. He's in the movie."
"I think he's one of the best actors today."
"So, I'm familiar with vulgarity, but not to the point where we started making this movie."
"I was also invited to participate in some of their low-cost activities."
"I'm curious."
"About his experience of low rider culture in Donglai, he went to some low rider galleries."
"This is a dynamic melting pot of art and American ink culture."
"I want to take this opportunity to take a picture of East Los Angeles."
"It's a universal story."
"The film explores the idea."



**Something goes wrong**
“Water Luis Sequeira Victoria and Abdul Consolata Boyle Visual Effects...”
“Dorota Kobiela Hugh Welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan Mactaggart Hugh Welchman Animated Short Dear Basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant Garden Party Victor Caire Gabriel Grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray Negative Space Max Porter Ru Kuwahata Revolting Rhymes Jakob Schuh Jan Lachauer Adapted Screenplay Call Me by Your Name James Ivory...”
“Guillermo del Toro’s “The Shape of Water” continued its awards show streak, leading the pack with 13 nominations.”
““Dunkirk” followed behind with eight nods and Martin McDonagh’s “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri”with seven.”
“All three films earned best picture nominations.”
“The rest of the category was rounded out by “Call Me By Your Name,” “Darkest Hour,” “Get Out,” “Phantom Thread,” “Lady Bird,” and “The Post.”The Academy Awards — hosted by Jimmy Kimmel for the second time — will air live on ABC on March 4.”
“Here is the list of 2018 Oscar nominations Best Picture Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk Get Out Lady Bird Phantom Thread The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Lead Actor Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Daniel...”
“Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Lead Actress Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep The Post Supporting Actor Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three...”
“Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All the Money in the World Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Supporting Actress Mary J Blige Mudbound Allison Janney I Tonya Lesley Manville Phantom Thread Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer The Shape of Water Director...”
“Dunkirk Christopher Nolan Get Out Jordan Peele Lady Bird Greta Gerwig Phantom Thread Paul Thomas Anderson The Shape of Water Guillermo del Toro Animated Feature The Boss Baby Tom McGrath Ramsey Ann Naito The Breadwinner Nora Twomey Anthony Leo Coco Lee Unkrich Darla K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha Loving Vincent...”


"Water Louis sequila, Victoria and Abdel Consuela tapboyle visual effects..."
"Dorota kobiela Hugh welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan MacTaggart Hugh welchman animated short film dear basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant garden party winner Caire Gabriel grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray negative space Max Porter Ru kuwahata reversing rhyms Jakob Schuh Jan lachauer adapted screenplay" call me your name James ivory "..."
Guillermo del Toro's the shape of water continues its winning streak at the awards ceremony, leading with 13 nominations
Dunkirk followed with eight nods, and Martin MacDonald's three billboards out of Missouri followed with seven nods
"All three films were nominated for best picture."
"The rest of the awards were replaced by" call me your name "," the darkest moment "," go away "," phantom line "," Miss bird "and" post ". The second Oscars, hosted by Jimmy Kimmel, will be broadcast on ABC on March 4
"Here's the list of best picture nominations for the 2018 Oscars. Please call me your name at the darkest moment. Dunkirk goes out Lady Bird mirage line, the shape of water behind three billboards, ebb tide. Missouri chief actor Timothy chalamit, please call me your name Daniel Day Lewis mirage line Daniel..."
"Karuya comes out of Gary Oldman's darkest moment Denzel Washington Roman J Israel ESQ heroine Sally Hawkins water shape Francis mcdorman and three billboards out of the ebb Missouri margotrobi I Tonia sayilsronan lady Kyle Streep supporting actor William Dafoe Florida project woody hallerson III.."
"Missouri billboard Richard Jenkins the shape of water Christopher Plummer all the world's qiansam Rockwell three billboard supporting actress Mary J. blaig confused Alison Jennie Tony Leslie Manville phantom line Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer the shape director of water..."
"Dunkirk Christopher Nolan out of Lady Jordan peel bird Greta wig phantom thread Paul Thomas Anderson water Guillermo del Toro shape cartoon boss baby Tom McGrath Ramsey annetto breadwinner Nora Tommy Antonio CoCo Lee Unkrich Dara K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha love Vincent..."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“BONUS: See all of Kate's incredible photos from SI Swimsuit 2017!”
“See for yourself in the steamy clip below:They say history repeats itself...and this time, we are most definitely NOT complaining.”
“Don't believe us?”
“Kate nails the impression so well that even fellow SI Swimsuit model and Lip Sync Battle color commentator Chrissy Teigen finds herself needing to pick her jaw up off the floor.”
“!—Kate brings the heat as she crawls across the stage and does that signature body roll move we all know and love.”
“SpikeSpikeDecked out in the sexiest schoolgirl outfit you have literally ever seen—thigh highs, pigtails and a tied-up white shirt, anyone?”
“In a duel against '90s heartthrob Ricky Martin, our favorite blonde bombshell pulled out all of her best moves as she channeled Britney Spears for her performance of "...Baby One More Time."”
“SI Swimsuit cover model Kate Upton is taking it to the next level in this short preview from her upcoming Lip Sync Battle appearance.”
“If you just did a double take, you're not alone.”
“Hit me, baby, one more time!”


"Reward: see all the incredible photos of Kate in the 2017 Si swimsuit!"
"Take a look at this steaming clip for yourself. Below: they say history will repeat itself And this time, we will never complain. "
"Don't believe us?"
"Kate is so impressive that even Chris Teigen, who is a swimsuit model and lip gloss commentator for Si, finds that she needs to lift her chin off the floor."
"! - Kate crawls up and down the stage. It's exciting. She does a symbolic body roll that we all know and love."
Put on the sexiest schoolgirl you've ever seen, high thighs, braids and a white shirt. Anyone
"In a duel with 90's sweetheart Ricky Martin, our favorite blonde put out all her best moves when she sang" baby one more time "for Britney Spears
"Si Swimsuit Cover Model Kate Upton takes it to a new level in this short trailer of the upcoming lip fight."
"If you only do it twice, you're not alone."
"Hit me again, baby!"



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In case you can’t get enough of Chrissy in that costume, she benevolently shared some footage of her doing the most hilarious Spidey-dance on the planet:But John still loves her.”
“The only thing they’re missing is some pouring rain.”
“As usual.”
“Then John trots out, happy to fulfill all his wife’s desires.”
“She’s lowered from the rafters in the full costume, though LL Cool J gives her an assist with the mask.”
“The best part of this may be that Chrissy is playing Spider-Man instead of Mary Jane.”
“The clip highlights the very special moment when Chrissy lives out her fantasy of sharing an iconic “Spider-Man kiss.” With her husband, of course.”
“Chrissy shared a sneak peak on Sunday morning for an episode that aired later that night, featuring Zendaya doing a spot on Bruno Mars impersonation.”
“They also seem to still have fun with each other, at home, on the red carpet, and of course, on Chrissy’s show, Lip Sync Battle.”
“Chrissy Teigen and John Legend still seem wildly in love even after years of marriage and one incredibly adorable child.”


"If you don't know enough about Chris in that suit, she will kindly share some of her funniest spider dances on stage: but John" I still love her. "
"The only thing they lack is the downpour."
"As usual."
John stepped out quickly and fulfilled all his wife's wishes
"She came down from the rafters in full dress, but I'll put on the mask for her."
"Maybe the best part is that Chris is playing Spiderman, not Mary Jane."
This video highlights a special moment when Chris realizes her dream of sharing an iconic "spider man kiss" with her husband
"Chris shared a furtive peak on Sunday morning for an episode aired that night about cendaya playing a role on Bruno Mars."
"At home, on the red carpet, of course, on Chris's show, they seem to have a good time."
"Chris tegan and John Legend seem to be still madly in love, even though they have been married for many years and have a very lovely child."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And for more from Batman Forever, read Heat Vision's oral history from 2015, which explains how hesitant Jones was about taking the part.”
“Hear Carrey's story about Jones at the 1:08:30 mark.”
“It was not a pleasant experience for Jones, and he made it crystal clear to Carrey, the Truman Show actor explained.”
“"I was the star and that was the problem," Carrey guessed.”
“"He's a phenomenal actor, though.”
“I still love him."”
“The situation came to a head in the middle of production, before the two had their "biggest scene together" on the Joel Schumacher film, when Carrey randomly popped into the same restaurant that Jones was having dinner, he told Macdonald.”
“"The maitre said, 'Oh, I hear you're working with Tommy Lee Jones.”
“He's over in the corner having dinner.'”
“I went over and I said, 'Hey Tommy, how are you doing?'”


"To learn more about Batman, read the heat vision's oral history in 2015, which explains Jones' hesitation to play the role."
"Listen to Kerry's story about Jones at 1:08:30."
"It wasn't a pleasant experience for Jones. He made it very clear to Kerry," the Truman actor explained
"I'm a star, that's the problem," Kerry guessed
"But he's a great actor."
"I still love him."
"In Joel Schumacher's movie, the biggest scene of the two was not finished, and during the shooting, when Kerry ran into the same restaurant where Jones was having dinner, the situation reached its climax," he told McDonald
"The foreman said," Oh, I hear you're working with Tommy Lee Jones. "
"He had dinner in the corner."
"I came up and said," Hey, Tommy, how are you? "



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She’s… very sweet and kind and loving to me, and always has been.””
“She did reach out and say she was sorry and offered her condolences.”
““Very new, it’s still very raw.”
““She reached out when Michelle died,” O’Donnell revealed.”
“She also touched on the passing of her ex-wife Michelle Rounds and the support she received from Oprah Winfrey.”
“...her face...”
“We don t know why you did we don t know how you did you will not survive another one O Donnell also briefly addressed the Harvey Weinstein scandal revealing he allegedly once called O Donnell a c t to...”
““The doctor said there’s no reason you survived this heart attack.”
““You only have this surgery when you’re near death… I should’ve died,” O’Donnell continued.”
“Surviving Trump Presidency The Primetime Emmy Award winner insisted this was no run of the mill procedure...”


"She It's nice to me, it's kind, it's loving, and it's always been
"She did lend a helping hand, say sorry, and express sympathy."
"It's new. It's still fresh."
"When Michelle died, she helped," O'Donnell revealed
"She also talked about the death of her ex-wife Michelle and the support she received from Oprah Winfrey."
“… Her face... "
"We don't know why you did it, we don't know how you did it, and you won't live any longer. O Donnell also briefly talked about the Harvey Weinstein scandal, which he claimed he once called o Donnell
"The doctor says you have no reason to survive this heart attack."
"You only do it when you're dying I should have died, "O'Donnell continued
"The Emmy golden time winners who survived Trump's presidency insist that this is not an ordinary procedure..."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:'Queer Eye' Gets a Season 2 Summer Premiere Date'Queer Eye's Karamo Brown and Fiance Ian Jordan Gush Over Their Heartwarming Engagement (Exclusive)'Queer Eye' Cast Reacts to Tom Jackson Getting Married to Abby Parr -- Watch!”
“The Queer Eye star revealed that he and and his longtime partner, Drey, are married during Netflix's FYSee event in Los Angeles on Thursday.”
“Brown announced the exciting news after walking the red carpet with the new Fab Five -- Antoni Porowski, Bobby Berk, Jonathan Van Ness, Karamo Brown and Tan France -- along with creator and executive producer David Collins.”
“"The Fab 5 reunited with AJ + Andre, who revealed they're now MARRIED!"”
“...a tweet from the official account for the Netflix series read, accompanied with heart emojis.”
“The Fab 5 reunited with AJ + Andre, who revealed they’re now MARRIED!”
“❤️ pic.twitter.com/R2XOUpY60v — Queer Eye (@QueerEye) June 1, 2018AJ and Drey both appeared on episode four of the Queer Eye for the Straight Guy reboot.”
“At the time of filming, AJ was feeling regret about not coming out to his father before he died.”
“As things were becoming more serious with Drey, he decided to come out to his stepmom in the emotional episode, eventually introducing her to his partner.”


Related libraries
"Embedded code restart related content: 'strange eye' gets Season 2 summer premiere date 'strange eye's karamo brown and fiance Ian Jordan gush over their warm engagement (exclusive)' strange eye 'actor reaction Tom Jackson marries Abby Parr - look!"
The "strange eye" star revealed that he and his old partner Drey married at Netflix's fysee event in Los Angeles on Thursday
Brown announced this exciting news after stepping onto the red carpet of the new plant V - Antony polovsky, boby Burke, Jonathan vannis, karamo brown and Tan France - with co-author and executive producer David Collins
"Fab 5 reunited with AJ + Andre, who revealed that they are married now!"
“…… "With a heart-shaped expression," wrote a microblog from Netflix's official accounts
"FAB5 reunited with AJ + Andre, who revealed that they are married now!"
“ ❤️  pic.twitter.com/R2XOUpY60v -"Queereye" (@ queereye) both AJ and Drey appear in the fourth episode of "strange eyes of heterosexuality"
"While filming, AJ felt sorry that he didn't come out to see his father before he died."
"As dray's affair became more and more serious, he decided to make a confession to his stepmother in this episode and finally introduce her to his partner."



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We can’t tell what will happen to Cardi and Offset’s relationship with everything that has happened lately.”
“?’ Celina tweeted.”
“Anything??”
“Advertisement‘So baby dad @OffsetYRN how’s your night going @iamcardib what about you sis?”
“His alleged baby mama Celina Powell seems to enjoy the problems that Cardi and Offset these days, and she even makes fun of the couple on her social media account.”
“Another sex tape was just leaked featuring Offset and another woman, and unfortunately, this one seems to date from only a few weeks ago.”
“Everyone, show your love for the one and only CARDI B!’It’s great that Cardi B is getting so much love from another music celebrity especially these days when she must be feeling really low considering everything that has happened in her relationship with Offset.”
“I hope that you feel better soon because we got some celebrating to do.”
“Thank you for putting all of your energy and love all over this record and video.”
“You’re a true star.”


"We can't tell what's going to happen to Katie and ofeste in relation to what's happened recently."
"?" Serena tweeted. "
"Anything?"
"So, baby dad, how was your evening, sister, and you?"
"His so-called baby mother, Serena Powell, seems to like Katie and the problems Katie is solving these days. She even teases the couple on her social media account."
"Another sex video has just leaked, with Coffey and another woman in it. Unfortunately, this video seems to be from a few weeks ago."
"Everyone, express your love for the only caddy B! It's great that Katie B can get so much love from another music celebrity, especially now, considering what happened in her relationship with Orpheus, she must feel very disappointed
"I hope you will get better soon, because we have some celebrations to do."
"Thank you for all your energy and love on this record and video."
"You're a real star."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared on The Hollywood Reporter.”
“Voting takes place at mtvema.com.”
“Similarly, Louis Tomlinson has been chosen by fans via social vote for Best U.K. & Ireland Act.”
“In the Best U.S. Act voting category, wildcard nominee Fifth Harmony has been chosen by fans via social vote.”
“Chainsmokers Live from Isle of MTV Malta 2017 Foo Fighters Live from Barcelona Spain 2017 BEST LOCAL ACT Bruno Mars U S Little Mix U K Ireland Drake Canada Justin Bieber Canada and Kygo Norway are among those nominated for their respective home regions...”
“Kyle Noah Cyrus Petite Meller Rag n Bone Man SZA The Head And The Heart BEST WORLD STAGE Steve Aoki Live from Isle of MTV Malta 2016 Kings of Leon Live from Oude Luxor Theatre Rotterdam The Netherlands 2016 Tomorrowland 2017 DNCE Live from Isle of MTV Malta 2017 The...”
“The Killers U2 BEST HIP HOP Drake Eminem Future Kendrick Lamar Post Malone BEST ALTERNATIVE Imagine Dragons Lana Del Rey Lorde The xx Thirty Seconds To Mars BIGGEST FANS Ariana Grande Justin Bieber Katy Perry Shawn Mendes Taylor Swift BEST PUSH Hailee Steinfeld Jon Bellion Julia Michaels Kacy Hill Khalid...”
“Katy Perry Bon Appetit ft Migos Kendrick Lamar Humble Kyle iSpy ft Lil Yachty Taylor Swift Look What You Made Me Do BEST LIVE Bruno Mars Coldplay Ed Sheeran Eminem U2 BEST ELECTRONIC Calvin Harris David Guetta Major Lazer Martin Garrix The Chainsmokers BEST ROCK Coldplay Foo Fighters Royal Blood...”
“Ed Sheeran Kendrick Lamar Miley Cyrus Shawn Mendes Taylor Swift BEST LOOK Dua Lipa Harry Styles Rita Ora Taylor Swift Zayn BEST NEW Dua Lipa Julia Michaels Khalid Kyle Rag n Bone Man BEST POP Camila Cabello Demi Lovato Miley Cyrus Shawn Mendes Taylor Swift BEST VIDEO Foo Fighters Run...”
“Check out the full nominations below BEST SONG Clean Bandit Rockabye ft Sean Paul Anne Marie DJ Khaled Wild Thoughts ft Rihanna Bryson Tiller Ed Sheeran Shape of You Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee Despacito Remix ft Justin Bieber Shawn Mendes There s Nothing Holdin Me Back BEST ARTIST Ariana Grande...”


"This article first appeared in Hollywood Reporter."
"Vote at mtvema.com Website. "
"Similarly, Louis Tomlinson has been voted by the fans for the best British and Irish bill."
"In the best U.S. bill voting category, the wild card nominee fifth harmony was chosen by fans through social voting."
"Live MTV Island, Maltese, live foo fighters, Barcelona, Spain, live best local performance of 2017 Bruno, Mars, American remix, UK, Ireland, Drake, Canada, Justin Bieber, Canada and kigo Norway are all nominated in their home regions..."
"Kyle Noah Cyrus little Merle rag n head and heart of bone man SZA best world stage Steve Aoki live from Maltese Island 2016 King Leon live from udluxor theatre in Rotterdam, Netherlands 2016 tomorrow world 2017 Dnce live from Maltese Island 2017..."
"Killer U2 best hip-hop Drake Eminem future Kendrick Lamar best alternative Malone imagine longana drellod XX 30 seconds Mars biggest fan Arianna grand Justin better than burkitty Perry Shawn mendelsteil swift best pusher Hailie Stanfield Jon belline Julia Michael scareshill Khalid..."
"Katy Perry Bon Appetit ft migos Kendrick Lamar humble Kyle iSpy ft lil Yachty Taylor Swift look what you made me do best live Bruno Mars Coldplay ed Sheeran Eminem U2 best electronic Calvin Harris David Guetta major Lazer Martin the chainmokers best rock Coldplay foo fighters royal blood..."
"Ed Sheran Kendrick Lamar Miley Cyrus Shawn Mendes Taylor Swift best modeling Dua LiPA Harry styles Rita ora Taylor Swift zayn best new Dua LiPA Julia Michaels Khalid Kyle rag n bone man best pop singer Camila Cabello Demi Lovato Miley Cyrus Shawn Mendes Taylor Swift best video foo fighters run..."
"Take a look at the following best song clean bandit rock music Sean Paul Anne Mary DJ Khalid wild thought Rihanna Bryson tiler edsilland you Louise fancy dad Yankee despacito Remix left Justin bibber Sean Mendes nothing stands in the way of my back best artist Ariana grand shape complete nomination..."



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yeah, he'll remain my best friend for life.'”
“So yes, I was a little thrilled to see her in that.'”
“...to glam up even if it means compromising their own comfort But after a fevered response to the images the star responded with a lengthy Facebook...”
“...praised the Italian designer for the timeless apparel saying I mean Versace they still make phenomenal dresses 20 years on from me wearing that one On social media many suggested the images show how women in Hollywood still feel pressure...”
“Versace Versace The Hunger Game s actress s ultra sexy dress gave some fashion fanatics deju vu for its striking resemblance to a sizzling Versace look worn by bombshell Elizabeth Hurley back in 1994 A classic The The Royals actress...”
“Jennifer also caused a bit of a stir when she sported her hot, hot look during a chill of 3F in London while doing press for her spy thriller Red Sparrow.”
“The garment is considered one of Versace's best known creations and even has an entire Wikipedia entry dedicated to it.”
“Miss Hurley sported the original look while accompanying ex Hugh Grant at the premiere of Four Weddings And A Funeral, making instant fashion history.”
“...and sexy The The Royals actress continued to praise the Italian designer I mean Versace they still make phenomenal dresses 20 years on from me wearing that one...”
“You know, he's now a father of five, he has five kids and he's a great dad.”


"Yes, he will always be my best friend."
"So yes, I was a little excited to see her in that dress."
“… Dazzling, even if it means sacrificing their own comfort, after a frenetic response to these images, the star responded with lengthy facebook... "
“…… Praising this Italian designer for his timeless clothes, he said, "I mean Versace. 20 years ago, I was wearing this dress on social media, and they still made extraordinary clothes. Many people think these photos show that women in Hollywood still feel pressure..."
"Versace, the super sexy dress of the starving game actress of Versace, has given some fashion enthusiasts a deja vu, because it is strikingly similar to the sexy Versace of Elizabeth Hurley's classic" the Royal actor "in 1994..."
"Jennifer's fiery expression caused a bit of a sensation when she was reporting on her spy thriller" red sparrow "in the 3F cold wind in London
"This dress is considered one of Versace's most famous works, and there is even a complete entry on Wikipedia about it."
"Miss Hurley created the history of fashion in a flash when she accompanied former Hugh Grant to the premiere of Four Weddings and a funeral
“… And sexy Royal actresses continue to praise Italian designers. I mean Versace, they still make amazing dresses. 20 years later, I wear this one... "
"You know, he's a father of five now, he has five children, and he's a great father."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Audrina Patridge Reveals How She and Husband Corey Bohan Will Avoid Divorce This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“'”See more on Patridge's new life as a wife and mom in the video below.”
“It's like, 'No, that's not true.”
“"I feel like we are so grounded now and we have each other's backs no matter what… people can't just try to come in between us and tell us lies.”
“WATCH: Audrina Patridge Goes Back to Brunette, Says She Did It for Her 'Hills' Fans!”
““We experienced the reality side of it, the made-up stories in the tabloids, other people trying to get in between us and the gossip and the rumors."”
““We've been through all those pitfalls, I feel like, before we got married,” she explained.”
“ET caught up with Patridge in December, before the Hills baby boom (Lauren Conrad, Whitney Port and Heidi Montag are all expecting babies this summer), when she opened up about how she and husband Corey Bohan make it work.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Exclusive: Audrina Patridge reveals how she and her husband Corey Bohan will avoid divorce. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's message."
"Please see more about Partridge's new life as a wife and mother in the video below."
"It's like," no, that's not true. "
"I think we are very down-to-earth now. No matter what happens, we have the support of each other People can't just try to step in and tell us lies. "
"Watch: audienne partridge goes back to the brunette and says she did it for her fans of hills!"
"We went through the reality side, the tabloid stories, other people trying to get in between us and the gossip."
"I feel like we went through all these traps before we got married," she explained
Last December, before the Hilles baby boom (Lauren Conrad, Whitney Porter and Heidi Montague were all pregnant this summer), et caught up with Patricia, when she opened her heart to how she and her husband, Corey Bohan, had succeeded



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“He taught me a rumba.”
“After an emotional rumba on Monday night for the "Most Memorable Year" week of the competition, Chmerkovskiy wrote a heartfelt Instagram post about his partner and their performance.”
“"Everything I ever want for my partners is literally what @vanessalachey has brought to the dance floor last night," he began.”
“"Raw, unapologetic, real emotion expressed through a beautiful dance."”
“The dance was inspired by the Lachey family's difficult third pregnancy, and it struck a chord with the dancer.”
“"Yesterday also marked the first time when I completely lost it right before the dance...”
“I rarely cry but this was something different, something I’ve yet to experience watching someone else’s story," he continued.”
“"I’m proud of you partner!"”
“...he added.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"He taught me rumba."
On Monday night, during the "most unforgettable year" competition week, zimmerkovsky excitedly posted an instagram post about his partner and their performance
"Everything I want for my partner is what @ vanesalachey brought to the dance floor last night," he began
"The original, apologetic and true feelings expressed through graceful dance."
"The inspiration for the dance comes from the difficult experience of the Lachy family's third pregnancy, which resonates with the dancers."
"Yesterday was the first time I lost it completely before the dance..."
"I seldom cry, but it's another thing, I haven't experienced watching other people's stories yet," he continued
"I'm proud of you, partner!"
“…… He added



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I think it’s a glorious way to make a living, especially in this day and age when so many people either can’t recognize the truth or don’t think it’s important.””
““Even though our lines and the stories we’re told are given to us by writers, it’s our job, under those imaginary circumstances, to find the truth.”
“...tell lies for a living And he said No an actor s job is to tell the truth Macy recalled as he accepted his award...”
“Couple of years ago I was privy to a conversation with David Mamet who is really my mentor and taught me everything I knew was talking to a journalist and the journalist said Actors have a weird job they just...”


"I think it's a glorious way to make a living, especially in today's era, where many people either don't recognize the truth or don't think it matters."
"Although the lines and stories we hear are given to us by writers, in those fictional situations, our job is to find the truth."
“…… Lying for a living, he said, "no, it's the job of an actor to tell the truth. When accepting the award ceremony, Messi recalled that..."
"A few years ago, I had a private conversation with David Mamet, who was my real mentor and taught me everything I knew, which was to talk to reporters, who said actors had a strange job and they just..."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whedon: Partially, we’ve been waiting on it because we knew what was coming in the second “Avengers” movie so we didn’t want to hit that note before them.”
“The last scene also introduced the concept of Life Model Decoys – there’s obviously been a lot of speculation about that aspect of the Marvel universe since before the show even began, so why did it feel like now was right time to introduce them?”
“Why did you decide to sacrifice Lincoln, out of all the possibilities?”
“It was very poetic to see Daisy’s two love interests go out in a blaze of glory together, at least visually, even if Ward’s technically been gone for a while.”
“[Laughs.]”
“Whedon: Unless the actors were pricks, which in this case they aren’t, so that makes this very difficult.”
“Tancharoen: It’s never an easy decision to kill off any of our characters.”
“Whedon: We definitely want to leave people wanting more – we don’t want them to lose steam and we don’t want anybody to get burnt out on people always turning up, but I think that by the end, you’ll wish that he was around, which is our goal.”
“We felt like we could give Grant Ward/Hive his glorious ending that he deserved, because Grant Ward essentially died halfway through Season 3, but we didn’t want to let go.”


"Wheaton: part of the reason is that we've been waiting, because we know what the second Avenger movie is going to be, so we don't want to play that note in front of them."
"The last scene also introduced the concept of life model decoys - it's obvious that there was a lot of speculation about this aspect of wonder world before the exhibition started. Why is it time to introduce them now?"
"Why did you decide to sacrifice Lincoln?"
"It's poetic, at least visually, to see Daisy's two interests come together in a brilliant scene, even though ward has been away technically for some time."
(laughter)
"Wheaton: unless the actors are jerks, in this case, they're not, so it's hard."
"Tancharoen: it's not an easy decision to kill any character."
"Wheaton: we definitely want people to have more desire - we don't want them to lose motivation, we don't want anyone to be exhausted by the fact that there's always someone around, but I think in the end, you'll want him around, and that's our goal."
"We feel we can give grant ward / beehive the glorious ending he deserves, because grant ward basically died in the middle of the third season, but we don't want to let go."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Dream then reunited with her mom and brother, King Cairo, later in the day for some Mother’s Day shenanigans.”
“The 30-year-old reality star took to Instagram on Sunday to honor his baby mama on Mother’s Day.”
“After sharing a sweet post to his own mom, Kris Jenner, Kardashian posted a throwback video of Chyna to Instagram.”
“The clip followed Chyna’s pregnancy and the birth of Kardashian’s daughter, Dream.”
“MORE: Blac Chyna Goes Glam for Friend's Wedding -- See the Chic Pics!”
““And happy mama's day to the mother of my only child @blacchyna :) I am so Thankful for our beautiful baby girl and so Thankful for YOU and never thought I could be this Happy so thank you for giving me Her,” he captioned the footage.”
“The on-again, off-again pair appeared to spend the holiday apart.”
“Rob visited his sisters earlier in the day where they all cuddled with baby Dream on Snapchat, posting several sweet clips.”
“Chyna documented her special day on Snapchat, posting photos and videos with her two children.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
Later, Meng was reunited with her mother and brother, the king of Cairo, and played some mother's Day pranks later in the day
"The 30-year-old reality star came to instagram on Sunday to commemorate his little mother on Mother's day."
"After sharing a sweet post with her mother, Kris Jenner, Kardashian posted a retrospective video of Zina on instagram."
"This video was taken after Gina got pregnant and Kardashian's daughter dream was born."
More: Blake ziner shines for a friend's wedding - look at those chic photos
"Happy Mother's day, mother of my only child @ blacchyna:) I thank our beautiful baby girl very much, thank you very much, I never thought I would be so happy, so thank you for giving me her," he wrote under the title of the camera
"It seems that the couple who are both on and off are going on holiday separately."
"Rob visited his sisters earlier in the day, all of them holding baby dreams on snapchat and posting some sweet clips."
"Gina recorded her special day on snapchat and posted photos and videos with her two children."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Orlando Bloom and Elijah Wood Have Epic 'Lord of the Rings' Reunion With Co-StarsRelated Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Orlando Bloom Admits to Cate Blanchett That He Had a Crush on Her During 'Lord of the Rings' FilmingKate Hudson Lets ‘Papa’ Steven Tyler Cradle Her Baby Bump After Going Glam With Pal Liv Tyler: Pics!”
““All gossip!” the 41-year-old actress declared when a caller asked about the dating rumors during Tuesday's episode of Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen.”
““No, never ever, ever."”
“Further dispelling the rumors, Tyler added, "He’s one of my oldest friends, obviously.”
“We grew up together and we were in The Lord of the Rings together, but never ever dated.”Aside from being just friends, there was another reason the two never got together while co-starring in The Lord of the Ring movies.”
““I was with Royce [Langdon] then, my first husband, and madly in love with him, so I wasn’t on the market,” she shared.”
“Langdon and Tyler were married from 2003 to 2009.”
“That being said, the LOTR set wasn't all that innocent.”
“"We all flirted," Tyler admitted.”


"Orlando Bloom and Elijah Wood's epic 'Lord of the rings' reunite with star related galleries..."
"Embedded code restart" content: Orlando Bloom admits to Kate Blanchett that he was infatuated with her when shooting "Lord of the rings". After Kate Hudson was totally different from her friend liv Taylor, she let Steven Taylor cradle hold her lump: photo
"It's all gossip! "On Tuesday's watch and Andy Cohen, a 41 year old actress called to ask about dating rumors," she said
"No, forever, forever."
Taylor further refuted the rumor, saying: "obviously, he is one of my oldest friends."
"We grew up together, together in Lord of the rings, but never dated." Apart from being just friends, there is another reason that the two never got together when they co starred in the Lord of the rings movie
"I was with my first husband, Royce (Langdon), and I fell madly in love with him, so I wasn't in the market," she said
"Langdon and Taylor got married from 2003 to 2009."
"Having said that, the Lotts are not so innocent."
"We all flirted," Taylor admitted



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Never change, Kris, you gem!”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“In the words of Sebastian the Crab:GiphyAlso, in related news, Kris Jenner spent the party doing this:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“...before sitting on his lap for some lip-to-lip action.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Never change, Chris, you baby!"
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"In Sebastian's words, crabs: so is giffy. In the related news, Chris Jenner said at the party: this content was imported from instagram."
"This content was imported from instagram."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
"Before he's sitting on his lap talking"



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She believed he would get sober and they would work it out, but that isn’t how things seem to be panning out,” the source added.”
““Lindsay was supporting Ben in the beginning but now he seems to be relying more on Shauna than Lindsay and she is devastated,” the source said.”
““Saturday Night Live,” which she produces, had just been honored for outstanding variety sketch series.”
“Shookus, 38, later posed, smiling with her trophy, with her blond hair pulled up in a messy updo.”
“The image offers up a contrast to a report that she’s “devasted” by her breakup last month from Affleck.”
“The breakup was announced the same week that Affleck was photographed in the company of 22-year-old Playboy model Shauna Sexton, followed by video of his ex-wife Jennifer Garner driving him up to Malibu to check into rehab for his ongoing struggles with alcohol addiction.”
“But in addition to joining Lorne Michaels and the rest of her “SNL” crew to pick up some Emmys, Shookus has apparently found other ways to cope with separating herself from Affleck’s high-profile personal challenges.”
“Vanity Fair writer Josh Duboff said on his “In the Limelight” podcast that Shookus was spotted on a date Sept. 8 at the U.S. Open women’s final.”
“A source emailed Duboff to say that Shookus was seen with an unidentified man, holding hands, and hustling to leave the USTA Billie Jean King National Tennis Center in New York City after the match between Serena Williams and Naomi Osaka.”
“Shookus, wearing a khaki jacket, white jeans, sneakers and sunglasses, “seemed concerned she was going to be spotted,” the source told Duboff.”


"She believes he will wake up and they will solve it, but it doesn't seem to be the case," the source added
"Lindsay initially supported Ben, but now he seems to rely more on Shauna than Lindsay, and she is very sad," the source said
Her production of "Saturday night live" has just won the award of excellent variety sketch series
Shokus, 38, then posed, holding the trophy with a smile, his golden hair combed up in a mess
"This photo is in sharp contrast to the report that she broke up with Affleck last month."
"The same week that Affleck was photographed with 22-year-old Playboy model Shauna sexton, Affleck announced his break-up, and his ex-wife, Jennifer Garner, drove him to Malibu for a drug treatment center because he had been fighting alcohol addiction."
"But in addition to joining Lorne Michaels and her other 'SNL' cast to win some Emmy Awards, shokus has clearly found other ways to deal with the high-profile personal challenges that are out of touch with Affleck."
In his "under the spotlight" podcast, Vanity Fair author Josh duboff said shokus was discovered in the women's final of the US Open on September 8
"A source sent an e-mail to dubov saying that after the match between Williams and Naomi Osaka, shokus and an unidentified man hand in hand hurriedly left the billirankin National Tennis Center of the American tennis association."
"Shookus was wearing a khaki jacket, white jeans, sneakers and sunglasses," and seemed worried that she would be found, "the source told duboff



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This landmark deal will allow fans to re-watch their favorite moments ahead of the series premiere, as well as bring Will & Grace and its cast of characters to a whole new audience.””
“Additionally, Hulu has been active in acquiring streaming rights to broadcast comedy series, including the Golden Girls library.”
“The Emmy-winning comedy will be available beginning Thursday, a week ahead of the September 28 return of Will & Grace on NBC.”
“.”
“Hulu will be the exclusive SVOD partner for the original eight seasons, which also will be available on the NBC app and pay TV providers with authentication.”
“The deal also extends to the new episodes of Will & Grace, which will be available for streaming on the same platforms the day after their broadcast premiere.”
“Hulu was the logical home for Will & Grace because, as an NBC corporate sibling, it gets access to the network’s current series via the network’s stacking rights.”
“The pact keeps new and library episodes together, as was the case with NBC’s freshman drama series This Is Us, which also went to Hulu in SVOD.”
“Related Story Sean Penn To Star In Beau Willimon's 'The First' TV Series For Hulu & Channel 4The original eight seasons of Will & Grace ran from 1998-2006, receiving 83 Emmy nominations and 16 wins, including Outstanding Comedy Series in 2000.”
““To be able to bring such an iconic show into the streaming universe for the first time ever is an opportunity we couldn’t pass up.”


"This landmark deal will allow fans to revisit their favorite moments before the series premiere, while bringing will and grace and their cast to a new audience."
In addition, Hulu has actively won streaming rights for comedy series, including "golden girl library"
"The Emmy award-winning comedy will be on air on Thursday, a week ahead of NBC's" will and grace "on September 28."
“.”
"Hulu will be SVOD's exclusive partner for the first eight quarters, and NBC apps and pay TV providers will also provide certification."
"The agreement also extends to a new episode of will and grace, which will be broadcast on the same platform the day after its premiere."
"Hulu is the logician of will & grace, because as a brother of NBC, it can access the current series of the network through the network's stacking permissions."
"This agreement puts the new series together with the Library series, just like NBC's new series this is us, it goes to SVOD's Hulu."
Sean Penn will play in the eight seasons of will and grace, the "first" TV series shot by Bob willimont for Hulu & Channel 4. From 1998 to 2006, he won 83 Emmy nominations and 16 awards, including the excellent Comedy Series in 2000
"To be able to bring such an iconic program into the streaming media world for the first time is an opportunity we can't miss."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Don't jinx me!"”
“"I just need a few years!”
“"I mean, I haven't had a chance," he joked.”
“While he hasn't lost his footing just yet, Mendes says his rebellious side may come out in the future.”
“You never know though, give it a couple more years and you might be taking back everything you just said."”
“I think it's really important to keep your feet on the ground.”
“"Support is there when you need it, but not when it's not needed.”
“I'm just a normal person and nobody talks me up too much," he said.”
“"I think I've been really lucky to have a good foundation of people around me...”
“...eonline com...”


"Don't let me down!"
"I only need a few years!"
"I mean, I don't have a chance," he joked
"Although he hasn't made a mistake yet, Mendes said that his rebellious side may appear in the future."
"But you will never know that in a few years, you may take back what you just said."
"I think it's really important to be down-to-earth."
"Support is there when you need it, not when you don't need it."
"I'm just an ordinary person," he said. "No one says too much to me."
"I think I'm really lucky to have a good foundation around people..."
“… Online communication... "



**Something goes wrong**
“Mohit, 26Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCA product manager from Pacifica, California29.”
“Milton, 31Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCA hotel recreation supervisor from North Bay Village, Florida28.”
“Brady, 29Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCA male model from Miami, Florida7.”
“Blake K., 29Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCA U.S. Marine veteran from San Francisco, California6.”
“Blake E., 31Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCAn aspiring drummer from Marina del Rey, California5.”
“Anthony, 26Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCAn education software manager from Chicago, Illinois4.”
“Alex, 28Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCAn information systems supervisor from Grosse Pointe Park, Michigan3.”
“Adam, 27Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABCA real estate agent from Dallas, Texas2.”
“RELATED VIDEO: ‘Bachelor Nation!’ Here’s Your First Look at ‘Bachelorette’ Rachel Lindsay’s Premiere EpisodeAnd here they are:1.”
“You can call somebody a Whaboom,” he said on a Facebook Live Wednesday.”


"Mohit, 26 image zooming credit: Craig Sjodin / ABCA product manager, Pacifica, California 29."
"Milton, 31 image zooming credit: Craig Sjodin / ABCA hotel entertainment director, 28 North Bay Village, Florida."
"Brady, 29, thanks to image zooming: Craig Hawking / ABCA male model from Miami, Florida."
"Black K., 29 image zooming credit: Craig Hawking / ABCA marine veteran, San Francisco, California 6."
"Black e., 31 image scaling credit: Craig Sjodin / abcan aspiring drummer from Marina dray, California 5."
"Anthony, 26 image zooming credit: Craig Sjodin / abcan, manager of educational software, Chicago, IL."
"Alex, 28 image zooming L / C: Craig Sjodin / abcan, head of information systems, Gros Point Park, Michigan 3."
"Adam, 27 image scaling credit: Craig Sjodin / ABCA real estate agent, Dallas, Texas 2."
Related video: 'Bachelor country! This is your first time to see the premiere of "Bachelor" by Rachel Lindsay: 1
"You can call someone whoboom," he said live on Facebook on Wednesday



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...days after that story was published Goop removed the spacesuit claim but it still sells the stickers and still touts their energy balancing properties...”
“Gizmodo ran a story in late June that said NASA spacesuits do not have any conductive carbon material lining Mark Shelhamer former chief scientist at NASA s human research division called the marketing claim a load of BS and told Gizmodo the whole premise was like snake oil A few...”
“Opinion The Goop website tells visitors We test the waters so that you don t have to...”
“Nevertheless while we believe that TINA s description of our interactions is misleading and their claims unsubstantiated and unfounded we will continue to evaluate our products and our content and make those improvements that we believe are reasonable and necessary in the interests of our community of users A Second...”
“Unfortunately, they provided limited information and made threats under arbitrary deadlines which were not reasonable under the circumstances.”
“We responded promptly and in good faith to the initial outreach from representatives of TINA and hoped to engage with them to address their concerns.”
“We are receptive to feedback and consistently seek to improve the quality of the products and information referenced on our site.”
“Goop responded to TINA’s accusations with this statement:“Goop is dedicated to introducing unique products and offerings and encouraging constructive conversation surrounding new ideas.”
““It's a very high-profile site, and a lot of women have turned to its empowerment message and purchased its products,” Patten told NBC News.”
“So why did TINA decide to investigate Goop?”


“…… A few days after the report was published, goop canceled the claim of the spacesuit, but it still sold the stickers and still promoted their energy balance characteristics... "
"In late June, Gizmodo published a report saying that there was no conductive carbon lining in NASA's space suit. Mark shelhamer, former chief scientist of NASA's human research department, called this marketing proposition a pile of rubbish and told Gizmodo that the whole premise was like snake oil in several places..."
"Opinion Google tells visitors that we test the waters so you don't have to..."
"Although we believe that Tina's description of our interaction is misleading and there is no factual basis for their claims, we will continue to evaluate our products and content and make improvements that we think are reasonable and necessary to safeguard the interests of our user groups..."
"Unfortunately, the information they provided was limited and the threat was issued within an arbitrary period of time, which was unreasonable in the circumstances at the time."
"We respond promptly and sincerely to the initial outreach of Tina's representatives and hope to approach them to address their concerns."
"We are open to feedback and are constantly seeking to improve the quality of the products and information quoted on our website."
In response to Tina's criticism, Google responded: "Google is committed to launching unique products and services and encouraging constructive dialogue around new ideas."
"It's a very eye-catching website and a lot of women are turning to its licensing information and buying its products," Patten told NBC news
"So why did Tina decide to investigate goop?"



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Click HERE to read about the character.”
“A lot of Riverdale stans also read it that way and panicked.”
“The Riverdale showrunner, Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa, dropped a worrisome hint on Tuesday, Oct. 2.”
“He was tweeting about the episodes that they're working on now when he teased that a major character could die in the mid-season finale.”
“"Episode 308 is our mid-season finale!"”
“...he tweeted first.”
“"(#Riverdale hasn't even premiered and we're already shooting our mid-season finale!!)"”
“(via Riverdale/The CW)Aguirre-Sacasa then followed up his first tweet with a scarier one: "Life goes on (for MOST of our series regulars) in Episode #309 of #Riverdale…"Episode 308 is our mid-season finale!”
“(#Riverdale hasn't even premiered and we're already shooting our mid-season finale!!)”
“⚒ pic.twitter.com/s022T8KKtS — RobertoAguirreSacasa (@WriterRAS) October 2, 2018Life goes on (for MOST of our series regulars) in Episode #309 of #Riverdale… ☠️ pic.twitter.com/9lqwzR59uU — RobertoAguirreSacasa (@WriterRAS) October 2, 2018That certainly makes it sound like one of the show's stars could be killed off.”


"Click here to read about roles."
"A lot of Riverdale stans look at it the same way. It's scary."
On Tuesday, October 2, Riverdale host Roberto Aguirre sacasa gave a worrying hint
"He tweeted about the series they're making now, when he joked that a major character might die in the mid season finale."
"Episode 308 is our season finale!"
“…… He tweeted first. "
"(# Riverdale hasn't premiered yet, we're already filming our mid season finale!" "
"(via Riverdale / the CW) Aguirre sacasa then tweeted a more terrifying tweet on his first tweet:" life (for most of our regulars) continues in Riverdale episode 309... " Episode 308 is our season finale
"(# Riverdale hasn't premiered yet, we're already filming our mid season finale!)"
“ ⚒  pic.twitter.com/s022T8KKtS -Roberto Aquila CASA (@ writerras) October 2, 2018 life continues (for most of our series regulars) in episode 309 Riverdale ☠️  pic.twitter.com/9lqwzR59uU -Robertoaguinacasa (@ writerras) October 2, 2018, which undoubtedly makes people think that a star of the play may be killed. "



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think you’re in my seat,'” he explained.”
“Excuse me, sir.”
“The actress shared never-before-seen photos on Instagram Tuesday to mark her daughter Delta’s 3rd birthday on Tuesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Staying true to form for the star, the snapshots were a mix of very candid and intimate moments as well as some funny moments.”
“Image zoomBell with husband Dax ShepardImage zoom“Three years ago today.”
“47lbs heavier,” Bell, 37, wrote in the caption of a series of photos she shared.”
““Getting through painful contractions with backrubs and breathing.”Image zoom Credit: Kristen Bell/InstagramShe continued, “Occasionally swinging from the IV pole to try and feel sexy and open up my hips.”
“After 36 hours of labor I met a girl i love more than all the molecules in all the world.”
“Happy birthday, Delta.”


"I think you're in my seat," he explained
"I'm sorry, sir."
"On Tuesday, the actress shared photos she had never seen on instagram to commemorate her daughter Delta's third birthday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"To keep the real state of being a star, the snapshot is a very frank and intimate moment, as well as a mix of some interesting moments."
"Three years ago today" with her husband, Darth Shepard
"Weighing 47 pounds," bell, 37, wrote in the title of a series of photos she shared
"Go through painful contractions with back massage and breathing." Credit for image zooming: Kristen bell / instagram she continues, "occasionally swings from the intravenous stick to try to be sexy and open the hips."
"After 36 hours of hard work, I met a girl who I love more than all the elements in the world."
"Happy birthday, Delta."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Viewers will get to see that online solidarity in action on the red carpet Sunday night.”
“It’s time for every workplace to look more like our world, where women have equal representation.” Online, fellow actors Ashley Judd and Tessa Thompson tweeted their support of Jones’ statements.”
“In the wake of President Donald Trump’s inauguration last January, women flooded Washington wearing pink pussycat hats to march on the Capitol.”
“In September, celebrities made a political statement at the 2017 Emmys by wearing blue ACLU ribbons after Trump announced his plans to end DACA.”
“But perhaps this year’s Golden Globes could thread Hollywood’s largest display of solidarity as some of the biggest names in show business pledge to don black at the 75th annual event.”
“With the influx of sexual misconduct allegations in entertainment and other industries since the Harvey Weinstein scandal broke in October stars of the big and small screen are planning to wear all black to the Beverly Hilton in Los Angeles this Sunday in support of those who have spoken out...”
“...about sexual harassment and to protest gender inequality...”
“Along with the dark ensembles, participants will reportedly be accessorizing with pins created by Time’s Up — the coalition behind the statement.”
“Michael Shonda Rhimes, Reese Witherspoon, and 300 other prominent women in the entertainment industry are behind the Time’s Up initiative aimed at eradicating abuse, harassment, marginalization and underrepresentation in the work place.”
“The alliance almost decided to boycott the Golden Globe Awards entirely, Kerry Washington told the LA Times.”


"Viewers will see the online support on the red carpet on Sunday night."
"It's time to make every workplace look more like our world, where women are equally represented." On the Internet, actors Ashley Judd and Tessa Thompson tweeted their support for Jones
"After President Donald Trump took office in January last year, a large number of women swarmed into Washington, wearing pink cat caps and parading in the Capitol."
"In September, after trump announced the end of Dhaka's plan, celebrities put on blue ACLU ribbons at the 2017 Emmy Awards to make a political statement."
"However, this year's Golden Globe awards may be able to run through the largest support activities in Hollywood, because some celebrities in the performing arts industry promised don black at the 75th Golden Globe Awards ceremony."
"Since the Harvey Weinstein scandal came to light in October, there has been a flood of sexual misconduct charges in the entertainment industry and other industries, and the stars on the big and small screens are planning to put on all black clothes at Beverly Hilton in Los Angeles this Sunday to support those who publicly declare their position..."
“… On sexual harassment and protest against gender inequality... "
"It's reported that the participants will work with the dark band to use time's up pins for accessories - this is the alliance behind the statement."
"Michael shoda Reims, Reese Witherspoon and 300 other well-known women in the entertainment industry support time's actions aimed at eliminating abuse, harassment, marginalization and underrepresentation in the workplace."
"The league has almost decided to boycott the Golden Globes entirely," Kerry Washington told the Los Angeles Times



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
““She’s already created a show, how hard can it be to create some lungs and liver and stuff, kidneys?”As previously reported, The Office alum has chosen to keep the identity of the baby’s father private.”
“Mindy Kaling is pregnant with a baby girl, Us Weekly can exclusively reveal.”
“Her costars spilled the beans while attending the PaleyFest Fall TV Preview event for The Mindy Project in L.A. on Friday, September 8.”
““I’m just thrilled out of my mind!”
“I cried like a baby and that it’s a girl … I just think that she’s up to it,” Beth Grant, who plays Beverly Janoszewski on the hit show, told Us.”
“I just think that she s ready and I m very happy for her because I have a daughter that s turning 25 and it s just the greatest thing in the world Ed Weeks who plays Dr Jeremy Reed also shared the same sentiment to Us saying We were...”
“...so thrilled for her The show started as a tribute to her mother who very sadly passed away just as the show is being picked up and it ends with her having a daughter of her own It s a lot a lot...”
“When she reminded us all of that, we all cried in the final table read,” the English actor continued.”
““I mean Jesus, life!”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"She's already created a show to create things like lungs and livers. How hard is it for kidneys? "As previously reported, alumni in the office chose to keep the father's identity secret."
"American weekly" exclusive disclosure, Mindy Carlin pregnant with a baby girl
On Friday, September 8, her partners told the truth at the Mindy project's Paley Fest fall TV preview in Los Angeles
"I'm just mad with excitement!"
"I cry like a baby, it's a girl I just think she's up to it, "Beth grant, who plays Beverly janozewski in a hit show, told us
"I just think she's ready, and I'm happy for her, because I have a daughter who's going to be 25 years old, and ED vex, who plays Dr. Jeremy reed, is the greatest person in the world, and she also tells us that we are..."
“…… The play was too exciting for her. It started as a tribute to her mother, who died very sad. When the play was taken away, it ended with her own daughter. It was too much... "
"When she reminded us of all this, we all cried at the last table," the British actor continued
"I mean Jesus, life!"



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementBirthday guests also included Blake Griffin, BFF Hailey Baldwin, Kendall’s parents, Kris Jenner, Caitlyn Jenner, sister Kourtney Kardashian and her boyfriend, Younes Bendjima.”
“Kim and Kanye left their kids at home for their night out.”
“It was just the two of them, and this event came to shut down rumors according to which they are planning to get divorced.”
“Went to see Dave Chappelle this night and laughed all night long.”
“Sometimes u just need a good laugh session with your friends!”
“A post shared by Kim Kardashian West (@kimkardashian) on Oct 31, 2017 at 10:47am PDTKim wore a skintight bodycon dress and kept the accessories to a minimum with a pair of gold chain necklaces.”
“The reality star paired the simple look with a sexy pair of lace-up stilettos by Merah Vodianova.”
“Kanye braced a workman’s look, and he wore a grey work jacket by Caterpillar, black pants which he paired with black boots.”
“Back in September, Kim confirmed that the family of four are happily expecting a third child via surrogate shortly.”
“...bar Petite Taqueria in LA on Thursday night...”


"Also included in the ad are Blake Griffin, BFF Haley Baldwin, Kendall's parents, Chris Jenner, Caitlin Jenner, sister Courtney Kardashian and her boyfriend, yones bengima."
"Kim and Kanye left the baby at home for the night."
"It's just the two of them. It calms down the rumor that they are planning a divorce."
"I went to see Dave chapel tonight and laughed all night."
"Sometimes you just have to joke with your friends!"
"At 10:47 a.m. on October 31, 2017, Kim Kardashian West (@ kimgardashian) shared a post that Kim wore tights and kept accessories to a minimum with a gold necklace."
"The reality star paired a simple look with Merah Vodianova's sexy lace up heels."
Kanye pretended to be a worker. He wore a grey overalls made of caterpillars, black trousers and black boots
"As early as September this year, Kim confirmed that a family of four would soon be able to have a third child through surrogacy."
“… Thursday night at the little taclia bar in Los Angeles... "



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Raisa’s mother, Virginia Almendarez, recently recalled the emotional reaction Teefey had following their daughters’ transplant surgery.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Meet Francia Raisa, Selena Gomez’s Actress BFF Who Gave Her a Kidney“It was what I needed to do for my overall health,” the singer captioned the same hospital beds photo on Instagram.”
“We survived from all the love, prayers and God.”On Thursday, Gomez revealed that the reason she quietly stepped back from her career over the summer was that she was recovering from a kidney transplant in hopes of aiding her battle with the chronic autoimmune disease Lupus.”
“Image zoom Credit: Steve Cohn/Invision for Netflix/APConcluding, “Selena gained a kidney, I was able to keep my little girl, but I also gained another daughter….thank you to everyone who was there for Sel, Francia and our families.”
“Mama Bear was in high gear,” the 13 Reasons Why producer continued.”
“I am pretty sure I am banned from that hospital.”
““As a mother I was helpless, scared and all I could do was pray for both of them, Francia’s beautiful family.”
“For all those moments of not knowing if we were going up or going down, I can always come back to this picture and know we can always make it back up,” Teefey wrote.”
““This picture is one of the most breathtaking images that will live with me forever.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


Lisa's mother, Virginia almendarez, recently recalled tiffy's emotional reaction to her daughter's transplant
"Related video: meet Francia Risha, Serena Gomez's actress BFF, and she gives her a kidney," which I need to do for my overall health, "the singer subtitled the same bed photo on instagram
"We live from all love, prayer and God." On Thursday, Gomez revealed that she quietly quit her career in the summer because she is recovering from a kidney transplant, hoping to help her fight against the chronic autoimmune disease lupus
"Image zooming credit: Steve Cohn / Introduction for Netflix / apconclusing," Selena got a kidney, I can keep my little daughter, but I also got another daughter Thank you all for being there for Serena, Francia and our family. "
"Mama Bear is running at a high speed," 13 reasons why the producer continues
"I'm pretty sure I was banned from that hospital."
"As a mother, I'm helpless and scared. All I can do is pray for the beautiful family of the two of them, Francia."
"For those who don't know whether we're going up or down, I can always come back to this picture and know that we can always get it back," Tiffany wrote
"This is one of the most amazing photos, and it will always be with me."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I don’t get angry anymore unless I’m really, really hurt — so this is the end result of me being angry, is that I’m hurt.””
““Not cool.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Everything that’s going on with Jen is just driving me crazy,” he said.”
““They say if things aren’t good at home, then things aren’t going to be good in life.”
“Me and Jen, we’re going to be involved in each other’s lives forever, so we may be toxic forever.”But beyond repairing his relationship with Jen, Ronnie’s focus was on the couple’s infant daughter, Ariana Sky.”
“Determined to get a custody plan in place, he paid a visit to his lawyer’s office to get the paperwork in motion.”
““I have to make a change for my daughter.”
“I have to put a stop to this for Ariana, something has to be done so she has stability and foundation,” he said.”
““That’s why we need some kind of guidelines, to make sure that she’s all right at the end of the day.”And the rest of the cast was more than happy to give Ronnie his time and space.”


"I won't get angry again unless I'm really, really hurt - so that's the end result of my anger, that's when I get hurt."
"Not cool."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Everything about Jane is driving me crazy," he said
"They say that if things at home are bad, things in life will not be good."
"Jennie and I, we will always be involved in each other's lives, so we may always be toxic." But in addition to repairing his relationship with Jennie, Ronnie's attention is also focused on the couple's youngest daughter, Arianna Skye
Determined to make a guardianship plan, he went to a law firm to start the paperwork
"I have to make a change for my daughter."
"I have to stop this for Ariana, I have to do something, so she has stability and foundation." He said.
"That's why we need some guidelines to make sure she's OK at the end of the day." The rest of the crew are very happy to give Ronnie time and space. "



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The actress has not starred in a television show since Alias, which wrapped in 2006 after five seasons.”
“They all seem like huge dolphin fans.”During the trip, Garner stayed at a resort while Affleck stayed at a nearby house.”
““They spent several hours at the park and looked like they had the best time.”
““They made a family trip to interact with dolphins, sea lions and stingrays,” a source told PEOPLE.”
“There is a lot of love and respect there.”The day before the holiday, the whole family made a group trip to Sea Life Park in Oahu.”
““They continue to remain cordial to one another.”
““They’re doing well, and are both committed to providing a supportive environment for their kids,” a source close to Affleck told PEOPLE.”
“Image zoom Credit: Gotham/GC ImagesSince then, they have continued to happily co-parent their three children, Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 6, and spent Easter weekend together with them in Hawaii, where Affleck has been shooting his new movie Triple Frontier.”
“The divorce isn’t yet finalized but is progressing, sources have said, as the two have been in mediation with leading L.A. divorce lawyer Laura Wasser to settle privately.”
““Ben was back in LA this weekend,” the insider explained, adding that “the whole family went to church on Sunday before Jen’s party.”The duo filed to end their 10-year marriage on April 13, 2016, nearly two years after they originally announced their split.”


"The actress hasn't been in a TV series since the alias broadcast for five seasons in 2006."
"They all seem to be dolphin fans." During the trip, Ghana lived in a resort and Affleck lived in a house nearby
"They've been in the park for hours and they seem to have a good time."
"Their family went to interact with dolphins, sea lions and stingrays," a source told people
"It's full of love and respect." The day before the festival, the whole family went to the marine life park on Oahu Island
"They continue to have a friendly relationship."
"They do a good job and are committed to providing a supportive environment for their children," a source close to Affleck told people
"Image scaling credit: Gotham / GC images since then, they have continued to happily raise their three children, violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 6, and spend Easter weekend with them in Hawaii, where Affleck has been filming his new film triple frontier."
"The divorce has not yet been finalized, but it is in progress, the source said, because the two have been mediating with Laura Wasser, a famous divorce lawyer in Los Angeles, to make a private settlement."
"Back in Los Angeles this weekend," the person explained. "The whole family went to church on the Sunday before Jennifer's party." The two filed an application to end their 10-year marriage on April 13, 2016, nearly two years after they first announced their separation



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Of the troubled reality star, a Bachelorette source previously told PEOPLE that the spotlight of the show had weighed heavily on Nance.”
“Officials at the time said they did not expect foul play.”
“...at the time of his death PEOPLE confirms...”
“Nance had ingested cocaine, heroin, Clonazepam and Gabapentin shortly before his death, according to an autopsy report obtained by PEOPLE from the Travis County Office of the Medical Examiner.”
“It also stated Nance had a history of opiate abuse and anxiety.”
“His death has been ruled an accident.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Nance — who competed on Emily Maynard‘s season 8 of The Bachelorette in 2012 — was found unresponsive in Austin, Texas, on May 28.”
“He was rushed to a local hospital where he was pronounced dead.”
“He was 31.”


"About the troubled reality star, a single person told people earlier that the spotlight on the show is putting a lot of pressure on Nancy."
"Officials at the time said they didn't expect fouls."
“… At the time of his death, people confirmed that... "
According to an autopsy report from the Travis County coroner's office, NANs took cocaine, heroin, clonazepam and gabapentin shortly before his death
"The report also said NANs had a history of opium abuse and anxiety."
"His death was judged an accident."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Nancy - who took part in Emily Maynard's season 8 Bachelor in 2012 - was found unresponsive in Austin, Texas, May 28."
"He was rushed to a local hospital and declared dead."
"He was 31."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’ll make mornings a little easier, no?”
“Time to say goodbye to dark under-eye circles, hello to a seamless blend, and more money in our pockets.”
“Fun face: Innisfree is a favorite in the K-beauty circles, due to its eco-conscious ingredients, which are exclusively and ethically sourced from the Jeju Island in Korea.”
“It comes in 14 different shades and uses all natural ingredients.”
“One of Hughes’ top three picks is the Innisfree Matte Full Cover Concealer, which lucky for everyone, is only $8.”
“Now that you know your shade, it’s time to pick a concealer.”
“That otherwise insignificant area is “the most neutral-toned part of your face,” and your new color-match spot for concealer.”
“...what you already have under your eyes Instead do like Hughes and place your finger halfway between your nose and the apple of your cheek...”
“The common assumption about under eye concealer is that it should be a few shades lighter than your natural skin tone but Hughes recently told Allure those bright pinks and stark lights can actually create a much muddier version of...”
“...and concealing dark circles along the way...”


"That would make the morning a little easier, wouldn't it?"
"It's time to say goodbye to the black eye, say hello to seamless integration, and have more money in your pocket."
"Interesting face: because of its environmental protection, morally speaking, it comes from Jeju Island, South Korea, so Innisfree is the favorite of K beauty circle."
"It comes in 14 different tones and uses all natural ingredients."
"One of Hughes's most popular three Concealer is Innisfree Matt full concealer. It's lucky for everyone. It costs only 8 dollars."
"Since you know your shadow, choose a concealer."
"Otherwise, of no great importance is the most neutral part of your face", and your new Concealer matching point.
“… What you already have under your eyes, instead of putting your finger between your nose and cheek like Hughes did... "
"The common assumption about eye blading is that it should be lighter than your natural skin color, but Hughes recently told people that those bright pink and stark lights can actually create a more muddy version."
“… And hiding dark circles all the way... "



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and to go but it s tough to be a purse holder...”
“He s come every year he s been so supportive and this year he was playing in a tennis tournament and I wasn t nominated as an individual so I said What do you want to do on our anniversary I mean it s such an honor to be nominated...”
““We just had our anniversary on the day of the Emmys which was hilarious,” Bowen told PEOPLE.”
“Image zoom From left: Scott Phillips, Oliver McLanahan Phillips, Gustav Phillips, John Phillips and Julie Bowen | Credit: John Photography/REX/ShutterstockAt that gala, Bowen, 47, explained why Phillips, 44, didn’t attend the Emmy Awards that year.”
“Los Angeles LGBT Center 47th Anniversary Gala Vanguard Awards in West Hollywood...”
“Image zoom Julie Bowen and Scott Phillips in 2016 Credit Gabriel Olsen Getty They were last photographed with their kids at a Harlem Globetrotters game in Los Angeles almost a year ago in February 2017 and the pair most recently walked a red carpet together in September 2016 at the...”
“They share three sons: Oliver, 10, and twins John and Gustav, 8.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“PEOPLE has confirmed that the couple, who married in September 2004, has separated after 13 years of marriage.”
“The couple married in September 2004 and shares three sonsModern Family star Julie Bowen and her husband, real estate investor Scott Phillips, are going their separate ways.”


“… Go ahead, but it's hard to be a wallet holder... "
"He comes every year and he's very supportive of me. This year he took part in a tennis competition and I wasn't nominated as an individual, so I said," what do you want to do on our anniversary? I mean it's such an honor to be nominated... "
"It's funny that we just had our anniversary on Emmy day," Bowen told people
"Image zooming from left to right: Scott Phillips, Oliver McLanahan Phillips, Gustav Phillips, John Phillips and Julie Bowen | photo source: John photographers / Rex / shutterstock at the party, Bowen, 47, explained why Phillips, 44, didn't attend the Emmy Awards that year."
"Los Angeles LGBT Center 47th Anniversary Pioneer Award in West Hollywood..."
"Julie Bowen and Scott Phillips zoomed in on Gabriel Olsen Getty's 2016 picture. They were last photographed playing with their children in Harlem Globetrotters in Los Angeles almost a year ago in February 2017, and the two recently walked the red carpet together in September 2016 in..."
They have three sons: Oliver, 10, and twins John and Gustav, 8
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It has been confirmed that the couple, who married in September 2004, have separated after 13 years of marriage."
"The couple got married in September 2004, and three of the Santos modern family stars, Julie Bowen, and her husband, real estate investor Scott Phillips, parted ways."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Her first major hit was “Becky From The Block,” where she heavily sampled Jennifer Lopez’ hit “Jenny From The Block.” She has appeared in television with roles in “Austin & Ally” and “Empire”, and will soon be seen back on the big screen in “Miles.””
“Becky G’s real name is Rebbeca Marie Gomez and is from Inglewood, California.”
“For this leg of their tour, Becky G is the opening act for the girls.”
“At their stop in Argentina's Luna Park, the group that was formed on Season 2 of "The X-Factor USA" was singing "Flex," when someone rushed on to the stage and security swiftly reacted and removed her.”
“But the problem is that the girl they removed was actually our girl Becky.”
“Video of the moment has now gone viral on social media and it shows Becky running to the girls and security getting a hold of her and pulling her away.”
“Normani Kordei saw everything go down and looked confused as to what was going on, but continued to dance the choreography.”
“When Ally Brooke realized what was happening, she went to go save the "Shower" hit-maker and inform the guard she was no crazed fan rushing the stage.”
“After the incident, Becky G answered one of her fans asking how she was and she replied: "My arm kinda hurt but they just doing they job."”
“Watch the hilarious moment below and tell us what you think!”


Her first big hit was Becky from the block, in which she selected a large number of popular dramas from Jennifer Lopez, Jennie from the block. She has played roles in Austin and Ellie and Empire and will soon be back on the big screen in miles
"Becky G's real name is Rebecca Mary Gomez, from Inglewood, California."
"In this part of their tour, Becky G is the opening line for the girls."
"At a stop in Luna Park in Argentina, the band set up in the second season of X-factor USA is singing flex. Suddenly someone rushed onto the stage, and the security guard responded quickly and took her away."
"But the problem is, the girl they're taking is actually our girl Becky."
"The video at that time is now going crazy on social media. It shows Becky running to the girls and the security guards catching her and pulling her away."
"Normany Cordy saw everything falling and was confused about what happened, but he continued to dance."
When Ellie Brooke realized what had happened, she went to save the "shower" killer and informed the guard that she was not a crazy fan rushing on stage
"After the incident, Becky g replied to one of her fans who asked her how she was. She said," my arm hurts a little, but they just do their work
"Look at the funny moments below and tell us what you think!"



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Weinstein, 66, has denied the allegations of nonconsensual sex and retaliation.”
““Thank you.”
“In PEOPLE’s exclusive sneak peek at Thursday’s one-hour installment, the actress packs up her belongings after she says she was forced to sell her house in order to fund her fight against Harvey Weinstein.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’m going to be okay, right?” she says tearfully.”
““I’m going on an adventure.”
“I will look at it that way.”
“Here’s to a new life, baby girl.”
“Goddamnit, I didn’t want to cry, I wanted to be all peppy.”“Bye, house,” she adds.”
“I love you.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”


"Weinstein, 66, denies the charges of non sensory sex and retaliation."
"Thank you."
"In a one hour interview with people magazine on Thursday, the actress said she was forced to sell her house and pack her things in order to fund her fight with Harvey Weinstein."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'll be fine, won't I? "She said with tears streaming down her face."
"I'm going to take risks."
"I'll see that."
"To a new life, baby."
"Damn it, I don't want to cry, I just want to be energetic." "Goodbye, house," she added
"I love you." Want to keep up with the latest news from people? "



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re both ready to get married, but we haven’t set a date because we want to make sure we’re not doing it for anyone but ourselves,” said Bushnell.”
“It’s hard.”Higgins, meanwhile, told PEOPLE he couldn’t apologize “for being honest or expressing what I thought was the best thing to express at the time.”“Don’t get us wrong.”
““It is with heavy hearts that we announce our decision to go our separate ways,” they tell PEOPLE in an exclusive statement.”
““We feel fortunate for the time we had together, and will remain friends with much love and respect for one another.”
“We wish nothing but the best for each other, and ask for your support and understanding at this time.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Nevertheless, the two did their best to overcome their issues together and Bushnell moved to Higgins’ hometown of Denver shortly after going public with their engagement following the season finale, which aired in March.”
“Of Higgins declaration of love to both women Bushnell told PEOPLE exclusively at the time that post filming was more of an emotional roller coaster than the actual show I fall more in love with Ben every day and it s hard to separate what happened long ago and my...”
“...current feelings she said...”
““It’s confusing.”
“It does wear on me.”“It hurts,” she added.”


"We're all ready to get married, but we haven't set a date yet because we want to make sure we do it not for others, but for ourselves," Bushnell said
At the same time, Higgins told people that he could not apologize for "being honest or expressing what I thought was the best expression at the time." don't get us wrong. "
"It is with a heavy heart that we announce our decision to go our separate ways," they told people in an exclusive statement
"We feel very lucky because of the time we spend together and will maintain love and respect between friends."
"We just want to have the best of each other, and we ask for your support and understanding at this time." Get push notification containing news, functions, etc
Nevertheless, Bushnell and Higgins did their best to overcome their conflicts. After the season 2 finale broadcast in March, Bushnell moved to Higgins' hometown Denver shortly after his public engagement
"On Higgins's declaration of love for two women, Bushnell exclusively told people magazine at that time that after shooting, it was more like an emotional roller coaster than a real show. I love Ben more every day, and it's hard to compare what happened a long time ago with my..."
“… What she said about the present feeling... "
"It's confusing."
"It's really on me." "It hurts," she added



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more information, including a list of the categories of third parties to whom we disclose your personal information, please refer to our California Privacy Policy or for additional options please check your browser's settings.”
“You can still use this website if you do not click "Accept" but your experience may be different.”
“By clicking "Accept" you understand that you are directing Allergan to disclose your personal information, including internet tracking data (like cookies and the IP address you used to access this website), to these third parties for the purposes stated above.”
“This website uses cookies and other technologies to personalize content and to show you more personalized ads (for example, Google Ads and Facebook) on other websites, as well as provide you with social media features on this website (such as, Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn).”


"For more information, including a list of third party categories to which we disclose your personal information, please refer to our california privacy policy, or check your browser settings for other options."
If you don't click accept, you can still use the site, but your experience may be different
By clicking "accept", you have instructed Allergan to disclose your personal information, including Internet tracking data (such as cookies and IP addresses used to access this website), to these third parties for the above purposes
"This site uses cookies and other technologies to personalize its content, display more personalized ads to you on other sites (for example, Google ads and Facebook), and provide you with social media features on this site (for example, Facebook, twitter, LinkedIn)."



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WINNER Kendrick Lamar Humble Logic Featuring Alessia Cara Khalid 1 800 273 8255 Contemporary instrumental album The Jerry Douglas Band What If Alex Han Spirit Julian Lage Chris Eldridge Mount Royal WINNER Jeff Lorber Fusion Prototype Antonio Sanchez Bad Hombre Dance electronic album Bonobo Migration WINNER Kraftwerk 3 D The...”
“Long Strange Trip WINNER Various Artists The Defiant Ones Various Artists Soundbreaking Various Artists Two Trains Runnin Music video Beck Up All Night Jain Makeba Jay Z The Story Of O J”
“The Man Feel It Still Zedd Alessia Cara Stay Country song Little Big Town Better Man Sam Hunt Body Like a Back Road WINNER Chris Stapleton Broken Halos Midland Drinkin Problem Miranda Lambert Tin Man Country solo performance Sam Hunt Body Like a Back Road Alison Krauss Losing You Miranda...”
“Justin Bieber, DespacitoImagine Dragons, ThunderWINNER: Portugal.”
“Michael Bublé Nobody But Me Deluxe Version Pop duo group performance The Chainsmokers and Coldplay Something Just Like This Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee feat...”
“Travis Scott Love Galore Pop vocal album Coldplay Kaleidoscope EP Lana Del Rey Lust for Life Imagine Dragons Evolve Kesha Rainbow Lady Gaga Joanne WINNER Ed Sheeran Divide Traditional pop vocal album Bob Dylan Triplicate Seth MacFarlane In Full Swing Sarah McLachlan Wonderland WINNER Various artists Tony Bennett Celebrates 90”
“Rihanna, LoyaltySZA feat.”
“Beyoncé, Family FeudWINNER: Kendrick Lamar feat.”
“Brent Faiyaz & Shy Glizzy, CrewJay-Z feat.”
“Cara Khalid Lil Uzi Vert Julia Michaels SZA Rap sung performance 6lack Prblms Goldlink feat...”


"Winner Kendrick Lamar's humble logic highlights alexia Kara Khalid 1 800 273 8255 contemporary Instrumental Album Jerry Douglas if Alex Han spirit Julian lager Chris Eldridge mountain Royal laureate Jeff lober fusion prototype Antonio Sanchez bad hombrey dance electronic album bonobo migration laureate kafwok 3 D.... "
"Long journey champion, all kinds of artists, all kinds of artists, all kinds of artists, all kinds of artists, all kinds of artists, all kinds of artists, two trains driving all night in the audio and video tapes, the story of Jain Makeba jay z o J"
"Men feel it's still Zedd Alessia Cara stay country song small town better man Sam hunt body like a back road champion Chris Stapleton break halo Midland drinking problem Miranda Lambert tin country solo performance Sam hunt body like a back road Allison Klaus lose you Miranda..."
"Justin Bieber, desperate dragon, thunder Champion: Portugal."
"Michael Bubler, no one but me has a luxury version of popular duet performing chain of fireworks and Coldplay, just like this one about Lewis fonsey's dad Yankee's feat..."
"Travis Scott love galore pop album Coldplay kaleidoscope EP Lana del Rey lost for life imagine dragons evolve Kesha rainbow Lady Gaga Joanne winner ed Sheeran divide traditional pop album Bob Dylan triplet Seth McFarlane full speed attack saramclaren Wonderland award winner various artists Tony Bennett celebrates 90"
"Rihanna, loyalty, it's a feat."
"Beyonce, housewife: Kendrick Lamar's feat."
"Brent fayyets & shy, glib, clumsy feat."
"Kara Khalid lil UZ and Julia Michaels szar's rap show the Golden Link feat..."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Hills: New Beginnings will come back to MTV in 2019, and Patridge is one of the many original stars set to return.”
“I’m in mom mode every day and trying to get through this.”Patridge will be returning to The Hills in 2019We’ll get to see Patridge return to the TV screen, as The Hills has officially been given a reboot.”
“Ryan enjoys his bachelor style life.”
““They were just having fun together.”
““Ryan considers her a friend first and foremost,” Us Weekly’s source noted.”
“They ‘live two different lives’Aside from working better as friends, their lives simply aren’t compatible enough for a relationship.”
“Even though they’re not together romantically anymore, they have hung out and spent time with each other,” the source confirmed.”
““They are really good friends first and foremost.”
“And as a source told Us Weekly, Patridge was the one to break things off with Cabrera.”
“Even though we are not in a romantic relationship right now, we will continue to be friends and are still in touch.”Apparently, by the time their split was confirmed on Sept. 24, 2018, the couple had already broken up a few weeks prior.”


“The  Hills:New Beginnings Will return to MTV in 2019, Patric is one of many original stars who will return to MTV. "
"I'm in mom mode every day, trying to get through it." Partridge will return to hills in 2019, and we will see partridge return to the TV screen because hills has officially restarted
"Ryan enjoys being single."
"They just play together."
"Ryan thinks she's a friend in the first place," a US weekly source said
"They" live two different lives. "Apart from working better as friends, their life is not suitable for a relationship at all."
"Although they were no longer romantically together, they spent time together," the source confirmed
"They are really good friends first of all."
"As one source told us weekly, Patric was the one who broke up with Cabrera."
"Although we are not in love yet, we will continue to be friends and keep in touch." Apparently, by September 24, 2018, news of their breakup had been confirmed, and the couple had broken up a few weeks ago



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““For practical reasons, I personally was very happy when Michael offered up solutions for my Justice League costume that made me the most comfortable in my work and in my body.””
“First designed by Lindy Hemming, directed by Patty Jenkins Second designed by Michael Wilkinson, directed by Zack Snyder.”
“...which hit theaters earlier this year...”
“Based off of images posted on director Zack Snyder’s Vero site, the Amazon warriors’ costumes in Justice League appear far more revealing than they were in director Patty Jenkins’ Wonder Woman.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““In case you wonder: Here’s a picture of how the Amazons looked in Wonder Woman…next to pic how they look in Justice League.”
“First designed by Lindy Hemming, second by Michael Wilkinson.”
“Some steps backwards, me thinks,” a fan tweeted (below).”
“Not long after the discovery fans created an uproar on social media noting that the costumes in Justice League designed by a man in a film directed by a man sexualized the female actors while in Wonder Woman directed by a woman with costumes designed by a woman did not...”
“...appear overtly sexual...”


"For practical reasons, I'm personally very happy when Michael offers a solution to my justice league costume, which makes me feel the most comfortable at work and physically."
"First Lindy Heming, directed by Patty Jenkins; second Michael Wilkinson, directed by Zach Snyder."
“… Earlier this year
"According to the pictures posted on the Vero website directed by Zach Snyder, the clothes of Amazon warrior in justice alliance look more exposed than those in wonder woman directed by Patty Jenkins."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"If you want to know: This is a picture of Amazon people in wonder woman Next to them is what they look like in alliance for justice. "
"The first was designed by Lindy Heming and the second by Michael Wilkinson."
"I feel a little bit regressive," one fan tweeted (below)
"Shortly after discovery, fans made a big stir on social media. They noticed that in a film directed by a man, the costume in justice alliance designed by a man sexualized the actress, while in wonder woman directed by a woman, the costume designed by a woman did not..."
“… Obviously sexy... "



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Family affair: She then squeezed between Goldie Hawn and her daughter Kate HudsonRubbing elbows: Dakota laughed with SAG winner Sam Rockwell...”
“The 24th Annual SAG Awards will air both on TNT and TBS at 8pm EST/ 5pm EST.”
“But Dakota Fanning looked every inch the movie star as she commanded attention on the red carpet of the 2018 SAG Awards in Los Angeles on Sunday.”
“The 23-year-old acting ingenue wore an elegant pink strapless gown for her entrance at The Shrine Auditorium.”
“Scroll down for video Pretty in pink Dakota Fanning 23 looked every inch the movie star as she commanded attention on the red carpet of the 2018 SAG Awards in Los Angeles on Sunday Daring to impress the War Of The World alum looked ravishing in the couture number that...”
“...flaunted her enviable figure...”
“The pink hued fabric had a ruched effect as the strapless number highlighted her delicate decolletage.”
“A beaded detail lined her waist and the top of her bodice as the train swept gracefully along the floor.”
“Her trademark blonde tresses were swept up in a dramatic bun allowing her youthful face to shine.”
“Graceful entrance The acting ingenue wore an elegant pink strapless gown for her entrance at The Shrine Auditorium Class act Daring to impress the War Of The World alum looked ravishing in the couture number that flaunted her enviable figure Surely it will be a night celebrating women as the...”


"Family: then she squeezed between Goldie horn and her daughter Kate Hudson, rubbing her elbows: Dakota and Major League Baseball champion Sam Rockwell laughed together..."
"The 24th sag annual awards ceremony will be broadcast on TNT and TBS at 8pm / 5pm est."
"But Dakota Fanning caught people's attention on the red carpet at the 2018 sag awards in Los Angeles on Sunday. She looks like a real movie star."
"The 23-year-old acting genius entered the Shrine Auditorium in an elegant pink Strapless robe."
"On the red carpet of the 2018 sag awards ceremony in Los Angeles last Sunday, fanning 23, a pink Dakota beauty, looked very attractive. She boldly moved the alum of the world war and looked very attractive on the fashion number..."
“… Show off her enviable figure... "
"The pink fabric has a wrinkle effect, because the strapless number highlights her delicate decoloration."
"As the train sped gracefully on the floor, the top of her waist and bra was covered with beads."
"Her signature blonde hair is curled into a striking bun to brighten her young face."
"Elegant entrance performance genius wears an elegant pink Strapless robe to enter the temple auditorium to perform in class. Alum, who dares to move the world war, looks charming on the fashion number and shows off her enviable figure. I'm sure it will be a celebration for women as..."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There are worse things to spend your money on than this adorable teen gay comedy whose worst quality is its boring straight man.”
“An unexpected chain of events including an elaborate manipulation of many other students attractions for each other it feels like a Shakespearean comedy of errors by way of The CW eventually forces Simon to come out against his will as he learns that honesty is the only way to earn...”
“Ben Rothstein Twentieth Century Fox rating 3 5 out of 4 stars Love Simon Directed by Greg Berlanti Written by Elizabeth Berger and Isaac Aptaker Starring Nick Robinson and Jennifer Garner Classification PG 109 minutes After a landmark year for LGBTQ films with specificity one in which Moonlight won best...”
“...picture at the Academy Awards and Call Me by Your Name Beach Rats and God s Own Country explored gay relationships in the Italian countryside the outskirts of Brooklyn and a sheep farming community in Yorkshire respectively wealthy white people in suburban America finally have an epic gay romance to...”
“...call their own...”
“Helmed by Greg Berlanti (the force behind The CW’s Riverdale and most importantly, the showrunner during the second season of Dawson’s Creek, which ushered in television’s first gay kiss), Love, Simon is a smart and genuine teen rom-com, made for the masses and the multiplexes.”
“Making history as the first gay film to be financed by a major studio (that’s 20th Century Fox), it proves that in 2018, you don’t have to be gay to love a gay love story.”
“The film centres on Simon Speirs (played by the comely, corn-fed Nick Robinson), a senior in high school with a doting family, a crew of close-knit friends, and one “huge-ass secret” – no one knows that he’s gay.”
“Simon is the chauffeur and confidante among his family and friends, navigating life with a knowing, Ferris Bueller-like serenity that perhaps college is the time for his coming out.”
“Story continues below advertisementHowever, he soon comes to a crossroads when he reads an anonymous confession by a fellow gay student on his school’s message board.”


"There's something worse than this cute teenage gay comedy that's going to cost you money, and the worst quality of this comedy is its boring straight guy."
"A series of unexpected events, including careful manipulation of many other students, attracted each other. This makes people feel like Shakespeare's wrong comedy. Through CW, Simon is forced to go against his will, because he knows that honesty is the only way to make money... "
"Ben Rothstein's twentieth century fox has selected 35 of the four stars" Simon ", directed by Greg Blandy, directed by Elizabeth Berg, starring Isaac aptak, Nick Robinson and Jennifer Garner. This is a milestone year in the history of LGBTQ films, 109 minutes after moonlight won the best picture Award..."
“… Imagine the scene at the Oscars, and then call me your name beach mouse and God's country explored homosexual relations in rural Italy, a sheep raising community in suburban Brooklyn and Yorkshire, and wealthy white people in suburban America finally had an epic homosexual romance... "
“… Call them their own... "
"Under the leadership of Greg Brandy (the power behind CW's Riverdale, and most importantly, the pacesetter in season 2 of Dawson Creek, which ushered in the first gay kiss on TV), love, Simon is a smart and real teenager, Rom com, produced for the masses and the society."
"Being the first gay film funded by a big studio (20th Century Fox) made history, proving that you don't have to be gay to fall in love with a gay love story in 2018."
"The protagonist of this movie is Simon spears, a high school student with a doting family, a group of close friends and a big ass secret - no one knows he's gay."
"Simon is the driver and confidant among his family and friends. He controls his life with a kind of erudite and Ferris Buller style tranquility. Maybe college is the time for him to come out."
"The story goes on under the advertisement. However, when he saw the anonymous confession of a gay classmate on the school message board, he soon came to the crossroads."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Decker has not commented publicly on her brother's seizure or accident.”
“"I had no idea what was happening.”
“James, 23, is a fitness enthusiast, and he was on his way to the gym after doing a UV sauna when he suffered what he believes was a seizure while driving.”
“James lost control of his car, causing it to roll.”
“The vehicle was completely destroyed, but James walked away from the crash.”
“"The only way I can describe it is that I was screaming in my own head but couldn't control my body," James tells E!.”
“"I remember thinking there was nothing I could do."”
“Country Stars Who Have Suffered Tragedy"I was conscious, but it was the smallest amount of consciousness I can describe," James continues.”
“One minute I felt super healthy and on top of the world and the next my car was totaled."”
“We all know we're gonna pass away one day, but I guarantee you if really lived like you could die any minute then you'd live a hell of a lot differently," he reflects.”


"Decker did not comment publicly on her brother's seizure or accident."
"I don't know what happened."
"James, 23, is a fitness enthusiast. After taking an ultraviolet sauna on his way to the gym, he developed what he thought was epilepsy while driving."
James lost control of the car and it rolled over
"The car was completely destroyed, but James escaped from the accident."
"The only way I can describe it is that I scream in my head, but I can't control my body," James told E
"I remember thinking there was nothing I could do."
"Tragic country star" I'm conscious, but it's the smallest consciousness I can describe, "James continued
"One minute I felt super healthy, at the top of the world, the next minute my car was completely destroyed."
"We all know that one day we will die, but I promise you that if you really live as if you could die at any time, then your life will be very different," he recalled



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Just so you're aware, I know you think I'm freaked out by engagement and everything but I'm hoping that that doesn't take that much longer," she added.”
“Touched, Burnham immediately offered her forgiveness and she and Luyendyk Jr. exchanged "I love yous."”
“It'll always be with you."”
“"And I feel terrible but I know my heart's with you.”
“"I made the wrong decision," he said.”
“...his ex...”
“After telling the 25 year old that he wanted a second chance he explained that he only proposed to Kufrin because he was making a safe decision for my future and assured Burnham that he was 1 000 percent over...”
“After Luyendyk Jr., 36, broke up with Kufrin, 27, he called Burnham, 25, to tell her what happened and then traveled to her home in Virginia to explain the situation in person.”
“The shocking twist comes after Luyendyk Jr. ended his engagement with Becca Kufrin to pursue a relationship with Burnham.”
“Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr. proposed to runner-up Lauren Burnham on Tuesday night's "After the Final Rose" special.”


"You know, I know you think I'm scared by engagement and other things, but I hope it won't take too long," she added
Burnham was moved and immediately forgave her. She exchanged "I love you" with little luyandike
"It's always with you."
"I'm sad, but I know my heart is with you."
"I made the wrong decision," he said
“… His predecessor... "
"After telling the 25-year-old that he wanted a second chance, he explained that he proposed to kuflynn because he made a safe decision for my future and assured Burnham that he was over 1000%..."
"After young luyandick, 36, broke up with kuflynn, 27, he called Burnham, 25, to tell her what had happened, and then went to her home in Virginia to explain the situation face to face."
"The shocking turn took place after young luyandick ended his engagement to Becca Coughlin and pursued a relationship with Burnham."
Ali luyandick, Jr., a bachelor, proposed to runner up Lauren Burnham on the "terminator of the roses" special on Tuesday night



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We Call It Family.””
“After all these years, I still have her best interests at heart,” Abraham continued.”
“Saying horrible things about your own child after I m the only one who has ever strived to overlook her demons she fights daily against this brings sadness to our family and I wish her all the best for the sake of my health safety I wish her all the...”
““I always wish my mother the best as I attended her wedding supporting her.”
“RELATED VIDEO Farrah Abraham Brands Teen Mom OG Costars Trash Moms in Twitter Rant Abraham said her therapists have come to the conclusion my mother is jealous of her...”
“I started therepy sic in my past at the age of 14 due to my mother and I not getting along as our family therapist sided with me about my safety and my life choices that my mother has never been supportive or caring to help guide her own children...”
““Clinically & honestly, none of my TV show therapists & personal therapist have all said I’m balanced.”
“Image zoom Farrah Abraham and her mother Debra DanielsenThe star admits she does have her struggles but denied suffering from what her mother suggested.”
“...she was sad to hear my own mother would say these untrue things about her own child It s evil and alarming...”
“Image zoom Debra Danielsen (second from left) at her wedding with friends and daughter and Farrah Abraham (far right).”


"We call it family."
"After all these years, I still have her best interests in mind," Abraham continued
"After I was the only one who tried to ignore the demons of her children, I said some terrible words about her children. She fought against these demons every day, which brought sorrow to our family. For my health and safety, I wish her all the best, I wish her all the best..."
"When I go to my mother's wedding and support her, I always wish her all the best."
"Related video Farrah Abraham brands teenage mom og starring garbage mom yells on twitter that Abraham says her therapist has come to the conclusion that my mom is jealous of her..."
"I started the therapy SiC when I was 14 years old, because my mother and I didn't get along well, because our family therapist was on my side, talking about my safety and my life choices, and my mother never supported or cared about her, helping to guide her own children..."
"Clinically, to be honest, neither my TV program therapist nor my personal therapist said I was balanced."
"The image of Abraham and her mother Debra danielsant" the star admits that she did struggle, but denies the pain her mother implied
“… She was sad to hear that my mother would say these untrue things to her own children, which is evil and worrying... "
"Zoom in and out Deborah Danielson (second from left) is at the wedding with friends and daughter and Farah Abraham (first from right)



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“I also have some ballet or almond-toe flats.”Conrad and Tell, who had their first date on Valentine’s Day in 2012, married in September 2014.”
“Lauren Conrad captured the most adorable photo of son Liam, 2 months, snoozing on Sunday, October 1.”
“In a pic The Hills alum, 31, shared on Instagram, the little boy is dressed in a navy and white striped outfit while under a matching navy and white nautical blanked as he takes a nap.”
““Sunday snuggles with this little guy?,” the proud mom captioned the heartwarming moment.”
“Conrad and her husband, Williams Tell, welcomed Liam, their first child together, on July 5.”
“The pair announced their exciting news via Instagram that same day.”
““He’s here!”
“We’re so excited to welcome Liam James Tell into the world!” the former MTV star wrote alongside a picture of a cross-stitch that depicted her growing family.”
“He's here!”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"I also have some ballet or almond flats." Conrad and tyle dated for the first time on Valentine's Day 2012 and got married in September 2014
On Sunday, October 1, Lauren Conrad took the cutest picture of his son Liam dozing off two months ago
In a photo shared on instagram, 31 year old hills alum was dressed in navy blue and white stripes, wearing a navy blue and white nautical blanket while taking a nap
"Cuddle up with this little guy on Sunday?" Proud mother inscribes for this warm moment
On July 5, Conrad and her husband Williams tell welcomed their first child Liam
"The two announced exciting news through instagram on the same day."
"Here he comes!"
"We are very happy to welcome Liam James tell to this world! "The former MTV star wrote next to a cross stitch photo depicting her growing up family."
"Here he comes!"



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pair welcomed their first child together, Kulture Kiari, in July.”
“I don’t know, it might take time to get a divorce and I’m going to always have a lot of love for him because he is my daughter’s father," Cardi concluded.”
“"It’s nobody fault I guess we just grew out of love, but we are not together anymore.”
“I Like It rapper shared...”
“We are really good friends and we are really good business partners you know he s always somebody that I run to to talk to and we got a lot of love for each other but things just haven t been working out between us for a long time the...”
“Cardi B revealed the news through a video on Instagram in December, in which she said they "grew out of love."”
“Rap's power couple called it quits after one year of marriage.”


In July this year, the two ushered in their first child, the cultural family
"I don't know, divorce may take time, and I will always love him because he is my daughter's father," Kadi concluded
"It's not anybody's fault. I think we grew up in love, but we're not together anymore."
"I love what rappers share..."
"We are really good friends, we are really good business partners, you know he has always been the person I am looking for, we have a lot of love for each other, but the matter between us has not been solved for a long time..."
"Katie B revealed this through a video on instagram last December, in which she said they" grew up in love. "
"Rap's strong couple broke up after a year of marriage."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It's unclear what was taken this time, or whether his burglar alarm was on.”
“You'll recall, Scott's house was broken into last year - almost to the day - while he was in Cannes.”
“An hour later, his house was hit.”
“Various people were posting pics and videos of Scott inside 1 Oak where he was celebrating his birthday.”
“It doesn't seem coincidental that Scott was at a well-publicized gig in Vegas, hundreds of miles from his Hidden Hills home.”
“As we reported ... Scott was celebrating his 34th birthday in Vegas.”
“Nobody was home at the time of the burglary.”
“Law enforcement sources tell TMZ burglars broke through a rear door of Scott's Hidden Hills home, and deputies responded around 1 AM.”
“Scott Disick is the latest celeb to get hit by burglars ... this time someone broke into his home in the wee hours of Sunday morning.”
“One neighbor tells us there was more car activity than usual at the house Saturday morning, but it was quiet from at least 11 PM until cops showed up.”


"It's not clear what was filmed this time, or whether his burglar alarm is on."
"You remember when Scott was in Cannes last year, his house was broken into - almost to this day."
"An hour later, his house was hit."
"A lot of people put up pictures and videos of Scott celebrating his birthday in an oak tree."
"It doesn't seem like a coincidence that Scott was in Vegas for a popular concert that was hundreds of miles from his home in Yinshan."
"As we reported... Scott is celebrating his 34th birthday in Vegas. "
"No one was at home when they were stealing."
"Law enforcement sources said TMZ thieves broke into the back door of Scott Yinshan's house and the police responded around 1 a.m."
"Scott Disick is the latest celebrity to be attacked by burglars... This time someone broke into his home in the early hours of Sunday morning. "
"A neighbor told us that there was more car activity at home on Saturday morning than usual, but it was quiet at least from 11 p.m. until the police showed up."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share Share Tweet EmailMy Labor Started With A Panic Attack...”
“"Kendra and Hank took the kids to Menchie’s in Calabasas on Sunday afternoon.”
“Two days after Wilkinson announced she and Baskett were going their separate ways, they are keeping true to their word and putting the kids first.”
“The soon-to-be exes were both spotted supporting each of their children at different sporting events over the weekend.”
“The reality TV star documented their family time together on her Instagram stories.”
“Both Baskett and Wilkinson cheered on 8-year-old son Hank IV while he was playing hockey.”
“They were both also present to watch their 3-year-old daughter Alijah play her very first soccer game.”
“As it turns out, Hank is the coach of the little girl's team, so he was in a lot of the Kendra on Top star's social media posts.”
“Via Kendra Wilkinson Instagram StoriesConsidering the couple had literally just announced they were ending their marriage, all eyes were on the family.”
“However, Wilkinson and Baskett put their differences aside in order to be there for their children.”


"My labor of sharing twitter started with panic attacks..."
"Kendra and Hank took the children to the Munch's in Calabasas on Sunday afternoon."
Two days after Wilkinson announced her separation from Basquet, they kept their promise to put children first
"Both would-be ex girlfriends were found supporting their children at different sports events on the weekend," he said
"The reality star recorded their family life on instagram."
"When his 8-year-old son hank IV played hockey, basset and Wilkinson cheered for him."
"The two of them also attended the first football match of their three-year-old daughter, aria
"It turns out that hank is the coach of the little girls team, so he often appears in Kendra on superstar's social media posts."
"Via Kendra Wilkinson instagram stories, considering that the couple just announced the end of their marriage, all eyes are focused on the family."
"However, Wilkinson and Basquet put their differences aside for the sake of their children."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He treats every single person alike on the set it, does not matter their job title… Yeah, he taught me everything,’ she gushed.”
“The crew actually does not get to go home to see their families.”
“Now, it looks like the actress is looking back at those years with the same fondness the fans do.”
“The star revealed that it was Clooney who taught her to respect everybody on set.”
“Margulies was in attendance at the American Film Institute’s Life Achievement Award Gala that honored Clooney earlier in the week, and while there, she shared with ET a story from the set of the medical drama.”
“She recalled Clooney shutting down a diva guests star.”
“‘I remember that it was a guest star who was … they were upset, and they were keeping all of us waiting while in their trailer.”
“And we were on set waiting and when they came on I was just watching, and George said, ‘You know, you keep all of us waiting.”
“So that is what that little tantrum was.’ And I was like, ‘Nice!’ never happened again.’The actress went on to praise her fellow actor, even more, talking about how ‘lucky’ she was to work with him.”
“He’s truly noble.”


"He treats everyone equally on the set, regardless of their title Yes, he taught me everything
"The crew can't actually go home to see their families."
"Now it seems that the actress is looking back on those years with the same love as her fans."
"The star revealed that it was Clooney who taught her to respect everyone on the set."
Earlier this week, Margulis attended the life achievement awards in honor of Clooney at the American Film Academy, where she told et a story from the medical drama
"She recalled that Clooney had shut down a heroine's film."
"I remember being a guest star They're not happy. They make us all wait in the trailer. "
"We were waiting on the set, and I just looked at them when they came, and George said," you know, you made us all wait. "
"That's the little temper." I said, "good! "It never happened again." The actress went on to praise her fellow actor and how "lucky" she was to work with him
"He's really noble."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It seems Dream is becoming a little fashionista in her own right, and clearly she and her mom are just having fun with accessories.”
“Others said, “Cute baby, but why the pink bow extensions… I hope this baby Ain’T gonna be like her mom… Ghetto fab.” Ouch!”
“And while many fans loved the tot’s pink clip-on pigtails, others said very hurtful things.”
“After putting fun pink-colored clip-on hair extensions on her 1-year-old daughter Dream Kardashian, Blac Chyna, 29, has faced some vicious mom-shaming — and it is not pretty!”
“Some even dragged Dream’s grandmother, Kris Jenner, 62, into the conversation, claiming Kris would not want the toddler wearing hair extensions at such a young age.”
“Chyna shared the adorable photo via Instagram on April 25, but has since removed it from her account.”
“Perhaps the negative comments were getting to be too much?”
“Click here to see other Kar-Jenners with pink hair.”
“The mom-of-two captioned the snapshot, “My beautiful baby girl,” yet she still received plenty of criticism from followers.”
““She’s not a toy… clip on bows??”


"It seems that dream itself has become a little fashionist. Obviously, she and her mother are just playing with accessories."
Others said, "lovely baby, but why does the pink bow extend I hope this child won't be like her mother The Jewish factory. " Ouch
"Although many fans like the little boy's Pink pigtail clip, some people said very hurtful things."
Blac Chyna, 29, faces some vicious mother humiliation after making a funny pink hair clip for her 1-year-old daughter dream Kardashian - it's not beautiful! "
"Some even drag dream's grandmother, Chris Jenner, 62, into the conversation, claiming that Chris doesn't want this toddler to have a wig at such a young age."
"Chyna shared this lovely photo through instagram on April 25, but later removed it from her account."
"Maybe there are too many negative comments?"
"Click here to see other pink hair Kar Jenners."
"The mother of two added the title 'my beautiful baby daughter' to this snapshot, but she was still criticized by many followers."
"She's not a toy It's on the bow



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...unit known as the Dora Milaje...”
“Close friends Gurira attended the event with her friend and date for the evening This Is Us star Susan Kelechi Watson who presented Gurira with the award along with gymnast Aly Raisman Dora Milaje Gurira played Okoye in Marvel s Black Panther the head of the all female special forces...”
“Gurira, 40, beat out her Black Panther co-star Chadwick Boseman, along with Avengers: Infinity War star Chris Hemsworth, Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom star Chris Pratt and Deadpool 2 star Ryan Reynolds for the award.”
“She also joined her female Avengers: Infinity War co-stars Scarlett Johansson and Pom Klementieff to accept the Action Movie award on Sunday.”
“Action Star: Danai Gurira accepts the People's Choice Award for Action Star of the Year, beating out four male action stars'Thank you so, so much for this, or, as we say in Wakanda, N'cos,' referencing the fictional African planet in her Marvel blockbuster Black Panther.”
“'I just have to really give love and appreciation to Mr. Ryan Coogler, the storyteller behind this and for giving me this role and entrusting women to be collaborators and to be front and center and to have space and to tell a story with him.'”
“'So, thank you, Mr. Coogler, you are an example to all,' Gurira said about the Black Panther writer-director.”
“Danai gives thanks Thank you so so much for this or as we say in Wakanda N cos referencing the fictional African planet in her Marvel blockbuster Black Panther And thank you of course to Marvel and Disney for giving it a platform and to the very beautiful gentlemen I”
“...share this category with...”
“I love you all,' she continued.”


“… The unit known as doramiraj... "
"My close friend Gula and her friends attended the event. Tonight's date is American star Susan kellich Watson. She and gymnast aly lesman Dora mirage Gula play okoye, the head of all female special forces team in the marvel cartoon Panther..."
"Gula, 40, won the award after beating her Panther partner, Chadwick Bosman, as well as nemesis: Infinite War Star Chris Hemsworth, Jurassic world: Fallen Kingdom star Chris Platt and dead pool 2 star Ryan Reynolds."
"She also joined her Avengers: Infinite War co stars Scarlett Johnson and Bohm clementif to receive Sunday's action film awards."
"Action star: Danai gurilla won the people's Choice Award for action star of the year, beating four male action stars." thank you very much, thank you very much, or, as we said in vacanda, New Mexico, "mentions the fictional African planet in her miracle blockbuster panther
"I really want to love and appreciate Mr. Ryan Kugler, who is the storyteller behind the scenes and has given me the role to make women partners, stand in the front, stand in the middle, and have space to tell stories with him."
"So, thank you, Mr. Kugler, you're a role model for everyone," gurila said of panther's screenwriter and director
"Danai, thank you very much. As we said in vacanda, she mentioned the fictional African planet in the marvel blockbuster panther. Of course, I also want to thank marvel and Disney for giving it a platform, and thank the very beautiful gentlemen around me."
“… With Share this category
"I love you," she continued



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...make ourselves look silly...”
“Hydraulics Megatron Gluten Emphysema Kevin Gonorrhea Amoxicillin Bebop Rocksteady The twins real rumored names Rumi and Sir are no where near as crazy as the names that Kimmel and company came up with but still pretty unique nonetheless...”
“Jimmy Kimmel decided to test this theory, taking to the streets of Los Angeles to have a little fun with innocent Beyoncé fans (and give them some fake info about her twins names).”
“But Jimmy Kimmel's fake Beyoncé twin names make a very important point — celebrity obsession has gotten a little out of hand.”
“Kimmel is known for his "lie witness news" segments on his late night talk show, Jimmy Kimmel Live!, tricking innocent bystanders on the streets into believing some ridiculous headlines.”
“His segment on Tuesday's night show was no different.”
“Instead of headlines, Kimmel got people to believe that Beyoncé and JAY-Z had named their kids some pretty fun names, making them congratulate the couple on the birth of their twins.”
“"This afternoon, we went out on the street and asked people to congratulate Beyoncé and JAY-Z on their recent arrival with some baby names we made up," Kimmel told the audience.”
“The results were pretty hilarious and definitely worth watching (and also a little embarrassing).”
“The full list of names that Kimmel s producers convinced bystanders to say aloud and congratulate Beyoncé and JAY Z for are pretty great Cucumber Uvula Denver Omelette Landline Retweet Bedbath Beyondcé Pantene Neosporin Zumba Zika Bong Blunt Coco Loco...”


“… Make us look stupid... "
"Hydraulic Megatron gluten emphysema Kevin gonorrhea amoxicillin bebop rockstable the real names of the twins, Rumi and Sir, are not as crazy as the names Kimmel and company came up with, but they are still very unique..."
"Jimmy Kimmel decided to test this theory and take to the streets of Los Angeles to have fun with innocent Beyonce fans (and give them fake information about her twin names)," he said
"But Jimmy Kimmel's fake Beyonce twin name illustrates a very important issue - the obsession with celebrities is getting a little out of hand."
Kimmel is famous for the segment of "lie witness news" on his late night talk show "Jimmy Kimmel live show"! To induce innocent bystanders on the street to believe some ridiculous headlines. "
"His footage on Tuesday night was no different," he said
"Kimmel made people believe that Beyonce and Jay-Z gave their children some interesting names instead of headlines, which led them to congratulate the couple on the birth of twins."
"This afternoon, we took to the streets and asked people to use some of our baby names to congratulate Beyonce and Jay-Z on their recent arrival," Kimmel told the audience
"It turned out to be quite funny and definitely worth seeing (and a bit embarrassing),"
"The producers of Kimmel s convinced onlookers to speak up and congratulate Beyonce and jay z for their complete list of great cucumbers uvula Denver omelet landline forwarding bedbath beyondc é Pantene neosporin Zumba Zika Bong blunt coco loco..."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Star Best Fandom and Cast on Social Media Best New 2017 2018 Show Most Anticipated New Show Saddest Cancellation and Best Series Finale...”
“Here s the full list of polls Best Comedy and Best Drama Best Drama Acting Best Comedy Acting Best Breakout Stars Best Couple and Sexiest Moment Best Reality Show and Star Best and Worst Shocker Best Fight and Musical Moment Saddest Death and Actor Exit Best Villain and Best Guest...”
“Others nominated include Charmed, Sharp Objects, Shadowhunters, Will & Grace, New Girl, Kerry Washington (Scandal), James Corden, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmel Kimmel and Michelle Wolf.”
“Pretty Little Liars: The Perfectionists is up for 'Most Anticipated Show' of 2018/2019.”
“Any show that aired between June 9 2017 and June 8 2018 is eligible.”
“News' TV Scoop Awards.”
“Shortlink to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday, June 29, 2018 7:37am ET by PresspartyVoting closes at 5pm PT today (June 29) for this year's E!”


"Star, best fan and social media, best new 2017, best 2018 show, most expected rookie, saddest cancellation and best series ending..."
"The following are the best comedy and the best drama, the best drama performance, the best comedy performance, the best breakthrough star, the best couple and the sexiest moment, the best reality show and the best and the worst shock star, the best battle and music moment, the saddest death and the actor's exit, the best villain and the best guest..."
"Other nominations include magician, sharp weapon, shadow hunter, will and grace, new girl, Kerry Washington (scandal), James scodon, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmy Kimmel and Michelle wolf."
"Beautiful little liar: perfectionists will participate in the 2018 / 2019" most anticipated show. "
"Any program broadcast between June 9, 2017 and June 8, 2018 is eligible."
"News TV exclusive Award"
"Short link to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday , June 29, 2018, 7:37 a.m. EDT press release ends today (June 29) at 5 p.m. this year's e! "



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My biggest focus is learning how to really, legitimately move on and do a lot more with my kids without Kourtney.””
“...water...”
“On Thursday, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star shared a heartwarming clip from the show of himself spending time with his son Reign, 2, and daughter Penelope, 5.”
“(Disick, 34, also shares son Mason, 7, with ex Kourtney Kardashian, though their eldest son doesn’t appear in the video.)”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the clip, the father of three carries Penelope around until Reign asks to be picked up.”
““Thank you, Dad,” Reign gushes as he settles into Disick’s arms.”
““No problem,” says Disick as his youngest son showers him with sweet kisses.”
““You’re a funny little guy, aren’t you?”“This is why I’m thankful today,” Disick captioned the post.”
““Happy thanksgiving 2 all!”


"My biggest concern is to learn how to really and legally move on and do more with my children without Courtney."
“… Water... "
"On Thursday, the" keep up with Kardashian "star shared a warm clip of his time with his two-year-old son, Ruijin, and his five-year-old daughter, Penelope."
"The 34 year old also shares a 7-year-old son, Mason, with former Kourtney Kardashian, but their eldest son is not in the video."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In this video, the father of three walks around with Penelope until Ruijin asks to pick him up."
"Thank you, Dad," Raven gushed, holding dick in his arms
"No problem," said desik, whose little son gave him a sweet kiss
"You're an interesting little fellow, aren't you?"? "That's why I'm grateful today," Disick wrote in the title of the post
"Happy Thanksgiving!"



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We feature a lot of wonderful, big brand names, but it’s more about her look and her style.”
“She’ll go from a sweater with a cotton blouse underneath to a fake fur, jeans, and some boots the next time we see her.”
“And Yara has a lot of input.”
“Hair and makeup make me look great and I give them a huge shout out because they make the outfits look as I’d like to call it “mo’ better”.”
“I’m extremely proud of our hard work.”
“When she was on black-ish, she had her other siblings that she was with, but we’re getting to see her blossom on her own in this show.”
“With Zoey, coming from her parents' home and going to college, we’re seeing her blossom in front of us.”
“The exciting part is that I’m unfolding these different layers of different characters.”
“It’s like dating.”
“Every week, you’re trying to develop your characters because every week you get that script that reveals them a little bit more.”


"We have a lot of great big brands, but it's more about her look and style."
"The next time we see her, she'll go from a sweater and a cotton shirt to a fake fur, jeans and a couple of boots."
"Yala has a lot of input, too."
"My hair and makeup make me look great, and I yell at them because they make clothes look like what I want to say," mo. "
"I'm very proud of our hard work."
"When she's in blackish, she has her other siblings, she's with, but we're going to see herself blossom on this show."
"Coming to college with Zoe from her parents' house, we saw her blooming in front of us."
"It's exciting that I'm showing different levels of these different characters."
"It's like a date."
"Every week, you're trying to develop your character, because every week you see more scripts."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...to cancer research.”
“Thanks @thebkoof!”
“And “The Bachelor” contestant Becca Kufrin had a pretty major one after what happened during Monday night's painful finale.”
“But thankfully, the reality TV star's fans did their best to help soothe her sorrows ... with plenty of money to stock up on sad day essentials.”
“Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr. shockingly ended his engagement to Kufrin in what was quite possibly the cringiest “Bachelor” finale of all time.”
“And there have been no shortage of cringey finales.”
“He then reconciled with runner-up contestant Lauren Burnham, a 25-year-old from Virginia.”
“Don't cry over him, Becca.”
“He's not worth it.”
“ABCBut Kufrin’s devoted fans managed to find her account on Venmo, an app that lets you send and receive money, to fund her recovery in the form of booze and pampering — with messages of love and support.”


“… Cancer research. "
"Thank you @ thebkoof!"
And "Bachelor" contestant Becca Coughlin had a big game in Monday night's painful ending
"But thankfully, fans of the reality TV star did their best to help her heal her grief... There's enough money for the necessities of a sad day. "
"Arie luyendyk Jr., the bachelor, has ended his engagement to kuflynn in a shocking way, which is probably the most despicable" Bachelor "ending ever."
"There is no lack of a daunting ending."
"Then he reconciled with runner up Lauren Burnham, 25, from Virginia."
"Don't cry for him, Becca."
"He's not worth it."
"Abcbut kufrin's loyal fans managed to find her account on venmo, an app that lets you send and receive money, supports her recovery in the form of alcoholism and connivance, and conveys messages of love and support."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Comment below!”
“What are some other tips on how to re-establish a love of yourself amid relationship issues?”
“When everything else isn’t going your way, the only person you can count on is yourself.”
“You are the only person who has been there since birth and through all your struggles.”
“Cupid’s Advice:The deepest love you can have is for yourself.”
“What are some ways to re-establish a love of yourself amid relationship issues?”
“This celebrity marriage may almost be over.”
“Always wrong.” She posted another Instagram story on Monday morning stating “I’m proud of myself,” and she was not sporting her wedding ring yet again.”
“Crazy.”
“D list celebrity.”


"The comments are as follows!"
"Any other suggestions on how to rebuild your love for yourself in interpersonal problems?"
"When everything else doesn't go your way, the only person you can rely on is yourself."
"You're the only one who's been there since birth, through all your struggles."
"Cupid's advice: the deepest love you can have is your own."
"What is the way to rebuild your love for yourself in interpersonal problems?"
"This celebrity marriage may be coming to an end."
"It's always wrong." On Monday morning, she posted another post on instagram, saying, "I'm proud of myself." she stopped showing off her wedding ring
"Crazy."
"List D celebrities."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The American Meme is written and directed by Bert Marcus, with producers Bert and Cassandra Thornton.”
“'The age of the digital influencer is going to crash,' John, who has 10.4 million followers on Instagram, says towards the ends of the trailer.”
“What a life: Paris opens the trailer with: ''I have over 50 million followers on all my social media platforms'Smooches: The American Meme trailer showed a glimpse of Paris the avatar as she blew a kiss to the cameraReady!”
“It's all part of an image and a brand and being a product,' via The Decider.”
“The reality star said during The American Meme: 'I'm a 21-year-old the past few decades.”
“Paris, who has 9.9 million followers on Instagram alone, opens the trailer with: ''I have over 50 million followers on all my social media platforms.'”
“The American Meme trailer showed a glimpse of Paris the avatar as she blew a kiss to the camera; she used a 3D scanner to create the avatar.”
“It felt like I've lost part of my soul and been talked about in such cruel and mean ways,' via The DeciderGuest appearances include Hailey Baldwin, Emily Ratajkowski and DJ Khaled.”
“The past: The reality star, 37, broke down in tears as she recalled how she felts after it was released: 'It was like being raped.”
“The documentary follows Paris as well as Instagram stars Josh Ostrovsky (@TheFatJewish), Brittany Furlan (@BrittanyFurlan) and KirillBichutsky (@thes**twhisperer).”


American meme is directed by Bert Marcus and produced by Bert and Cassandra Thornton
John, who has 10.4 million fans on instagram, said at the end of the trailer: "the age of digital influence is about to collapse."
"What a wonderful life: Paris wrote at the beginning of the trailer:" I have more than 50 million kissers on all social media platforms: the American meme trailer shows a glimpse of avatar Paris blowing kisses to photographers! "
"It's all part of an image and a brand, and it's also a product, 'through the decision maker'."
"In American meme, the reality star said: 'I've been 21 for the past few decades.'
"Paris, who has 9.9 million fans on instagram alone, wrote at the beginning of the trailer:" I have more than 50 million fans on all social media platforms. "
"The trailer for American meme shows Paris kissing in front of the camera; she created the avatar with a 3D scanner."
"I feel like I've lost a part of my soul, and I've been talked about in such a cruel and mean way," through deciderguides, guests include Haley Baldwin, Emily latajikovsky and DJ Khalid
"In the past: the 37 year old reality star was in tears as he recalled how he felt after the show:" it's like being raped. "
"The documentary follows Paris and instagram stars @ the fatjewish, @ Brittany Furlan and @ the * * twhisperer."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That is the gift of facing death,” she told PEOPLE in 2015, “that you say to yourself all I need is what I have right now.””
“(She also wrote a New York Times bestselling book about the experience, Better: How I Let Go of Control, Held on to Hope and Found Joy in My Darkest Hour.)”
“She’s now cancer-free and said the battle only brought her closer to husband Andrew Shue and her two daughters.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Amy Robach: ‘I Haven’t Felt This Good in Weeks’Robach memorably underwent her first mammogram on GMA in October 2013 — and learning she had Stage III breast cancer.”
““She has covered the biggest news events around the world, from the deadly terrorist attacks in Belgium and Manchester and the Pulse nightclub shooting to the poaching epidemic in Tanzania and the Olympic games in PyeongChang, Rio and Sochi.”
““Amy, as we know so well, is a brilliant journalist and a skilled interviewer,” ABC News president James Goldston said in a staff memo.”
“She’s filling the seat vacated by Elizabeth Vargas, who is leaving 20/20 for A+E Investigates.”
“Robach, 45, will still report on major news stories for GMA.”
“Signup for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”


"It's a gift in the face of death," she told people in 2015. "You tell yourself what I need is what I have now."
(she also wrote a best-selling book about the experience, better: how I give up control, hold on to hope, and find happiness in the darkest hours.)
"She's cancer free now, and she says the fight will only bring her closer to her husband Andrew Shu and her two daughters."
"Related video: Amy robach:" I haven't felt so good in weeks. " In October 2013, roebach received his first mammography on GMA and learned that he had stage III breast cancer
"She covered the world's most significant news events, from the deadly terrorist attacks in Belgium and Manchester, the shooting at the Pulse nightclub, to the poaching epidemic in Tanzania, and the Olympics in Pingchang, Rio and Sochi."
"As we all know, Amy is an excellent journalist and a skilled interviewer," James Goldston, President of ABC News, said in an employee memo
"She's filling Elizabeth Vargas's seat. She's leaving for a + e 20 / 20."
"Robach, 45, will still be reporting big news for GMA."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...airs its Season 5 finale this Friday at 9/8c.”
““By putting it in the summer, we’re going to be able to ‘super-serve’ the fan base that loves that show and hopefully give it an opportunity to continue on longer than we would if it was [scheduled] in-season.”Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D.”
“The show does incredibly well for us in delayed viewing,” Dungey explained.”
““What we’ve discovered is that we have a very loyal and passionate fan base for S.H.I.E.L.D.”
“...think of Season 6 as the last season In fact the summertime schedule could extend the show s life span...”
“As for speculation that Season 6 being S H I E L D s first ever shortened run will serve as the show s swan song Dungey told me I feel like Season 5 was their creatively strongest yet so I don t at the moment have any plans to...”
““Whatever they [at Marvel Studios] have planned, I cannot say,” she hedged.”
“— hits theaters next May.)”
“(Avengers 4 — the follow-up to Avengers: Infinity War, the end of which would seem to have significant implications for the characters on TV’s S.H.I.E.L.D.”
“Dungey told TVLine that the summertime scheduling was strictly ABC’s decision, and not necessarily out of deference to any of the larger Marvel Cinematic Universe’s plans.”


“… The season 5 finale will be broadcast on Friday at 9 / 8 degrees Celsius
"By putting it in the summer, we will be able to 'super service' the fan base, love the show and hope to give it a chance to continue than we do if it is [scheduled] in the season." S. Agent of h.i.e.l.d
"The show is very good at delaying viewing," dunkey explained
"We found that s.h.i.e.l.d. has a very loyal and enthusiastic fan base."
“… Think of season six as the last season. In fact, the summer schedule can extend the life of the show. "
"As for the speculation that season 6 is the first sprint in the history of s hi E L D and will be the best performance of the show, dunkey told me that I think season 5 is their most creative season, so I have no plans at present..."
"Whatever they (Marvel studio) planned, I couldn't say," she dodged
"- next May.)
"(Avenger 4 - Avenger's sequel: Infinite War, whose end seems to have a significant impact on the s.h.i.e.l.d. character on TV."
Dungee told tvline that the summer programming was entirely ABC's decision, not necessarily out of respect for any of the larger Marvel world projects



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Avoid feeding your dog puppy food longer than you have to.”
“Foods to AvoidTry to avoid foods that list corn or meat by-products as the first ingredient because meat should be the first ingredient.”
“Sometimes it is not possible to keep a puppy with the mother for the first eight weeks such as when the mother develops eclampsia or mastitis.”
“The mother’s milk provides the best nutrition and provides antibodies to help protect your puppy from disease.”
“It is especially important they nurse from the mother.”
“First 6 to 8 WeeksDuring the first six to eight weeks of life the puppy should stay with the mother and be allowed to nurse ad-lib.”
“This is a popular time of year for bringing home puppies so I’d like to take the opportunity to review basic puppy feeding guidelines for the first year of life while covering your question which may also answer any future questions you or other readers may have.”
“You want to do right by her and that includes making sure she is getting the correct amount of nutrition.”
“I understand the excitement and trepidation that comes with bringing home a furry ball of joy.”
“-Michele SolanoRead Dr. Kristy Conn’s Advice:Congratulations on your newest four-legged addition to your family.”


"Avoid feeding your dog more than you have to."
"Avoid eating food, try to avoid corn or meat by-products as the first ingredient of food, because meat should be the first ingredient."
"Sometimes it's not possible to bring a puppy with her in the first eight weeks, such as when her mother has eclampsia or mastitis."
"Breast milk provides the best nutrition and provides antibodies to help protect your puppy from disease."
"It's especially important that they get care from their mothers."
"The first six to eight weeks in the first six to eight weeks of life, puppies should stay with their mothers and be able to breastfeed at will."
"It's a hot time of the year to take your puppy home, so I'd like to take this opportunity to review the basic puppy feeding guidelines for the first year and answer your questions, which may also answer any future questions you or other readers may have."
"You want to do the right thing with her, which includes making sure she gets the right nutrition."
"I understand the excitement and fear of bringing home a hairy ball of joy."
"Dr. Michele Solano read Kristy Conn's advice: congratulations on your family's newest quadruped."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have been crying more than I ever have, but am still optimistic for what is next.””
“...and saddest times of my life My husband Andrew and I found out that we were unexpectedly pregnant only to find out hours later some tragic news...”
“I ve cried enough today I don t need to cry anymore Johnson uploaded the video Saturday morning and it s already been seen more than 100 000 times as of late Saturday afternoon In the caption she wrote The past 48 hours have been some of the happiest scariest...”
“It’s definitely no fun, guys … and having a doctor confirm that we miscarried doesn’t feel good,” Johnson said in the video.”
“It sucks.”
“Somehow, I lost the pregnancy already.”
“We just got back from the doctor and I’m no longer pregnant.”
““So, it’s been a roller coaster of a few days.”
“But then came the news no expectant mother ever wants to hear.After she experienced bleeding, Johnson went to the doctor’s office, where the doctor confirmed the “Dancing with the Stars” winner was miscarrying but that it’s not her fault.”
“I have no idea who you are, what you are, or what you’ll be like, but I’m pumped to meet you.” Johnson gives her husband a pair of Converse baby sneakers and tells him that she is pregnant before they give each other a big hug.”


"I cry more than ever, but I'm still optimistic about what's next."
“…… At the saddest time of my life, my husband Andrew and I found out that we had an unexpected pregnancy. A few hours later, we found a sad news... "
"I've cried enough today. I don't need to cry any more. Johnson uploaded this video on Saturday morning. As of late Saturday afternoon, this video has been seen more than 100000 times. Among the subtitles she wrote, the past 48 hours are the happiest and scariest..."
"It's not fun, guys It doesn't feel good to have the doctor confirm our abortion, "Johnson said in the video
"Terrible."
"Somehow, I'm pregnant."
"We just got back from the doctor. I'm not pregnant."
"Well, these days are like a roller coaster ride."
"But then came the news that no mother to be was willing to do so. After she experienced the bleeding, Johnson went to the doctor's office, the doctor confirmed that "dance with the stars" champion abortion, but it is not her fault
"I don't know who you are, what kind of person you are, or what kind of person you will be, but I'm glad to meet you." Johnson gave her husband a pair of converse baby sneakers, told him she was pregnant, and they gave each other a big hug



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Prince Harry and Meghan MarkleHarry and Meghan said their “I dos” in a fairytale ceremony in St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle.”
“I kind of like that photo.”
““My intention was solely to put a face to the people who think that sort of glancing commentary is necessary, helpful or funny.”
““Yesterday I posted a photo of a woman who did some casual body shaming of my wife and I in the airport,” he wrote.”
“...scene.”Image zoom Patrick J. Adams and Troian Bellisario | Credit: James Gourley/REX/ShutterstockOn Monday, Adams issued an apology and explained his actions after fans called him out for bullying the woman.”
““And ….”
““She laughs and falls asleep,” he continued.”
“‘Well, you’re just so….chunky.’ ”In response to her comment, Adams took an unflattering photo of the woman sleeping in the chair next to him.”
“What do you think is wrong with it?’ She pauses.”
“‘Really.”


At a fairy tale ceremony at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, Harry and Megan said "I do."
"I kind of like that picture."
"My intention is just to give face to those who think such comments are necessary, useful or interesting."
"Yesterday I posted a picture of a woman doing some casual physical humiliation to my wife and me at the airport," he wrote
“… The scene. " Photo zooming Patrick J. Adams and Troy pelisario | source: James Gurley / Rex / shutterstock on Monday, Adams issued an apology and explained his behavior as fans called him out to bully the woman
"And..."
"She fell asleep laughing," he continued
"Well, you are Short and fat "In response to her comments, Adams took an unpleasant picture of the woman sleeping in the chair next to him."
"What do you think is the problem? "She pauses."
"Really."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That’s Wayward.“Watch a trailer for the episode airing this Thursday, then hit the comments with your hopes for the offshoot.”
““There’s a saying in Supernatural: ‘Family doesn’t end with blood,’ and that’s the show,” Ramdeen says.”
“On Thursday, the Wayward Sisters backdoor pilot makes its debut (The CW, 8/7c), and the female-led offshoot’s timing couldn’t be more, well, timely.”
““Now is the time that television and movies are discovering that a lot of women want to have their stories told by women, [and] they want to have their voices heard,” Briana Buckmaster, who plays Jody’s friend/ally Sheriff Donna Hanscum, says.”
“This is an opportunity that Supernatural and The CW is giving to all of us as a viewership and a fandom Her Wayward co star Katherine Ramdeen aka Jody s surrogate daughter Alex Jones echoes the sentiment Starting off 2018 with this powerful show with six powerful strong female leads...”
“...is exactly what the world needs right now...”
“I think people are going to love it.”The sisterhood — which also includes hunter Claire Novak (Kathryn Newton), psychic Patience (Clark Backo) and dreamwalker Kaia (Yadira Guevara-Prip) — is brought together by a rescue mission after Dean and Sam go missing.”
“(Quick refresher: They got transported to The Bad Place, unbeknownst to Jody & Co.) Like many of the Wayward characters, Alex “owes the boys her life,” Ramdeen notes.”
““I think she thinks of them as uncles.”
“So she wants to help in any way she can.”But the episode is not about propping up Dean and Sam.”


"That's too headstrong." Watch a trailer that's on Thursday, and then add your hopes for the branch in the comments
"There's a saying in supernatural:" families don't end up in blood. "That's the show," says ramdean
"On Thursday, wayward sister backdoor pilots made their debut (CW, 8 / 7C), and the time for female led branches can't be more, um, timely."
"It's time for television and movies to find that a lot of women want women to tell their stories, [and] they want their voices heard," said Briana buckmaster, who plays Donna hanscum, Jody's friend / ally sheriff
"It's an opportunity for supernatural and CW to give all of us as an audience and fan, and her wayward co star Katherine ramdeen, also known as Jody's acting daughter Alex Jones, echoes the mood of starting this powerful 2018 show with six powerful actresses..."
“… That's what the world needs right now... "
"I think people will like it." After Dean and Sam disappear, the sisterhood - including Hunter Claire Novak (Catherine Newton), psychic patience (Clark Barker) and sleepwalker Kaya (yadila Guevara pryp) - is called together by a rescue team
(quick review: they were sent to a bad place, and Jody knew nothing about it.) Like many wayward characters, Alex "owes his children a life," Ramsay
"I think she thinks they're uncles."
"So she wanted to help as much as she could." But this episode is not about supporting Dean and Sam



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more information and advice on eating disorders, visit BEAT.”
“If you are experiencing problems, you can find help from suicide prevention charity SAVE.”
“The singer – who won the first season of American Idol in 2002 – recently spoke to Attitude about the “dark time” in her early career, saying: “When I was really skinny, I wanted to kill myself.”
“I was miserable, like inside and out, for four years of my life.”
“But no one cared, because aesthetically you make sense.”“It was a very dark time for me,” Clarkson added.”
““I thought the only way out was quitting.”
“I like wrecked my knees and my feet because all I would do is put in headphones and run.”
“I was at the gym all the time.”AdvertisementClarkson went on to say that she realised things needed to change around the release of her third album ‘My December’ in 2007.”
““There’s a song on ‘My December’ called Sober.”
“There’s this line ‘picked the weeds but kept the flowers’ and I just live my life by that because you are who you surround yourself with,” she said.”


"For more information and advice on eating disorders, visit beat."
"If you have a problem, you can turn to the suicide prevention charity save for help."
The singer, who won the first season of American Idol in 2002, recently talked about the "dark ages" of her early career. "When I was really thin, I wanted to commit suicide," she said
"For four years, I've had a lot of pain in my heart and in my heart."
"But no one cares, because aesthetically, you have a point." "It was a very dark time for me," Clarkson added
"I think the only way out is to resign."
"I like knee and foot injuries because I only run with headphones on."
"I've been in the gym all the time." Clarkson went on to say that before and after her third album, my December, was released in 2007, she realized that things needed to change
"My December has a song called sober."
"There's a line that says," pick the weeds and leave the flowers. "That's how I live, because you're the one around you," she said



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rumours of tensions between Kate and Meghan have plagued the royal family for the past few months, as insiders have claimed they are "very different people".”
“Nevertheless, the move will inevitably fuel further speculation about a rift between the two couples.”
“It would now be unusual, according to the royal insider, for the couple not to stay with the Queen.”
“But their marriage changed everything.”
“Inviting Meghan to the festivities was already a break in convention, so Anmer Hall offered the "perfect solution".”
“Royal protocol dictates it is inappropriate for unmarried couples to stay in the main house - which is apparently why the couple would have been forbidden from sleeping there, rather than because of any particular issue.”
“(Image: AFP/Getty Images)A source suggested to the Mail on Sunday the Sussexes stayed at Anmer Hall last year because at that point they hadn't tied the knot.”
“And it turns out, there may be a reason the couple weren't allowed to stay with the Queen at her Norfolk estate last year - and it's all down to royal protocol.”
“The couple won't be staying at William and Kate's nearby Anmer Hall this Christmas, unlike last year when the 'Fab Four' spent festivities together at the Georgian country home.”
“Now it's been reported the Duke and Duchess of Sussex will be staying at the Queen's Sandringham estate this Christmas - where they'll be "packed like sardines" among the monarch's nearest and dearest.”


Rumors of tension between Kate and Megan have plagued the royal family over the past few months as insiders called them "totally different people."
"Nevertheless, this move will inevitably lead to further speculation about the rift between the couple."
"According to Royal insiders, it's unusual for the couple not to live with the queen now."
"But their marriage changed everything."
Inviting Megan to the celebrations has broken the rules, so the hammer room offers the "perfect solution"
"Royal etiquette says that unmarried couples are not fit to live in the main house - that's obviously why the couple are forbidden to sleep there, not because of any particular problem."
"(picture: AFP / Getty Images) a source advised the daily mail on Sunday that the Sussex couple stayed in the hall last year because they were not married at that time."
"It turns out that there may be a reason why the couple were not allowed to live with the queen at Norfolk last year - it all depends on Royal etiquette."
"This Christmas, the couple won't live in the hammer hall near William and Kate, unlike last year's fabour, which celebrated together at their home in rural Georgia."
"Now there are reports that Duke and Duchess of Sussex will be living in Queen Sanderlin Hamm this Christmas, where they will be crowding the king's closest beloved, like sardine."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Martinez adamantly denied the claims, saying she was "horrified and saddened" by them and that "she never said no to what we chose to do together."”
“...oral sex on her and used a sex toy without her consent...”
“On Monday Dec 4 Heller posted a lengthy tweet in which she described a night during which she repeatedly said no to advances from her best friend Martinez claiming she kept the secret for years and alleging that Martinez performed...”
“...up way and the public really loves them and most probably wouldn t believe me Martinez tried to contact her 20 minutes later after the two hadn t spoke in more than a year...”
“In an interview with Newsweek Heller claims that after she tweeted last month asking what if I have my own story of abuse but I m scared to ruin the persons life and I still love them in a fucked...”
“Former Dresses singer Timothy Heller says that a month before she accused former The Voice star Melanie Martinez of rape, Martinez attempted to get in touch with her after a long period of silence.”


"Martinez firmly denied these claims, saying she was" shocked and sad "by them," and that she never said no to what we chose to do together. "
“… Oral sex with her, using sex toys without her permission... "
"On Monday, December 4, Heller posted a long tweet, in which she described a night in which she repeatedly refused to marry her good friend Martinez, claiming that she had kept secret for many years and accused Martinez of acting..."
“…… Along the way, the public really liked them and probably wouldn't believe me. Martinez tried to contact her 20 minutes after they hadn't spoken for more than a year... "
"In an interview with NEWSWEEK, Heller claimed that she tweeted last month asking what to do if I have my own experience of abuse, but I'm afraid to ruin the lives of these people, and I still love them in a damned..."
Former fashion singer Timothy Heller said that a month before she accused former singer Melanie Martinez of rape, Martinez tried to contact her after a long silence



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the most important life lesson of all.”
“When She Mastered Smizing Before Learning to Form a Proper Sentencea.k.a.”
“Kourtney Kardashian and Scott Disick s only daughter hits a milestone today and while we re already expecting the pint sized cutie to spend her day playing with cousin North West we re also reminiscing about how far Penelope has...”
“...come since making her debut on Keeping Up with the Kardashians...”
“Not only is the 4-year-old stylish, but she’s also the epitome of cool.”
“In honor of the toddler’s big day, we rounded up all the times Princess P made us feel inferior – because, after all, it’s Penelope’s world and we all just live in it.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When She Flawlessly Posed for a Photo Without Actually PosingShe makes it look easy.”
“When She Took Home the Prize for ‘Who Wore it Best?’Oh, you know, NBD.”
“When She Made Channeling a Mermaid Look EffortlessHardly a competition.”


“…… The most important lesson in life. "
"She learned to smile before she learned to form a proper sentence."
"The only daughter of Courtney Kardashian and Scott Disick has ushered in a milestone today. Although we have been looking forward to this pint sized cute girl playing with her cousin in the Northwest for a day, we are also recalling how far Penelope is..."
“… Since she first boarded Kardashian... "
"At the age of 4, she is not only fashionable, but also the epitome of cool."
"To commemorate the happy day of this toddler, we always surround the time when Princess P makes us feel inferior - because after all, this is Penelope's world, and we all live in this world."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When she posed flawlessly for a picture, she looked relaxed."
"When she brought home the" who wears the best "prize? "Oh, you know, NBD."
"When she thought of the psychic mermaid as a game."



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Article continues below advertisement Source: E!”
“Though, some may be wondering how every person on the show can afford an A-list plastic surgeon, rest assured, they aren’t paying the full bill.”
“The show follows two top-notch plastic surgeons in California, Dr. Terry Dubrow, 60, and Dr. Paul Nassif, 56, who help people who have had past surgeries gone wrong.”
“Article continues below advertisementEach patient on the show has an emotional explanation as to why they need their previous work fixed.”
“These personal stories will range from multiple surgeries gone wrong in the past to getting operations done by untrained professions to going overseas to cut costs on pricey American procedures.”
“This reality show has seen it all.”
“The doctors are usually willing to take on these high risk patients many of whom have been turned away by other doctors due to the extent of the cosmetic damages but most fans still wonder if Botched pays for the extensive surgery or if the patient has to cover the...”
“...expense...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: E!”
“So, do Botched patients pay for the surgery?”


The article continues the following advertising sources: e! "
"However, some people may want to know how everyone can afford a first-class plastic surgeon. Don't worry, they don't pay the full cost."
"The show was conducted with the help of two of California's top plastic surgeons, Dr. Terry dubro, 60, and Dr. Paul nasif, 56, who helped people who had undergone surgery."
"The article continues with the following advertising program, each patient has a perceptual explanation of why they need to repair their previous work."
"These personal experiences will go from making mistakes many times in the past, to having untrained professionals perform operations, to going abroad to cut costs for expensive operations in the United States."
"This reality show has seen everything."
"Doctors are usually willing to accept these high-risk patients, many of whom are turned away by other doctors because of the extent of cosmetic damage, but most fans still doubt whether they are clumsy in paying for extensive surgery, or whether the patients have to pay..."
“… Fees... "
"The article continues with the following advertising source: e!"
"So, will bad patients pay for the operation?"



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Did this scene actually end up being more expensive than if you’d just gone with a generic prison?”
“Thank you for clarifying.”
“I think [the OITNB scene] was just half a joke pitch and half we felt we could somehow save money, and that turned out not to be true.”
“We didn’t want to blow up Gretchen or any of the people around her, so we knew she was going to jail.”
“ROBERT CARLOCK: Well, once we went down that road with that story, which we wanted to tell, we knew that Gretchen either had to go to jail or get blown up.”
“Who pitched in the writers’ room?”
“ENTERTAINMENT WEEKLY: Where did the idea for this crossover come from?”
“Read on below to find out more about this fun aside!”
“...not a line from the scene was an intentional nod to another Netflix series...”
“We thought it was funny to suggest we lived in the same universe Kimmy Schmidt co creator Robert Carlock told EW when we hopped on the phone with him for a quick chat about how this crossover came to be what input OITNB creator Jenji Kohan had and whether or...”


"Is this really more expensive than when you just went to an ordinary prison?"
"Thank you for your clarification."
"I think [oitnb live] is only half a joke, half we think we can save money in some way, and it turns out that's not the case."
"We didn't want to blow up Gretchen or anyone around her, so we knew she was going to jail."
Robert Crocker: Well, once we go that way with this story, we know that Gretchen is going to either go to jail or be blown up
"Who pitches in the writers' room?"
Entertainment Weekly: where did the idea of this crossover come from? "
"Please continue to read the following to learn more about this interesting story!"
“…… Not a single line on the scene was intended to nod to another Netflix series.... "
"When we talked on the phone with Robert Carlock, CO creator of Kimmy Schmidt, about how this crossover became the input of oitnb creator jenji kohan, he told e-week that we thought it was very interesting. He said that we live in the same universe, and whether it's true or not



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let's just hope he doesn't break any more hearts in the process of healing his own this time.”
“At this point, who knows what direction the Weeknd's heart is pointed towards, but if his latest music is any indication, he's still in a pretty raw emotional state.”
“Onlookers watched as the two wandered through the VIP area, and at one point the pair were seen hugging, with Jeffries resting her head on his shoulder.”
“This time, he was seen with his arm around Justin Bieber's ex Chantel Jeffries, reports TMZ.”
“What's even more confusing is that on day two of the festival, Abel was spotted strolling side-by-side with yet another girl.”
“Some think that Abel and Hadid's afterparty PDA debunks the theory that his sorrowful performance earlier that night was due to his breakup with Selena Gomez, but we can't say for sure.”
“They were definitely super affectionate, cuddling each other while hanging out with their friends."”
“Bella looked really happy.”
“"They spent the whole night together and left together.”
“The pair apparently weren't concerned about privacy, as the source said the singer and supermodel spent the whole night together at the party.”


"I hope he won't be sad in the process of self-healing this time."
"At this point, who knows where the weekend's heart is going, but if there is any sign of his latest music, he is still in a rather primitive emotional state."
"Onlookers watched the two strolling in the VIP area, and once they saw them embracing, Jeffries resting his head on his shoulder."
This time, he was seen hugging Justin Bieber's ex girlfriend Chantel Jefferies, TMZ reported
"What's more puzzling is that on the second day of the festival, Abel was found walking side by side with another girl."
"Some people think that Abel and Hadid's" the trail party "debunk his sad performance earlier that night because of his theory of breaking up with Selena Gomez, but we can't be sure."
"They are absolutely super intimate, hugging each other when they are playing with their friends."
"Bella looks happy."
"They've been together all night and gone together."
"The two obviously don't care about privacy because the source said the singer and the supermodel spent the whole night together at the party."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Rousey is new to the sport, her mixed martial arts background makes her fun to watch in the ring, potentially creating an exciting battle at the next big PPV.”
“"She's one of a kind, so there definitely has to be an alternation to my regimen and I'm looking forward to it."”
“"I've never been in a ring with somebody like Ronda," Jax said.”
“While she has already successfully defended her title, she knows Rousey represents a different challenge.”
“Jax is the current Raw women's champion, beating Alexa Bliss for the belt at WrestleMania.”
“However, the upcoming battle will not only represent her start of competing in the women's division, it will give her a chance at a title.”
“Rousey made her in-ring debut for WWE at WrestleMania 34 as part of a tag team match alongside Kurt Angle, taking on Triple H and Stephanie McMahon.”
“The upcoming pay-per-view is set for Sunday, June 17, in Chicago.”
“"I happily oblige respectfully, so I can sit next to her."”
“Online.”


"Although Lucy is a novice in the sport, her mixed martial arts background makes it interesting for her to watch the match in the ring, and it is possible to create an exciting battle on the next big PPV."
"She is unique, so there must be a substitute for my regimen. I'm looking forward to it."
"I've never dealt with people like Ronda," Jakes said
"Although she has successfully defended the title, she knows that Lucy represents a different challenge."
"Jakes is the current original women's champion, beating Aleksa bliss in wrestling to win the belt."
"However, the coming battle will not only represent her in the women's group, but also give her the chance to win the championship."
"Lucy made her debut for WWE at wrestling field 34, where she joined Kurt angel in a tag team game against three h and Stephanie McMahon."
"The upcoming pay per view is scheduled for Sunday, June 17, in Chicago."
"I'll gladly and respectfully promise so that I can sit next to her."
"Online."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Each season would feature a brand new cast.”
“As previously reported, the project follows a group of friends as their lives intersect through five events.”
“Hulu also confirmed Wednesday that it has officially picked up Four Weddings and a Funeral, a series adaptation of the 1994 romantic comedy exec produced by Mindy Kaling and Matt Warburton.”
“In making the announcement, the streamer noted that last week’s Season 2 premiere earned double the viewership of last year’s Season 1 opener.”
“One week after the the Emmy-winning, dystopian drama launched its second season, Hulu has renewed the Elisabeth Moss-fronted series for a third season.”
“I’m sorry, Aunt Lydia, but The Handmaid’s Tale will continue — not that there was any doubt.”


"Every season has a new cast."
"As mentioned earlier, the project focuses on a group of friends because their lives intersect through five events."
Hulu also confirmed on Wednesday that it has officially held four weddings and a funeral, in the 1994 romantic comedy "exec" series adapted by Mindy Kaling and Matt Warburton
"In announcing the news, streamer pointed out that the second season premiere last week had twice the audience rating as the first season premiere last year."
"One week after the Emmy winner's second season of anti Utopian TV series, Hulu will launch the third season of TV series series starring Elizabeth moss."
"I'm sorry, aunt Lydia, but the maid story will go on - there's no doubt about that."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Why can’t people accept the fact that these two people simply want to stay married to one another and let them live their lives?””
“Capisce.”“What’s the matter with two women sitting together and shooting the breeze,” Teresa continued.”
“Following fan speculation that the Real Housewives of New Jersey star, 45, was planning to split from husband Joe Giudice after she posted an Instagram photo with a divorce attorney, Teresa clarified that she was simply at dinner with a friend.”
“As previously reported, Teresa posted a photo to Instagram on Saturday, January 6, posing with New Jersey attorney Loren La Forge-Kyriakoulis.”
“The reality star originally captioned the photo Dinner with a great friend getting great advice before quickly changing it to Dinner with a great friend lots of laughs with the hashtag webothlovefood During Teresa s Wednesday January 10 appearance with sister in law Melissa Gorga on Watch What Happens Live...”
“With Andy Cohen a fan called in to ask Teresa if the photo indicated she and Joe were on the rocks which Teresa vehemently denied...”
““I was helping her.”
“Just in case – If anybody’s getting divorced, she’s a great divorce attorney to call,” she explained.”
““Get it?”
“I was helping her.”Gorga, 38, chimed in, “Oh, you’re saying you were publicizing her,” to which Teresa said, “Yes!”


"Why can't people accept the fact that these two people just want to stay married and let them live their own lives?"
"Kapis." "Two women sitting together chatting. What's the matter?" Teresa continued
"Fans speculated that the 45 year old New Jersey star's real housewife was planning to break up with her husband, Joe Judith, after taking a picture with a divorce lawyer on instagram. Theresa clarified that she was just having dinner with a friend."
"As mentioned earlier, Theresa posted a photo on instagram on January 6 (Saturday) with New Jersey attorney Loren Lafarge kiriakulis."
"The original title of the reality show star was a picture of dinner with a good friend, which was well advised. Then it was quickly changed to dinner with a good friend. Theresa made a lot of laughter with the label webothlovefood while watching what happened with her sister-in-law Melissa Gorga on Wednesday, January 10..."
"With Andy Cohen, a fan called to ask Theresa if the photo showed her and Joe on the rock. Theresa firmly denied that..."
"I'm helping her."
"Just in case - if someone wants a divorce, she's a good divorce lawyer," she explained
"Do you understand?"
"I'm helping her." Gorga, 38, echoed, "Oh, you mean you're promoting her," Teresa replied, "yes!"



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/nc4w9HdTLC — Shaun Cassidy (@shaunpcassidy) November 22, 2017(ANI)”
“Now, I will carry him, along with all of the funny/sad/extraordinary days we shared, none more filled with love than these last few at his side.”
“But I never could.”
“I always tried to catch him.”
“During the battle, he would regale me with hysterical stories of our father, often culminating in his taking a giant leap off my top bunk... — Shaun Cassidy (@shaunpcassidy) November 22, 2017...I tried to catch him of course.”
“When I was a little boy and my big brother would come to visit, the first call of business would be a punishing pillow fight.”
“"Now, I will carry him, along with all of the funny/sad/extraordinary days we shared, none more filled with love than these last few at his side," Shaun signed off with a comforting note.”
“But I never could."”
“"I tried to catch him of course.”


“... pic.twitter.com/nc4w9HdTLC -Sean Cassidy (@ shanpcassidy) November 22, 2017 (ANI) "
"Now, I'm going to take him with me, with all the fun / sad / extraordinary days we've spent together. There's nothing more loving than the last few days around him."
"But I can never do it."
"I always wanted to catch him."
"In battle, he would please me with our father's hysterical stories, and often climax by taking a big step down my bunk... -Sean Cassidy (@ shanpcassidy) November 22, 2017 I want to catch him, of course
"When I was a little boy, my big brother would come to see me. The first business call was a punitive pillow fight."
"Now, I'm going to take him with me, with all the fun / sad / extraordinary days we spent together. There's nothing more loving than the last few days around him," Sean concluded with a note of comfort
"But I can never do it."
"Of course I want to catch him."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[13][14]East High SchoolNotable alumni [ edit ]References [ edit ]Coordinates:”
“About 100 students at the time were homeless.”
“It serves grades nine through twelve in general and special education.”
“East High School was founded in 1913[4] and currently has an enrolled student body of around 1,900.”
“It is located at 840 South 1300 East in the East Bench neighborhood.”
“The original building was completed in 1913, and the current structure was built in 1997.”
“[4]Most of the Disney Channel film High School Musical was filmed at East High School.”
“The opening scenes of its first sequel High School Musical 2 (including the film's opening number, "What Time Is It?")”
“...were also filmed at East High.”
“Additional filming took place in St. George.”


[13] [14] East High School [Edit] reference [Edit] coordinates:
"About 100 students were homeless at the time."
"It serves the ninth to twelfth grades of general and special education."
"East high school was founded in 1913 [4], and now there are about 1900 students on campus."
"It is located at 840 East, 1300 south of dongbandeng community."
The original building was completed in 1913. The present one was built in 1997
"[4] most of the Disney Channel movie high school musical was shot in East high school."
"The prologue of the first sequel" High School Musical 2 "(including the prologue of the movie," what time is it now? ")"
“…… Also shooting in East high school. "
"Extra filming in St. George."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Within moments, the final members of Team Adam took to the stage with their coach to sing "Hey Jude" by The Beatles.”
“Christina, we love you."”
“During Tuesday's live episode of the "The Voice," host Carson Daly made a special announcement about the former contestant who died in June 2016 after being gunned down at a concert in Orlando, Florida.”
“"As you know, family is very, very important to us here at 'The Voice' and last year we tragically lost one of our own, the incredibly talented and beautiful Christina Grimmie," he explained.”
“Tonight in memory of our good friend and along with Christina s family we re honored to help announce the creation of the Christina Grimmie Foundation benefiting those impacted by gun violence and families just like her own affected by...”
“...breast cancer...”
“The cameras then passed to Grimmie's family, who were in the audience for the special announcement.”
“"Thank you for letting us be a part of this very important moment," Daly continued.”
“"And Christina, we feel your spirit here at 'The Voice' every single day and we love and miss you dearly."”
“Musicians Performing Live on StageLevine, who had Grimmie on his team during season six, later appeared on stage where he had a personal message for the late singer's family.”


After a while, the last member of the Adam team and the coach went on stage to sing "Hey Jude" by the Beatles
"Christina, we love you."
"On Tuesday's live show the voice, host Carson Daly specifically announced the death of the former player who was shot at a concert in Orlando, Florida in June 2016."
"You know, family is very, very important to the voice, and last year we unfortunately lost one of our very talented and beautiful Christina grimy," he explained
"Tonight, in honor of our good friends and Christina's family, we are honored to announce the establishment of the Christina grimy foundation, which will benefit those affected by gun violence and those who are just like her The families affected. "
“… Breast cancer... "
"The camera was then passed to grimy's family, who were the audience of the special announcement."
"Thank you for getting us involved in this very important moment," Daly continued
"And Christina, we feel your spirit in the voice every day. We love you very much and miss you very much."
"The musicians who performed live on stage, in season 6, grimy joined his team, and later he appeared on stage to convey a personal message to the family of the late singer."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But of all of the stars involved, "Stranger Things" actress Brown was actually the most excited to yell out her portion, even though the song was dropped eight years before she was born.”
“Kidman chose to recite her portion with a sultry reading as she seductively looks into the camera, while Franco couldn't keep a straight face as he attempted to spell it out in a New Jersey accent.”
“I want a, I want a, I want a" bunch of A-list actors to dramatically read “Wannabe” by the Spice Girls for the song's 21st anniversary on Friday.”
“"Yo, I'll tell you what I want, what I really, really want.”


"But of all the stars involved, Brown is actually the most excited to shout her share, even though the song was canceled eight years before she was born."
"Kidman recites her part in a sultry reading. She looks at the camera seductively, but Franco can't keep a straight face because he's trying to spell it with a New Jersey accent."
"I want one, I want one, I want one." a group of A-rated actors read Spice Girls' wannabe dramatically on Friday's 21st anniversary of songs
"Oh, I'll tell you what I want. I really, really want."



**Something goes wrong**
“So Marley puts the blanket in the stroller, and she goes around the house with it.”
“"We put together our fun new fancy stroller, and it's up in the house.”
“I'm just gonna bite my teeth, grin and bear it, and Dad will be there feeding me ice chips.”
“There's not much I can do.”
“"I feel like I'm as ready as I'm gonna be.”
“Not much, just a little bit," she said.”
“And for some reason, I kind of forgot about that, and now I'm remembering all of that, so there's just a little bit of anxiety.”
“"My daughter was 31 hours in labor, like full pain, back labor, the whole nine.”
“However, she wasn't so sure if she was ready to have the experience of going into labor again.”
“Eva previously opened up to The Daily Dish about her pregnancy in March, exclaiming that she was "super, duper excited" to welcome her baby boy.”


"So Marley put the blanket in the pram, and she went around the house with the blanket."
"We put the fun new pram together and it's in the house."
"I will gnash my teeth and bear it with a smile. My father will feed me borneol there."
"There's nothing I can do."
"I feel like I'm ready."
"Not much, just a little bit," she said
"For some reason, I forgot. Now I remember it, so I'm a little anxious."
"My daughter was in labor for 31 hours, like general pain, back pain, nine hours."
"However, she's not sure if she's ready to give birth again."
EVA, who announced her pregnancy on the daily show in March, exclaimed that she was "super excited" to welcome her baby boy



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Anyone.”
“There was one person who appears to have read Perry’s lyrics as shots fired and that was Ruby Rose, Orange Is the New Black star, DJ, and a friend of Taylor Swift’s.”
“...incident that prompted Perry to post the following tweet...”
“And that s not to any one person and don t quote me that it is because it s not It bears mentioning that Perry tapped Nicki Minaj as a collaborator who had a public disagreement with Swift on Twitter following the MTV Video Music Awards nominations in 2015 an...”
““One thing to note is: You can’t mistake kindness for weakness and don’t come for me.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"Anyone."
"There's one person who seems to have read Perry's lyrics at the time of the gunshot, and that's Ruby Rose, orange is a black star, DJ, and Taylor Swift's friend."
“… The event that prompted Perry to post the following tweet... "
"It's not for anyone, and don't quote me, because it's not worth mentioning that Nicki Minaj, who was in a public disagreement with swift on twitter after Perry's nomination for the 2015 MTV Music Video Award, is a collaborator, he is a..."
"One thing to note: you can't mistake kindness for weakness, and don't come to me."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From what I know of her, he seems like exactly a good person for her.'”
“(She also added a heart emoji and a cloud emoji.)”
“The 24-year-old singer and 24-year-old Saturday Night Live star have recently shared several videos and photos of their time together on social media, including some that had guest star appearances from THAT ring.”
“On Friday, Davidson posted a photo showing his and her hands and feet intertwined, with a big engagement ring on display.”
“Scroll down for video Engaged Ariana Grande 24 and her 24 year old Saturday Night Live star lover Pete Davidson shared several videos and photos from their fun day together on Friday Massive rock Pete shared a snap of the couple s hands and wrote how great his life is...”
“...now...”
“Ariana was quick to comment.”
“'So much better,' she wrote'U know what you'd dream it be like?'”
“...the comedian wrote.”
“'It's better than that.'”


"As far as I know, he is a good man to her."
"(she also added a heart emoticon and a cloud emoticon.)
"The 24-year-old singer and 24-year-old Saturday night live star recently shared several videos and photos of them together on social media, some of which were guest stars on the ring."
"Last Friday, Davidson posted a picture of him and her hand and foot intertwined and showing a big engagement ring."
"Scroll down to watch the engagement video Ariana Grande 24 and her 24-year-old Saturday night Star lover Pete Davidson shared several videos and photos from their happy time together on Friday. Pete shared a snapshot of the couple's hands and wrote down how wonderful his life was..."
“… Now... "
"Ariana was quick to comment."
"Much better," she wrote, "do you know what your dream is?"
“…… The comedian wrote
"Much better than that."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
““Not ‘just’ ‘cause I love my boys, but I'll have another boy, and I don't know if I'm ready for five.”Source: GettyDo you think Megan and Brian should try for a girl?”
“Article continues below advertisement“I'm worried that if I try I'll just get another boy,” he said.”
“I really want a girl.” Brian has a fourth son, 15-year-old Kassius, from a previous relationship.”
“So, that would kind of be awesome,” he said before admitting, “I want a girl.”
“I have four boys now, a fifth is a basketball team.”
““I don’t know.”
“Article continues below advertisementMegan’s post came after Brian’s interview with Dax Holt on Hollywood Pipeline’s Facebook Live, where he spoke about whether he and Megan were open to having more children.”
“Source: GettyBlazers and ear piercings on men were all the rage back in 1992, so Brian was definitely one of the hottest heartthrobs around.”
“#mcm #colonymission,” Megan captioned this throwback pic of her man.”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"It's not just because I love my children, I'll have another boy, and I don't know if I'm ready for five." Source: Getty, do you think Megan and Brian should try to find a girl? "
The article continued in the following ad: "I'm worried that if I try, I'll only get another boy," he said
"I really want a girl." Brian has a 15-year-old son, casius, who is an ex boyfriend
"That would be great," he said before admitting, "I want a girl."
"I have four boys now, and a fifth of them are basketball teams."
"I don't know."
"This article continues with an interview with daxholt on Facebook live in Hollywood channel, where he talks about whether he and Megan are willing to have more children, before following Megan's post
Source: as early as 1992, gaitibs and ear holes on men were very popular, so Brian was definitely one of the most popular people
Megan added a caption to this retrospective photo of her man: "the Cognates of MCM."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Magro's Jersey Shore co-stars did not immediately issue public statements.”
“Magro and Harley have a volatile relationship, with Magro's Jersey Star costars urging him to leave the relationship last season.”
“Both stars posted photos to social media, urging fans to click links in their bios to reveal their news.”
“The Celebuzz!”
“...story they shared hinted that they might be engaged, in addition to supposedly expecting their second child together.”
“"It's all smiles for Ronnie Ortiz-Magro and Jen Harley this holiday season.”
“The mother-of-two has exclusively released pictures of her adorable baby bump to Celebuzz!"”
“...the celebrity news site announced.”
“"Another baby would be a huge step for the Las Vegas residents, but it looks like the couple is finally taking the leap together!”
“Just a few weeks ago, Jen was seen rocking a big diamond on her finger…yes, that finger."”


"Magro's Jersey coast co stars did not immediately make a public statement."
"The relationship between Magro and Harley is not stable, and last season Magro's star partner in Jersey urged him to leave the relationship
"Both stars posted photos on social media, urging fans to click on the links in the BIOS to publish their news."
"My God
“…… The stories they share suggest that they may be engaged and that they are said to have a second child together. "
"On this holiday, Ronnie Ortiz Magro and Jan Halley laughed."
"This mother of two posted photos of her lovely baby to celebuzz!"
Celebrity news website announced
"It's a huge step forward for the residents of Las Vegas to have another child, but it looks like the couple are finally together!"
"Just a few weeks ago, someone saw Jane shaking a big diamond on her finger Yes, that finger. "



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett Getty ImagesThe Suits cast held a dinner in London last night and shared pictures of the joyous occasion on Instagram.”
“Markle has starred in the USA drama for seven years as paralegal-turned-lawyer Rachel Zane, and departed in the season seven finale which aired last month.”
“Patrick J Adams, who played Markle's on-screen love interest Mike Ross and departed the show along with her, was in attendance with his wife Troian Bellisario.”
“Sarah Rafferty Getty ImagesThe rest of the show's main cast also arrived: Sarah Rafferty, who plays Donna Paulson; Gabriel Macht, who plays Harvey Specter, Gina Torres, who plays Jessica Pearson; Rick Hoffman, who plays Louis Litt, and Abigail Spencer who plays Dana 'Scottie' Scott.”
“Gina Torres Getty Images"We were with each other longer than we went to college or high school with our friends, so we became family in a way," Rafferty said during a Today appearance.”
“"We're still family, so this is a wonderful family affair."”
“It was also confirmed during that appearance that the cast knew about Markle's relationship with Harry before the public did.”
“"We knew she was excited and there was reason to keep it close to the vest," Torres said.”
“This morning, Adams also posted a pretty hilarious Insta in which he seemed to finally realize Markle was actually marrying Harry.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett Getty had a dinner in London last night and shared photos of this happy moment on instagram."
Marcel has been a paralegal Rachel Zane for seven years and left in the season 7 finale broadcast last month
"Patrick J. Adams played Mark's comedy Mike Ross on screen and left the show with her when he and his wife, troian Bellisario, were present."
"Sarah Rafferty Getty Images" the other leading actors of the show are also here: Sarah Rafferty as Donna Paulson, Gabriel Macht as Harvey specter and Jessica Pearson Gina Torres of Pearson and RI of Louis litt
"We spend more time together than we do in college or high school with friends, so we've become a family to some extent," Lafferty said on today
"We're still a family, so it's a wonderful family event."
"During that appearance, it also confirmed that the crew knew about the relationship between Marcel and Harry before the public."
"We know she's excited and there's a reason to put it next to the vest," Torres said
"This morning, Adams also released a very funny insta, he seems to finally realize that markel is really going to marry Harry."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We are all madly in love and overwhelmingly happy with our little arrival.” He’ll be effortlessly crooning to some Girls Aloud classics by next week, we’re sure.”
“...own Instagram Although he still doesn t have a name he is already stealing hearts...”
“I m incredibly happy to welcome our new baby boy into the world it s a moment that I will never forget for the rest of my life and my favourite memory I have so far Cole added on her...”
““My close friends and family know there are very few times when I’m left speechless … wow!” he wrote on Instagram.”
“One Direction’s Liam Payne has announced that his girlfriend, singer Cheryl Cole (of Girls Aloud and X Factor judging fame), has given birth to their first child, an unnamed baby boy, earlier this week.”
“This baby is going to win The X Factor soooooo hard.”


"We're all madly in love and we're very happy to be here." We are sure that by next week, he will have no trouble singing classic songs to some girls
“… He has instagram. Although he doesn't have a name yet, he's already cheating... "
"I'm very happy to welcome our new baby boy to this world. It's a moment I'll never forget and my favorite memory of Cole so far..."
"As my close friends and family know, I'm rarely speechless WOW! "He wrote on instagram."
"Liam Payne of one direction announced that his girlfriend and singer Cheryl Cole gave birth to their first child, an unnamed baby boy, earlier this week."
"The child will work hard to win the X factor."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There was no judgment from Day one, which is huge, because that’s very hard to find for someone in my position.””
“My jet is 30 minutes late!’ I could speak to her about anything; we ended up spending a bit of time together and realized that there was something more there.”McIlory added: “I love that she knows everything about me, and there was no judgment there.”
““I found it refreshing being with someone who was living a normal life rather than, ‘Oh!”
““We met when she was working for the PGA of America and renting a condo in Palm Beach,” he told the newspaper.”
“In an interview with Irish Sunday Independent, the golf champ explained that the two hit it off as friends before becoming a couple.”
“McIlroy proposed to the American beauty in December 2015 after less than a year of dating.”
“Both Sheeran and Wonder are said to have performed throughout the evening.”
“Multiple outlets report that the Irish athlete, 27, and the publicist exchanged vows before several noteworthy guests, including Ed Sheeran, 50 Shades of Grey star Jamie Dornan, Coldplay’s Chris Martin, and singer Stevie Wonder.”
“The star-studded ceremony took place at Ashford Castle in Co. Mayo, Ireland, according to E News.”
“Professional golfer Rory McIlroy took a break from the green to marry his fiancee, Erica Stoll, on Saturday, April 22.”


"There's no judgment from the first day, it's huge, because it's hard to find for people like me."
"My plane is 30 minutes late! "I could talk to her about anything; we finally spent a little time together and realized there was more to come." "I like that she knows everything about me, there's no judgment," McNally added
"I find that it's better to be with someone who's living a normal life than to say," Oh! "
"We met when she worked for the PGA and rented an apartment in Palm Beach," he told the newspaper
"In an interview with the Irish Sunday Independent, the golf champion explained that they got along well as friends before they became lovers."
"After less than a year of dating, McRoy proposed to this American beauty in December 2015."
"It's said that Sheeran and Wande are performing all night."
According to various media reports, the 27 year old Irish athlete and public relations staff exchanged vows in front of several famous guests, including ED Sheeran, 50 degree gray star Jamie Donan, Coldplay's Chris Martin and singer stevie wonder
According to e-news, the star gathering ceremony was held at Ashford castle in Mayo, Ireland
On Saturday, April 22, pro golfer Rory McRoy took a break from the green to marry his fiancee Erica Stoll



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And while it may seem like they had celebrity parties, they weren’t yet “celebrities” at that point.”
“According to Seacrest, Ackles was just one of his five roommates.”
“Ackles had a vague recollection of the ice, but Seacrest seemed to have a greater-than-average memory of how the night unfolded.”
“One of Seacrest’s best memories of the party in question included a place called George E. Wong, which had the very best pellet ice for parties.”
“As it turns out, that’s actually Tatyana Ali.”
“...looks like she s giving the pair side eye but because she looks so familiar...”
“Since they look like fresh faced teens we can t ignore the frosted tips we have to believe Ackles when he said it was a long time ago Image zoom Credit ABC Kelly Ripa was as curious about the girl in the back as we were not just because it...”
“The news was shared on LIVE With Kelly and Ryan, along with a photo of the roommates at a party.”
“We’ve got a lot of questions.”
“Or drop each other off at casting calls?”


"Although it seems that they have celebrity parties, they were not celebrities at that time."
"According to Seacrest, Akers is just one of his five roommates."
Akers has a vague memory of the ice, but Seacrest seems to have a deeper memory of the development of the night than most people
"One of Seacrest's best memories of the party was a place called George E. Wong, where there was the best granular ice for the party."
"It turns out that it was actually Tatyana Ali."
“… It looks like she's looking sideways, but because she looks familiar... "
"Because they look like young people with new faces, we can't ignore these frosting tips. We have to believe that Akers said that this is the image zooming of a long time ago. ABC Kelly Ripa is a curious girl behind, because we're not just because of it..."
"The news was shared with Kelly and Ryan on the spot, along with a picture of a roommate at the party."
"We have a lot of problems."
"Or drop the opponent off the pitch?"



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In June 2014, Nori was photographed during her parents’ wedding sitting on her father’s laps.”
“Paris in May 2014 and though she enjoyed it she looked a bit tired with the day of shopping...”
“I can’t believe you are 4 already.”
“Kim wrote on her app:“Happy birthday to my mini me!”
“Social media wishes to North WestMother Kim Kardashian and her family resorted to the social media to express their wishes and love to the birthday girl North West as she turned 4 this year.”
“There were food stands providing lemonade, snow cones, funnel cake, churros, and cotton candy.”
“It was put up in Kourtney Kardashian’s house backyard and also had a bounce house with lots of delicious treats.”
“In this Kidchella party, there was a Ferris wheel, face-painting as well as a stage for lip-syncing.”
“It was inspired by California’s Coachella music festival.”
“Recalling Nori’s first birthday party bashKim Kardashian and Kanye West were newlyweds during their daughter’s first birthday party.”


"In June 2014, nori was photographed sitting on her father's lap at her parents' wedding."
"In Paris in May 2014, although she enjoyed it, she looked a little tired on the day of shopping..."
"I can't believe you're four years old."
Kim wrote on her app: "Happy Birthday to my mini!"
"Best wishes for Northwest mother Kim Kardashian and her family expressed their best wishes and love to northwest, a 4-year-old girl, through social media."
There are food stalls selling lemonade, ice cream cone, funnel cake, sausage and marshmallow
"It's in Courtney Kardashian's backyard, and there's a bouncing house with lots of good food in it."
"At kidchella's party, there are Ferris wheels, face painting and a stage for lip synching."
"It's inspired by the cochella festival in California."
"Recalling nori's first birthday party, bashkin Kardashian and Kanye West got married at their daughter's first birthday party."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The former reality star has stayed silent about her split on social media, her previous Instagram post a serene vacation photo dating back to four days ago.”
“In 2011, a season of her own reality TV series, Audrina, aired on VH1.”
“Since her stint on The Hills, Patridge has done some acting and appeared on Dancing with the Stars.”
“The couple dated on and off for years before their engagement in 2015, welcoming daughter Kirra Max in June 2016 and marrying in October.”
“The former Hills star filed for divorce from Bohan this week and obtained a domestic violence restraining order against him, according to People and the Los Angeles Times.”
“Maeve McDermottUSA TODAYAfter just 10 months of marriage, Audrina Patridge is splitting with her husband Corey Bohan.”


"The former reality star has been silent about her breakup on social media, and a quiet holiday photo she posted on instagram goes back four days."
"In 2011, her own reality TV series" Audrey "was broadcast on VH1."
"Since working in the mountains, partridge has done some performances and appeared in dance with the stars."
"The couple dated intermittently for several years before their engagement in 2015, and their daughter, Cora max, was born in June 2016 and married in October."
According to people and the Los Angeles Times, the former hills star filed for divorce from Bohan this week and received a domestic violence restraining order against him
"Medvedemotusa is only 10 months married today, and audienne partridge is breaking up with her husband, Corey Bohan."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Judging by his dedication and his tenacious team, we have no doubt that he'll pull it off!”
“— and the dad of two said he's been humbled by the positive feedback.”
“Jonathan Chambers“They brought lumber, scrap wood, exterior paint; it was a community effort,” Chambers said, mentioning that it added up to about $2,000 in supplies.”
“Chambers' daugther Haley (center) preps and paints one of the Diagon Alley displays with her friends.”
“He was pleasantly surprised when more than 30 people showed up, half of them children.”
“...dummaloop/InstagramChambers then posted messages on social media seeking help from friends and neighbors to build some of the more labor-intensive parts.”
“Chambers created his very own Golden Snitch with a 3-D printer.”
“Dummaloop / Jonathan ChambersAs an experienced woodworker, he invested $3,000 of his own money to get the project going and used a 3-D printer to create detailed finishes, including lanterns, Quaffle balls and an impressive Golden Snitch.”
“Chambers had illustrators draw animal cages for the Magical Menagerie.”
“Jonathan ChambersOn the other side, he replicated the Magical Menagerie, Madam Malkin’s Robes for All Occasions and Eeylops Owl Emporium.”


"Judging from his dedication and tenacious team, we have no doubt that he will succeed!"
"The father of two said he was humbled by the positive feedback."
"Jonathan Chambers" they brought wood, scrap wood, exterior paint; it's a community effort, "Chambers said, referring to the total supply of about $2000
"Chambers' daughter Haley (middle) and her friends prepared and painted an exhibition in Diagon Alley."
"When more than 30 people showed up, he was very surprised, half of them were children."
“…… Dummaloop / instagram chambers then posted a message on social media, asking friends and neighbors to help build some labor-intensive parts. "
"Chambers created his own snitch with a 3D printer."
As an experienced carpenter, he himself invested $3000 to get the project going and made detailed decorations with a three-dimensional printer, including lanterns, quaff balls and an impressive snitch
"Chambers asked illustrators to draw animal cages for the magic zoo."
"Jonathan chambers is on the other side. He has copied the magic zoo, Mrs. Malkin's robes for all occasions and the elops owl mall."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“One of the sources on set questioned Dick's sobriety and claimed that he appeared and acted as if he were intoxicated.”
“They can just say no, and they probably did and then I was done."”
“"I do understand that the temperature in the world right now is delicate."”
“(Also well-documented is his history of exposing his genitals in public and onstage.)”
“I don't expose myself anymore," Dick said by telephone.”
“"I don't grope people anymore.”
“However, he followed up with a denial that he ever groped anyone on set.”
“At first, the actor made light of the situation, joking that "my middle name is ‘misconduct.’ They know what they signed up for."”
“Dick said he's aware of his reputation.”
“Loud House creator Chris Savino and the list of accused sexual harassers goes on and now includes Kevin Spacey and director James Toback...”


"A source on the set questioned Dick's soberness, claiming that he appeared and acted as if he was drunk."
"They can say no, they may say, and then I'm done."
"I know the temperature of the world is very delicate now."
"His history of exposing his genitals in public and on stage is also well documented."
"I'll never expose myself again," Dick said on the phone
"I don't touch people anymore."
"However, he later denied that he had touched anyone on the set."
"At the beginning, the actors played it down and joked," my middle name is "misconduct." they knew what they wanted to sign up for. "
"Dick said he knew his reputation."
"The list of Creator Chris Savino and alleged molesters of the house of noise continues, and now includes Kevin Spacey and director James Toback..."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A pair of transparent Yeezy pumps provided the dramatic final touch—heels worthy of a woman used to making power moves.”
“The oversize jacket offset the curve-hugging bodysuit, and the cargo pants pulled everything together for a fresh take on business casual.”
“On anyone else the combination might not have worked, but Kardashian West tailored each piece to her petite frame for maximum effect while playing with proportions.”
“Out for dinner last night in Hollywood after heading to the polls, Kardashian West wore an unexpected suit consisting of a cream blazer, asymmetrical neon bodysuit, and white cargo pants complete with drawstrings at the waist and ankles.”
“The latest to offer an elevated take on the look is Kim Kardashian West, a reality star who has made a habit of fearlessly test-driving new trends.”
“A favorite of suburban dads everywhere, the divisive trousers are hard to pull off, though that doesn’t stop celebrities from trying.”
“Cargo pants get a bad rap.”


"A pair of transparent yeezy high heels provides a dramatic last touch of high heels, which is worth a woman used to power action."
"The oversized jacket offsets the curve of the tights, while the cargo pants bring everything together to add freshness to business and leisure."
"In other people, this combination may not work, but Kardashian West has tailored each piece to her petite body to achieve maximum effect while giving full play to proportion."
After voting, Kardashian West wore an unexpected suit for dinner in Hollywood last night, including a cream suit, asymmetrical neon tights and white pants with drawstrings around the waist and ankles
"One of the most impressive new models is reality TV star Kim Kardashian West, who has developed the habit of fearlessly driving new trends."
"Suburban dad's favorites are all over the place, and it's hard to take off these divergent pants, although it doesn't stop celebrities from trying."
"Pants have a bad reputation."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s gonna be so good.””
““I wanted it to be something you can mix together and use different ways,” she said.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star, 37, shared a sneak peek of her soon-to-be-released line of shimmery highlighters and lip glosses on Instagram Monday, posing in nothing but metallic gold glitter with an equally dramatic silver tinted ponytail.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kardashian West’s upcoming collection is called Ultralight Beams, which is perhaps an homage to husband Kanye West‘s 2016 single by the same name featuring Chance The Rapper and Kirk Franklin from his The Life of Pablo album.”
““Ultralight Beams highlighters & glosses launching Dec 1st on KKWBEAUTY.COM,” she captioned the teaser.”
“On Wednesday, Kardashian West posted a nude, behind-the-scenes selfie of her body covered in glitter.”
““I named my product[s] after his song,” Kardashian told Refinery29.”
““Because I heard it and I was like, ‘Oh shit — someone needs to name a highlighter Ultra Light Beam,’ and so I did.”Looking for more style content?”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”


"It's going to be great."
"I want it to be something that can be mixed together and used in different ways," she said
"The 37 year old Kardashian star" Star "shared her upcoming series of sparkling fluorescent pens and lipsticks on Instagram on Monday, and what she did was nothing but metallic glittering and silver colored ponytail.
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Kardashian West's upcoming series, ultralight beams, may be a tribute to her husband Kanye West's 2016 single of the same name, featuring Kirk Franklin from chance and his album the life of Pablo Franklin）
"Super beam, fluorescent lamp and light shield launched on December 1" KKWBEAUTY.COM Website "she added a title to the teaser."
"On Wednesday, Kardashian West released a nude photo of her with all her body shining."
"I named my product after his song," Kardashian told refinery29
"Because I heard that, and I thought," Oh, shit, somebody needs to name a superluminal beam. "So I did."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He probably needs a lil break from me tho.”RELATED VIDEO: Amy Schumer Buys $2,000 Mattress for Store Employee Who Let Her Use the Bathroom...”
““Two couples find themselves in a marital free-fall matched in velocity and peril only by the smoldering space rocks tearing through the sky,” reads the production notes.”
“Are in...”
“Amy Schumer just got the most important review of her Broadway career.”
“Schumer is set to make her Broadway debut in Steve Martin’s new comedy, Meteor Shower — which begins previews on Nov. 1 — and on Saturday, the comedian posted a photo of her dad stopping by rehearsals to check up on how she’s doing.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““My dad came to watch rehearsal yesterday and loved it so the important reviews are in!” the 36-year-old wrote alongside a sweet photo of the father-daughter duo hugging in the theatre.”
“Martin’s adult comedy tells the story of two married couples who gather to watch a celestial event.”
“On Saturday, the Trainwreck star also shared a video of herself joking around with the play’s director Jerry Zaks.”
“I’ma love you.”Schumer captioned the photo, “I love our director Jerry Zaks very much.”


"He may need a rest." Related video: Amy Schumer bought a $2000 mattress for a store employee to use the bathroom
"Two couples found themselves in the marriage of free fall speed and danger matched only by smoldering space rocks tearing the sky," read production notes
"You are..."
"Amy Schumer just got the most important review of her Broadway career."
Schumer will make his Broadway debut in Steve Martin's new comedy meteor shower, which starts rehearsal on November 1. On Saturday, the comedian posted a picture of her father stopping to examine her during rehearsal
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My father came to see the rehearsal yesterday and liked it very much, so the important comments were all in it!"! "At the age of 36, he wrote a sweet picture of father and daughter embracing in the theater."
"Martin's adult comedy tells the story of two married couples who get together to watch a celestial event."
"Last Saturday, the star of the train crash also shared a video of himself joking with the show's director, Jerry Zaks."
"I love you," Schumer wrote in the title of the photo. "I love our director, Jerry Zacks, very much."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared in the New York Post.”
“They have been spotted visiting each other in LA, in Paris together last spring, and there were photographed strolling on a Malibu beach in September.”
“The pair was first linked in 2013, but have kept their relationship low-key.”
“Then when Logic and Khaled performed, they got up onto their feet and danced with other partygoers.”
“But later in the night, Foxx finally moved into the seat next to Holmes, where he was seen whispering in her ear.”
“A camera showed Foxx, 50, still sitting at the next table, cracking up into laughter while Holmes gave an embarrassed smile.”
“...to sit together what better night than tonight Davis added to laughs from the audience which included Jay Z Beyoncé Pink John Legend and Chrissy Tiegen Cardi B Sting DJ Khaled and a host of top music execs...”
“KATIE HOLMES LOOKS SMITTEN WITH JAMIE FOXX IN RARE PUBLIC APPEARANCE But when she returned Davis called her out saying This lady left the room right when I was going to introduce her she was sitting at that table right with Jamie Foxx and everyone else If you re going...”
“But Katie not-so-subtly left the room as Davis – who traditionally announces his big name guests at the event – was about to give a shout out to them both.”
“Holmes, 39, arrived in a red gown with her hair in a sleek bob, with producer and Tribeca Production’s honcho Jane Rosenthal at Saturday night’s bash at the Sheraton in Manhattan,Foxx rolled in later, and sat at the next table to Holmes, exchanging smiles and jokes.”


"This article was originally published in the New York Post."
Last spring, they were found visiting each other in Los Angeles and Paris, and in September they were photographed walking along Malibu beach
"The two first contacted in 2013, but kept a low-key relationship."
"Then, when logic and Khalid perform, they stand up and dance with the other party members."
But late at night, fox finally sat down in the seat next to Holmes. Someone saw him whispering in her ear
"A video camera showed that fox, 50, was still sitting at the table next door, smiling back and forth, while Holmes was embarrassed to smile."
“… What better night to sit together than tonight? Davis added laughter to the audience, including Jay Beyonce, the legend of pink John and Chris tigan, Katie B. sting, DJ Khalid and a series of top music executives... "
"Katie Holmes seldom appears in public, but when she comes back, Davis calls her out and says that this lady left the room just when I was going to introduce her. She's sitting at that table with Jamie Fox and others, if you want to go..."
"But Katie didn't leave the room as cleverly as Davis did. Davis usually announced his big name guests during the event, and he was ready to shout to both of them."
"Wearing a red robe and sleek hair, Sheraton Holmes, 39, sat at the table next to Sheraton Holmes, smiling and joking with each other at a dance at the Sheraton Manhattan Hotel on Saturday night."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But stronger roles for each of the women in Season 2 — and the addition of Meryl Streep — makes the future for Big Little Lies sound better than ever.”
“Kidman also told Variety that Streep had signed onto Season 2 without even reading the script, something Kidman has spoken about before, because, as the actor said, "That’s how much she wanted to support us."”
“Sadly, not too much is known about the new season, which is set to premiere on HBO sometime in 2019, but fans can already tell it's going to be a good one, probably for two reasons.”
“First, it's Big Little Lies, so, duh, and secondly, Meryl Streep will be on season two so double duh.”
“And, though she didn't open up about what will go down the mansions of Monterey next year in a recent interview with Variety, Nicole Kidman did reveal how Meryl Streep got involved with Big Little Lies.”
“Two words: her emails.”
“Well, considering that today's news literally reports that Ivanka Trump used her personal email account for government business, this isn't really the time for a "her emails" joke.”
“In this case, though, emails are pretty funny for once.”
“Speaking with Variety, Kidman revealed that Streep emailed her and Reese Witherspoon on the night of the 2018 Golden Globes.”
“After Big Little Lies won the award for Best Television Limited Series, Streep said in her email, "I suppose now I have to join you."”


"But in season two, every woman has a stronger role to play - Meryl Streep in - making the future of big lies sound better than ever."
"Kidman also told variety that Streep signed the second season without even reading the script, which Kidman said before, because, as the actor said," that's how much she wants to support us. "
"Unfortunately, people don't know much about the new season, which will premiere at HBO sometime in 2019, but fans already know it's going to be a good season for two reasons."
"First of all, it's a big and small lie, so, um, second, Meryl Streep will be in the second season, so double Du."
"And although Nicole Kidman didn't say in a recent interview with variety what would happen to Monterey's mansion next year, she did reveal how Meryl Streep got involved in some little lies."
"Two words: her email."
"Well, considering today's news report that Ivanka trump used her personal email account for government affairs, it's not time to joke about" her email. "
"In this case, though, email is quite interesting once."
"Kidman revealed in an interview with variety that Streep e-mailed her and Reese Witherspoon on the night of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards."
"I think now I have to join you," Streep said in an email after little lies won the award for best TV series



Number  201
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She is survived by her parents, Max and Elizabeth, and her sister, Millie.”
““In a way, heroin saved me, because otherwise I would have killed myself.”Neilson was married to banker Nathaniel Rothschild from 1994 to 1997.”
““I fell into a serious depression and became a heroin addict because it provided an escape bubble and was the only way I could cope,” she told the Daily Mail in December 2015.”
“She battled drug addiction and mental health issues after being assaulted at age 16 during a trip to Perth, Australia.”
“The reality star, who was raised in a wealthy British aristocratic family, had spoken candidly through the years about her past.”
“In more recent years, she worked as a children’s author, writing a series of books titled The Me Me Me’s, which were inspired by her struggles with dyslexia.”
“She joined the Bravo reality series in 2014 but announced her exit the following year after two seasons.”
“Neilson worked as a model for years and was close friends with fashion designer Alexander McQueen, who died by suicide at age 40 in February 2015.”
“London’s Metropolitan Police Service told Us Weekly that the death was not being treated as suspicious.”
“As previously reported, the Ladies of London star died on Thursday, July 12, at the age of 49.”


"Her parents Max and Elizabeth, and her sister Millie, all survived."
"In a way, heroin saved me because otherwise I would have killed myself." Nelson married Nathaniel Rothschild, a banker, from 1994 to 1997
In December 2015, she told the Daily Mail: "I fell into a serious depression and became a heroin addict, because it provides an escape bubble, the only way I can cope with it."
"She was attacked on a trip to Perth, Australia, when she was 16, fighting drug addiction and mental health problems."
The reality star grew up in a wealthy British aristocratic family and has been candid about his past for years
In recent years, as a children's writer, she has written a series of books called my, which are inspired by her struggle with dyslexia
"She joined the Bravo reality series in 2014, but announced her exit the year after two seasons."
"Nelson has been a model for many years and is a close friend of fashion designer Alexander McQueen, who committed suicide in February 2015 at the age of 40."
"The metropolitan police told us weekly that the death was not considered suspicious."
As mentioned earlier, London actress died on Thursday, July 12, at the age of 49



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Guess says that Marciano has begun transitioning his duties to Victor Herrero, who previously took over Marciano’s role as Guess CEO in 2015, while brother Maurice Marciano has been appointed by the board to serve as the company’s new executive chairman.”
“...improper conduct Upton first went public with her allegations in January joining the MeToo movement on social media and later giving a detailed account to Time magazine...”
“Marciano won’t be cutting all ties with the company, which is known for its sex-centric marketing and has helped launch many young models’ careers.”
“He will remain chief creative officer through January 2019, when his contract expires, and then will stay on as a board member, Bloomberg reports.”
“In a regulatory filing, Guess announced that Marciano had entered into settlements with five people arising out of claims of inappropriate conduct, for a total of $500,000.”
“The settlements, according to the filing, were to avoid litigation costs, and did not represent an admission of “liability or fault.”The investigators, who according to the filing interviewed 40 people and reviewed some 1.5 million pages of documents, ultimately couldn’t corroborate many of the allegations.”
“”In some cases, no conclusion could be reached because the individuals either declined to be interviewed or provided insufficient information to the investigators,” the filing states.”
“And in other cases the investigation found that credible accounts were given by both sides What the investigators did conclude was that Marciano exercised poor judgment in his communications with models and photographers and that he had put himself in situations that could and did result in plausible allegations of...”
““After the first day of shooting the Guess Lingerie campaign [on July 25, 2010], Paul Marciano said he wanted to meet with me,” she said.”
“Now that the investigation is over, he will receive his salary again until January 30, according to the filing.”


"At the same time, guess said that Marciano has begun to transition to Victor Herrero, who took over as chief executive of guess in 2015, while Maurice Marciano, his brother, has been appointed as the company's new executive chairman by the board of directors."
“…… Upton's misconduct first made her accusations public in January. She joined the metoo campaign on social media and later provided detailed reports to time magazine... "
"Marciano will not sever all ties with the company, which is known for its sex centric marketing and has helped many young models start their careers."
He will continue to be chief creative officer until his contract expires in January 2019, and then continue to be a member of the board of directors, according to Bloomberg
"Guess announced in a regulatory document that Marciano had reached a settlement with five people for misconduct claims for a total amount of $500000."
"According to the case file, the purpose of settlement is to avoid litigation costs and does not mean admission of 'liability or negligence'. The investigators interviewed 40 people on the basis of the case file, reviewed about 1.5 million pages of documents, and ultimately were unable to confirm many of the charges. "
"In some cases, conclusions cannot be drawn because these people either refused to be interviewed or provided insufficient information to investigators," the document said
"In other cases, the investigation found credible statements from both sides. The investigators concluded that Marciano misjudged in his communication with models and photographers, and that he put himself in a position that could and did lead to reasonable accusations... "
"After the first day of filming (July 25, 2010) the underwear event for guess, Paul Marciano said he wanted to meet me," she said
"The filing materials show that now that the investigation is over, he will receive his salary again before January 30."



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Solo: A Star Wars Story will be released on May 25.”
“A similar Wookiepedia entry claims that Wookiees live to be about 400 years old, so Chewbacca was just coming into the best years of his life during Solo.”
“That makes Chewbacca about 28 years younger than a popular Wookiepedia entry claims.”
“Best guesses place the events of Solo approximately 12 or 13 years before A New Hope, meaning Chewbacca is either 202- or 203-years-old.”
“A timeline from Del Ray Books, the official publisher of the Star Wars novels, helps fill in the blanks.”
“We know there’s a 19-year gap between the events of Star Wars: Episode III — Revenge of the Sith and A New Hope, with Solo taking place just a few years after Episode III.”
““You look great!”Based on the new information, it isn’t too difficult to guess Chewbacca’s age in Star Wars: Episode IV — A New Hope, the first time he appeared.”
““190 years old?” Han asks, translating Chewbacca’s response for the viewer.”
“After Han asks Chewie how he knows to fly the ship, the young smuggler gets a surprising answer.”
“The revelatory moment occurs toward the end of the trailer, when Han and Chewie are flying the Millennium Falcon.”


Solo: the Star Wars story will be released on May 25
"A similar entry in the Wookiee encyclopedia claims that the Wookiee lived to about 400 years old, so Chewbacca just entered the best years of his life when he sang solo."
"That makes Chewbacca 28 years younger than one of the popular Wikipedia websites claims."
"The best guess is that Solow is about 12 or 13 years ahead of new hope, which means that Chewbacca is either 202 or 203 years old."
A timetable from del ray books, the official publisher of Star Wars novels, helps fill the gap
"We know that there is a 19 year gap between the story of Star Wars: Episode 3 - Revenge and new hope of the Sith, and the solo takes place a few years after episode 3."
"You look great! "Based on the latest information, it's not too hard to guess Chewbacca's age in Star Wars: Episode 4 - new hope, his first appearance."
"190? "Han Wen translated Chewbacca's answer for the audience."
"When Han asked Chuyi how he could fly the ship, the young smuggler got a surprising answer."
"The moment of revelation happens at the end of the trailer, when Han and Zhui are driving the Falcon."



Number  204
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  205
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below, and don't miss the new season of "This Is Us" when it returns to NBC in the fall.”
“Do you feel surprised about how much she opened up?”
“She recently decided to write her own book and now E!”
“Online is talking about how Chrissy feels like writing this book was very "therapeutic" for her.”
“This new book is called "This Is Me" and in it, Chrissy opens up about a lot of things that the fans of "This Is Us" don't know about her already.”
“Chrissy opens upIn this book, Chrissy Metz really does open up even going as far as talking about being abused as a child.”
“She talked about how it was scary to open up like that, but also ended up being "therapeutic" for her to do it.”
“She said she had to be very "vulnerable."”
“Of course, Chrissy worried about what the fans would think, but lucky for her, she is getting a ton of support about what she revealed.”
“In this book, Chrissy Metz says that her stepfather hit her and was also very critical of her weight.”


"Please voice in the comments below and don't miss the new season of this is us, as it will return to NBC in the fall."
"Are you surprised at what she said?"
"She recently decided to write her own book, and now it's e!"
"It's said on the Internet that Chris thinks writing this book is very" therapeutic "for her."
This new book is called "this is me". In this book, Chris tells a lot of things that fans of "this is us" don't know
"Chris opens the book, Chris Metz does, and even talks about being abused as a child."
"She talked about how terrible it was to open her heart like this, but in the end it became a" cure "for her."
"She said she had to be very" vulnerable. "
"Of course, Chris is worried about what the fans will think, but fortunately, the news she revealed has received a lot of support."
"In this book, Chris Metz says her stepfather beat her and was very picky about her weight."



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Editors' Recommendations...”
“Update on June 8: The series finale is available on Netflix.”
“Unfortunately for fans of those other series, they have not enjoyed the swift resurrection that Sense 8 received.”
“Sense8 was part of Netflix’s cancellation spree that saw fan-favorites The Get Down, Marco Polo, and the star-studded drama Bloodline canceled within eight months of each other.”
“Two days before Christmas in 2016, Netflix released a two-hour holiday special called Happy F*cking New Year.”
“At the time of its revival from cancellation, Wachowski would not rule out even more Sense8 in the future, writing, “After that … if this experience has taught me anything, you NEVER know.”The new two-hour special is the second of its kind in the series.”
“Despite the finality of its brief return, there’s still a sliver of hope that Sense 8 could continue on even further.”
“Either way, that point is now moot in the face of the show’s return and opportunity for closure.”
“In the letter, Wachowski stated Netflix did “love the show as much as we do, but the numbers have always been challenging.” She did not clarify if the numbers she was referring to were low viewership data, the expensive production cost, or both.”
“The letter not only revived hope of Sense8‘s return to our lives but also gave the most definitive answer as to why it was canceled in the first place.”


"Editor's recommendation..."
"Update June 8: Series finales available on Netflix."
"Unfortunately, for the fans of other series, they didn't enjoy the rapid recovery brought about by sense 8."
"Sense8 is part of the cancellation of Netflix's hit shows, with fans' favorite" get off "," Marco Polo "and the star drama" bloodline "canceled within eight months."
"Two days before Christmas 2016, Netflix released a two-hour holiday special called happy f * cking new year."
"As it recovers from cancellation, wachovsky does not rule out greater significance in the future," he wrote, "after that If this experience taught me anything, you'll never know. " The new two-hour feature is the second of its kind in the series
"Although the brief return of eighth sense is a foregone conclusion, there is still a glimmer of hope that it can go further."
"In any case, in the face of the return and closing opportunity of the show, this is meaningless now."
In the letter, wachovsky said Netflix did "love the show as much as we do, but the numbers have always been challenging." She did not clarify whether the figures were low ratings, expensive production costs, or both
"This letter not only rekindles the hope of sensory 8 returning to our life, but also gives the most clear answer to why it was cancelled in the first place."



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GETTY Prince Harry talked to pupils about how young people can use their voices to change the worldGETTY Prince Harry attended the inaugural summit of the Obama Foundation...”
“Earlier in the day, Prince Harry and Michelle Obama had surprised pupils at Hyde Park Academy high school, in the south of Chicago where he was questioned about the city’s unique pizza.”
“...pizza...”
“She said: “When Prince Harry’s here, he eats Chicago — make sure he has a pizza.” To which the royal revealed his shocking dietary revelation.”
“He replied: “I had pizza last night.”
“I don’t even eat pizza anymore, but I had pizza last night.”
“GETTY Prince Harry has revealed another secret about his dietary habits on a visit to ChicagoFREE now and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“We will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”


"Getty Harry told the students how young people use their voices to change the world. Getty Harry attended the first summit of the Obama Foundation..."
Earlier in the day, Harry and Michelle Obama surprised students at Hyde Park Academy High School in southern Chicago, where he was asked about Chicago's unique pizza
“… Pizza... "
"When Prince Harry is here, he will eat Chicago - make sure he has a pizza," she said In this regard, the royal family revealed his shocking diet enlightenment
He replied, "I had pizza last night."
"I don't even eat pizza, but I did last night."
"Prince Getty Harry revealed another secret about eating habits during his visit to Chicago and will never miss the top Royal story again."
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"We will only use your email address to send you a press release."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And she gives El Moussa a thumbs up for enjoying wine and chocolate a few times a week for “a nice treat.”NOTE: It is recommended that women eat at least 1,200 calories per day, and men eat at least 1,800 calories per day.”
“If I want a glass of wine I’m going to have it, or some chocolate — sure why not!”
““When I’m stressed, food is the last thing on my mind,” the Flip or Flop star, 33, tells PEOPLE.”
““I knew I needed to get back to being healthy for myself and my babies.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“So El Moussa consulted her good friend, nutritionist Cara Clark, who set her up with a daily nutrition plan.”
““She is so sweet she made me a bunch of smoothies for me to freeze and dropped them by my house,” El Moussa says.”
““She gave me some easy recipes to get me back on track.”RELATED VIDEO: Christina El Moussa Says Yoga Helped Her Cope with Her Divorce — and Shares Her Fitness Secrets!”
““Nutrition is very important to me for both my own health and wellness, but also for my children,” El Moussa says.”
““It’s all about everything in moderation.”
“For me, my nutrition routine is a way of life, and I have so much energy when I exercise and eat a healthy balanced diet.”Breakfast8 oz.”


She also praised El Moussa's drinking wine and chocolate a few times a week as "a good treat.". Note: it is recommended that women eat at least 1200 calories a day and men at least 1800 calories a day
"If I want a glass of wine, I'll take it, or some chocolate - of course, why not!"
"When I'm stressed, food is the last thing I want to do," the 33 year old star told people
"I know I need to get myself and my children back to health." Get news, feature, etc
So Musa consulted her good friend, nutritionist Carla Clark, who developed a daily nutrition plan for her
"She's so cute, she made me a pile of ice sand to freeze and then left them next to my house," El Musa said
"She gave me some simple recipes to get me back on track." Related video: Christina El Musa said yoga helped her cope with the divorce and shared her fitness tips! "
"Nutrition is very important to my own health and health, as well as to my children," El Moussa said
"Everything should be moderate."
"For me, my daily nutrition is a lifestyle, and I have so much energy when I exercise and eat a healthy and balanced diet."



Number  209
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sitting in front of an open flame or other heat source can dry your skin.”
“Stay warm without cozying up to a fireplace or other heat source.”
“Ointments and creams are more effective and less irritating than lotions.”
“To trap this much-needed moisture, you need to apply a moisturizer within few minutes of: Drying off after a shower or bathUse an ointment or cream rather than a lotion.”
“Ointments, creams, and lotions (moisturizers) work by trapping existing moisture in your skin.”
“Apply moisturizer immediately after washing.”
“Click the image above to download a PDF.”
“You can prevent baths and showers from worsening dry skin by following these dermatologists' tips.”
“Baths and showers can worsen dry skin.”
“Use warm rather than hot water.”


"Sitting in front of an open fire or other heat source will dry your skin."
"Keep warm and away from fireplaces or other heat sources."
"Ointment and cream are more effective and less irritating than lotion."
In order to catch this badly needed moisture, you need moisturizing cream in a few minutes: after the shower, dry or bathe with cream or cream instead of lotion.
Ointments, creams and lotions (Run Fushuang) work by absorbing moisture from the skin.
"Apply moisturizer immediately after washing."
"Click the image above to download the PDF."
"Following these dermatologists' advice, you can prevent bathing and showering from making your skin dry and worse."
"Bathing and showering aggravate dry skin."
"Use warm water instead of hot water."



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...for loving me the way that you do...”
“Tristan have been dating for around 15 months after going public with their romance in September 2016 pictured in June The reality star then turned her attention to her boyfriend of one year who already has baby son Prince one with ex girlfriend Jordan Craig She wrote Tristan thank you...”
“Really cute.”
“We’re kind of doing a jeans-and-T-shirts vibe.”
“Kim previously said of this year's Kardashian Christmas card: 'This year’s card is shot really casually.”
“2017 also marks the first time the first family of reality TV have teased the image on a day-by-day basis.”
“DAY 21 West Family...”
“New arrival It will also be the last time Kim 37 and Kanye 40 will pose as a family of four with the power couple set to welcome their third child via surrogate any day now pictured day 16 Posting the snap on her Instagram page Kim simply captioned it...”
“This year marks the first year the rapper has appeared in the annual Kardashian family Christmas card since he started dating Kim back in 2012.”
“Little North was happy as can be as she grinned away, while adorable Saint stole the show by looking positively cherubic as dad Kanye wrapped a protective arm around him.”


“… Love me as you do... "
"Tristan has been dating for about 15 months since they announced their love affair in September 2016. The photo was taken in June. The reality TV star then turned her attention to her boyfriend who has been dating for a year. He and his ex girlfriend Jordan Craig have a son Prince one, and she wrote a thank-you letter to Tristan..."
"That's lovely."
"We're creating an atmosphere of jeans and T-shirts."
"Kim said earlier about this year's Kardashian Christmas card:" this year's Christmas card is really casual. "
"2017 also marks the first time that the first family of reality shows tease images day by day."
"Day 21, Xijia..."
"New arrival, this will also be the last time that Jin 37 and Kanye 40 pose as a family of four. The power couple will welcome their third child through surrogacy on any day. Now the photo is the 16th day. Jin posted this snapshot on her instagram page, and she just added the title..."
"This year is the first time that the rapper has appeared on the Kardashian family's Christmas card since she fell in love with Kim in 2012."
"Xiaobeikai grins, while the lovely Saint takes the lead with an innocent look when his father kenye puts a protective arm around him."



Number  211
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below.”
“...big day...”
“ET caught up with Haynes in June when he gushed about his engagement and revealed that Leatham who has provided the elaborate floral installations for Tina Turner Chelsea Clinton and Sofia Vergara s weddings will be taking charge on their...”
“RELATED: Colton Haynes Joins Season 7 of 'American Horror Story' -- See the Lipstick-Smeared Announcement!”
“?," Haynes wrote alongside one shot.”
“Lol I'm cruel ??”
“VACATION B**CHES!!!”
“More to come.”
“"I would apologize for all the vacation photos but @jeffleatham & I had to sit & watch all of y'all go on vacation this summer so this is payback.”
“RELATED: Colton Haynes Pulls Off His Own Romantic Proposal to Fiance Jeff LeathamThe couple hasn't stopped sharing snaps from their tropical getaway since they arrived in paradise on Tuesday.”


"Pay attention to the bottom."
“… Big day... "
"In June this year, et met Haines, who talked about his engagement and revealed that lissam, who provided exquisite flower installation for the wedding of Tina Turner, Chelsea Clinton and Sophia villa, will be in charge of their wedding..."
Related report: Colton Haines joined the seventh season of American horror story - look at the lipstick statement
"?" Haines wrote next to a photo. "
"Ha ha, I'm cruel?"
"Vacation b * * ches!!!"
"There's more."
"I'll apologize for all the holiday photos, but @ jeffleatham & I have to sit and watch all of you go on holiday this summer, so it's a reward."
"Related reports: Colton Haynes has made a romantic proposal to his fiance, Jeff leathamt, who has been sharing photos of their tropical vacation since arriving in heaven on Tuesday."



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below!”
“WATCH: Christina Aguilera and Matthew Rutler Adorably Give Daughter Summer Rain a 'Kiss Attack'The singer also brought her cute kids to The Emoji Movie premiere in Los Angeles on Sunday, where they all walked the red carpet together.”
“Check out their amazing Fourth of July family photo.”
“NEWS: Christina Aguilera Gives Fans a Rare Glimpse Into Her Life, Reveals She's Back in the StudioAguilera has been spending plenty of quality time lately with her family, including fiance Matthew Rutler and their 2-year-old daughter, Summer Rain.”
“Aguilera wrote.”
“"#Aintnootherman my little Man filling in for mommy at rehearsal!"”
“Max clearly enjoyed being a stand-in for his famous mom, singing into a water bottle and showing off some adorable moves.”
“The 36-year-old singer Instagrammed a heartwarming video of her 9-year-old son, Max, having some fun with her backup dancers on Tuesday, performing her hit, "Ain't No Other Man."”
“Looks like Christina Aguilera has a superstar on her hands!”


"Watch the bottom!"
"Watch: Christina Aguilera and Matthew rutler lovingly kiss their daughter Xia Yu. On Sunday, the singer took her lovely children to the emotional movie premiere in Los Angeles, and they walked on the red carpet together
"Look at their amazing picture of their family on July 4th."
News: Christina Aguilera, a rare fan of her life, revealed that she was back in her study. Aguilera has been with his family recently, including fiance Matthew rutler and their 2-year-old daughter Xia Yu
"Aguilera wrote."
"My little brother is acting for my mother during rehearsal!"
"Max obviously likes to be his famous mother's stand in, singing to the water bottle and showing some cute moves."
"The 36 year old singer posted a warm video on Tuesday that her 9-year-old son Max had a good time with her dancers and performed her hit song" no other men. "
"It looks like Christina Aguilera has a superstar in her hand!"



Number  213
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
““u really should ;-)”It was retweeted thousands of times, and those who heeded her call were greeted on Snapchat with footage that has, for want of a less cringeworthy term, broken the Internet.”
“In the undated video we see her husband Kanye West apparently on a speakerphone call with Taylor Swift informing her that he was referencing her in his song Famous The lyric in question For all my Southside n that know me best I feel like me and Taylor might still...”
“...have sex Why...”
“I made that b**** famous.”Swift appears to be heard on the other end calling the shout-out “tongue in cheek” and saying that she “really appreciate[d]” West giving her a heads-up.”
“(The call is available in its entirety here.)”
“The years-long feud between the Wests and Swift has been one of the great culture dramas of our age.”
“In February, the Guardian reports, Swift’s representative claimed that “Kanye did not call for approval” about the track, and that Swift was “never made aware of the actual lyric ‘I made that b**** famous.”
“'”After Kardashian West posted the video, Swift was, er, swift to speak out.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"You really should." -) "the message has been forwarded thousands of times, and those who listened to her call have been welcomed on snapchat, and their video has spread on the Internet because of the lack of a less daunting term."
"In the undated video, we saw her husband Kanye West apparently making a hands-free phone call with Taylor Swift, telling her that he mentioned her in his song" famous lyrics "because I know my southern son best, and I think Taylor and I may still..."
“… Why... "
On the other end, it seems to hear swift yell "joking" and say that she "thanks a lot" West for giving her a chance
"(the full content of the phone is provided here.)
"The years long grudge between the West and swift has always been one of the great cultural dramas of our time."
In February, Swift's representative claimed that "Kanye didn't ask for permission" for the song and that swift "never realized the true meaning of the song" I made b * * famous, "the Guardian reported
"After Kardashian West released the video, swift, er, spoke quickly."



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cover MediaAuthor: Cover Media...”
“Bazaar cover shot is also called Shiloh after the pre teen...”
“Women s education and health are the first things to suffer Jolie and her children travelled to Namibia in July to open the Shiloh Wildlife Sanctuary which is named after her and her estranged husband Brad Pitt s 11 year old daughter One of the cheetahs in the Harper s...”
“...up most of the world s poor when the environment is damaged for example when fishing stocks are destroyed wildlife is killed by poachers or tropical forests are bulldozed it deepens their poverty...”
“As the San people say You are never lost if you can see your path to the horizon Subscribe to our Free Daily All4Women Newsletter to enter Sign Up Now Angelina also opens up in the piece about the link between the environment and women s rights saying Women make...”
“She holds dear the wise words she has picked up from the nation’s indigenous hunter-gatherer people, the San, adding, “If my life experience has taught me anything, it is only what you stand for, and what you choose to stand against, that defines you.”
“...said...”
“In the accompanying interview the By The Sea star reveals that Namibia has become a country very close to her heart For me Namibia represents not only ties of family and friendship but also the effort to the balance between humans and the environment so crucial to our future she...”
“One stunning photo features Angelina posing for the camera in a gorgeous Ralph Lauren Collection dress as the three rescue cheetahs prowl around her.”
“...a wildlife sanctuary in Namibia the birthplace of her biological daughter Shiloh...”


"Cover media Author: cover media..."
"The cover photo of the bazaar is also known as Shiluo Hou, teenager..."
"Women's education and health are the top priority for Julie and her children when they went to Namibia in July to open the Shilo wildlife reserve, named after a cheetah in the Harper River, the 11 year old daughter of her separated husband Brad Pitt..."
“…… When the environment is destroyed, most of the poor people in the world will get into trouble. For example, when fishery resources are destroyed, wild animals are killed by poachers, or tropical forests are flattened, which will deepen their poverty.... "
"As the San people said, if you can see your way to the horizon, you will never get lost. Subscribe to our free daily all4women newsletter and register. Now Angelina also opens an article on the relationship between environment and women's rights, saying that women make..."
"She values the wisdom she has learned from the indigenous hunter gatherer San people in the land, adding," if my life experience has taught me anything, then only what you support and what you choose to oppose is your definition. "
“… Say... "
"In the attached interview, Ocean Star revealed that Namibia has become a country. For me, Namibia not only represents the bond of family and friendship, but also represents the balance between human beings and the environment, which is very important for our future. She..."
"In an amazing picture, Angelina poses in front of the camera in a gorgeous dress of Ralph Lauren series, with three rescue cheetahs hovering around her."
“… The wildlife reserve in Namibia, the birthplace of her daughter Shiloh... "



Number  215
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“...all still in the film...”
“She is respected by her peers and beloved by her public Read the rest of his lengthy comma happy statement below and take solace in the fact that Kit Harington Ben Schnetzer Natalie Portman Bella Thorne Susan Sarandon Jared Keeso Kathy Bates Thandie Newton Michael Gambon and Sarah Gadon are...”
““She is a terrific actress, a politically engaged artist, what is more, who relentlessly champions the causes she believes in.”
“...rest of the story which ended up not being on heroes or their nemesis bur sic rather on childhood and its dreams Jessica has since the very beginning defended this project and defended me on so many occasions he continues...”
“The decision was editorial and narrative in that it has nothing to do with a performance and everything to do with a character and the compatibility of its storyline Dolan goes on to explain that this villain subplot albeit funny and entertaining didn t feel like it belonged to the...”
“I feel, toward Jessica, a very sincere love, and a great admiration.”
““It was an extremely difficult decision to make.”
““What you need to hear from me is that Jessica Chastain’s character, after what was a long period of reflection, had to be cut from the film,” Dolan writes on Instagram.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
“… It's still in the movie... "
"She is respected by her peers and loved by the public. Please read the rest of his lengthy comma happy statement below and take comfort in the fact that kit Harrington Ben schneizer Natalie Portman Bella Thorne Susan Sarandon Jared kisso Casey Bates sandy Newton Michael Gambon and Sarah gaden are..."
"She is an outstanding actress, an artist with political participation, and more importantly, she perseveres in the cause she believes in."
“…… The rest of the story is ultimately not about the heroes or their Avengers, but about childhood and its dreams. Jessica defended this project from the beginning, defended me on many occasions, and he went on to say... "
"This decision is editorial and narrative, because it has nothing to do with the performance, everything has to do with the role, and the compatibility of the plot. Doran then explained that although the villain plot is interesting, it doesn't belong to..."
"I feel a deep love and admiration for Jessica."
"It was an extremely difficult decision."
"What you need to hear from me is that the character of Jessica chastein has to be removed from the film after a long period of thinking," Dolan wrote on instagram



Number  216
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Andy Cohen asked, “Prenup?” And she said, “Yes!” With her future husband looking on, smiling from the audience.”
“In 2017, E News calculated that the franchise had a divorce rate of about 34%, but that was before a flood of new breakups.”
“Since then four cast members from The Real Housewives of Orange County, one from The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills, two from The Real Housewives of Atlanta and of course there was Tom.”
“Luann de Lesseps and Tom D’Agostino from The Real Housewives of New York City married and divorced so fast, viewers had whiplash.”
“With the amount of cash being flashed around on the show, you’d think every couple has a prenuptial agreement.”
“Surprisingly, the women who seem to be the wealthiest on the show actually don’t have one.”
“So which Real Housewives don’t have a prenup?”
“Kyle RichardsNet worth: $50 millionMarital status: marriedRichards, who is an original Real Housewives of Beverly Hills cast member, says when she met her husband Mauricio Umansky, they were stone cold broke.”
““My husband and I didn’t have two nickels to rub together when we got married, so a prenup was not an option or even talked about,” she said on Andy Cohen’s Then & Now, People recounts.”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
Andy Cohen asked, "prenuptial agreement? She said, "yes! "Her future husband was watching and the audience was smiling."
"In 2017, e news calculated that the chain's divorce rate was about 34%, but that was before a lot of new breakups."
Since then, four actors have come from Orange County's Real Housewives, one from Beverly Hills, two from Atlanta and, of course, Tom
In the real housewife of New York, Luan de Lesseps and Tom dagostino got married and divorced so quickly that the audience was whipped
"On TV, the amount of cash flashes by and you think every couple has a prenuptial agreement."
"Surprisingly, the woman who seems to be the richest in the play does not."
"So which Real Housewives don't have a prenuptial agreement?"
Kyle richardsnett worth: 50 million dollar marital status: Mary derichaz, an original housewife from Beverly Hills, said that when she met her husband Mauricio umansky, they were completely bankrupt
"My husband and I didn't have two nickels to wipe when we married, so a prenuptial agreement wasn't an option or even a topic of discussion," she said in Andy Cohen's then & now magazine, people recalled



Number  217
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Getty Images'I don’t think a lot of him could have anyway.”
“'Look, when we first came on the scene, there were a lot of people who didn’t get him.”
“And if he doesn’t want to be up there in front of a lot of people, I completely understand.”
“Getty Images'His health is better now, but I know he still doesn’t feel like himself, doesn’t feel like he's perfect.”
“'Maybe a lot of daughters wouldn't react the same way, but I know the struggles he’s had these last few years,' she reflected.”
“Getty ImagesSerena added that while Richard's health is better now, at the time he wasn't feeling good about himself, and although many daughters may have reacted differently, all she wanted was for her family to be happy.”
“I'm not going to be upset with you about it, so I don't want you to be upset about it.'”
“She wrote back and said: 'Daddy, it's okay, if you don't want to come to the wedding at all, that's okay too.”
“The 36-year-old sports star - who had welcomed her first child with Reddit co-founder Ohanian just two months before their wedding - managed to remain calm and sympathetic.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"I don't think he has too many chances."
"You see, when we first got to the scene, a lot of people didn't catch him."
"If he doesn't want to be in front of a lot of people, I fully understand."
"Gatty is much better now, but I know he still can't feel himself. He can't feel perfect."
"Maybe a lot of daughters won't have the same reaction, but I know he's been struggling for years," she recalled
"Getty Images Serena added that although Richard's health is improving now, he didn't feel good about himself at that time, and although many of his daughters may react differently, she just wanted her family to be happy."
"I won't be angry with you for that, so I don't want you to be angry with you for that."
"She wrote back and said," Dad, it doesn't matter. If you don't want to come to the wedding at all, it doesn't matter. "
"The 36 year old sports star, who had her first child with reddit co-founder Ohanian two months before her wedding, managed to stay calm and sympathetic."



Number  218
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch Oprah’s full USC commencement speech below.”
“And Oprah’s USC commencement speech had it all: warnings, realism, hope, and a beautiful quote from Maya Angelou.”
“Graduating and having a celebrity deliver your graduation speech.”
“Well, there’s maybe ONE thing that could top that: Having Oprah Winfrey deliver your graduation speech.”
“On Friday, May 11th, she did exactly that at the University of Southern California’s Annenberg School for Communications and Journalism.”
“Sure, a celebrity commencement speech might feel gimmicky.”
“But many famous people are more than worthy of speaking to a giant crowd of graduates.”
“Oprah is a perfect example of that.”
“In 2017, Pharrell Williams used his NYU commencement speech to send an important message about women’s rights.”
“That same year, Janelle Monáe spoke to Dillard University about the American Dream, and her words are still bringing tears to our eyes.”


"Here's Oprah's full speech at the University of Southern California graduation ceremony."
"Oprah's graduation speech at USC was full of everything: warning, realism, hope, and a beautiful quote from Maya Angelou."
"Invite a famous person to give a graduation speech after graduation."
"Well, maybe one thing is more important than that: let Oprah Winfrey deliver her graduation address."
On Friday, May 11, she did it at the Annenberg School of communication and Journalism at the University of Southern California
"Of course, a speech at a celebrity graduation ceremony can be very funny."
"But many celebrities are more worthy of speaking to a large group of graduates."
"Oprah is a good example."
"In 2017, Pharrell Williams delivered a speech at the graduation ceremony of New York University, conveying an important message about women's rights."
"That same year, Janel Monet talked about the American dream at Dillard University, and her words still bring tears to our eyes."



Number  219
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the end, it will always be okay."”
“"It's obviously easy to get insecure and feel bad about yourself," he said.”
“The couple got engaged after a whirlwind courtship during Viall's turn as the titular "Bachelor" and now days after the announcement was made, he is speaking out about how he's been coping with the breakup.”
“"I still love her very much.”
“I'm not afraid to say that," the reality star told Us Weekly.”
“The couple stepped out at the MTV Movie and TV Awards during happier times in their relationship.”
“David Crotty / Patrick McMullan/Getty Image"My friends, my family and Vanessa and I are still very much each other's support system," Viall continued.”
“"We're trying to do that and it's a challenge at times, but we still realize that we're there for each other."”
“He also mentioned the mental toll the split has taken.”
“"You get in your head about things when things aren't working out for you."”


"In the end, everything will be fine."
"Obviously, it's easy for you to lose your sense of security and feel bad about yourself," he said
The couple got engaged after a whirlwind courtship in the name of Villar as a "Bachelor", and now, a few days after the announcement, Villar talked publicly about how he dealt with the breakup
"I still love her."
"I'm not afraid to say that," the reality star told us
"The couple attended the MTV film and Television Awards ceremony at the happiest time of their relationship."
"David Crotty / Patrick McMullen / Getty pictures" my friends, family and Vanessa and I are still supporting each other, "vial continued
"We're trying to do that, and sometimes it's a challenge, but we still realize that we exist for each other."
"He also mentioned the mental loss caused by the breakup."
"When things don't work for you, you think about them in your head."



Number  220
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Business Insider evaluates the future of the MCU post-"Infinity War" below:”
“Marvel's comic books provide a glimpse into the MCU's possibilities going forward, and Disney's acquisition of Fox assets could potentially mean the arrival of characters we have yet to see in the MCU.”
“With "Captain Marvel" and an "Infinity War" sequel coming next May, and "Black Panther" and "Spider-Man: Homecoming" sequels already planned, the MCU shows no signs of slowing down.”
“That doesn't mean there's no hope left, however.”
“But the ending leaves the fate of many characters up in the air, and the characters spared face an uncertain road ahead.”
“It's not bleak in terms of interest: Audiences are coming out in droves for the movie.”
“The future of the Marvel Cinematic Universe may appear bleak after "Avengers: Infinity War," but there's still plenty to expect from the franchise going forward.”
“Spoiler Warning: Don't read if you have yet to see "Avengers: Infinity War."”


Business insider evaluates the future of "Infinite War" after MCU as follows:
"Marvel let us see the future development possibility of MCU. Disney's acquisition of fox assets may mean the arrival of characters we haven't seen in MCU yet."
"As the sequels of Captain miracle and infinite war will be released in May next year, the sequels of panther and spider man: return are already in the plan, and MCU shows no sign of slowing down."
"However, it does not mean that there is no hope."
"But the ending makes the fate of many characters in suspense, and the characters who are let go are facing the fate of uncertain future."
"It's not bleak in terms of interest: the audience comes out in droves to see the film."
"After Avenger: Infinite War, the future of Marvel may look bleak, but there are still many expectations."
Spoiler Alert: if you haven't seen Avenger: Infinite War, don't read it



Number  221
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“JUST bfffffs.””
“Two days later, the duo took their adventures to the water for a day of fun in the sun with some celebrity pals, according to photos obtained by the Daily Mail.”
“Justin Theroux Seen with Emma Stone Again as They Do Dinner at Jennifer Lawrence's ApartmentJustin Theroux and Emma Stone are back together again.”
“The duo, who have been spotted together three times in the last two weeks, reunited Tuesday at Jennifer Lawrence’s apartment in New York City.”
“The three were seen eating dinner on the rooftop of the Hunger Games star’s building.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Theroux, 46, and Stone, 29, have been spending time together since his split from Jennifer Aniston in February.”
“Two weeks ago, the actor was seen lounging shirtless in the sun next to Stone, who wore a red one-piece bathing suit, in a bungalow at the famed Hotel du Cap Eden Roc in France.”
“Image zoom Justin Theroux and Emma Stone.”
“| Credit: Shutterstock (2)Both had been in the country for the Louis Vuitton Cruise 2019 show, as they’re ambassadors of the luxury brand.”


"It's that simple."
According to photos obtained by the daily mail, two days later, they went on an adventure in the water with some famous friends and spent a day in the sun
"Justin seru and Emma stone meet again for dinner at Jennifer Lawrence's apartment. Justin seru and Emma stone are together again."
"The two have been found together three times in the past two weeks and reunited on Tuesday at Jennifer Lawrence's apartment in New York City."
"Someone saw three people having dinner on the roof of the hungry game star."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Seru, 46, and stone, 29, have been together since breaking up with Jennifer Aniston in February
"Two weeks ago, in a bungalow of the famous French ducap Eden Rock Hotel, the actor was seen lying naked in the sun, next to stone in a red one-piece bathing suit."
"Image zooming Justin seru and Emma stone."
"Credit: shutterstock (2) has participated in Louis Vuitton's 2019 tour in China because they are ambassadors of luxury brands."



Number  222
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The weaving net controversy comes just days after Walmart Canada came under fire and was forced to pull from its shelves a 'racist' onesie decorated with teepees that joked about children living at home despite the country's history of taking indigenous kids away from their families.”
“Most shocking!'”
“The merchandise, a weaving net used for hair extensions retailed under the brand Jagazi Naturals, was being sold by a third party on Walmart.com for $7.28.”
“The title of the item read, in part: 'Durable Stretchy Weaving Net Weaving Cap Wig Cap Size M (N*****-brown).'”
“Scroll down for video Twitter user Kwani Lunis came upon this offensive product description for a weaving cap on Walmart s website The racist term also caught the attention of comedy writer Travon Free who quipped that he and Walmart should have a chat The offensive term was also repeated...”
“...in the description section beneath a photo showing a mannequin with the brown lacy cap on its head...”
“Online user Kwani Lunis came upon the racial slur online and alerted Walmart, tweeting: 'Hey @Walmart what are you doing.'”
“Comedian Travon Free, who is African-American and works as a staff writer on TBS' Full Frontal with Samanta Bee, weighed in on the controversy, quipping in a tweet that he and Walmart should 'have a chat.'”
“By Monday, as outrage over the slur spread on social media, the weave cap had been removed and the big-box retailer apologized on its Tweeter account, writing: ‘We agree, this is appalling.’The company also issued a statement laying the blame on the third-party retailer.”
“Writer and commentator Roxane Gay also weighed in on the controversy on TwitterSo sorry: Walmart later removed the item from its website and issued an apology‘We are very sorry and appalled that third party seller listed their item with this description on our online marketplace.”


"A few days before the netting controversy, Wal Mart Canada was attacked and forced to remove a 'racist' item decorated with T-shirts from its shelves. Despite the country's history of taking Aboriginal children away from their families, the item joked that the children lived at home."
"Most shocking!"
The product is a woven mesh for hair extension, retailed under the jagazi Naturals brand and sold by a third party for $7.28 on Wal Mart's website. "
Part of the title of the project is: "durable elastic braided net braided hat wig cap size M (n * * * - brown)"
"Scrolling down the video, twitter user kwani Lunis saw the offensive product description on Wal Mart's website. The racist word also attracted the attention of comedian travon free. He joked that he and Wal Mart should chat, and the offensive word was repeated..."
“… In the following description, a picture shows a mannequin wearing a Brown Lace hat... "
"Netizen kwani Lunis found racial discrimination on the Internet and reminded Wal Mart on Twitter:" Hey @ Wal Mart, what are you doing? "
"Comedian travon free, an African American writer of TBS's full front with samanta bee, is also involved in the controversy, tweeting that he should have a 'chat' with Wal Mart."
"By Monday, anger over the slander spread on social media, and weave's hat had been taken off. The big retailer apologized on its tweet account, saying: 'we agree, it's appalling.' The company also issued a statement, putting the blame on third-party retailers. "
"Writer and commentator Roxane gay was also involved in the controversy on twitter, so I'm sorry: Wal Mart later removed the product from its website and apologized," we're very sorry and shocked that third-party sellers listed their products with this description in our online market. "



Number  223
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here's just a sampling of what we learned:”
“Ellen clarified the movie was "never offered" to her.”
“She will be the one to steal the car.”
“I like that she'll take a knife and cut a guy.”
“But I like that about her.”
“"He more him than him her.”
“"He wanted his sister and he knew she was his sister, but now there are moments when they want to kill each other," said Bullock.”
“Bullock also talked about the relationship between her two children, daughter Laila, 5œ, and 8-year-old son Louis.”
“"I found out later, he was like, you inspired me ... he said, 'I thought it did get offered to you,'" DeGeneres continued.”
“"Maybe he lied to me, maybe he did write it for you and you turned it down."”


"It's just an example of what we've learned:
Ellen clarified that the film was "never" given to her
"She's the one who stole the car."
"I like it when she cuts people with a knife."
"But I like her."
"He likes him more than she does."
"He wanted his sister, he knew she was his sister, but now they sometimes want to kill each other," Bullock said
Bullock also talked about the relationship between her two children, 5-year-old daughter Leila and 8-year-old son Louis
"I found out later that he was like, you inspired me... He said, "I thought it was given to you," continued DeGeneres
"Maybe he cheated me, maybe he wrote for you, but you refused."



Number  224
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
““I mean she’s up there dancing on the side of a building.”The American Music Awards air on ABC on Sunday, November 19, at 8 p.m.”
““It’s pretty amazing,” one fan told ABC.”
““This is the first time that I’ve ever panicked.”In a video posted by ABC 7, the singer can be seen doing choreographed moves to her music by pushing off against the hotel’s windows.”
““This is by far the craziest, most insane thing I’ve ever attempted to do,” Pink admitted in the video.”
“Airs Sunday on @ABC7 pic.twitter.com/Rr6Wvz7IaK — Veronica Miracle (@ABC7Veronica) November 18, 2017Pink is set to open the AMAs on Sunday, November 19, with Kelly Clarkson, but it’s unclear if her stunt is part of the opening number or for another performance later in the show.”
“So fearless!”
““This is nothing you can prepare for.”A closer look at @Pink rehearsing her opening number for the @AMAs.”
““I feel the fear this time,” she added as she was shown rehearsing her aerial moves.”
““I don’t care about heights, I just care about being able to actually breathe up there.”“This was a fine idea,” she quipped before she was strapped into her harness.”


"Wait a minute."
"I mean she's dancing at the edge of a building upstairs." ABC broadcast the American Music Awards on Sunday, November 19, at 8 p.m
"It's amazing," one fan told ABC
"It was the first time I panicked." In a video released by ABC7, you can see the singer leaning against the window of the hotel doing carefully choreographed musical movements
"It's the craziest, craziest thing I've tried so far," Pinker admitted in the video
"On Sunday at @ ABC7 pic.twitter.com/Rr6Wvz7IaK -Veronica miracle (@ abc7veronica) on November 18, 2017, pink will open in AMAS with Kelly Clarkson on November 19 (Sunday), but it is not clear whether her stunts are part of the opening ceremony or later. "
"So fearless!"
"It's not something you can prepare." Take a closer look at @ Pink's opening speech for @ AMAS
"This time I felt fear," she added, as she was rehearsing her aerial movements
"I don't care about height, I just care about breathing on it." "That's a good idea," she joked before being strapped on



Number  225
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rockers We've Lost in 2017”
“Bennington was 41.”
“According to a press release, more than 500 family members and friends attended the ceremony, which was led by local KROQ DJ Ted Stryker.”
“Among those in attendance were Bennington's Stone Temple Pilots bandmates Robert and Dean DeLeo, his Kings of Chaos bandmate Matt Sorum as well as Damon Fox and Jimmy Gnecco.”
“That fivesome performed "Amazing Grace" at the ceremony.”
“Meanwhile, Dead by Sunrise's Ryan Shuck and Bennington's Linkin Park bandmates Mike Shinoda and Joe Hahn were among those delivering eulogies.”
“One fan has started a Google Doc collating all of the memorials worldwide.”
“Music for Relief has launched the One More Light fund in honor of Bennington.”
“Donations may be made here.”
“Close friends and family members had their chance to say farewell to Linkin Park's Chester Bennington Saturday (July 29) in Palos Verdes, Calif.”


"The rock singer we lost in 2017"
"Bennington is 41."
"According to a press release, more than 500 family members and friends attended the ceremony, which was hosted by Ted Stryker, a local KROQ DJ."
There were Bennington's Stone Temple Pilots, Robert and Dean DREO, his king of chaos, Matt soram, Damon Fox and Jimmy Glenn
"The five performed" Amazing Grace "at the ceremony."
Meanwhile, Ryan shuck of death at sunrise and Mike hinoda and Joe Hahn of Bennington's Lincoln Park band were among the mourners
"A fan started using Google documents to organize all the memorials around the world."
"The music relief fund launched a lighter fund in memory of Bennington."
"You can donate here."
"Close friends and family have a chance to say goodbye to Chester Bennington in Lincoln Park on Saturday (July 29) in Palos Verdes, California."



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re both ready to get married, but we haven’t set a date because we want to make sure we’re not doing it for anyone but ourselves,” said Bushnell.”
“It’s hard.”Higgins, meanwhile, told PEOPLE he couldn’t apologize “for being honest or expressing what I thought was the best thing to express at the time.”“Don’t get us wrong.”
““It is with heavy hearts that we announce our decision to go our separate ways,” they tell PEOPLE in an exclusive statement.”
““We feel fortunate for the time we had together, and will remain friends with much love and respect for one another.”
“We wish nothing but the best for each other, and ask for your support and understanding at this time.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Nevertheless, the two did their best to overcome their issues together and Bushnell moved to Higgins’ hometown of Denver shortly after going public with their engagement following the season finale, which aired in March.”
“Of Higgins declaration of love to both women Bushnell told PEOPLE exclusively at the time that post filming was more of an emotional roller coaster than the actual show I fall more in love with Ben every day and it s hard to separate what happened long ago and my...”
“...current feelings she said...”
““It’s confusing.”
“It does wear on me.”“It hurts,” she added.”


"We're all ready to get married, but we haven't set a date yet because we want to make sure we do it not for others, but for ourselves," Bushnell said
At the same time, Higgins told people that he could not apologize for "being honest or expressing what I thought was the best expression at the time." don't get us wrong. "
"It is with a heavy heart that we announce our decision to go our separate ways," they told people in an exclusive statement
"We feel very lucky because of the time we spend together and will maintain love and respect between friends."
"We just want to have the best of each other, and we ask for your support and understanding at this time." Get push notification containing news, functions, etc
Nevertheless, Bushnell and Higgins did their best to overcome their conflicts. After the season 2 finale broadcast in March, Bushnell moved to Higgins' hometown Denver shortly after his public engagement
"On Higgins's declaration of love for two women, Bushnell exclusively told people magazine at that time that after shooting, it was more like an emotional roller coaster than a real show. I love Ben more every day, and it's hard to compare what happened a long time ago with my..."
“… What she said about the present feeling... "
"It's confusing."
"It's really on me." "It hurts," she added



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for more celebrity pregnancy news!”
“The Hardict’s baby girl will join their son, Cree Hardrict, at home in coming weeks.”
“The celebrity mom shows us everything from shoes she has purchased for her daughter to the decor, which is nothing short of bright and beautiful.”
“Tia Mowry’s Baby Girl Nursery Reveal An organic color palette & minimal clutter make for an ultra calming environment, which is perfect for me & baby girl!Take a peek inside her nursery that I created with my dear friend Jake Alexander.”
“See more of his work here: sure to follow Quick Fix for more episodes.”
“Posted by Tia Mowry's Quick Fix on Friday, April 27, 2018“You asked and you got it,” Tia told her Instagram fans on Friday.”
““Baby girl is almost here and we are READY,” she exclaimed.”
““I’m loving the earth tones and calm vibes of all the decor, and can’t wait to see her grow into this gorgeous room.”Jake Alexander was one of the masterminds behind Tia’s nursery creation.”
“The interior designer did a spectacular job of putting together an airy space in which the newest member of the Hardrict family can thrive.”
““An organic color palette & minimal clutter make for an ultra calming environment, which is perfect for me and baby girl,” Tia shared with her Facebook subscribers.”


"Please pay attention to more celebrity pregnancy news!"
"The hardict baby girls will be at home with their son, Cree hardict, in the coming weeks."
"The celebrity mother showed us everything from the shoes she bought for her daughter to the designs and colors. It was just gorgeous."
"TIA Mowry's baby girl nursery shows an organic palette and minimal clutter to make a super calm environment, which is perfect for me and baby girls! Look at the nursery I built with my dear friend Jack Alexander
"Here you can see more of his works: be sure to follow the quick fix for more plots."
"TIA Mowry's quick fix was released on Friday, April 27, 2018," TIA told instagram fans on Friday, "you can ask."
"The baby girl is coming and we are ready," she cried
"I love the earth tone and the calm atmosphere of all the decor. I can't wait to see her grow into this gorgeous room." Jack Alexander is one of the masterminds behind TIA's creative nursery
"The interior designer has done a great job of putting together a ventilated space where the newest members of the hadrick family can thrive."
"An organic palette and minimal clutter make a super calm environment, which is perfect for me and baby girl," TIA shares with her Facebook users



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“?”
“HollywoodLifers, who do you think looked the best at the American Music Awards!”
“We’ll be updating as more and more celebrities continue to arrive, so keep checking back and refreshing to see ALL the gorgeous looks.”
“Click through the gallery above to see all the red carpet arrivals and get pumped for the full show!”
“Plus, with Tracee Ellis Ross hosting the show, there’s sure to be a ton of laughs.”
“This year’s AMAs are sure to be a star-studded show, with Selena Gomez, Pink, Kelly Clarkson, Demi Lovato, Shawn Mendes, Christina Aguilera and more set to hit the stage for epic performances.”
“She went braless underneath the outfit, risking a major wardrobe malfunction, but rocked the style with confidence on the carpet.”
“One of the more shocking early looks was from Bleona Qereti, who showed a ton of skin in a silver, metallic ensemble, which featured high-waisted bottoms and a blazer, held together only by a belt in the middle.”
“The actress wore her dark hair in loose waves, and looked flawless.”
“Also among the first to show up was Laura Marano, who stunned in a shimmering red gown, that showed off her fabulous figure to perfection.”


“?”
"Hollywood stars, who do you think is the best performer at the American Music Awards?"
"With more and more celebrities coming, we will keep updating, so please continue to look back, refreshing and see all the gorgeous shapes."
"Click on the gallery above, you can see all the red carpet audience and feel excited for the whole exhibition!"
"In addition, Tracy Ellis Ross hosts the show, and there's bound to be a lot of laughter."
"This year's AMAS is sure to be a star studded show, with Serena Gomez, Pinker, Kelly Clarkson, Demi Lovato, Sean Mendes, Christina Aguilera on the epic stage."
"She wore the suit, risked a major break down in the wardrobe, but confidently changed her style on the carpet."
"A more shocking early look is from bleona qereti, who shows a ton of silver, metal ensemble, which has a high waist, hip and jacket, held only in the middle of the belt."
The actress combed her black hair in waves and looked flawless
"One of the first to appear was Laura Marano, who wore a sparkling red robe and showed her charming figure incisively and vividly."



Number  229
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Proceeds go to Samaritan’s Purse.”
“1 on the Christian iTunes chart.”
“Gifford had just learned her tune “He Saw Jesus,” which she wrote for late husband Frank Gifford, reach No.”
“It brought the entire crowd to tears.”Megyn Kelly, Sheinelle Jones, Dylan Dreyer and Al Roker were all cheering Kotb on.”
“Hoda shared her emotional journey that led her to adopting her daughter, Haley [Joy].”
“Kathie talked about Hoda’s infectious spirit and their deep friendship.”
“.”
“...of the Year lunch a spy said It was a real tearjerker...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window When Kathie Lee Gifford honored her Today co host and close friend Hoda Kotb at the American Cancer Society s Mother...”


"The proceeds go to the Samaritans."
"Number one on the Christian iTunes list."
Gifford has just learned her tune "he saw Jesus," which she wrote for her late husband Frank Gifford
Megan Kelly, shanell Jones, Dylan Dreyer and Al rock are all cheering for Kotb
"Hetian shared her emotional experience of adopting her daughter, Haley (Joey),"
"Cathy talked about Hotan's infectious spirit and their deep friendship."
“.”
“… Lunch of the year a spy said it was a real tear jerker
"Click send this email to a friend to open in a new window click Share on Twitter to open in a new window click Share on Facebook to open in a new window when Kathie Lee Gifford's mother at the American cancer society today honored her co host and close friend Hoda Kotb..."



Number  230
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As well as Metcalf, Janney also beat out Lesley Manville (Phantom Thread), Octavia Spencer (The Shape of Water), and Mary J Blige (Mudbound).”
“At the Oscars, 58-year-old Janney added another trophy to her collection after sweeping the Golden Globes, Baftas, Critics’ Choice, and Screen Actors Guild awards.”
“I, Tonya tells the story of Harding, the disgraced American figure skater who was banned from the sport after an investigation into her involvement in an attack on rival Olympian Nancy Kerrigan.”
“Janney was previously best known for playing White House press secretary CJ Cregg in The West Wing.”
“In the blackly comic Tonya Harding biopic directed by Craig Gillespie, Janney plays the figure-skating prodigy’s chain-smoking, domineering mother.”
“In her acceptance speech, Janney joked “I did it all myself!” before going on to thank her collaborators on the film, as well as veteran actor Joanne Woodward, with whom she appeared in the 1993 TV movie Blind Spot.”
“Nominated for an Oscar for the first time, the veteran took the award ahead of Laurie Metcalf of Lady Bird, who was considered Janney’s closest competition in the category.”
“Allison Janney has won the Oscar for best supporting actress at the 90th annual Academy Awards for her brash turn as LaVona Golden in I, Tonya.”


"In addition to Metcalf, Jennie beat Leslie Manville (phantom line), Octavia Spencer (the shape of the water) and Mary blich (muddy)," he said
At the Oscars, the 58 year old added a trophy to her collection after sweeping the Golden Globes, the British Academy of film awards, the choice of Critics Awards and the Screen Actors Guild Awards
"I, Tonya, tell the story of Harding, a discredited American figure skater who was banned from the sport for attacking rival Olympic athlete Nancy krigan."
"Jennie used to be best known for playing CJ Cregg, White House press secretary, on the West Wing of the White House."
In the black cartoon Tony Harding's biography directed by Craig Gillespie, Jennie plays the mother of figure skating prodigy, a smoking, bossy mother
In her acceptance speech, Jennie joked: "I made it all myself! "Before that, I would like to thank her collaborator and veteran actress Joanne Woodward, who starred with Joanne Woodward in the 1993 TV movie blind spot."
The veteran won the first Oscar nomination, ahead of Mrs. bird's Laurie Metcalf, who is considered to be Jennie's closest rival in the award
Alison Jennie won the best supporting actress award at the 90th Academy Awards for her bold performance as ravner in I, Tongya



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite the recent tough circumstances, it’s good to see Liam and Miley keeping each other close and remembering what’s most important.”
“He expressed his sympathy for others who lost their homes and gratitude for the firefighters who worked endlessly to contain and stop the fire from spreading.”
“Liam visited the site of the rubble after the fire and posted a heartbreaking photo that showed a LOVE sign, the only thing still left in tact from their home.”
“In his caption, Billy, of course, was referring to the recent devastating California wildfires that took lives and destroyed so many homes, including Miley and Liam’s Malibu home.”
“Peace and love to all,” Billy’s caption read.”
“My thoughts and prayers with so many hearts that need mended.”
““Thankful for this moment.”
“Miley’s dad Billy Ray Cyrus took to Instagram to share a photo of Miley smiling and sitting with everyone in front of her birthday cake.”
“In addition to writing his loving post, Liam spent Miley’s birthday with her and her family.”
“❤️,” the caption read.”


"It's good to see Liam and Miley stay close to each other and remember the most important things, despite the difficult situation recently."
"He sympathizes with other people who have lost their homes and thanks the firefighters for their unremitting efforts to contain and stop the spread of the fire."
"Liam visited the ruins after the fire and posted a heartbreaking photo showing a sign of love, the only thing left in their family."
"In his note, Billy was referring, of course, to the recent devastating wildfire in California, which killed many people and destroyed many houses, including the Malibu home of Miley and Liam."
"Peace and love to all," Billy's headline reads
"My thoughts and prayers, there are so many hearts to repair."
"Thank you for this moment."
"Miley's father, Billy Ray Cyrus, shared a picture of Miley smiling and sitting in front of the birthday cake on instagram."
"In addition to writing fraternity posts, Liam also spent Miley's birthday with Miley and her family."
“ ❤️ "The title is."



Number  232
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““[Social media is] kind of like cotton candy: It looks so appealing and you just can’t resist getting in there, and then you just end up with sticky fingers and it lasted an instant,” she said.”
“Roberts’ Instagram account is surprising as she told Marie Claire in 2013 that she thought social media as an “appealing” yet “sticky” cotton candy.”
“Rebel Wilson, Amber Rose and Entertainment Tonight host Carly Steel all took selfies with the actress.”
“Roberts made an appearance of plenty of Instagram pages last month after attending Taylor Swift’s show at the Rose Bowl in Pasadena, California.”
“While this is the mother of three’s first time sharing a social media post of her own, it’s far from the first time she’s been featured on other celebrity Instagrams.”
““Hello☀,” Roberts wrote in the caption.”
“The Oscar-winning actress, 50, shared her first social media post on Tuesday in which she showed off her iconic smile while wearing a black sweatshirt reading “Love.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Says 'Hello' to Instagram with a Radiant Smile and LoveRejoice, Julia Roberts is finally on Instagram!”
“Julia Roberts shared her first social media post on Tuesday in which she showed off her iconic smile while wearing a black sweatshirt reading "Love"Julia Roberts (Finally!)”


"It's kind of like marshmallow: it looks very attractive, you can't help going in, and then your fingers get sticky and last for a moment," she said
"Roberts' instagram account is amazing because she told Mary Claire in 2013 that she thinks social media is an" attractive "but" sticky "marshmallow."
"Rebellious Wilson, amber rose and Entertainment Tonight host Carly steel all take selfies with actresses."
"Roberts had a lot of pages on instagram last month after joining Taylor Swift at the Rose Bowl in Pasadena, California."
"While this is the first time the mother of three has shared her social media post, it's far from the first time she's appeared on other celebrity instagram."
"Hello ☀ "Roberts wrote in the title."
On Tuesday, the 50 year old Oscar winner posted her first post on social media, in which she wore a black sweatshirt with the words "love" on it, displaying her trademark smile. Get news, feature, etc
"Say 'hello' to instagram, with a big smile and joy on her face, and Julia Roberts is finally on instagram!"
Julia Roberts shared her first social media post on Tuesday, wearing a black sweatshirt with the words "love" Julia Roberts (finally!) "



Number  233
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  234
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When asked if her husband was happy, Mackenzie said, “[He] was so excited, he couldn’t contain himself.””
“In an April episode of Teen Mom OG, Mackenzie confirmed her pregnancy when she showed a positive test to producer Jeni, who quickly hugged and congratulated her.”
“...she saysTeen Mom OG’s Ryan Edwards checked himself into rehab during his wife’s pregnancy.”
“The 30-year-old MTV star was absent from Monday night’s episode, but his wife, Mackenzie Standifer, revealed where the father of two was when a producer, David, asked.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He has checked himself into a longterm — ” Standifer began to say before allowing her mother-in-law, Jen, to explain.”
““It’s called a 90-day intensive rehab facility,” Jen said.”
““We can’t talk to him for seven days.”
“They’re pretty strict.”
“Two phone calls a week, 10 minutes [for each phone call].”Edwards’ father, Larry, added that the reality star “just knew he needed to go.”“He picked the [rehab] place.”


"When asked if her husband was happy, McKenzie said," he's too excited to control himself. "
"In April's episode of young mom og, McKenzie showed producer Jennie a positive test result, and Jennie quickly hugged and congratulated her, confirming her pregnancy."
“… She said Ryan Edwards of Steen mom og put himself in rehab while his wife was pregnant
The 30-year-old MTV star was absent from Monday night's show, but his wife, Mackenzie standifer, revealed where the father of the two children was when producer David asked
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"He's settled in," he began before asking his mother-in-law Jan to explain
"It's called the 90 day intensive rehabilitation center," Zhan said
"We can't talk to him for seven days."
"They are very strict."
"Make two 10 minute calls a week." Edwards' father, Larry, added that the reality star "only knew he needed to go." "He chose the rehabilitation center."



Number  235
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The star has since expanded her brand and is now one of the most promising stars in Hollywood.”
“Now, Maddie Ziegler has noted that she is a lot happier after leaving the reality dance television series even though the hit show catapulted her to stardom.”
“However, their teacher-student relationship suddenly changed when “The Book of Henry” actress and her younger sister Mackenzie Ziegler decided to quit “Dance Moms” to focus on their individual careers outside the Lifetime show.”
“It can be recalled that Maddie Ziegler and the 50-year-old dance instructor and choreographer used to be close.”
“...was surprised with Abby Lee Miller s fraud and money laundering cases Maddie opted not to say anything about her former mentor at all...”
“Maddie wants nothing to do with former Dance Moms mentor In the same interview Maddie Ziegler was also asked if she was still in contact with the famously tough dance teacher and she quickly said no When asked if she...”
“However, the 14-year-old dancer, actress, model, and businesswoman would rather not talk about Abby Lee Miller or say nothing but bad things about her.”
““But Jack is really great and I have a good time with him.”Maddie Ziegler is clearly smitten with Jack Kelly and she is always smiling when talking about her boyfriend.”
“"I would never want things to move too quick and plus I know I'm still 14, I'm still a child,” Maddie Ziegler shared to Entertainment Tonight.”
“The pair has been sharing photos of them together and adding sweet messages on the snaps, but Maddie recently revealed that she's taking things slow with her beau.”


"The star has since expanded his brand and is now one of the most promising stars in Hollywood."
"Now, Maddie Ziegler has noticed that she's much happier after leaving the reality TV Dance Series, even though the hit shows have made her a star."
However, when McKenzie Ziegler, the heroine of the book of Henry, and her sister decided to quit the dancer and focus on their own career, their teacher-student relationship suddenly changed
"As you can recall, Maddie Ziegler and the 50 year old dance coach and choreographer were very close."
“…… Surprised by Abby Lee Miller's fraud and money laundering cases, Mandy chose not to mention a word to her former mentor... "
In the same interview, Maddie Ziegler was also asked if she was still in touch with the dance teacher, who is known for her toughness
"However, the 14-year-old dancer, actress, model and businesswoman would rather not talk about Abby Lee Miller than say anything bad about her."
"But Jack is really great. I have a good time with him." Maddie Ziegler is obviously fascinated by Jack Kelly and always smiles when she talks about her boyfriend
"I never want things to go too fast, and I know I'm still 14 years old, I'm still a child," Maddie Ziegler said on tonight's entertainment show
"The two have been sharing their photos together and adding sweet messages to them, but Marty recently revealed that she and her boyfriend get along very slowly."



Number  236
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Oh, to be a fly on that wall because...”
“Lamar and Chyna hanging out together inside the party, because this is the world we live in.”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“This is the kind of thing you can't make up.”
“When Tyga, Blac Chyna, and Lamar Odom all got the invite to attend the iGO.live launch event at the Beverly Wilshire Hotel on Wednesday, they all RSVP'd yes.”
“That's right, three KarJenner exes (formerly the loves of Kylie Jenner (and, well, Blac Chyna), Rob Kardashian and Khloe Kardashian, respectively) all showed up to the same event -- and we have the photos to prove it.”
“Blac Chyna at the event in L.A. on Wednesday, also attended by......Tyga......and Lamar Odom.”
“In fact, Lamar and Chyna were even photographed together inside the bash, which was also attended by The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills' Dorit Kemsley, Hailey Baldwin, Pepa (of Salt-n-Papa fame, duh!”
“), Fifth Harmony, and Ashley Benson.”
“Wait, did we forget to mention there was yet another person connected to the KarJenners who partied at the bash?”


"Oh, I'm a fly on the wall because..."
"Lamar and ziner hang out in the party because this is the world we live in."
"Create a free profile to get unlimited exclusive videos, raffles, etc!"
"It's something you can't make up for."
"When tiga, Blake Zina and Lamar Odom were all invited to play iGO.live At the company's press conference at Beverly Hills Hotel on Wednesday, they all answered "yes"
"Yes, three of kajana's ex girlfriends (Kelly Jenna's ex girlfriend, and Blake chener's ex girlfriend), rob Kardashian and Carol Kardashian's ex girlfriends) all showed up at the same event - we have photos to prove that."
"Blake chener attended the event in Los Angeles on Wednesday, and TEGA And Lamar Odom. "
"In fact, Lamar and Zina were even photographed together at the ball, with dorit Kemsley of Beverly Hills, Haley Baldwin and the Real Housewives of salt-n-papa
"Fifth harmony, and Ashley Benson."
"Wait, did we forget to mention that there was another person who had something to do with the kajenas at the party?"



Number  237
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“EXCLUSIVE Ben Affleck s New Girlfriend Lindsay Shookus Split From Husband A While Ago Source Says The 44 year old actor was set to star in the upcoming Netflix film Triple Frontier but is now departing the feature to take some time to focus on his wellness and his family...”
“...according to Deadline...”
“The thriller, directed by JC Chandor, will replace the actor and continue without him.”
“No word on what specifically made Affleck drop out, but he is still expected to make an appearance at Comic-Con this week to promote part one of Justice League, out in November.”
“ET reached out to Affleck's rep for comment.”
“RELATED: Ben Affleck Arrives Solo to Charity Gala in 1st Red Carpet Appearance Since Lindsay Shookus Romance NewsIn March, Affleck revealed in an intimate Facebook post that he had completed rehab and was taking the necessary steps for a "positive recovery."”
“"I have completed treatment for alcohol addiction; something I've dealt with in the past and will continue to confront.”
“I want to live life to the fullest and be the best father I can be," he wrote.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Ben Affleck's new girlfriend Lindsay shookus broke up with her husband not long ago. According to sources, the 44 year old actor originally planned to play in the upcoming Netflix film triple frontier, but now he wants to leave the film and spend some time focusing on his health and family..."
“… Based on the deadline... "
"The thriller, directed by JC Chandler, will replace the hero and continue without him."
"It's not clear what caused Affleck to drop out, but he is still expected to appear at this week's comic show to promote the first part of the justice alliance, which was launched in November."
"Et contacted the representative of Affleck for advice."
Related reports: Ben Affleck, who made his debut on the red carpet since Lindsay shookus reported on the romantic news in March, revealed in a close Facebook article that he had completed rehabilitation treatment and was taking the necessary measures to "actively recover."
"I've finished my treatment for alcohol addiction; it's a problem I've dealt with in the past and I'll continue to face it."
"I want to live to the fullest and be the best father," he wrote



Number  238
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So at least in that respect, Bryan’s off to a good start as her future husband.”
“Rachel’s engagement ring on The Bachelorette is blingy for sure, but without being flashy or too over the top and I’d expect nothing less from someone who is already a Bachelorette favorite for so many fans.”
“...or their partners...”
“For years, Neil Lane has been the prime source for the franchise’s engagement rings and that doesn’t seem to be changing anytime soon.”
“So, how much was Rachel’s engagement ring on The Bachelorette?”
“ABC spared no expense for true love and for Season 13 it was the same deal even though it s not confirmed if Neil Lane gifts the show with his rings for the publicity or if ABC busts out some...”
“...hefty petty cash for them each season...”
“Despite Rachel preferring a plain wedding band over a big old rock, she described another version of her dream ring and Bryan was able to pick one out from Lane’s selection, as per usual.”
“And, like always, it didn’t come cheap.”
“According to E!”


"So at least in this respect, Brian has made a good start as her future husband."
"Rachel's engagement ring on a bachelor must be very bright, but it's neither flashy nor exaggerated. I expect the same from someone who is already a bachelor's favorite."
“… Or their partner... "
"For many years, Neil lane has been the main source of engagement rings for franchise stores, and that doesn't seem to change in the near future."
"So, how much is Rachel's engagement ring on a bachelor?"
"ABC has spared no effort to pay the price for true love, and so has season 13, although it has not yet been confirmed that Neil Ryan gave the ring to the show for publicity, or that ABC messed up some of it..."
“… There's a lot of pocket money every season... "
"Although Rachel prefers a simple wedding ring to a big stone, she describes another version of her dream ring, and Brian chooses one of Ryan's choices as usual."
"And, as always, it's not cheap."
"According to e!"



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She has that country twang, but she also has this other back home, down the road, thing.”Watch the full clip:”
“So it is amazing to see her shine,” she told Fallon.”
““I love Kelly…I never knew she had all this amazing personality.”
““Now his latest beatbox is around the word ‘avocado.’ He has a thing!”Keys also gushed about her love for her fellow Voice coach Kelly Clarkson.”
““He just started doing, he just kind of started getting his own flow,” Keys said of her son’s adorable talent.”
“Her husband, producer Swizz Beatz, posted the video, taken when Genesis was just 2 years old.”
“Alicia Keys stopped by The Tonight Show Thursday and shared an adorable video of her youngest son, Genesis, showing off his beatboxing skills.”
“Musical talent apparently runs in the family!”


"She has that kind of local accent, but she also has another kind of hometown. On the way, things are different." Look at the full clip:
"It's great to see her shine," she told Fallon
"I love Kelly I never knew she had such an amazing personality
"Now his latest Beatles are around the word 'avocado'. He has something! "Keith goes on and on saying that she loves her co voice coach, Kelly Clarkson."
"He just started to do it, he just started to have his own ideas," case said of her son's lovely talent
"Her husband, producer Swizz Beatz, released the video when genesis was two years old."
"Alicia case went to the tonight show on Thursday and shared a lovely video in which her youngest son, genesis, showed off his boxing skills."
"Musical talent is obviously inherited by the family!"



Number  240
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News, in early December, Peth relocated to New York City, while Nolan remained in Seattle.”
“According to E!”
“Rainier and reflecting and I was like, ‘Dang, I love this girl.’ ”The couple had been doing long distance.”
““There was one morning where we were drinking coffee on the porch looking at Mt.”
“...once I went to Seattle and saw her friends and family it definitely was seeing her heart connect with her loved ones and her animals Peth told PEOPLE at the time...”
“Image zoom Derek Peth and Taylor Nolan on Bachelor in Paradise Credit Paul Hebert ABC Getty RELATED VIDEO See the Classic Engagement Ring Derek Peth Gave Taylor Nolan on Bachelor in Paradise Paradise was amazing I definitely had started to fall in love with Taylor while we were there but...”
“They hit it off immediately and Peth popped the question on the reunion show in late August.”
“Nolan, a Bachelor alum from Nick Viall‘s season, and Peth, a Bachelorette alum from JoJo Fletcher‘s season, met on season 4 of Paradise last summer.”
“News was the first to report the split.”
“Image zoom Derek Peth and Taylor Nolan | Credit: Owen Hoffmann/Patrick McMullan/Getty ImagesE!”


"News, in early December, Perth moved to New York City, and Nolan stayed in Seattle."
"According to e!"
"It's raining harder and I think, 'damn, I love this girl.'" The couple have been on a long journey
"One morning, we had coffee on the porch and looked at the mountain."
“… I once went to Seattle and saw her friends and family. I must have seen her heart connect with her loved ones and her animals. Perth told people at that time... "
"Derek PEth and Taylor Nolan's picture about bachelor in heaven zoom Paul Hebert ABC Getty related video it's great to see Derek PEth's classic engagement ring for Taylor Nolan about bachelor in heaven. I'm sure I fell in love with Taylor when I was there, but..."
"They soon got along, and Perth raised the issue in the late August reunion show."
"Nolan is Nick Villar's single alumni of the season, and Perth is Joe Fletcher's single alumni of the season, who met in the fourth season of Paradise last summer."
"The news was the first to report the breakup."
Image zooming Derek Perth and Tyler Nolan credit: Owen Hoffman / Patrick McMullen / Getty Images e! "



Number  241
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hope you find a super adorable puppy!”
“Enjoy the city, you two.”
“This time, it didn't take much to muster up all of the lovey dovey feels — just two black jackets.”
“A photo of Selena Gomez and The Weeknd's matching outfits takes #relationshipgoals to new levels and proves a tough but chic look is a perfect date ensemble.”
“The lovebirds hit New York City on Saturday, Sept. 2 — the first fall-like day in the Big Apple — with black garb that's perfect for the cooler days ahead.”
“Gomez's biker jacket sported a punk rock look that she complimented with a dash of red thanks to (presumably) one of her designer Coach bags.”
“The Weeknd's jacket sported a more casual feel.”
“The two, ironically enough, headed for The Vintage Twin in SoHo, so they had the whole twinning thing on lock.”
“Since it was one of the first days in New York where you needed a jacket, you gotta hit the downtown streets in style.”
“These two were totally up for the challenge and didn't overdo the whole "it's getting cold" look.”


"I hope you can find a super cute puppy!"
"Enjoy the city, you two."
"This time, it didn't take long to put all the lovely pigeons together - just two black jackets."
"A photo of Selena Gomez and this week's outfit takes relationship goals to a new level, proving that a strong but chic look is a perfect date combination."
"Saturday, September 2, it's the first autumn in New York, and the black dress is perfect for cool weather."
"Gomez's motorcycle jacket sports punk rock style, which she praised with a red dash thanks (presumably) to one of her designer coaching bags."
"The weekend jacket gives a more casual feel."
"Ironically, the two went to the old double room in Soho, so they locked up the whole double room."
"Because it's your first day in New York, you need a jacket, so you have to walk in the streets of the city center in style."
"The two men were fully prepared for the challenge and didn't show" it's getting cold. "



Number  242
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The former Glee star revealed on June 20 via Instagram that Zolciak sent the couple a box of “goodies” and called the gift “so thoughtful.”With reporting by Brody Brown...”
“My ask, believe, receive, like the way I walk, the way I talk, that’s just how I live.”Despite Zolciak and Leakes’ rocky history, the two women appeared to temporarily put their differences aside last month when Leakes announced that her husband, Gregg Leakes, was diagnosed with cancer.”
“Kim Zolciak caused an uproar with fans when she released a new song titled “Wig,” on Wednesday, July 11, but despite rumors that the track was inspired by her Real Housewives of Atlanta frenemy NeNe Leakes, the singer exclusively tells Us Weekly that the anthem is not about her costar.”
““Well, I mean, I’ve worn wigs long before I ever met NeNe.”
“I love wigs,” the Don’t Be Tardy star, 40, tells Us.”
““My mom’s a hairdresser.”
“I just love hair.”
“I have great hair.”
“I just love to like, play around with different hair and different styles, and I’d rather fry the s—t out of a wig than my own hair.”
“… I’ve been wearing wigs for 17 years.”


The former glee star revealed through instagram on June 20 that zorsiak had given the couple a box of "candy" and called the gift "too thoughtful."
"My way of asking, believing and accepting is just like the way I walk and speak. This is my way of life." Despite zorchak's and Alex's precarious history, the two women seemed to have put their differences on hold when Alex announced last month that her husband, Greg Rex, had been diagnosed with cancer
"On Wednesday, July 11, Kim zorchak released a new song called wig, which caused an uproar among fans. But despite rumors that the song was inspired by her real Atlanta housewife, Nene leaves, the singer told us weekly exclusively that the song was not about her partner."
"Well, I mean, I've been wearing a wig for a long time, and I haven't met Nathan yet."
"I love wigs," the 40 year old star told us
"My mother is a barber."
"I just like hair."
"My hair is great."
"I just like to play with different hairstyles and styles. I'd rather blow the S-T out of my wig than my hair."
"I've been wearing wigs for 17 years."



Number  243
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s What Can Be Done About It”,”reading_time”:12}]};”
“\u201cI knew that they were going to have to downsize, and I knew that because I was the last one hired, I was going to be the first one […]”,”hub”:{“hub_title”:”In the Americans Are Still Struggling to Get Their Benefits.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports the time Grace Williams was let go from her job as a financial aid counselor last fall, she had seen the writing on the wall.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Bet Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“This NFL Pro Has Some Financial Advice for you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”
““,”hub”:{“hub_title”:”In the Bowl LV Winners Got a Cash Bonus.”
“...const FP = you\u2019re an NFL player signing multi-million dollar contracts or earning a normal salary, Brandon Copeland says this is what you should do.”


"Here's what you can do", "reading time: 12};"
"I know that they will have to lay off their staff, and I also know that because I am the last one to be employed, I will be the first [...] ]In the United States, they are still trying to get benefits
"Here's what we know about legal sports. When grace Williams was relieved of her position as financial aid adviser last fall, she saw the handwriting on the wall."
"Here's what you should know about the Super Bowl LV bet."
"This NFL professional gave you some financial advice to make money from sports betting before the super bowl?"
"," hub ": {" hub / u title ":" Lv winner in the bowl gets cash bonus. "
“… Const FP = if you're an NFL player, signed a multimillion dollar contract, or earned a regular salary, Brandon Copeland said, "that's what you should do."



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her mother, Kris Jenner, will also be in attendance to welcome the birth of her ninth grandchild.”
“Us Weekly exclusively reported that Kardashian will give birth in Ohio, where she and Thompson, who plays for the Cleveland Cavaliers, share a home.”
“She also revealed that her computer and charger, camera and favorite Barefoot Dreams blanket are also packed up.”
“The Revenge Body star shared on her app on Friday, April 6, that her hospital bag is ready to go with “lots of comfy things” for her and the baby, including going-home outfits for both.”
“In the meantime, the always-organized reality personality is keeping busy finalizing last-minute details before the big day.”
“...series.”
“She revealed the baby’s gender on an episode of the hit E!”
“A post shared by Khloe Kardashian Snapchats❕ (@khloesnapchats) on Apr 7, 2018 at 10:41pm PDTKardashian also shared selfies using other filters, including one she captioned, “Bored AF.”The Strong Looks Better Naked author is expecting her first child — a girl — with boyfriend Tristan Thompson any day now.”
“...during labor...”
“In one shot she rocked back and forth on an exercise ball while using the app s bunny filter and said Birthing ball life em hmm The ball is commonly used by pregnant women to relieve back pain and is said to help get the baby into a better position...”


"Her mother, Kris Jenner, will also be present to welcome the birth of her ninth grandson."
According to the exclusive report of American weekly, Kardashian will give birth in Ohio, where she lives with Thompson, who plays for the Cleveland Cavaliers
"She also revealed that her computer and charger, her camera and her favorite barefoot blanket were all packed."
On Friday, April 6, the avenging star said on her app that her medical bag was ready to provide "a lot of comfortable things" for her and her baby, including two people's home clothes
"At the same time, people who are always in good order are busy finalizing the details at the last minute before the big day comes."
“… Series. "
"She's on the hit e!"
Post shared by Kardashian ❕  (@ khloesnapchats) at 10:41 pm on April 7, 2018, Kardashian shared her photos with other filters, one of which was titled "boring AF". The strong naked writer expects her first child - a girl - to be with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson at any time
“… During childbirth... "
"Once, while using the app's rabbit filter, she swayed back and forth on a sports ball, and said that the delivery ball is commonly used by pregnant women to relieve back pain, which is said to help put the baby in a better position..."



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While I’ve certainly had my complaints, I’d rather be entertained by Scandal’s actual alternate reality than the one logical one presented in “The Decision.” Fitz may tell Olivia that she was right to stop the Defiance plan at the end of the episode, but I disagree.”
“One where Fitz and Mellie are somehow Republicans who fight for gun control and Planned Parenthood.”
“Olivia killed a man with a wheel chair.”
“AdvertisementIt’s fair to criticize Scandal’s later seasons for losing focus on what made the show great.”
“It’s enjoyably over the top, but most importantly, the actual stories being told in this Alternate Scandal-land are boring.”
“Mellie and Cyrus get married.”
“Abby and David stay together.”
“Huck never learns to shave.”
“Quinn escapes Olivia’s orbit and remains Lindsay, the reality star.”
“Fitz and Olivia get married.”


"Although I certainly have my complaints, I would rather be entertained by the reality of the scandal instead of the logical reality proposed in the decision. Fitz may tell Olivia that she's right to stop fighting at the end of the episode, but I don't agree
"Fitz and Melly are somehow Republicans, fighting for gun control and family planning."
"Olivia killed a man in a wheelchair."
"It's fair that the advertising criticism of the last few seasons of scandal doesn't focus on what makes the show great."
"It's too much, but most of all, the real story in this other scandalous place is boring."
"Melly and Cyrus are married."
"Abby and David stay together."
"Huck never learned to shave."
"Quinn has escaped Olivia's orbit and is still reality TV star Lindsay."
"Fitz and Olivia are married."



Number  246
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My actions alleged in the police report do not reflect my core values and my law abiding character.””
“Police say de Lesseps slammed a door and kicked at least one officer.”
“News at the launch of her Skinnygirl Jeans line in New York City on Tuesday night, adding that the two have “been texting.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She said she’s in a good place, so you know, like I said, we all have our flaws,” continued Frankel, 47.”
““Luann’s no different.”
“We all have high points low points times we feel confident times we feel less confident and so but I m sorry she s not here Image zoom Luann de Lesseps left and Bethenny Frankel Credit Cindy Ord Getty De Lesseps 52 was arrested in the early morning hours of...”
“Dec 24 after attacking a police officer in Palm Beach nearly a year after she wed now ex husband Tom D Agostino at the Florida destination...”
“She was charged with disorderly intoxication, battery on an officer/firefighter/EMT, resisting arrest with violence and threatening a public servant, according to the Palm Beach County Sheriff’s Office.”
“The Bravo star has pleaded not guilty.”
“She had been discovered trespassing in a hotel room with an unidentified man, according to a police report.”


"The conduct I allege in the police report does not reflect my core values and law-abiding character."
"Police said that dreisepps slammed a door and kicked at least one police officer."
On Tuesday night, she launched the skinny girl jeans line in New York City, adding that the two "have been texting.". Get news, features, etc
Frankel, 47, continued: "she said she was in a good position, so you know, as I said, we all have our own shortcomings."
"So is Luan."
"We all have ups and downs, when we feel confident, we don't feel so confident, so I'm sorry that she's not here. Picture zoom LuAnn de Lesseps left and Bethenny Frankel credit cindio degeti de Lesseps was arrested in the early morning of 52..."
"On December 24, nearly a year after attacking a police officer in Palm Beach, she married her ex husband Tom Agostino at her destination in Florida..."
"According to the Palm Beach County Sheriff's office, she was charged with alcoholism, beating a police officer / firefighter / first aider, resisting arrest with violence and threatening a civil servant."
"Bravo star pleads not guilty."
"According to police reports, she was found breaking into a hotel room illegally with an unidentified man."



Number  247
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Roc Nation/Parkwood EntertainmentImage zoom Credit: Roc Nation/Parkwood Entertainment“Family Feud” is far from JAY-Z’s first video featuring some Hollywood heavyweights.”
“...scenes of infidelity political turmoil and murder...”
“RELATED VIDEO JAY Z on Beyoncé Infidelity The Hardest Thing Is Seeing Pain on Someone s Face That You Caused The Carters are featured in the last three minutes of the eight minute footage after Chastain Ferrera Thandie Newton Michael B Jordan Omari Hardwick David Oyelowo and more act out...”
“Celebrities like America Ferrera, Jessica Chastain, and Janet Mock — all who made cameos in the clip — also posted pics from the set once the video was released exclusively on Tidal.”
“Image zoom Credit: Roc Nation/Parkwood EntertainmentImage zoom Credit: Roc Nation/Parkwood EntertainmentBeyoncé wasn’t the only one sharing behind-the-scenes “Family Feud” photos on Instagram.”
“...across from his wife to confess his sins...”
“The Ava DuVernay directed video for his 4 44 single Family Feud tells a story over more than 400 years beginning in the year 2444 and going backwards to the present day of 2018 where the rapper walks his daughter Blue Ivy into a church before stepping into a confessional...”
“JAY-Z brought in many of his famous friends to star in the visual accompaniment to the song in which he confirms he cheated on wife Beyoncé.”
“Image zoom Credit: Roc Nation/Parkwood EntertainmentImage zoom Credit: Roc Nation/Parkwood EntertainmentOf course, there are plenty of glamour shots of the former Destiny’s Child member and her over-the-top outfits — including the flowing white coat with oversized puffy sleeves that took Twitter by storm.”
“Pictures from filming show that while the subject matter might have been tough, the set was filmed with happy moments, with JAY-Z sharing laughs with Blue in a few shots.”


"Credit for image zooming: ROC nation / Parkwood entertainment credit for image zooming: ROC nation / Parkwood entertainment family grudge is far from Jay-Z's first Hollywood heavyweight video."
“…… Scenes of infidelity, political unrest and murder... "
"The hardest thing to do is to see the pain on someone's face, the cartel you cause is eight minutes after the camera shot, chastan Ferreira sadi Newton, Michael B Jordan Omari hadwick, David oyelovo and more behaviors come out after the last three minutes feature..."
"Celebrities like Ferreira, Jessica chastan and Janet Mook - all guest stars in this video - also released photos of the set after the exclusive release of the video in tide."
"Credit for image zooming: ROC nation / Parkwood entertainment credit for image zooming: ROC nation / Parkwood entertainment Beyonce is not the only one to share behind the scenes" family feud "photos on instagram."
“… Confessing his crime in front of his wife... "
"The video directed by EVA duvinai for his 444 single families tells a story of more than 400 years. From 2444 to 2018, the rapper takes his daughter, blue ivy, into the church and then into the confessional room..."
"Jay-Z invited many famous friends to play in the visual accompaniment of the song. He confirmed that he cheated his wife Beyonce."
"Credit for image zooming: ROC nation / Parkwood entertainment credit for image zooming: ROC nation / Parkwood entertainment of course, there are many charming photos of the former son of destiny and her super tall clothes, including elegant white coat and oversized fluffy sleeves, which make twitter look impressive."
"The photos show that although the subject matter may be difficult, the shooting scene is full of happy moments. In several photos, Jay-Z and blue share laughter."



Number  248
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Not there – I came home and lost another 20 lbs., and I keep going.””
“...and all told, I lost close to 50 lbs.”
“The actor, who stars on Lifetime’s critically acclaimed series UnREAL, told reporters at the Television Critics Association summer press tour that he had lost 70 lbs.”
“...between seasons — a weight loss meant to show the struggles his character Jeremy has been facing after helping orchestrate a car crash that appeared to kill a producer and undercover journalist in the season 2 finale.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I lost 70 pounds after the second season,” Kelly said, per The Hollywood Reporter.”
““[Jeremy’s] dealing subconsciously but he’s not yet dealing with, consciously, the fact that he may or may not have killed people.”
“You know when someone’s clean sober but clearly something’s up in their head?”
“They’re like, ‘No, but look, I’m totally fine.”
“Look, I’m skinny, everything’s good.’ ”Image zoom Credit: Michael Stewart/WireImage;Image zoom Credit: Michael Stewart/WireImage; Michael Tran/FilmMagicJeremy has had a tough road on UnREAL.”


"Not there - I went home and lost another 20 pounds, and I kept walking."
"All in all, I lost nearly 50 pounds."
The actor, who starred in the acclaimed series "unreal life," told reporters during the TV Review Association's summer reporter tour that he lost 70 pounds
“… Between the two seasons - losing weight is to show his character that Jeremy has been fighting after helping to plan a car accident that seems to have killed the producer and undercover reporter at the end of the second season. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I lost 70 pounds after the second season," Kelly said, according to a Hollywood Reporter
"(Jeremy) subconsciously deals with it, but he has not consciously dealt with the fact that he may or may not kill."
"You know, when a person is awake, it's obvious what's going on in his head?"
"They said," no, but you see, I'm fine. "
"Look, I'm thin. Everything's fine." "Image zooming credit: Michael Stewart / WireImage; image zooming credit: Michael Stewart / WireImage; Michael Trane / filmmagic Jeremy. It's a hard road on the unreal."



Number  249
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kardashian avoided spilling her sisters' secrets.”
“The other Kardashian sisters also said in the episode what they were “thankful” for and how exciting it was to see the next generation of Kardashian dynasty.”
“In a special holiday episode of “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” on Sunday, the Kardashian matriarch talked about her growing family and her love for her grandchildren, E!”
“News reported.”
“Though Kim Kardashian, 37, confirmed she will be having a baby via a surrogate, Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Kylie Jenner, 20, have not publicly addressed reports that they are both expecting.”
“"I used to pray that one of you guys would have a baby and now it's like a faucet that we turned on and won't turn off,” Jenner said during the family dinner.”
“The fact that I have all these grandchildren it s been the most amazing journey to watch your kids because it s truly the meaning of just life KEEPING UP WITH THE KARDASHIANS STARS GET MAJOR PAY RAISE RENEWED THROUGH 2019 Jenner added One of my favorite traditions during the...”
“...holidays is to shop for all the kids for Christmas and now it s extra special because I get to shop for all the grandkids It never seems to end which is exciting she said...”
“"I don't know if I'm thankful for the calm before the storm next year with the new baby, and I'm thankful that we have family here,” Kim Kardashian said.”
“Kim Kardashian was asked about the pregnancy rumors when she appeared on the “Late Late Show” with James Corden earlier this month.”


"Kardashian avoided divulging her sister's secret."
"Other Kardashian sisters in this episode also say what they" thank "for and how exciting it is to see the next Kardashian Dynasty."
In a special festival episode "follow Kardashian's family" on Sunday, Kardashian's head daughter talks about her growing family and her love for her grandchildren, e! "
"News coverage."
"Although Kim Kardashian, 37, confirmed that she would be pregnant through a surrogate mother, Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Kylie Jenner, 20, have not publicly reported that they are both pregnant."
"I used to pray that one of you would have a child, and now it's like a tap, and we turn it on and off," Jenner said at a family dinner
"In fact, I have so many grandchildren, and it's the most amazing journey to see your kids, because it's really the meaning of life to keep up with Kardashian star getting a big raise and renewal to 2019, Jenner added, one of my favorite traditions is in..."
“… Holiday is to buy Christmas presents for all the children. Now it's special because I buy Christmas presents for all the grandchildren. It seems that it will never end. It's exciting, she said
Kim Kardashian said: "I don't know if I'm grateful for the calm before the storm with my new baby next year and for having family here."
"When Kim Kardashian appeared on the evening show with James Corden earlier this month, she was asked about pregnancy rumors."



Number  250
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Separately, USA Gymnastics said it became aware of Nassar’s sexual abuse in the summer of 2015 when three top gymnasts said he abused them.”
““I think that the way that my investigation was handled was not in a way to bring out the truth, but instead it was performed in a way to conceal and protect a pedophile,” Thomashow said.”
““I am asking you to tell these little girls, tell the young women, tell the watching world, that they are worth everything,” she told the judge.”
““How much is a little girl worth?” Rachael Denhollander, the woman who first brought Nassar’s abuse to public attention in 2016, asked the court in Eaton County.”
“Nearly 200 girls and women – ranging from accomplished Olympic gymnast Aly Raisman to a 12-year-old poet named Amanda on Friday – spoke out in person or in statements at the Ingham County and Eaton County courts about how Nassar’s sexual abuse changed their lives.”
““That will be your lifetime consequence.”Powerful victim impact statementsNassar’s time in court was notable for the passionate, righteous speeches from the survivors of his abuse.”
““I do not believe that you will have the ability to shut out the words of the children, and the young women and the adults who trusted you and who you let down.”
““You will be left to sit there with only the memories of destroying your own family,” Cunningham said.”
“He will serve those sentences after a separate 60-year sentence in federal prison for child pornography, meaning Nassar will serve at least 100 years in prison – an effective life sentence.”
“This Eaton County sentence will run concurrently with the 40-to-175-year sentence in Ingham County, Michigan.”


"In addition, the American Gymnastics Association said they were aware of Nasar's sexual abuse in the summer of 2015, when three top gymnasts said he abused them."
"I don't think the way I handle my investigation is to reveal the truth, but to cover up and protect a paedophile," tomashaw said
"I want you to tell these little girls, young women, onlookers that they are worth it," she told the judge
"How much is a little girl worth? "In 2016, Rachael denhollander, a woman who first brought Nasar's abuse to public attention, filed a petition with Eaton county court."
"Nearly 200 girls and women - from accomplished Olympic gymnast Ellie Reisman to a 12-year-old poet named Amanda last Friday - spoke in person or in a statement in the English and Chinese county and Eaton County Courts about how Nasar's sexual abuse has changed their lives."
"That will be the consequence of your life." Powerful victim impact statement Sasar's time in court is famous for his passionate, just speech from his abusive survivors
"I don't believe you have the ability to shut out the children, young women and adults who believe you and disappoint you."
"You can only sit there and leave memories of destroying your family," Cunningham said
"He will continue to serve a separate 60 year sentence in federal prison for child pornography, which means that Nasar will serve at least 100 years in prison, which is an effective life sentence."
The decision in Eaton county will be executed at the same time as the 40-175 decision in English and Chinese County, Michigan



Number  251
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think if you’re growing up attached to another person, you never really get solid as your own being.”Also at the Thor: Ragnarok premiere were the film’s stars Cate Blanchett (in Gucci), Mark Ruffalo and Tessa Thompson (in Schiaparelli).”
“You get time to grow up.”
“I think people that break up and get back together, that’s awesome.”Image zoom Cate Blanchett, Mark Ruffalo and Tessa Thompson | Credit: FeatureflashSHM/Shutterstock; Matt Baron/Shutterstock; Chris Pizzello/Invision/APAdding, “You get time to be yourself.”
““So, I don’t think that I have that co-dependency.”
“I don’t like when relationships are two halves trying to make a whole,’ The Voice judge told Stern during his first appearance on his radio show.”
““I had to.”
“In a recent interview with Howard Stern, Cyrus revealed the reason behind their breakup.”
“Image zoom Credit: Broadimage/ShutterstockEver since reconciling last fall, the Younger Now singer and the Hunger Games actor, who dated for three years before splitting in 2013, have kept their relationship out of the spotlight.”
“He was accompanied by wife Elsa Pataky.”
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Buckner/Variety/ShutterstockMeanwhile, leading man Chris, 34, dressed in a cobalt blue suit with open collar dress shirt.”


"I don't think you'll ever be as strong as yourself if you grew up with someone else." At the premiere of Raytheon: ragnaro, Kate Blanchett, mark rufaro and Tessa Thompson also attended the premiere
"You have time to grow up."
"I think it's great to be reunited after a breakup." Image zooming: Kate Blanchett, mark rufaro and Tessa Thompson | source: featureflashshm / shutterstock; matt Baron / shutterstock; Chris pitzello / invision / apadding, "you have time to be yourself."
"So I don't think I have that kind of codependence."
"I don't like two relationships trying to be one," the voice judge told stern when he first appeared on the radio
"I had to."
"In a recent interview with Howard Stern, Cyrus revealed why they broke up."
"Credit for image zooming: broadimage / shutterstock since the settlement last fall, the young now singer and the hungry game actor dated for three years before breaking up in 2013, keeping their relationship out of the spotlight."
"He was accompanied by his wife Elsa Pataki."
"Image zooming credit: Michael Buckner / variety / shutterstock, actor Chris, 34, in cobalt blue suit and open collar dress shirt."



Number  252
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She has been very frank with her fans about her struggle to lose weight and how the stress from her bad marriage made her eat more.”
“Shannon also revealed David became distant from her when she gained 40lbs.”
“...and the word has spread around Newport Beach...”
“It s disgusting and cruel that David would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is not yet finalized a source told People Falling apart Shannon 53 shared this inspirational quote to Instagram last week He s been seeing this woman for at least a few weeks now...”
“News at the time.”
“'David wasted no time and has already started dating again and has moved on entirely,' an insider told E!”
“It first emerged last month that David was no longer hiding his new love as he referred to himself as 'the lucky one' in the comments of Instagram photo Lesley shared of the two of them.”
“'He’s always been selfish and is clearly not thinking about how this will affect his children.'”
“...would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is not yet finalized and they share three daughters together they added...”
“Moving on Lesley is a Newport Beach local who has two children of her own Taking the high road RHOC s Shannon Beador has been blindsided that ex David has a new girlfriend and is taking it publicly so soon after their split It s disgusting and cruel that David...”


"She was very honest with her fans about the hardships of losing weight and how the pressure of a bad marriage made her eat more."
"Shannon also revealed that when she gained 40 pounds, David became estranged from her."
“… The news has spread all over Newport Beach... "
"It's disgusting and cruel for David to say it so openly before their divorce is finalized. The source told" the man who broke up. "Shannon 53 shared this inspiring message with instagram last week. He has been dating this woman for at least a few weeks..."
"The news at the time."
"David didn't waste time, he's started dating again, and he's gone completely," one insider told e! "
"Last month, for the first time, it was reported that David no longer kept his new love secret because he called himself" lucky "in instagram photos, and Leslie shared the photos of them."
"He has always been selfish, obviously not thinking about the impact on his children."
“… It will be made public because their divorce has not been finalized and they have three daughters together, they added
"Leslie is a local from Newport Beach. She has two children and is on the highway. Shannon beador blindly believes that former David has a new girlfriend, and he made it public soon after their breakup, which makes David feel sick and cruel... "



Number  253
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
““All the kids want Jennifer and Alex to get married,” a source told People, adding that the kids already “act like siblings and are very sweet together.”Source: BACKGRIDDo you think Alex and Jen will get married?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDAccording to insiders, the couple’s kids are eager for them to get married.”
“Source: BACKGRIDMeanwhile, Max got so tuckered out that he fell asleep during the game!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDEmme and Ella are so close that the nine-year-olds even shared a seat at one point.”
“Source: BACKGRIDThe couple’s kids may not be related, but they could still pass for siblings!”
““Friday night, family night,” Alex captioned the pic featuring his daughters Natasha and Ella and J. Lo’s twins Emme and Max.”
“Article continues below advertisementAlex posted this adorable family selfie at the game.”
“Click through to see the pics!”
“The couple, who is about to celebrate one year together, were spotted at a Lakers game on Friday night with all four of their children — Jen’s twins and Alex’s two daughters — where they made for a picture perfect family.”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"All the kids want Jennifer and Alex to get married," a source told people, adding that the kids have "acted like brothers and sisters, and it's sweet together." Source: BACKGROUND: do you think Alex and Jennifer will get married? "
Background the couple's children are eager for their marriage, according to people familiar with the matter
"Source: backgrid at the same time, Max was exhausted during the game and fell asleep!"
"The article continues with the following advertising source: backgrideme and Ella are so close that nine year olds even once shared a seat."
Source: the couple's children may not be related, but they can still be considered brothers and sisters! "
"Friday night, family night," Alex wrote under the title of the photo, the twins Amy and max of his daughters Natasha, Ella and J. low
"The article continues with the following advertisement. Alex posted this lovely family selfie in the game."
"Click to see the picture!"
"The couple, who are about to celebrate a year together, were found in a Laker game on Friday night to form a perfect family with their four children - Jan's twins and Alex's two daughters."



Number  254
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Advertisement...”
“In the video above, the tennis star shares all the lessons she learned from sports, including strengths and goals.”
“Although fans may be disappointed to learn that it wasn’t actually Serena’s daughter, the ad has an inspirational message.”
“A Gatorade spokesperson e-mailed AdGage saying:While Serena intended to have Olympia make her screen debut as part of this film, her daughter was under the weather and unable to be on set, but the sentiment remains the same.”
“AdGage reports that Gatorade hired a stunt double for the baby because she got sick.”
“But it turns out that Alexis wasn’t even in the commercial.”
“Gatorade released a new commercial that appears to star Serena Williams and her new born Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr.”


"Advertising..."
"In the video above, the tennis star shares all the lessons she learned from sports, including strengths and goals."
"Although fans may be disappointed to learn that it's not Serena's daughter, this ad sends an encouraging message."
"When Serena made her debut for Olympia as part of the film, her daughter didn't feel well and couldn't perform on the set, but her feelings remained the same," a Gatorade spokesman e-mailed adgage
"Adgage reported that Gatorade hired a stunt stand in because she was ill."
"But it turns out that Alexis didn't even appear in the advertisement."
"Gatorade has released a new ad that seems to star Williams and her new born Alexis Olympia o'hanian Jr



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Star Best Fandom and Cast on Social Media Best New 2017 2018 Show Most Anticipated New Show Saddest Cancellation and Best Series Finale...”
“Here s the full list of polls Best Comedy and Best Drama Best Drama Acting Best Comedy Acting Best Breakout Stars Best Couple and Sexiest Moment Best Reality Show and Star Best and Worst Shocker Best Fight and Musical Moment Saddest Death and Actor Exit Best Villain and Best Guest...”
“Others nominated include Charmed, Sharp Objects, Shadowhunters, Will & Grace, New Girl, Kerry Washington (Scandal), James Corden, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmel Kimmel and Michelle Wolf.”
“Pretty Little Liars: The Perfectionists is up for 'Most Anticipated Show' of 2018/2019.”
“Any show that aired between June 9 2017 and June 8 2018 is eligible.”
“News' TV Scoop Awards.”
“Shortlink to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday, June 29, 2018 7:37am ET by PresspartyVoting closes at 5pm PT today (June 29) for this year's E!”


"Star, best fan and social media, best new 2017, best 2018 show, most expected rookie, saddest cancellation and best series ending..."
"The following are the best comedy and the best drama, the best drama performance, the best comedy performance, the best breakthrough star, the best couple and the sexiest moment, the best reality show and the best and the worst shock star, the best battle and music moment, the saddest death and the actor's exit, the best villain and the best guest..."
"Other nominations include magician, sharp weapon, shadow hunter, will and grace, new girl, Kerry Washington (scandal), James scodon, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmy Kimmel and Michelle wolf."
"Beautiful little liar: perfectionists will participate in the 2018 / 2019" most anticipated show. "
"Any program broadcast between June 9, 2017 and June 8, 2018 is eligible."
"News TV exclusive Award"
"Short link to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday , June 29, 2018, 7:37 a.m. EDT press release ends today (June 29) at 5 p.m. this year's e! "



Number  256
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 0207 782 4220We pay for videos too Click here to upload yours.”
“Got a story?”
“The Topshop heiress and the Hot Felon have been inseparable for months, and posting a series of loved-up selfies, it was clear they couldn’t bear to be apart from the holiday season.”
“2 Chloe and Jeremy shared their festive holiday with their online following Credit Instagram While keeping quiet on most social media during the festivities the pair shared one filtered pic which declared Merry Christmas with love from the two of us In the picture the usually cool and brooding Jeremy...”
“...is seen beaming next to his other half who is pouting for the camera...”
“Their Christmas day together comes shortly after the pair sparked rumours that they were engaged.”
“Chloe flashed a huge ring on her engagement finger as she walked with Jeremy through the streets of LA shortly before Christmas.”
“2 This is the loved up couples first Christmas together - so they were making it count Credit: InstagramThis is despite the fact the 34-year-old is still in the midst of his divorce from first wife, Melissa.”
“The couple first got together over the summer, but Jeremy and 26-year-old Chloe’s whirlwind romance has been plagued by claims he was a “money-grabber”.”
“However in a new interview he insisted he would have dated the Topshop heiress even if she wasn’t rich.”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207 782 4220 and we will pay for the video. Please click here to upload your video. "
"Is there a story?"
"Topshop heiress and hot felons have been inseparable for several months, releasing a series of self portraits in love, and it's obvious that they don't have the heart to leave the holiday."
"2 Chloe and Jeremy shared their festival on instagram while remaining silent on most social media. During the festival, the two of us shared a filtered photo in which we declared Merry Christmas with love. Jeremy, who is usually calm and thoughtful... "
“… See his other half pouting and laughing at the camera... "
"Shortly before Christmas when they were together, they started a rumor of engagement."
"Shortly before Christmas, when Chloe and Jeremy were walking in the streets of Los Angeles, a huge ring flashed on their engagement finger."
"2 this is the first time that the couple in love spend Christmas together - so they take credit for it: instagram this, though 34, is still divorcing his first wife, Melissa."
The couple got together for the first time in the summer, but Jeremy's whirlwind relationship with Chloe, 26, has plagued him, claiming he is a "money grabber"
"However, in a new interview, he insisted that he would date Topshop's heiress even if she was not rich."



Number  257
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Steve: "On a scale of 1-10, how sexy are you compared to the people you work with"Kim and Kanye, independent of each other: "10"11: Kanye's dorky celebratory dance at winning $25,000 for charity somehow made the whole show worth watchingImages via ABC”
“Kim said that they watch Family Feud every single night, at which point Kanye chimed in with "Gotta have the Feud"3.”
“America's unofficial first lad and lady have gone on Celebrity Family Feud (or Family Fortunes to you and I).”
“AdvertisementFor some reason, seeing Kanye West, King Yeezy, taking part in a gameshow is truly the most uncomfortable experience many of us are ever going to have.”
“The smiles, the giddiness, the hijinks atmosphere, it's a far cry away from the persona he gives off in every other aspect of his work.”
“Yet here we are, dissecting what was a very enjoyable time for all involved and an honourable means of fundraising for charity, all in the name of #content.”
“Here's 11 cringe moments that deserve recognition.”
“1.”
“Steve Harvey aggressively shouted 'Yeezy' as he smacked Kanye's hand, thereby letting him know that The Alpha had arrivedAdvertisement2.”
“The question was "Name a reason why Steve Harvey would be a good kisser" and Kanye buzzed in at lightning fast speed with "LIPS!"”


Steve: "on a scale of 1-10, how sexy are you compared to your colleagues?" Kim and Kanye, independent: "10" 11: Kanye won $25000 for charity's stupid celebration dance, somehow making the whole show worth watching through ABC
Kim said they watch family grudges every night, when kenye interjected, "there must be grudges."
"The unofficial first lady and the first boy in the United States have started a feud between celebrity families (or family wealth for you and me)."
"For some reason, seeing Kanye West, King yeezy in a game show is really the most uncomfortable experience many of us have ever experienced."
"The smile, dizziness and hijinks atmosphere are far from the personality he shows in other aspects of his work."
"Here, however, we dissect what a wonderful time for all participants and the glorious way to raise money for charity, all in the name of" content. "
"Here are 11 moments to be sure of."
“1.”
"Steve Harvey clapped Kanye's hand and called" yeezy "aggressively to let him know that alpha had arrived at number 2
The question is "say why Steve Harvey is a good kisser." Kanye rushes in with lightning speed. "Lips!"



Number  258
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Oscar-winning producer has been accused of sexual misconduct by over 60 women since The New York Times and The New Yorker documented decades of alleged sexual misconduct and sexual assault involving a number of women in detailed articles in October.”
“Weinstein also has three children from a previous marriage.”
“Harvey Weinstein and Georgina Chapman have agreed on a divorce settlement, a source tells PEOPLE.”
“The disgraced movie mogul, 65, and his estranged wife, 41, recently signed off on the deal, but they have not filed it in court.”
“Page Six was first to report.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The fashion designer could walk away with nearly $12 million thanks to the former couple’s prenuptial agreement, a source previously confirmed to PEOPLE.”
“According to the prenup, Chapman was set to receive $300,000 annually in spousal support for their first nine years of marriage.”
“After 10 years, that number jumped to $400,000.”
“Image zoom Credit: BEI/ShutterstockThough Chapman and Weinstein announced their separation in October, Dec. 15 marked their 10-year wedding anniversary.”


"Since the New York Times and the new Yorker wrote detailed articles in October about decades of sexual misconduct and assault charges involving multiple women, the Oscar winning producer has been accused of sexual misconduct by more than 60 women."
"Weinstein also has three ex-wife children."
"Harvey Weinstein and Georgina Chapman have agreed on a divorce agreement, a source told people
The infamous film tycoon, 65, and his estranged wife, 41, recently signed the agreement, but they have yet to bring it to court
"Page six is the first report."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"As a result of the former couple's prenuptial agreement, the fashion designer can bring close to $12 million, a source confirmed to people earlier."
"According to the prenuptial agreement, Chapman will receive $300000 in alimony each year for the first nine years of marriage."
"Ten years later, it jumped to $400000."
Photo zooming credit: Although Chapman and Weinstein announced their separation in October, December 15 is their 10th wedding anniversary



Number  259
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In a comment, the mother of one denied the rumor and responded to an Instagram user who accused her of “acting like Tristan didn’t cheat.””
“Kardashian has mostly avoided publicly discussing the scandal but she addressed it this week on social media while responding to speculation that she and Thompson were talking about getting married...”
“She s glad things are going well with Tristan a source recently told PEOPLE adding She can forgive him and move on but I don t think she ll ever forget RELATED VIDEO Khloé Kardashian Shows Off Her Impressive Abs in Mexico 4 Months After Giving Birth to Baby True...”
“...devoted to True...”
“They are still working through stuff but it very much seems they will stay together That being said the source adds that there s no mention of an engagement yet Image zoom Credit Khloe Kardashian Instagram Image zoom Credit Seth Browarnik Startraks She s the best mom and is so...”
“She and Tristan are great.”
““Khloé has been very happy.”
“Image zoom Credit: Khloe Kardashian/Instagram“It’s their first proper vacation since True was born,” the source says.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“(Kardashian’s mom Kris Jenner is also on the trip.)”


"In a comment, the mother of one child denied the rumor and responded to an instagram user who accused her of" acting as if Tristan had not cheated. "
"Kardashian basically avoided discussing the scandal publicly, but she spoke on social media this week, responding to speculation that she and Thompson were talking about getting married..."
"She's happy to get on well with Tristan. A source recently told people that she can forgive Tristan and move on, but I don't think she'll forget the video. Heloe Kardashian showed her impressive abdominal muscles in Mexico four months after giving birth to her baby. Really..."
“… Committed to the truth... "
"They are still dealing with some things, but it seems that they will be together. It is said that the source added that there is no mention of engagement, but image zooming credit Khloe Kardashian instagram image zooming credit Seth browrnik startraks, she is the best mother, so..."
"She and Tristan are great."
"Heroe has always been happy."
"Image zooming credit: Khloe Kardashian / instagram," the source said. "This is their first real vacation since true was born."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
(Chris Jenner, Kardashian's mother, is also on the trip.)



Number  260
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"And I'm proud to say that our show, The Tonight Show, is donating one million dollars to J.J.’s fund," he shared.”
“The 42-year-old host announced on Tuesday night that the late-night talk show is donating $1 million to J.J. Watt's Hurricane Harvey relief fund to help those affected in the wake of the fatal storm.”
“RELATED: Beyonce, George Clooney and Julia Roberts Among Stars to Participate in Hurricane Harvey Telethon"Last week, we saw the devastating effects of Hurricane Harvey on the state of Texas.”
“But in the face of this tragedy, we saw good," Fallon told his audience on Tuesday.”
“"We saw communities banding together.”
“Neighbors helping neighbors.”
“Strangers helping strangers.”
“So many heroes, people like Mattress Mack, who opened up his stores and showrooms for those who needed shelter.”
“The group of people who formed a human chain to save a man from a flooded SUV.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"I'm proud to say that our show tonight is going to donate $1 million to J.J.'s foundation," he said
"The 42 year old host announced on Tuesday night that the late night talk show will donate $1 million to J.J. Watt's Hurricane Harvey relief fund to help people affected by the deadly storm."
"Related news: stars like Beyonce, George Clooney and Julia Roberts are on hurricane Harvey." last week, we saw the devastating impact of Hurricane Harvey on Texas
"But in the face of this tragedy, we see a good side," Fallon told the audience on Tuesday
"We see communities coming together."
"Neighbors help neighbors."
"Strangers help strangers."
"So many heroes, people like T-Mac, who opened stores and showrooms for those who needed shelter."
"The group formed a human chain and rescued a man from a flooded SUV."



Number  261
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The soccer star said that he was a huge fan of the band and his favorite song was "I Am the Resurrection".”
“After the show, David stated that he was not only pleased with the collection, but also its collaboration with indie band The Stone Roses.”
“Jun 11, 2018AceShowbiz - On Sunday, 10 June, former soccer player David Beckham and his wife Victoria Adams a.k.a.”
“Victoria Beckham were in attendance at the Kent and Curwen spring/summer 2019 private capsule collection fashion show in London.”
“The couple looked happy as they're smiling and showing PDA, proving the recent divorce rumors were wrong.”
“The Posh Spice took to Instagram to share their PDA pictures.”
“The first picture sees Victoria posing with British Vogue editor-in-chief Edward Enninful and Dior Homme artistic director Kim Jones.”
“Her husband joins the photo session by standing behind them with one of his hands on Victoria's left shoulder.”
“Victoria, meanwhile, sees the opportunity to hold her husband's hand and taking it.”
“"So proud of @davidbeckham @daniel.kearns @kentandcurwen X beautiful collection x kisses @edward_enninful @mrkimjones VB," she proudly mentioned her husband who has been appointed as ambassadorial president of the British Fashion Council.”


The football star said he is a big fan of the band and his favorite song is "I am resurrection"
"After the show, David said he was happy not only with the series, but also with its collaboration with the independent band the stone roses."
"Aceshowbiz, 2008 - on Sunday, June 10, former footballer David and his wife Victoria Adams
"Victoria Beckham attended the Kent and kurwin private capsule fashion show in London in spring and summer 2019."
"The couple looked happy with a smile and a handheld computer, which proves that the recent divorce rumors are wrong."
"Posh Spice Girls share their PDA photos on instagram."
"The first photo was taken by Victoria with Edward enningfall, editor in chief of British fashion, and Kim Jones, artistic director of Dior Holm."
"Her husband stood behind them, one hand on Victoria's left shoulder, and joined the photo session."
At the same time, Victoria saw the opportunity to hold her husband's hand
"Proud of @ DavidBeckham @ Daniel Kearns @ kentandcurwen x beautiful collection x kisses@edward è enninful@mrkimjones  VB, "she mentioned with pride her husband, who was appointed ambassador president of the British Fashion Association."



Number  262
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(In the below GIF, he essentially does exactly what Cooper did to Gaga during that oft-told makeup wipe encounter.)”
“Judy Garland’s character receives such an awful studio makeover in the 1954 version that James Mason’s character, gentleman that he is, personally helps her remove the heinous face paint, faux eyebrows included.”
“Cooper was so committed to the project that he logged hundreds of hours learning to play the guitar and sing well enough to perform at Coachella and Glastonbury without being booed offstage.”
“He analyzed his dreams, re-purposing certain images and ideas for art.”
“He used his own pain and addiction—which he has been reluctant to discuss in interviews—to anchor his heart-aching role as an addict who, in spite of his artistic talent, is broken inside.”
“He spent hours interviewing Lady Gaga with his co-writer Eric Roth to ensure that her character, Ally, was authentic to Gaga’s own struggles.”
“He filled his cast with people who meant something special to him—including his own ear doctor!”
“He incorporated subtle, sweet homages to previous versions of Hollywood’s favorite love story.”
“As Taffy Brodesser Akner wrote for The New York Times Every detail of the film comes from a true thing something he s learned something he s seen something he knows for sure As a public service to better understand Cooper and his magnum opus we compiled some of the...”
“Easter eggs homages and Bradley isms that the star slash director lovingly planted in his version of A Star Is Born...”


(in the GIF below, he's basically what Cooper did to Gaga in that often told encounter.)
In the 1954 version, Judy Garland's character got such a bad makeover in the studio that James Mason's character, a gentleman, helped her get rid of the heinous facial paint, including the false eyebrows
"Cooper is very committed to this project. He spent hundreds of hours learning to play the guitar and sang well enough to perform in cochella and Glastonbury without being booed off stage."
"He analyzed his dreams and repositioned some images and ideas as art."
"He used his pain and addiction to consolidate his role. Although he had artistic talent, his heart was broken, which he didn't want to talk about in the interview."
"He spent hours interviewing Lady Gaga with co-author Eric Roth to make sure her character, ally, truly reflects Gaga's own journey."
"His cast is full of people who mean a lot to him, including his own otologist!"
He paid a subtle and sweet tribute to the first few versions of Hollywood's most popular love stories
"As taffy brodesser akner wrote for the New York Times, every detail of the film comes from the real thing. He learned something, he saw something that he believed was public service. In order to better understand Cooper and his representative works, we compiled some..."
"Easter egg salute and Bradley doctrine star slash director affectionately planted in his version of the star born..."



Number  263
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: ABC”
“It s really our first performance we ve had since then so tonight is going to be another step in getting through all that stuff and coming back here is going to be a big part of it Every night in our meet and greets we re meeting fans that...”
“In addition to the Las Vegas-themed dances throughout the night, host Tom Bergeron addressed the deadliest mass shooting in modern U.S. history, which occurred on Oct. 1, 2017, in a short segment of the show.”
“"As we present tonight's show, we are aware that last night marked the one-year anniversary of the tragic shooting in Las Vegas," he said.”
“"The spirit of that incredible city lives on in the people of Las Vegas.”
“We do this show with you foremost in our minds and hearts."”
“On Monday's anniversary of the Route 91 Music Festival shooting that killed 58 people and injured 851, country star Jason Aldean, who performed at the time of the shooting, also paid tribute to those involved in the tragedy with a #VegasStrong tweet.”
“He recently returned to the site of the shooting for the first time to perform.”
““On behalf of myself and my family and the country music community, I want to say thank you to the city of Las Vegas for your courage, strength and kindness,” Aldean said during the performance, via Rolling Stone.”
““Tonight we are all proud to be Vegas strong.”“That’s a day that’s hard to forget.”


"Image source: ABC"
"It's really our first performance since then, so tonight will be another step for us to overcome all the difficulties, and coming back here will be an important part of our meeting every night and greeting our fans..."
"In addition to the Las Vegas themed dance all night, host Tom bergeran also talked about the most lethal mass shooting in modern American history on October 1, 2017 for a short period of time."
"When we show tonight, we know last night was the first anniversary of the Las Vegas shooting," he said
"The spirit of that incredible city lives on in Las Vegas."
"When we do this show, you are the most important thing in our hearts."
"Monday marks the anniversary of the shooting at the road 91 Music Festival, which killed 58 people and injured 851 people. Country singer Jason Aldean, who performed at the time of the shooting, also paid tribute to those involved in the tragedy through a" Vegas strong "microblog."
"For the first time recently, he went back to filming and performing live."
"On behalf of myself, my family and the country music community, I want to thank the city of Las Vegas for your courage, strength and kindness," Alden said during the performance through rolling stones
"Tonight we are all proud of the strength of Vegas." "It was an unforgettable day."



Number  264
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She’s a yogi...”
““Exactly the same thing for day and night, with a good bit of bling and a pair of heels thrown in.”2.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The singer and the food blogger reportedly "bonded over their mutual love of quirky fashion and food"Sorry Directioners, Harry Styles may have found his “Sweet Creature.”According to The Sun, the singer, 23, is dating London-based chef and food blogger Tess Ward.”
“The U.K. publication ran photos of the pairing riding around in Styles’ car over the weekend and reports that the singer, 23, has already introduced Ward to some of his friends.”
““As soon as Harry met Tess there was an instant spark between them,” claims The Sun.”
““They really bonded over their mutual love of quirky fashion and food – and things turned romantic quickly.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Here’s a quick briefing on the stunning blonde.”
“1.”
“She started as a modelWard, 27, told U.K. magazine Phoenix that she first started modeling at age 19.”


"She's a yogi..."
"It's the same day and night, with a little jewelry and a pair of high heels."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
According to the report, the singer and food blogger "formed an indissoluble bond because of their common love for eccentric fashion and food.". Sorry, directors, Harry stiles may have found his "cute baby.". The 23-year-old singer is dating London chef and food blogger Tess ward, according to the sun
British magazine published photos of the two riding in a style car over the weekend, reporting that the 23-year-old singer had introduced the ward to some of his friends.
"As soon as Harry saw Tess, there was a spark between them," said the sun
"Their shared love of exotic fashion and food really brought them together - things quickly became romantic." Get news, feature, etc
"Here's a brief introduction to this charming blonde."
“1.”
"She started modeling when she was 27," he told the British magazine Phoenix, and she only started modeling when she was 19.



Number  265
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check it out below.”
“We now have our first full trailer.”
““We start again with season four in August,” Colman confirmed following her Oscar win in February.”
“But it shouldn’t be another two-year wait for the next instalment, as season four is already in production.”
“While season one was released in November 2016 and season two in December 2017 – just in time for Christmas – Netflix was always anticipating a longer break in between seasons two and three due to the introduction of the brand new cast.”
“All ten episodes of The Crown season three are available to stream on Netflix now.”
“The Crown season three was released on Sunday 17th November 2019 at 8am (GMT).”
“Find out everything we know about The Crown season three below…What date and time is The Crown season three released on Netflix?”
“For more information about how we hold your personal data, please see our privacy policy.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”


"Look down there."
"We now have the first full trailer."
"We're going to start season four again in August," Coleman confirmed after winning an Oscar in February
"But the next season shouldn't wait another two years, because the fourth quarter is already in production."
"Although the first season was released in November 2016 and the second season in December 2017, just in time for Christmas, Netflix has been expecting a longer break between the second and third seasons due to the introduction of a new cast."
"All 10 episodes of crown Season 3 are now available on Netflix."
"Crown Season 3 will be released at 8 a.m. (GMT) on Sunday, November 17, 2019."
"Take a look at what we know about season 3 What's the date and time to launch the third season of the crown on Netflix? "
"For more information about how we save your personal data, please refer to our privacy policy."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."



Number  266
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She admits, though, to nips and tucks, liposuction and collagen injections.”
“As far as surgery goes, Parton said that her breasts are real although she has had them lifted.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The Most Surprising Revelations From the New Dolly Parton Book — Including the Time She Contemplated SuicideBehind the big hair, big acclaim and even bigger personality — nobody knows Dolly like Dolly.”
“Dolly Parton’s rags-to-riches story and complicated past are the focus of a new book, Dolly on Dolly, Interviews and Encounters with Dolly Parton.”
“The book is not authorized or endorsed by Parton herself, but rather is a collection of interviews published over five decades of the 71-year-old country legend’s career and compiled by editor Randy L. Schmidt.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Here are some of the most surprising revelations detailed in the project:Her dog Popeye stopped her from committing suicideIn the early 1980s, Parton contemplated suicide after having an “affair of the heart” that ended in heartbreak.”
“As a result she struggled with her weight suffered from serious health issues and had to cancel a tour due to death threats all while trying to get over the nightmare that was working with Burt Reynolds on the 1982”
“...film The Best Little Whorehouse in Texas...”


"However, she also admits that she likes breast pinching, liposuction and collagen injection."
"In terms of surgery, Patton said her breasts were real, even though she had lifted them up."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The most surprising findings from Dolly Parton's new book - including when she thinks about suicide after big hair, cheers and a bigger personality - no one knows that Dolly is like dolly."
"The story of Dolly Parton from poor to rich and her complex past are the focus of the new book" Dolly to Dolly, Dolly Parton interview and encounter. "
"This book is not authorized or approved by Patton himself. Instead, it is an interview book edited by Randy L. Schmidt, the editor, which covers the career of the 71 year old rural legend for more than 50 years."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Here are some of the most surprising details of the report: her dog, boby, stopped her from committing suicide. In the early 1980s, Patton began to consider suicide after a heartbreak
"As a result, she struggled with her weight, her health deteriorated seriously, and due to death threats, she had to cancel a tour while trying to overcome the nightmare of working with Bert Reynolds in 1982."
“… Shooting the best little brothel in Texas... "



Number  267
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For better or worse, online is very much where our community is, and that’s how we get our news and connect with other people.””
““I couldn’t wait for everyone to see the images.” Here at Coveteur HQ, we couldn’t wait to see how Welch would style her shirts.”
“To be able to work closely and develop relationships with Pierpaolo [Piccioli] or Nicholas [Ghesquière], and to have a dress made for a client—I’ll never get over it.”
“We’re competitive because you want to get the girl or the job, but there’s so much room for everyone, so it was just a great celebration.” The best part about her job: “I love fashion, and I think designers are artists—I know they are.”
“There’s a group of us that are really close.”
“Now I have a job to prep.’ But I’m super proud of the year that I’ve had, and the [Hollywood Reporter party] was such a fun night because I got to be with all of my peers.”
“AdvertisementHer thoughts on her Hollywood Reporter nod: “I’m super pragmatic, so I was like, ‘OK, great!...”
“Our afternoon was a deep dive into optimal white-tee dressing, but also one that included talk of Welch’s former career as a maître d’, her love of Instagram, and what she’s working on next.”
“This is, after all, the woman who dressed Ruth Negga in that impeccable Valentino for the Oscars, put Sarah Paulson in plunging custom Prada at the Emmys, and landed at number one on The Hollywood Reporter’s 25 Most Powerful Stylists in Hollywood list—so yes, we were taking notes.”
““[We] worked together the whole process, and I was so grateful to him,” Welch says.”


"For better or worse, the Internet is largely where our community is, and that's how we get news and connect with others."
"I can't wait for everyone to see these pictures." At Covent headquarters, we can't wait to see how Welch will design her shirt
"Being able to work closely and develop relationships with Pierpaolo [piccioli] or Nicholas [ghesquie è re], and being able to make a dress for a client - I'll never forget."
"We're competitive because you want girls or jobs, but there's so much space for everyone, so it's just a great celebration." About the best part of her job: "I love fashion, I think designers are artists - I know they are."
"A group of us are really close."
"Now I have a job to prepare for." "But I'm very proud of this year. It's such an interesting night because I want to be with all my peers."
She nodded to the Hollywood Reporter: "I'm very pragmatic, so I said, 'great, great!..."
"In the afternoon, we went deep into the best white T-shirt dressing, but also talked about Welch's previous career, her love of instagram, and her next job."
"After all, this lady wore Ruth negga's impeccable Valentino for the Oscars, Sarah Paulson for the Emmys, and Hollywood Reporter Reporter's top 25 most influential stylists in Hollywood, so yes, we're all taking notes. "
"We worked together throughout the process and I thank him very much," Welch said



Number  268
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m sure Kendrick and Bruno don’t think they are the Fammys (whatever that means).”AdvertisementWhat are your thoughts?”
“Kendrick and Bruno deserved it but so did other people that’s why they give out so many in the first place.But in all her years despite being nominated numerous times, and being deserving at least once, Beyonce has yet to win Album of the year.”
“And here comes mama Tina Knowles to say what is on the minds of many Beyonce’s fans.”
“The diva wore almost 7 million dollars worth of jewelry to the awards show that took place in New York.”
“The mother of three showed off her killer curves in a tight black dress and sported a huge hat all in a tribute to the Black Panthers.”
“Blue Ivy even wore high heels and gave the media the viral moment it was seeking.”
“It was supposed to be the Carters’ night with JAY-Z’s eight nominations.”
“A post shared by Beyoncé (@beyonce) on Jan 28, 2018 at 2:58pm PSTAs it turned out, it was a winless soirée for Jay because Bruno Mars and Kendrick Lamar swept the event with epic performances and the number of trophies they picked up.”
“Many are upset that Jay was snubbed this year and that Adele stole it from the Texan star in 2017.”
“Tina Knowles Lawson wrote: “Last night at the Fammys, oops sorry, I mean the Grammys, Freudian slip.”Fans have reacted to Jay’ loss in different ways; some say they are sore losers, while others think the Grammys used the couple and their daughter for ratings and embarrassed them.”


"I'm sure Kendrick and Bruno don't think they're a family (whatever it means)," he said What do you think of advertising? "
"Kendrick and Bruno deserve it, but others deserve it, and that's why they paid so much in the first place. But in all her years, despite numerous nominations, and at least once worth it, Beyonce has yet to win the album of the year award
"Mother Tina Knowles said something about Beyonce's fans."
"At the awards ceremony in New York, the queen wore nearly $7 million worth of jewelry."
"The mother of three, wearing a tight black dress and a big hat, paid homage to the Panther."
"Blue Ivy even wears high heels, bringing the viral moment it seeks to the media."
"It should be cartel night, and Jay-Z has eight nominations."
"Beyonce (@ Beyonce) posted a post at 2:58 p.m. on January 28, 2018. As a result, it was a no win party because Bruno Mars and Kendrick Lamar swept the whole event with their epic performances and the number of trophies they won."
"A lot of people are upset about Jay being left out this year, and Adele stole it from the Texas Star in 2017."
Tina Knowles Lawson wrote, "at home last night, I'm sorry, I mean Grammy, Floyd Streep." Fans have different reactions to Jay Chou's defeat; some say they are painful losers, while others think Grammy is embarrassing them by using the couple and their daughter to get ratings



Number  269
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I always loved that Shonda’s shows are so colorful and multiracial,” says Rahimi.”
“...means choosing the blonde white girl...”
““It was a place where I could have a voice,” Rahimi says.”
“Rahimi slowly started regaining her confidence at age 12, when she starred as Cha-Cha DiGregorio in a seventh-grade production of Grease—a role she auditioned for on a whim that sparked her passion for acting.”
“When she started using makeup, she did her best to mask her freckles.”
“She even tried shaving parts of her head and dabbled in keratin treatment.”
“To hide her hair texture, she braided her hair every day before graduating to a straightener.”
““It’s something I’ve learned to embrace, but it was definitely hard.”As a result of the bullying, Rahimi withdrew into herself and made efforts to change her appearance.”
““It’s part of the reason why I’m so quiet,” she says.”
““People called me Hermione sometimes, which I loved because I thought she was brave, but they meant it in sort of a mean way.” Along with calling her “metal mouth,” Rahimi’s classmates would make fun of her hair and say her freckles were a sign of disease.”


"I've always loved how colorful and multi-ethnic shoda's shows are," Rahimi said
“… It means choosing a blonde white girl... "
"This is a place where I can make a sound," Rahimi said
Rahimi began to regain her self-confidence at the age of 12, when she played the role of chachadi gorio in a seventh grade film grease, which she tried out on a whim and inspired her enthusiasm for acting
"When she started to make up, she did her best to cover up freckles."
"She even tried shaving and keratin therapy."
"In order to cover up her hair quality, she braids her hair every day before graduation, and then straightens it out."
"It's something I've learned to accept, but it must be hard." Because of being bullied, Rahimi retreated and tried to change her appearance
"That's part of why I'm so quiet," she said
"People sometimes call me Hermione, and I like her because I think she's brave, but they mean something mean." In addition to calling her "metal mouth", Rahimi's classmates also make fun of her hair, saying that her freckles are a sign of disease



Number  270
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Advertisement...”
“Look at the photos, watch her stories, and say a prayer that there isn’t a norovirus outbreak.”
“Tuesday night, and fielded a question about Madonna’s, uh, interpretation, of her iconic role in Andrew Lloyd Weber’s Evita.”
“The musical, for which LuPone won a Tony, was adapted into a successful film in 1996.”
“But even though Madonna won a Golden Globe for her performance, LuPone (who admits she’s never watched the full movie) wasn’t impressed.”
“In the musical, the character of Eva Peron famously sings, “It won’t be easy, you’ll think it strange, when I try to explain how I feel.” This is a problem Ms. LuPone has never had.”
“Here’s her full quote in all its glory:“I thought it [the scene I saw] was a piece of shit.”
“Madonna is a movie killer.”
“She’s dead behind the eyes.”
“She couldn’t act her way out of a paper bag.”


"Advertising..."
"Look at the photos, look at her story and pray for no norovirus outbreak."
"On Tuesday night, she answered a question about Madonna's interpretation of her idol role in Andrew Lloyd Weber's Evita."
The musical was adapted into a successful film in 1996, and lupon won the Tony Award for it
"However, although Madonna won the Golden Globe for her performance, lupon (who admitted she had never seen the whole film) was not impressive."
In the musical, Eva Peron's character sings a famous song: "it's not easy when I try to explain how I feel. You'll find it strange." This is a problem that MS lupon has never encountered
"That's all she quotes in all the glory:" I think it (the scene I see) is a piece of shit. "
"Madonna is a movie killer."
"She died behind her eyes."
"She can't get out of the paper bag."



Number  271
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Since dating Prince Harry from 2012-2014, the actress has become best known as a royal's girlfriend.”
“But (not unlike Harry's wife, Meghan Markle) Bonas also has an acting career.”
“And while some royal fans felt a pang of empathy watching Bonas attend her former boyfriend's wedding to Meghan, they don't have to—Bonas has some good things going, too.”
“Cressida Bonas arrives at Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s royal wedding.”
“IAN WEST Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“She's reportedly just been cast in the leading role for ITV's The White House Farm Murders, a six-part series is based on a notorious 1985 quintuple murder at an Essex family home.”
“Decades later, the tragic event receives regular press, as the accused murderer Jeremy Bamber continues to challenge his conviction from prison.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Since dating Prince Harry in 2012-2014, the actress is best known as the Royal girlfriend."
"But (not unlike Harry's wife Megan markel) Bonas has an acting career, too."
"Although some royal fans feel a sense of sympathy when they see Bonas attend his ex boyfriend's wedding to Megan, they don't have to worry that something good will happen to Bonas."
"Krisida Bonas arrives at the royal wedding of Prince Harry and Megan Marcel."
"Ian West Getty Images this content is imported from {embedded name}."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"It's reported that she just starred in ITV's" the White House Farm murder, "a six part series based on the infamous murder of a quintuplet family in Essex in 1985."
Decades later, the tragedy was often followed by the media as the alleged murderer, Jeremy Bamber, continued to challenge his conviction in prison



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Celebrity kids then and now: See how they've grownNow a father himself, Robin shares three kids, Luca, Mia and Lola, with April Love Geary, as well as a son, Julian, with his ex, Paula Patton.”
“"When I saw the phrase 'On Earth, and in Heaven,' I realized that's what I'm singing about: the people who aren't here and the people who are here that made me who I am."”
“MediaPunch/ShutterstockWhen he announced the album last month, Robin described the new music as, "the sunshine coming out after the rain," according to Billboard.”
“The album trailer that accompanied the announcement suggests the rain was the intense period of years in which the Masked Singer star lost his dad Alan Thicke and his professional mentor Andre Harrell a music industry scion who started out at Def Jam in the 80s served as Motown s...”
“CEO and founded Uptown Records before his death last year...”
“As Robin told fans on social media on Friday, Feb. 5, he had both Andre and his dad in mind when he wrote what became the first track on the new album.”
“"You know that feeling you have when you're all alone but you know that you're not alone," he tweeted, sharing the new track.”
“"That's what 'Lucky Star' is about.”
“That presence in your life that holds you tight, gives you hope, and lights the way," Robin added, naming Alan and Andre as his own "lucky stars."”
“You know that feeling you have when you're all alone but you know that you're not alone.”


"Related reports: then and now celebrity children: look at how they grew up and are now a father. Robin and April love Gehry have three children, Luca, Mia and Lola, and a son, Julian, and his ex boyfriend, Paula button."
"When I saw the phrase" on earth, in heaven, "I realized that this is what I sang: those who are not here and those who are here are me."
Robin described the new music as "sunshine after rain" when he announced the album last month, billboard reported
"The trailer accompanying the album shows that the rain has been a tense period for many years. The masked singer lost his father, Alan hick, and his professional mentor, Andre Harrell, who was a successor in the music industry and began working as a motor city in def jam in the 1980s..."
"CEO, founded Shanghai records company before he died last year..."
On Friday, February 5, Robin told fans on social media that when he wrote the first song of his new album, he thought of Andre and his father
"You know how you feel when you're alone, but you know you're not alone," he tweeted about the new song
"Lucky star is like this."
Robin also said: "in your life, the kind of existence that holds you tight, gives you hope and lights up the road," he called Alan and Andre his "lucky stars."
"You know how it feels when you're alone, but you know you're not alone."



Number  273
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That is why America voted for you … except for the majority of America that didn't."”
“"Own your pointless cruelty.”
“We know you do, so say it already," she said to Trump.”
“"You want a Muslim ban?”
“...them...”
“But he can t recognize the courage of people who survived literal war zones to come to a new country start over with nothing and keep going each day despite the contempt with which we re horrible enough to treat...”
“"Here is a man who's afraid of germs, stairs, books, unprocessed food, women, birds, Muslims, Russian pee tapes, inner cities and, of course, strong winds.”
“I'll just point out that it is the act of a giant pussy," she concluded.”
“"I won't mention that this refugee ban is immoral, embarrassing and inhuman.”
“...for 120 days or longer...”


"That's why the United States voted for you Except for most of the United States that didn't vote. "
"Admit your senseless cruelty."
She said to trump, "we know you know, so let's go ahead."
"Do you want a Muslim ban?"
“… They... "
"But he can't admit that those who survived the war have the courage to come to a new country, start over with nothing and move on every day, even though our contempt for them is terrible enough..."
"Here's a man who's afraid of germs, stairs, books, raw food, women, birds, Muslims, Russian urinals, downtown, and of course strong winds."
"I just want to point out that this is the behavior of a huge cat," she concluded
"I will not say that this refugee ban is immoral, embarrassing and inhumane."
“… 120 days or more... "



Number  274
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the list of men Kylie Jenner has dated below.”
“This list of Kylie Jenner’s boyfriends includes Justin Bieber and Jaden Smith.”
“On February 1, 2018, Kylie Jenner's daughters was born.”
“According to media sources, Kylie Jenner is pregnant with boyfriend Travis Scott.”
“Kylie Jenner is currently dating rapper Travis Scott.”
“They broke up in early 2017.”
“In 2014, Kylie Jenner's relationship with rapper Tyga received much controversy due to their age difference and her being only 16 at the time.”
“It's not hard to get jealous of these men that Kylie Jenner has gone out with, so try your hardest to contain your envy.”
“These men come in all shapes and sizes, but what they all have in common is that they're all men that Kylie Jenner has either dated or had a fling with.”
“This list features Kylie Jenner’s ex-boyfriends along with additional information about them, such as when they were born and what they do professionally.”


"Look at the dates Kelly Jenner listed below."
"This list of Kelly Jenner's boyfriends includes Justin Bieber and Jaden Smith."
"On February 1, 2018, Kelly Jenner's daughter was born."
"According to the media, Kelly Jenner is pregnant with her boyfriend Travis Scott."
"Kelly Jenner is currently dating rapper Travis Scott."
"They broke up in early 2017."
"In 2014, Kelly Jenner's relationship with rapper TEGA was controversial because of age differences, when she was only 16 years old."
"It's not hard to be jealous of the men Kelly Jenner has been with, so try your best to curb jealousy."
"These men are all kinds of men, all sizes, but what they have in common is that they are all men Kelly Jenner has dated or had an affair with."
"This list has Kelly Jenner's ex boyfriends and other information about them, such as when they were born and what they do."



Number  275
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We hope they join us for these last few hours as we journey to the Enchanted Forrest for one more adventure.””
““’Once Upon a Time has been an amazing journey for all of us at ABC Studios and for fans around the world,” said Patrick Moran, president of ABC Studios.”
“The show, created and executive produced by Edward Kitsis and Adam Horowitz, returns for the second half of its final season on March 2, and the finale will air in May, after more than 150 episodes.”
“Once Upon a Time went through a creative and casting revamp at the end of Season 6 when a number of original cast members left, and also relocated from its longtime Sunday home to the lower-trafficked Friday night this season.”
“During the TCA winter press tour in January, ABC Entertainment President Channing Dungey said she was “cautiously optimistic” about an eighth season, pending a meeting with Kitsis and Horowitz, but that was not to be.”
“Related Story In The Financial Fine Print, A Glimpse Of Fragile Oscar Economics“When we first heard Adam and Eddy’s pitch for Once Upon a Time, we knew it was something incredibly special,” Dungey said in a statement today.”
““For seven years, they have captivated us with their creativity and passion while reimagining some of our most beloved Disney fairytales, creating an undeniable global hit.”
“Saying goodbye will be bittersweet but Once Upon a Time will forever be part of the ABC legacy and we can t wait for fans to join us in this epic final chapter Once Upon a Time was a breakout hit when it premiered in fall 2011 starring Ginnifer Goodwin...”
“Jennifer Morrison Lana Parrilla Josh Dallas Robert Carlyle and Jared Gilmore and featuring classic Disney fairytale characters...”
“In addition to strong ratings early in its run, Once fit nicely in the Disney brand with corporate synergies and has been a solid international seller for producer ABC Studios because of the global recognition of its characters.”


"We hope they will join us in the last few hours, and we will take an adventure in the enchanted Forrest."
"It used to be a wonderful journey for all of us at ABC and for fans around the world," said Patrick Moran, President of ABC
"The show, created and produced by Edward kisses and Adam Horowitz, will be broadcast in the second half of the final season on March 2. After more than 150 episodes, the final episode will be broadcast in May."
"Once upon a time, at the end of the sixth season, some original actors left for a creative and cast adjustment, and moved from their long-term Sunday home to the less popular Friday night of the season."
"On TCA's winter reporter tour in January, ABC entertainment president Channing dungee said she was" cautiously optimistic "about Season 8 and was waiting for a meeting with kisses and Horowitz, but that's not true."
"When we first heard Adam and Eddie speak, we knew it was a very special thing," dunkey said in a statement today
"Over the past seven years, they have fascinated us with their creativity and passion, and at the same time, they have re conceived our favorite Disney fairy tales, creating an undeniable global hit."
"It will be bittersweet to say goodbye, but" the past "will always be a part of ABC's tradition. We can't wait for fans to join in this epic final chapter," the past "will shine when it premieres in autumn 2011, starring Jennifer Goodwin..."
"Jennifer Morrison, Lana, parrilla, Josh, Dallas, Robert Carlyle and Jared Gilmore, starring in the classic Disney fairy tale characters..."
"In addition to its early high ratings, once is well integrated into the Disney brand by virtue of corporate synergy, and has always been a reliable international seller for producer ABC Studios due to its globally recognized role."



Number  276
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.”
“”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.”
“On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.”
“They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”
“Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.”
“Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.”


"Then she divorced Pete and dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer."
"The couple announced that they broke up at the end of last year. However, they celebrated the new year together, went on holiday in San Lucas, Cabo, Mexico, and had several close friends, including Jason Bateman and his family."
"She was found standing outside the Hollywood meeting and chatting with Farrell."
"Last Saturday, Aniston showed up at Ellen DeGeneres' birthday party without seru."
Aniston signed up with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and "Dun Prince" in Atlanta, while serrux, 46, made the comedy "the spy who left me in Budapest."
"Theroux is often found in New York City, far from Los Angeles."
"In recent months, the two have been separated for quite a long time and raised some questions."
"Zoom in on Farrell and Jennifer Aniston's birthday at Ellen DeGeneres."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
On Sunday, Aniston held a celebration in Malibu, California, with friends including Courtney Cox, Andrea bendwald, Lee kilton Smith and Christine Hahn



Number  277
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She called me a convict!” de Lesseps cries, referencing one of her castmates.”
“Image zoom Tinsley Mortimer Sonja Morgan Bethenny Frankel Ramona Singer Dorinda Medley Luann de Lesseps and Carole Radziwill Credit Patrick Ecclesine Bravo Here s the full list Radziwill In the marathon of life loyalty is everything Medley I have a big heart but little patience Singer Age is an issue...”
“Luann de Lesseps Jokes About Her Headlines in RHONY Season 10 TaglinesThe Real Housewives of New York City season 10 taglines are here!”
“A decade after the hit Bravo show first premiered, the first ladies of the Big Apple are back to drum up a whole new season of drama.”
“And with them comes an opening credits sequence sure to get RHONY fans squirming.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Perhaps the most on the nose?”
“De Lesseps, who tips her hat to the headlines she’s been making recently.”
“...of mind over matter If you don t mind it doesn t matter Mortimer Come on why cook when I can order room service...”
“De Lesseps seems to be the only one getting love from all around, except from one unnamed person.”


"She called me a prisoner! "Dreisepps cried and mentioned one of her companions."
"Image zooming Tinsley Mortimer Sonja Morgan Bethenny Frankel Ramona singers Dorinda Medley LuAnn de Lesseps and Carole Radziwill thanks to Patrick Ecclesine bravo. This is Radziwill's complete list of marathons in life. Loyalty is everything. I have a broad heart, but no patience. Singer age is a problem..."
"LuAnn de Lesseps joked that her headline for season 10 in rhony is here, the real housewife of New York City, the slogan for season 10!"
"Ten years after the first release of the hit Bravo show, the first ladies of big apple are back to cheer for the new season."
"Coming with them is a credit sequence for the opening ceremony, which is sure to make Lonnie fans squirm."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Maybe the one with the most pain on the nose?"
"Dreisepps, she's been making headlines lately."
"Mind is more important than business. If you don't mind, it doesn't matter. Mortimer, come on, since I can call room service, why cook..."
"Dreisepps seems to be the only one who gets love from around, except for a nameless person."



Number  278
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementExpensive products are also not necessary in the grand scheme of what can be used to nourish and treat skin.”
“This also helps to prompt the skin to turn over and be made new quicker as this is a natural process our skin does over time.”
“So what exactly is her secret to showing up to every job, booking or photoshoot looking like a million bucks?”
“The beauty has given birth to four children and still looks like the model she was before she had kids when she started in the 90s over 20 years ago.”
“Klum is finally revealing her secret.”
“She loves to exfoliate.”
“What’s even better is that her favorite exfoliating scrub can be found at drugstores in the UK.”
“It’s called Aapri.”
“Klum believes that it’s essential to exfoliate twice a week as it helps to rejuvenate the skin.”
“Scrubs like this can help to get rid of the dead skin that accumulates on the face and body.”


"Expensive products are also unnecessary in grand plans for nutrition and skin treatment."
"It also helps to make the skin turn over and regenerate faster, because it's a natural process and our skin will change over time."
"So what's the secret of her appearing in every job, reservation or photo that looks like a million dollars?"
"The beauty, who has four children, still looks like her model in the early 1990s more than 20 years ago."
"Krum finally let out her secret."
"She likes to exfoliate."
"Even better, her favorite exfoliating scrub can be found in pharmacies in the UK."
"It's called aapri."
"Kram believes that exfoliating twice a week is essential because it helps to rejuvenate the skin."
"Scrubbing like this can help remove dead skin from your face and body."



Number  279
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“EXCLUSIVE: 'Home Alone' Turns 25, and the Cast Reveals Secrets Behind the Movie's Biggest Moments This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“See what he had to say about his iconic role in the video below.”
“ET spoke with Heard in 2015 to celebrate Home Alone's 25th anniversary.”
“Heard also appeared in episodes of Battlestar Galactica, NCIS: Los Angeles, Modern Family and Outsiders, as well as had a couple of projects in post-production, including Imprisoned, Graffiti, The Tale, and he was filming Broome Street Boys.”
“RELATED: John Heard, 'Home Alone' and 'Sopranos' Actor, Dies at 71Heard's prolific career earned him over 170 acting credits, including Big, Beaches, Chilly Scenes of Winter,Heart Beat, Cutter’s Way and Cat People.”
“At the time he died, Heard was recovering from back surgery.”
“The Santa Clara County Medical Examiner’s office confirmed on Tuesday that the Sopranos and Home Alone star suffered a heart attack before he was found dead at age 71 in a Palo Alto, California, hotel room on July 21.”
“John Heard died of a heart attack, ET can confirm.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
Exclusive: lonely is 25 years old. The crew has revealed the secrets behind the most important moment of the movie. This video can't be played because we can't load the sponsor's information
"Take a look at what he says to his idol character in the video below."
"Et talked to Hurd in 2015 to celebrate the 25th anniversary of" exclusive. "
"Hurd has also starred in" Battlestar Galactica "," NCIS: Los Angeles "," modern family "and" the outsider ", as well as some post production projects, including" captivity "," graffiti "," story ", and he is shooting" bloom street boy "
Related report: John Hurd, the hero of lonely and soprano, died at the age of 71. Hurd's prolific career earned him more than 170 acting credits, including big beach, cold winter scenes, heartbeat, Carter's way and cat man
"At the time of his death, Hurd was recovering from back surgery."
"The soprano and lone star died of a heart attack on July 21 in a hotel room in Palo Alto, California, at the age of 71, the Santa Clara County forensic office confirmed on Tuesday
"John heard that he died of heart disease. Et can confirm it."



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News:”
“Selena Gomez & The Weeknd At Met Gala — Official Red Carpet Debut – Hollywood Life: Gomez, The Weeknd Make Red Carpet Debut at 2017 Met Gala – Us Weekly: Gomez Whispers ’’I Love You’’ to The Weeknd While Trailing Behind Yolanda Foster and Anwar Hadid at 2017 Met Gala | E!”
“The Weeknd attended last year’s Met Ball with his ex-girlfriend Bella Hadid, whose mother Yolanda and brother Anwar Hadid walked the carpet right behind him and Gomez this year.”
“Meanwhile the “Starboy“ singer opted for a classic black tuxedo.”
“For her first public event with her beau, Gomez stunned in a silk Coach gown with a thigh-high slit, a plunging neckline and beaded embellishments.”
“News, Gomez was caught sneaking an “I love you” into her man’s ear between holding hands, kissing and posing together on their way in to the event.”
“According to E!”
“Selena Gomez was caught whispering sweet nothings to her boyfriend The Weeknd while walking the white-and-blue carpet at the 2017 Met Ball on Monday night.”


News:
"Serena Gomez and the weekend of the 2017 metropolitan Festival - Official Red Carpet debut - Hollywood Life: Gomez, the weekend red carpet debut of the 2017 metropolitan Festival - US Weekly: Gomez whispered 'I love you' to the weekend at the 2017 metropolitan Festival, lagging behind Yolanda foster and Anwar Hadid!"
"This weekend he went to last year's meeting with his ex girlfriend Bella Hadid, whose mother Yolanda and brother Anwar Hadid are walking on the carpet behind him and Gomez this year."
Meanwhile, the star boy singer chose a classic black tuxedo
At the first public event with his boyfriend, Gomez was stunned by a silk coach dress with slits up to the thighs, a drooping neckline and beads
It is reported that Gomez was caught holding hands, kissing and taking a group photo on the way to the activity, secretly putting a "I love you" into a man's ear
"According to e!"
"Selena Gomez was caught whispering sweet words to her boyfriend while walking on the white and blue carpet of the 2017 meeting on Monday night."



Number  281
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Demi Lovato Was 'Stressed Out, 'Overworked' Prior to Apparent Overdose, Source Says (Exclusive)ET Flashback: Demi Lovato Opens Up About the 'Pressure of Not Making Mistakes' in 2008 InterviewEverything We Know About Demi Lovato's Apparent Drug OverdoseRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...message from our sponsors...”
“Some of the information being reported is incorrect and they respectfully ask for privacy and not speculation as her health and recovery is the most important thing right now Inside Demi Lovato s Rise to Fame While Battling Addiction This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a...”
““Demi is awake with her family who want to express thanks to everyone for the love, prayers, and support," reads the statement.”
“Instagram StoriesOn Tuesday, Lovato’s rep released a statement to ET regarding the singer's hospitalization.”
“Stars like Ariana Grande, Kim Kardashian West, Lady Gaga, Nick and Joe Jonas, Katy Perry, Justin Timberlake, Bruno Mars and many others have posted their well wishes on social media.”
“She posted a video of herself getting the ink, writing: “Got you on my mind.”Instagram StoriesRowland is one of many stars lending their support to Lovato in the wake of her relapse and hospitalization.”
“Lovato has a large lion tattoo on her hand, and Rowland decided to copy the look with a temporary drawn-on tattoo.”
“Getty Images“@ddlovato I [love] you,” Rowland captioned one Instagram Stories photo of a drawing of a lion.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Demi Lovato is' overworked 'and' overtired 'before obvious overdose, the source said (exclusive) et flashback: Demi Lovato opened up' pressure not to make mistakes' in the 2008 interview with everything we know about Demi Lovato's obvious overdose related gallery “
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“… Information from sponsors... "
"Some of the reported information is incorrect, they respectfully ask for privacy, not speculation, because her health and recovery is the most important thing, now in Demi Lovato's fame, and struggle addiction this video is not available, because we can't load one..."
"Demi wakes up and her family wants to thank everyone for their love, prayer and support," the statement said
"Instagram stories on Tuesday, Lovato representatives issued a statement to et about the singer's hospitalization."
"Ariana grand, Kim Kardashian West, Lady Gaga, Nick and Joe Jonas, Katie Perry, Justin Timberlake, Bruno Mars and other stars have all posted their blessings on social media."
She uploaded a video of herself getting the ink and wrote, "I think of you." Instagram stories Rowland is one of the stars who supported Lovato after her relapse and hospitalization
"Lovato has a big lion tattoo on his hand, and Roland decided to imitate it with a temporary tattoo."
"Getty Images" @ ddlovato I [love] you, "Roland wrote in an instagram stories photo of a lion



Number  282
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Harry was still a prince," says Nicholl, "and it was not the life that Chels wanted."”
“While Nicholl writes that the couple still had "deep feelings" for each other, Davy still knew that she was not ready for life in The Firm, the brazen name that Harry and his brother Prince William use to his family.”
“But although their date was romantic, it was not the beginning of a lasting union.”
“Then, when Harry, in Africa for his philanthropic work, asked him to meet in Cape Town, he accepted.”
“In the summer of 2015, Davy was fresh out of an affair with the jeweler Charles Goode .”
“In an effort to fix it, Harry returned to his other serious love.”
“"I think it really broke his heart."”
“"Harry did not want things to end, he was in love with her and he tried to convince her they could make it work, but Cressida's mind was made," says Nicholl.”
“Do not convince her to restart it.”
“Despite Harry's best efforts, he could not do it.”


"Harry is still a prince," Nicole said. "It's not the life that cheles wants."
Although Nicole wrote that the couple still had "deep feelings" for each other, David still knew that she was not ready to live in the company, a brazen name Harry and his brother Prince William used for their family
"But as romantic as their date is, it's not the beginning of a lasting union."
"Later, when Harry, a philanthropist in Africa, invited him to meet in Cape Town, he accepted."
"In the summer of 2015, David just came out of his affair with jeweler Charles good."
"To solve this problem, Harry went back to another serious lover."
"I think it really hurt his heart."
"Harry didn't want to let it end, he fell in love with her, he tried to convince her that they could make it work, but Cressida's decision," Nicole said
"Don't persuade her to start over."
"Despite Harry's best efforts, he can't do it."



Number  283
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now, we can sit back, relax, and watch life “Begin Again”.”
“We are out of the woods because justice was served in a powerful way.”
“After dealing with this situation for four years now, we all can move on and look forward to the future.”
“Whatever this chapter may hold for Swift, we are thankful that we were able to be a part of watching such a victorious and inspiring moment.”
“...or maybe it gives Swift a greater and more personal reason to give back.”
“Maybe it’s new music (we hope!)”
“Who knows what might come after this.”
“This is a new chapter for Swift and for every person she fought for in the courtroom.”
“Swift went away with winning her $1 but there’s more to it than that.”
“This is the message that speaks louder than words.”


Now, we can sit down, relax and watch life "start over"
"We are out of the woods because justice has been done forcefully."
"After four years of dealing with this situation, we can all move on and look to the future."
"Whatever the significance of this chapter for swift, we are grateful to be able to participate in such a winning and inspiring moment."
“… Or it gave swift a bigger, more personal reason to give back. "
"Maybe new music (we hope!)"
"Who knows what will happen after that."
"It's a new chapter for swift and everyone she's fighting for in court."
"Swift won her a dollar, but that's more than that."
"It's a message louder than words."



Number  284
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And then that went viral and that's the first and the last time that I've ever seen or met Phaedra."”
“"So I just decided to have a good time and she was such a good sport and we played and we flirted and we got our little kissy face on.”
“And I said, 'Well, I'm gonna introduce you to a different kind of Shemar,'" Shemar went on to say.”
“I m the guy from The Young and the Restless or She thinks I m a certain Shemar...”
“So I walked in and I saw Phaedra and I know who Phaedra I ve heard of Phaedra and she was looking like and so she looked at me and I kinda had this sense of like Oh she thinks...”
“And so you're loose and you have fun on his show."”
“And look, I met Phaedra doing a nighttime talk show with Andy Cohen and Andy Cohen does this thing late at night and he likes to get you to drink.”
“I just woke up, like, last week and everybody's like, 'Phaedra, Phaedra, Phaedra.'”
“News, “This thing, it's crazy to me.”
“Shemar cleared the air, telling E!”


"Then it spread. It was the first and last time I saw Federer."
"So I decided to have a good time, she was a good sport, we played, we flirted, we got our little kisses on the face."
"I said, 'well, I'll introduce you to a different Shema,'" Shema continued
"I'm young and restless, or she thinks I'm some Shema..."
"So I came in and saw Federer. I know who Federer is. I've heard of Federer. She looks very similar, so she looks at me. I'm a bit like, oh, she wants to..."
"So you're relaxed. You're having a good time on his show."
"You see, I've seen Federer do the evening talk show with Andy Cohen. Andy Cohen does it late at night. He likes to make you drink."
"I just woke up, like, last week, everyone said," Federer, Federer, Federer. "
"News," it's crazy for me
"Shema cleared her breath and told me!"



Number  285
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
““My parents are the ones that made me who I am.”
“...about affordable treatment options for the nation s families...”
“The two-time Olympic gold medal snowboarder spoke with Kimmel about his personal bout with the condition, explaining he’d undergone an operation similar to the one Kimmel’s newborn son, Billy, endured last week.”
““I don’t really, obviously, remember much at that point.”
“I was so young.”
“It brought back a lot, seeing [your monologue],” White said, further discussing an additional pair of reparative surgeries he received after the initial procedure.”
“While his heart could have prevented him from launching his prolific career in athletics, White went on to praise his parents’ decision to push him toward his goals even harder instead of sheltering him because of his malady.”
“They didn’t put these limitations on me.”
““It makes me believe that my son, too, is going to win Olympic gold medals for the United States of America — only if they make pizza-eating an Olympic event.”Jimmy Kimmel Live airs weeknights at 11:35 p.m.”


"Et on ABC."
"My parents made me."
“… About the national family affordable treatment program... "
"The two time Olympic skiing gold medalist talked to Kimmel about his personal battle with the situation and explained that he had undergone an operation similar to that performed by Kimmel's newborn son Billy last week."
"Obviously, I didn't remember it very well at that time."
"I'm too young."
"Seeing [your monologue] reminds him of a lot of things," White said He further discussed another pair of prosthetic operations after the initial operation
"Although his heart could have prevented him from starting his prolific career in track and field, white went on to praise his parents' decision to make him work harder towards his goals instead of sheltering him because of his illness."
"They didn't impose these restrictions on me."
"It makes me believe that my son will also win an Olympic gold medal for the United States of America - as long as they make pizza for the Olympics." Jimmy Kimmel showed "the Knights of the weekend" live at 11:35 p.m



Number  286
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...art and fits the show Westeros is so massive of course we need to see the entire world from the point of view of scholars and military strategists...”
“Just imagine if every season of Game of Thrones had fleeting shots of Rob Stark getting stabbed Joffrey purple and spluttering Cersei s dragonfire lighting shit up To be fair the Game of Thrones theme is its own work of...”
“But, as Bear explained in his wonderfully detailed Behind the Music-esque blog posts, he wasn’t connecting with the original lyrics by Sir H. Boulton.”
“And so forth.”
“Loud the winds howl, loud the waves roar,Thunderclouds rend the air;Baffled, our foes stand by the shore,Follow they will not dare.”
“...the sailors cry;Carry the lad that’s born to be KingOver the sea to Skye.”
“Already, amazing season 2 synergy before the damn pilot has even started:Speed, bonnie boat, like a bird on the wing,Onward!”
“...at the heart of the Jacobite uprising.”
“...during the Battle of Culloden (!!)”
“Because first he started off with the tune of the 1884 folk song “The Skye Boat Song,” which is not just any random Scottish ditty, but which chronicles the escape of Bonnie Prince Charlie (!)”


“…… Art and fit show westroth is so huge that we need to look at the whole world from the perspective of scholars and military strategists. "
"Just imagine, if every season of game of Thrones has short scenes of Rob stark being stabbed, Geoffrey purple and Selsey's Dragon Fire splashing, then the theme of game of Thrones is its own work..."
"But, as bear explained in detail at the end of his musical style blog post, he is not associated with Sir h. Bolton's original lyrics."
"Wait a minute."
The wind blows, the waves roar, the thunderclouds tear the air; our enemies stand on the shore, terrified, afraid to follow
“…… The sailors cried, and took the young man who was born to be king to Skye
"There's no time for the damn pilot to start: speed, Bonnie's boat, like a flying bird, moving forward!"
“… At the heart of the Jacobi uprising. "
“… In the battle of kuloden (!) "
Because he first started with the tune of the 1884 folk song "Skye's boat song", which is not just a casual Scottish minor, but records the escape of Charlie, the Bonnie Prince (!)



Number  287
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Your move, Pusha T.”
“Oh, and Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith (yes, Jay and Silent Bob appeared on Degrassi).”
“Saudin, Miriam McDonald, Cassie Steele, Sarah Barrable-Tishauer, and Paula Brancati.”
“J”
“Among the Degrassi alums to soon join Drake and Kippel are Nina Dobrev Stacey Farber Adamo Ruggiero Lauren Collins Jake Epstein Christina Schmidt Andrea Lewis Melissa McIntyre LinLyn Lue Stefan Brogen Ephraim Ellis who is lucky he got invited considering Rick shot Jimmy Jake Goldsbie Marc Donato Dalmar Abuzeid A”
“But the party and reunion truly starts after the duo arrives at Degrassi Community School.”
“He first meets up with Shane Kippel, who played Spinner, the best friend of Drake’s Jimmy Brooks.”
“Waking up in bed with a girl at center court of the Air Canada Centre, Drake sneaks out when he receives a reminder about his high school reunion.”
“In the video for his latest single “I’m Upset,” the rapper looks to being anything but, staging an epic Degrassi reunion, the Canadian teen drama that he starred on before his music career took off.”
“Drake is going back to school — and bringing along some old friends.”


"Your action, pushat."
"Oh, and Jason Mavis and Kevin Smith (yes, Jay and the Silent Bob are on degrassie."
"Sodding, Miriam MacDonald, Cathy Steele, Sarah barrebull tissauer and Paula blancati."
“J”
"Among de grassie's alumni are Nina Dobrev Stacy Farber Adamo Ruggiero Lauren Collins, Jack Epstein, Christina Schmidt, Andre Lewis Melissa MacIntyre, Lynn Lu, Stefan Brogan, and Ephraim Ellis. They are very lucky, considering that Rick shot Jimi Jack Goldsby and Marlene K. Donato Darma Abu Zaid, he was invited. "
"But when the party and reunion really started, they arrived at the de Grassi community school."
"He met Sean kipper for the first time, playing Drake's best friend, Jimmy Brooks, spinner."
Drake wakes up in bed with a girl in the atrium of the Air Canada Center and sneaks out when he receives a notice about a high school reunion
In the video of his latest single "I'm upset," the rapper looks like nothing, staging an epic reunion of de grassie, a Canadian teen drama he starred in before the take-off of his music career
"Drake is going back to school with some old friends."



Number  288
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I hate a knockoff.””
““The first time I walked into this one, I knew this was it—I fell in love,” Moore recalls.”
“It has the slightly pejorative connotation of something ordinary—the antithesis of the magic and wonder that fabulous design is meant to inspire.”
“Yet, when one enters the Manhattan home of actress Julianne Moore, the first impression is of surprising normality.”
“Teenagers buzz about, doing whatever it is that teenagers do, and dogs bark affectionately for attention.”
“The rooms possess the kind of engaging homeyness that emerges, seemingly without effort, in spaces where someone has paid close attention to proper scale, proportion, and period detail.”
“There is no indoor lap pool, Turkish-style hammam, James Turrell skyspace, or any other conspicuously lavish signifier of luxury.”
“It feels like a home—delightfully, unapologetically normal.”
““For years I dreamed about living in a townhouse in the West Village,” says the Oscar-winning actress, who lights up the big screen this fall with a hat trick of high-profile films: Todd Haynes’s Wonderstruck, George Clooney’s Suburbicon, and Matthew Vaughn’s Kingsman: The Golden Circle.”
“That was 15 years ago.”


"I hate fakes."
"The first time I walked into this room, I knew it was like this - I fell in love," Moore recalled
"It has a slightly derogatory connotation of common things, opposite to magic and miracle, and the mythical design is intended to inspire inspiration."
"However, when one walks into actress Julian Moore's Manhattan home, the first impression is surprisingly normal."
"Teenagers wander around and do whatever teenagers do. Dogs bark affectionately to get attention."
"These rooms have a charming sense of home, and it seems that they appear effortlessly in the space where people pay close attention to the appropriate proportion, proportion and details of the period."
"There is no indoor swimming pool, Turkish style Haman, James tourel's sky space, or any other obvious symbol of luxury."
"It feels like a home, pleasant and normal."
"For years, I've dreamed of living in a townhouse in the West Village," said the Oscar winner. This fall, she performed the hat trick of a famous movie on the big screen: Todd Haines's haunted, George Clooney's suburban and Matthew Vaughn's the king: the golden ring
"That was 15 years ago."



Number  289
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He added that police could quickly go to the same street and witness others disobeying laws.”
“AdvertisementRobert’s lawyer, Joseph Tacopina, claimed if the rapper’s name was “John Smith” police would not arrest him.”
“Initially, police were not aware of the accused’s identity, but they found the footage online which they used to indict the star.”
“...the rap star did not wear a helmet or obey traffic laws...”
“A post shared by Meek Mill meekmill on Oct 9 2017 at 10 17pm PDT As you may know Celebrity Insider reported that the rapper faced charges of reckless endangerment after authorities allegedly spotted the rapper dangerously driving around cars in traffic while doing wheelies or catwalks In the video...”
“CHANGE THE GAME!”
“The NYPD confirmed to the publication that the 30-year-old rapper went into police custody after the authorities arrived at the 10th Avenue and Dyckman Street in New York City.”
“However, if authorities arrest Robert one more time in the following six months, the deal will be voided.”
“After Meek finishes all of the requirements, prosecutors will dismiss his case ultimately clearing his record.”
“Today, Wednesday, October 11th, the District Attorney’s Office of Manhattan ruled that Robert Williams accepted an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal, more commonly stated as an “ACD.”As a result, the rapper must complete thirty hours of community service.”


"He added that the police can quickly go to the same street and witness other people breaking the law."
Robert's lawyer, Joseph Tacopina, said police would not arrest the rapper if his name was "John Smith."
"Initially, the police didn't know the identity of the defendant, but they found a video on the Internet to sue the star."
“… Rappers don't wear helmets or obey traffic regulations... "
"Meek mill meekmill published an article" inside the celebrity "on October 9, 2017 at 10:17 p.m., which reported that the rapper was facing the charge of reckless harm. It is said that the authorities found in the video that the rapper was driving dangerously around the car in traffic while doing wheel or show work..."
"Change the game!"
"The New York Police Department confirmed to publications that the 30-year-old rapper was detained by police after authorities arrived on 10th Avenue and deckerman street in New York City."
"However, if the authorities arrest Robert again in the next six months, the deal will be annulled."
"When Mick has completed all his requests, prosecutors will dismiss his case and eventually clean up his records."
Today, Wednesday, October 11, the Manhattan district attorney's office ruled that Robert Williams accepted an recess to consider dismissal, more commonly referred to as "ACD.". Therefore, rappers must complete 30 hours of community service



Number  290
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementWhen he is not traveling across the country for various projects, Kanye is usually found enjoying his Southern California property.”
“Lots of things have changed for Kanye since he purchased the mansion more than 10 years ago.”
“It has been confirmed that the rapper’s Hollywood Hills home that served as a bachelor pad back in the day has been sold.”
“It has been quite a long journey for the husband of Kim Kardashian as he has been trying to sell the pad since 2010.”
“The mansion received an offer of $2.95 million, and the sale was done privately.”
“Los Angeles Times first reported the real estate news.”
“In case you are wondering if that is a great deal or not, you should be aware of the fact that Kanye bought the three-bedroom, four-bathroom property back in 2003 for $1.7 million.”
“Regarding what the new owners will experience once they move in, amenities include a breakfast room, home theater, a fish tank in the master bedroom and a cartoon-like mural in the dining room.”
“Kidchella #Norths1stBirthday A post shared by Yeezus.”
“Soon after, they bought the property next door for a reported $2.9 million to ensure more privacy.”


When he doesn't travel around the country for a variety of projects, people usually find him enjoying a property in Southern California
"A lot of things have changed in Kanye since he bought the mansion more than 10 years ago."
"It's confirmed that the Hollywood villa, where rappers used to be single apartments, has been sold."
"It's quite a long journey for Kim Kardashian's husband, who has been trying to sell the pad since 2010."
"The mansion received an offer of 2.95 million yuan, and the sale was carried out in private."
"The Los Angeles Times first reported real estate news."
"If you want to know if it's a big deal, you should be aware of the fact that Kanye bought the three bedroom and four bathroom home for $1.7 million in 2003."
"For the new owner's experience, amenities include breakfast room, home theater, fish tank in the master bedroom and cartoon murals in the restaurant."
"A post shared by yeezus on the birthday of kidchella#north1."
"Soon after, they bought the property next door for $2.9 million to ensure more privacy."



Number  291
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Defending them is all the rage these days.”
“The most topical reference of all, however, is Portman’s fierce, violent respect for the controversial Star Wars prequels.”
“The sequel may not be quite as successful as the first attempt (mostly because it lacks the element of surprise), but a Samberg cameo is always welcome.”
“Black Swan, Portman’s kids, and her ballerino husband all get a shout-out in this updated sketch.”
“(As Bennett’s character notes, it’s pretty much the same sketch as before—with more current references.)”
“With Beck Bennett in the Chris Parnell role as an interviewer both bemused by and scared of Portman’s rap persona, the Annihilation star takes us all on a tour of what she’s been up to in the intervening years.”
“In other words: once more, with Jar Jar.”
“Well, Portman, Samberg, and the Viking helmet are all back for another go at, well, basically the same thing.”
“Digital Short she collaborated on with Andy Samberg where sweet, intellectual, child star Portman transformed herself into a gutter-mouthed rap star.”
“But if you remember anything, odds are it’s the S.N.L.”


"Protecting them is very popular now."
"But what's most focused on is Portman's respect for the intensity and violence of the controversial Star Wars prequel."
"The sequel may not be as successful as the first time (mainly because it lacks the element of surprise), but Sandberg's Cameo is always popular."
"Black swan, Portman's children and her ballet husband are all shouting in this updated sketch."
(as Bennett's characters say, this sketch is almost the same as before, with more references.)
"Beck Bennett is confused and afraid of Portman's rap role in Chris Parnell's role as an interviewer. The annihilation star shows us what she has done in the past few years."
In other words, again, with the jar
"Well, Portman, Sandberg and Viking helmets are back, basically the same."
"In her digital video with Andy Sandberg, Portman, a sweet and smart child star, turns himself into a dirty mouthed rapper."
"But if you remember anything, it's probably s.n.l."



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more details of the royal wedding:Now, learn 100 years of eyeliner history:Follow Sam on Instagram and Twitter.”
“Be sure to follow along with all our royal wedding coverage for more details of this historic day.”
“...name of which I cannot stop saying in my head...”
“Steve Parsons WPA Pool Getty Images In case you need a reminder of the striking Givenchy design Markle wore earlier in the day here it is in all its royal wedding glory Getty Images Anyway here s hoping the newlywed couple has a happy reception party at Frogmore House the...”
“Steve Parsons/WPA Pool/Getty ImagesHarry, on the other hand, changed out of his official frockcoat uniform and into a classic black tuxedo, complete with a black bowtie around his neck and an adorable just-married grin across his face.”
“Markle's reception dress, a long white gown made of silk crepe by British designer Stella McCartney, featured a halter-style neckline and the same type of effortless elegance as every other element of the bride's wedding-day look.”
“Both Prince Harry, the Duke of Sussex, and Meghan Markle, now the Duchess of Sussex, looked less formal than in the chapel earlier, but still just as classic and sophisticated.”
“The freshly married couple exited Windsor Castle, each having switched to a brand-new look.”
“For this, Markle changed into a reception dress that's just as divine as her ceremony gown.”
“Just kidding; they're off to a royal evening reception at Frogmore House, a location that's undoubtedly less awesome than its name, where they'll celebrate with family, friends, and fellow royals.”


"Read more details about the Royal Family Wedding: now learn the eyeliner for 100 years: follow Sam on Instagram and Twitter."
"Be sure to follow all of our royal wedding reports and learn more about this historic day."
“… I can't stop saying names in my mind... "
"Steve Parsons WPA pool Getty Images in case you need to remind you that Markle wore the eye-catching Givenchy design earlier in the day. Here it is in all its royal wedding glory Getty Images. Anyway, I hope the newlyweds have a happy reception in Frogmore house..."
"On the other hand, Steve Parsons / WPA pool / Getty Images Harry changed into a formal dress uniform, a classic black tuxedo, a black bow tie around his neck and a lovely wedding smile on his face."
"Markle's welcome dress is a long white dress made of silk crepe by British designer Stella McCartney, with a sling design at the neckline. Like all other elements of the bride's wedding day, it has the same type of effortless elegance."
"Neither Prince Harry, the Duke of Sussex, nor Megan marcel, the Duchess of Sussex today, looks as formal as they were in church earlier, but they are still classic and sophisticated."
The newlyweds left Windsor Castle for a new look
"For this reason, markel changed into a reception dress as sacred as her dress."
"I'm just kidding. They're going to a royal dinner at flagmore palace, which is no doubt less awe inspiring than its name, where they celebrate with their family, friends and other members of the royal family."



Number  293
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET.”
““Natalie and I will be welcoming twins in the fall,and we are excited to share the news with you all!”The Challenge: XXX airs on MTV Tuesdays at 10 p.m.”
“Well, it is well deserved with the news I am about to share,” the two-time champ wrote at the time.”
““I know it has been a very long time since my last blog post, and I have taken a little hiatus from social media.”
“She announced in May that she is expecting twins with her partner, Natalie Gee.”
“Following her admission Ferriera asked Portillo to go to bed with her as friends explaining I want to hold you like a little kitten Robinson has moved on from both relationships...”
“Portillo was less than thrilled to have her past relationship exposed explaining in a confessional interview I feel honestly bad for Rachel for me to come back years later and talk about it when I didn t talk about when we re together I feel like that s really disrespectful...”
“Her ex-girlfriend is my ex-girlfriend.”Ferreira explained that when she and Robinson, who began their romance after filming season six of the MTV series, eventually split, Robinson went on to date Portillo.”
““That’s what it really comes to.”
“And that’s it,” Ferriera said to Portillo.”


"Wait a minute."
"Natalie and I will have twins in the fall, and we are happy to share the news with you! "Challenge: XXX will be on MTV at 10pm on Tuesday."
"Well, the news I'm going to share is well deserved," the two time champion wrote at the time
"I know it's been a long time since my last blog post, and I've taken a break from social media."
She announced in May that she and her partner Natalie GEE were pregnant with twins
"After she was admitted to the hospital, Ferreira asked Portillo to go to bed with her. As a friend, she explained that I wanted to hold you, just like a kitten. Robinson had left the relationship..."
"Portillo is not so excited about the exposure of her past relationship. She explained in a confessional interview that I really feel sorry for Rachel because I came back to talk about it many years later. When I didn't talk about us together, I felt it was really disrespectful..."
"Her ex girlfriend is my ex girlfriend." Ferreira explained that when she and Robinson started their relationship after filming season 6 of the MTV series and finally broke up, Robinson continued to date Portillo
"That's what it really means."
"That's it," Ferreira said to porti



Number  294
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The duo first me as co-stars on the MTV reality drama, the Hills, in 2007 and recently celebrated their nine-year wedding anniversary.”
“Post baby body' she captioned the shot of herself with her trademark blonde tresses swept back in a ponytailMeanwhile, Heidi posted a sweet snap of the young adorable family as they ushered in the holiday season.”
“And Heidi Montag has been hard at work getting her post-pregnancy body back into pre-pregnancy shape.”
“The 31-year-old reality star announced she lost 25 lbs.”
“...since welcoming son Gunner with husband Spencer Pratt via social media on Thursday.”
“Scroll down for video...”
“Dropping: Heidi Montag has been hard at work getting her post-pregnancy body back into pre-pregnancy shapeThe Hills alum cut a casual figure in a light pink top as she took to Instagram to let her fans in on her weight loss progress.”
“'I lost 25lbs!”
“Post baby body' she captioned the shot of herself with her trademark blonde tresses swept back in a ponytail.”
“The former MTV starlet was hard at work returning to her former physique as she was often snapped in saucy bikini pics before her pregnancy.”


"In 2007, they first starred with me in MTV reality show mountain, and recently celebrated their ninth wedding anniversary."
"Post baby body" she captioned her photo with her signature blonde hair and ponytail. At the same time, Heidi posted a sweet snapshot of this lovely young family when the festival came
"Heidi Montague has been trying to get her body back to what it was before she got pregnant."
"The 31 year old reality star announced that she lost 25 pounds."
“…… Since Thursday's social media welcome of son ganner and husband Spencer Platt. "
Scroll down to view video
"Down: Heidi Montague has been trying to get her body back to what it was before she got pregnant. Hill's alum cut a casual figure on instagram wearing a light pink top to let her fans know her weight loss progress."
"I lost 25 pounds!"
"Post baby body" she wore her trademark blonde hair in a ponytail to make the title of her photo
"The former MTV actress works very hard because she is often photographed with sexy bikini before she gets pregnant, and she has regained her former physique."



Number  295
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“But today, Kensington Palace announced that the happy couple won't be jetting out of town immediately following their big day.”
“Rather, they are delaying their trip to get back to work.”
“Meghan and Harry will attend an engagement in the week following their wedding, and then they'll head off to an undisclosed location.”
“The couple will be going on honeymoon but not straightaway Kensington Palace spokesman Jason Knauf said according to People They will have their first engagement as a married couple in the week after the wedding That schedule is in keeping with what Markle said earlier this year about wanting to...”
“...hit the ground running once she officially becomes a member of the royal family...”
“Their plan is also similar to when Prince William and Duchess Kate went on their honeymoon.”
“According to royal commentator Victoria Arbiter, "William and Kate left for their honeymoon in the Seychelles 10 days after their wedding.”
“Before that the couple were in Anglesey as William was working at his RAF search and rescue base."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"But today, Kensington Palace announced that the happy couple would not fly out of town immediately after their big day."
"Instead, they delayed their trip to get back to work."
"Megan and Harry will attend an engagement ceremony a week after the wedding, and then they will go to a secret place."
"The couple are going on their honeymoon, but they won't go to Kensington Palace immediately," Kensington Palace spokesman Jason Knauf said. According to people familiar with the matter, they will be engaged for the first time within a week after the wedding, which is the same schedule as what markel said earlier this year... "
“…… Once she officially became a member of the royal family, she started to run... "
"Their plans are similar to those of Prince William and Duchess kate on their honeymoon."
According to Victoria arbiter, a British Royal commentator, "William and Kate went to Seychelles for their honeymoon 10 days after their wedding."
"Before that, William and his wife were in Anglesey, when he was working at RAF search and rescue base."



Number  296
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s got great taste.”
“Next time, compliment the girl you unintentionally match with.”
“That more than one person can look good AF in the same outfit without getting pitted against each other.”
“That both Hadid and Collins can rock the dopest frayed denim jeans 2.”
“1.”
“So what’s the lesson learned here?”
“But, for the most part, the two looked like they could exchange outfits for the day and no one would notice.”
“...sweater...”
“Fortunately the tops were noticeably different The 22 year old model we mean Hadid of course sported a cropped band tee under her jacket while the 28 year old actress bundled up in a white collared shirt and cream Rails...”
“(Hey, great minds, right?)”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“AdvertisementFilming is set to begin on October 9.”
“Bundy confessed to 30 homicides committed in seven states between 1974 and 1978 but the true number of his victims is still unknown and could possibly be much higher.”
“Extremely Wicked, Shockingly Evil and Vile will be told from the perspective of Bundy's longtime girlfriend, Elizabeth Kloepfer, who denied the accusations against Bundy for years before ultimately turning him into the police.”
“Berlinger is best known for co-directing, with the late Bruce Sinofsky, the Paradise Lost documentaries that eventually freed the West Memphis 3 from a wrongful murder conviction, as well as Metallica: Some Kind of Monster.”
“Oscar-nominated documentary filmmaker, Joe Berlinger, will direct the story of Bundy as penned by Michael Werwie.”
“In 2012, he featured in The Paperboy, which followed the story of death-row inmate Hillary Van Wetter.”
“This is not the first time Efron has been involved in a thriller of this kind before.”
“AdvertisementThe 29-year-old is set to play notorious serial killer Ted Bundy in Extremely Wicked, Shockingly Evil and Vile.”
“Zac Efron has most definitely moved away from his Disney days and his latest role cements his breakaway from the High School Musical image that made him a star.”
“Zac Efron to play one of America's most notorious serial killersHigh School musical murder?”


"Advertising is scheduled to start on October 9."
"Bondi confessed to 30 murders in seven states between 1974 and 1978, but the actual number of his victims is still unknown and may be much higher."
"From the perspective of Bondi's old girlfriend Elizabeth kloppfel, people will say extremely evil, shocking evil and despicable. She has denied the charges against Bondi for many years and eventually turned Bondi into a policeman."
"Belinger is best known for working with the late Bruce Sinofsky to direct the documentary paradise lost, which eventually freed West Memphis 3 from false murder and metal: some kind of monster（ Metallica:Some king  of Monster）
Oscar nominated documentary producer Joe Bolinger will direct Michael Weaver's Bondi story
"In 2012, he starred in NEWSBOY, which tells the story of death row Hillary van wetter."
"This is not the first time evron has been involved in such a thriller."
The 29 year old actor will star in the infamous serial killer Ted Bundy's "extreme evil, shocking evil and mean."
"Zac Efron is completely out of his days at Disney, and his latest role reinforces his separation from the high school musical image that made him a star."
Zac Efron plays one of America's most notorious serial killers, high school music murder



Number  298
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SLIDES Chris Jackson AFP Getty Images 51 55 SLIDES OBY MELVILLE AFP Getty Images 52 55 SLIDES AFP Getty Images 53 55 SLIDES CHRIS JACKSON AFP Getty Images 54 55 SLIDES IAN WEST AFP Getty Images 55 55 SLIDES CHRIS JACKSON AFP Getty Images 55 55 SLIDES”
“It seemed to be the last thing on Serena's mind though, as she documented plenty of fun moments on social media with her family, Alexis and their little baby girl, Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr.”
“But in many ways this event was no different than others, as buses were provided for guests to be shuttled to the event, and Oprah and Serena rode them just like everyone else!”
“© Ian West - WPA Pool / Getty Images Oprah Winfrey arrives at St. George's Chapel at Windsor Castle before the wedding of Prince Harry to Meghan Markle on May 19, 2018.”
“Oprah was one of the first to arrive at St. George's Chapel at Windsor Castle on Saturday, May 19, followed by showstoppers like Idris Elba, George and Amal Clooney, Serena Williams and Priyanka Chopra.”
“As the cameras rarely miss anything at events such as this, guests including Oprah and Serena alongside husband Alexis Ohanian, were spotted getting off shuttles that carried them from the security checkpoints to the chapel.”
“© REX/Shutterstock Serena Williams and Alexis Ohanian arrive for the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle at St. George's Chapel at Windsor Castle on May 19, 2018.”
“Winfrey's best friend and "CBS This Morning" co-host Gayle King, teased about Oprah's journey into Windsor.”
“"I said, 'Oprah has to ride the bus?”
“Oprah is not a bus person.”


"Slide Chris Jackson AFP Getty Images 51 55 slide oby butterfly AFP Getty Images 52 55 slide AFP Getty Images 53 55 slide Chris Jackson AFP Getty Images 54 55 slide Ian West AFP Getty Images 55 55 slide Chris Jackson AFP Getty Images 55 55 slide"
"However, this seems to be the last thing on Serena's mind, because she recorded many interesting moments with her family Alexis and their baby girl, Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr., on social media."
"But in many ways, this event is no different from other events, because there are buses to pick up guests, and Oprah and Serena take the bus just like everyone else!"
"? Ian West WPA pool / Getty Images Oprah Winfrey arrives at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle before the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan Marcel on May 19, 2018."
"Oprah was one of the first to arrive at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle on May 19 (Saturday), followed by performers such as Idris Elba, George and Amal Clooney, Serena Williams and Priyanka Chopra."
"Because the cameras rarely miss anything in such an event, guests including Oprah and Serena and her husband Alexis o'hanian were found getting off the shuttle bus from the security station to the church."
"On May 19, 2018, Rex / shutterstock Serena Williams and Alexis Ohanian arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle to attend the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel."
Winfrey's best friend and co host of CBS this morning, Gail king, joked about Oprah's Windsor trip
"I said, Oprah's going to take the bus?"
"Oprah is not a bus driver."



Number  299
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Audioslave and Soundgarden Frontman Chris Cornell Dies at 52, Celebs React This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Watch below to see how more stars mourned the loss of Cornell.”
“Wind River is out Aug. 4.”
“"And try to learn and grow from those experiences."”
“MORE: Read Chester Bennington's Heartbreaking Letter to Chris Cornell: 'Can't Imagine A World Without You'"You just kind of get saddened by stuff like that," he said of coping with loss.”
“"He was one of the reasons why I never wanted to be a singer because that voice that he had was...I almost hate the guy," Renner explained.”
“Himself a musician, Renner admitted that he would have been too awestruck to ever have a jam session with Cornell.”
“WATCH: Chris Cornell's Wife Opens Up About Singer's Death and Their Last Moments Together"I was just glad to have any experience with Chris," Renner added.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Chris Cornell, head of Audioslave and Soundgarden, died at the age of 52. Celebrities thought the video was not available because we couldn't load the sponsor's information."
"See how many stars below mourn the loss of Cornell."
"Wind River was out on August 4."
"Try to learn and grow from these experiences."
"More: read Chester Bennington's heartbreaking letter to Chris Cornell: 'can't imagine a world without you'," he said of how to deal with losses: "you're just a little sad about things like that."
"He's one of the reasons I don't want to be a singer, because of his voice I almost hate him, "Reiner explained
Reiner, a musician himself, admits he would be shocked if he had an impromptu concert with Cornell University
"Observation: Chris Cornell's wife made public Jackson's death and their last moments together." I'm glad to have any experience with Chris, "Reiner added



Number  300
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now it’s back to normal,” she said.”
“We were relaxed, didn’t bicker.”
“The former Real Housewives of Miami star’s attorney, Raymond J. Rafool, confirmed to PEOPLE that the pair divorced Thursday morning.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Joanna and Romain remain grateful for the years they spent together and wish each other nothing but continued happiness and success,” Rafool said in a statement to PEOPLE.”
““The parties did not request from the other and do and did not seek and irrevocably waived any and all rights to receive alimony and support in all forms and/or a combination of forms,” according to Krupa and Zago’s final judgment of dissolution of marriage obtained by PEOPLE.”
“After they signed their divorce documents, the duo was spotted leaving a Miami, Florida, court building.”
“Krupa, 38, donned a fitted black top and black skinny jeans, which she paired with nude pumps and a pale pink blazer, while Zago sported jeans, black tennis shoes and a white long-sleeved polo shirt.”
“Upon walking out of the building with two lawyers, Krupa and Zago each hugged the legal counsel before they went their separate ways.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash News OnlineA source confirmed to PEOPLE in May that the former Bravo personality had separated from Zago after four years of marriage; last month, the pair jointly filed for divorce.”


"It's back to normal now," she said
"We're very relaxed. There's no quarrel."
The former housewife of Miami star lawyer Raymond J. RADUL confirmed that the two divorced on Thursday morning
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Joanna and Roman are still grateful for the years they have spent together and just hope that each other will continue to be happy and successful," laver said in a statement to people magazine
"In accordance with the final judgment of dissolution of the marriage obtained by Krupa and Zago, the parties have not made any claim to the other party, nor have they sought and irrevocably renounced any and all rights to alimony and alimony in all forms and / or combinations."
After they signed their divorce papers, they were found leaving a court building in Miami, Florida
"The 38 year old wore a fitted black top and black skinny jeans with nude heels and a light pink suit, while Zago wore sports jeans, black tennis shoes and a white long sleeve polo shirt."
"When they walked out of the building with two lawyers, Krupa and Zago hugged the legal adviser respectively, and then went their separate ways."
"Credit for image zooming: a source on splash news online confirmed to people in May that the former Bravo celebrity separated from Zago after four years of marriage, and last month they filed for divorce."



Number  301
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for why you have absolutely no memory of the sketch in question, "It got zero laughs," explained Ferrell.”
“I cultivate my look to look like him!'"”
“'You guys!”
“'Oh Gabe Kaplan was here.'”
“"So I was really sad in the break room, dressed s Gabe Kaplan, and I was overhearing this conversation like, 'He was so nice,' and I was like, 'Who you guys talking about?'”
“In the sketch, Ferrell's character, who is the world's biggest Kaplan fan, is horrified to learn that Kaplan visited the insurance office that day, but none of his co-workers had notified him.”
“"I'll say my least was one where I dressed up as Gabe Kaplan from Welcome Back, Kotter, and I worked in an insurance agency, and he was a client."”
“"I had many, many sketches that died, which I kind of perversely loved," Ferrell said.”
“You may unsubscribe at any time.”
“By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy .”


"As for why you have no memory of this sketch at all," Ferrer explained, "it didn't laugh."
"I dress up like him!"
"You
"Oh, Gabe Kaplan is here."
"So I was really sad in the lounge, dressed in s Gabe Kaplan, and I overheard this conversation," he's so nice, "and I thought," who are you talking about? "
"In the sketch, Ferrer's character is the biggest fan of Kaplan in the world. He was shocked to learn that Kaplan visited the insurance company's office that day, but no colleague informed him."
"What I want to say is that at least once I dressed up as Gabe Kaplan, who's welcome back. Kurt, I work for an insurance company and he's my client."
"I made lots of dead sketches, and I kind of loved them," Ferrer said
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"By registering, you agree to our terms of use and acknowledge the data practices in our privacy policy."



Number  302
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When asked about Cosby’s statement during a press conference, Montgomery County, PA District Attorney Kevin Steele responded, “I’m not going to talk about Camille Cosby.””
“And to our dear friends and supporters who never gave up on us despite it all.”
“Here’s what she said:“How do I describe the district attorney?”
“Heinously and exploitively ambitious.”
“How do I describe the judge?”
“Overtly arrogant and collaborating with the district attorney.”
“How do I describe the counsels for the accusers?”
“Totally unethical.”
“How do I describe many, but not all, general media?”
“Blatantly vicious entities that continually disseminated intentional omissions of truths for the primary purpose of greedily selling sensationalism at the expense of a human life.”


"Asked at a press conference about Cosby's statement, Montgomery County Attorney Kevin Steele replied," I won't talk about Camille Cosby. "
"And our dear friends and supporters, who never gave up on us, despite all this."
She said, "how do I describe a district attorney?"
"Outrageous ambition."
"How do I describe a judge?"
"Blatant arrogance, cooperation with the district attorney."
"How do I describe the plaintiff's lawyer?"
"Totally immoral."
"How do I describe a lot, but not all, of mass media?"
"Blatant evil entities constantly spread acts of deliberately omitting the truth, whose main purpose is to greedily sell sensational remarks at the cost of human life."



**Something goes wrong**
“‘ We need to formalize the whisper network.”
“Ashley Judd 49 Actor More Judd says she was sexually harassed by Harvey Weinstein when she was 29 years old.”
“Finally, in October—when Judd went on the record about Weinstein's behavior in the New York Times , the first star to do so—the world listened.”
“"There wasn't a place for us to report these experiences."”
“Judd asks.”
“"Were we supposed to call some fantasy attorney general of moviedom?"”
“It allowed for people to warn others to some degree, but there was no route to stop the abuse.”
“TIMEShe recalls one screenwriter friend telling her that Weinstein's behavior was an open secret passed around on the whisper network that had been furrowing through Hollywood for years.”
“I told everyone."”
“I told him.”


"We need to formalize the whispering network."
"Ashley Judd is 49, and actor Moore Judd said she was sexually harassed by Harvey Weinstein when she was 29."
"Finally, in October, when Jude announced Weinstein's behavior in the New York Times, the world's first star heard about it."
"We have no place to report these experiences."
"Asked Judd
"Should we call the fantasy Attorney General of the movie industry?"
"It allows people to warn others to some extent, but there is no way to stop abuse."
"He recalled that a playwright friend told her that Weinstein's behavior was an open secret circulating on the whispering network, which had been popular in Hollywood for many years."
"I told you."
"I told him."



Number  304
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His ex, Kourtney Kardashian, is reportedly not bothered by his playboy ways.”
“Image zoom Thorne and Sulkin announced their split exclusively through PEOPLE in August vowing to always love each other The actress who came out as bisexual soon after the breakup continued to work with her ex on the TV movie Drink Slay Love where Sulkin tackled the leading man role...”
“...to be very amicable exes...”
“The former Disney Channel star, 19, is back to canoodling with Sulkin after returning from the Cannes Film Festival, where the actress got frisky with Scott Disick.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Thorne shared a photo of her laying on top of the shirtless 25-year-old actor on a pool float wearing the same outfit she had (which was featured on her Snapchat) worn earlier on Sunday.”
““Happy birthday Gregg!!!!”
“I love you,” she captioned the image.”
““Always been such a wonderful person:) glad we are here through thick and thin.”
“Let’s party you old man!”


According to reports, his ex girlfriend Courtney Kardashian is not bothered by his playboy style
"Photo zooming: in August, Thorne and surkin announced their breakup exclusively through people, vowing to love each other forever. Soon after the breakup, they acted as bisexual actresses and continued to cooperate with their ex boyfriends in the TV movie" love between men and women ", in which surkin played the leading role..."
“… To be a very friendly predecessor... "
The 19-year-old former Disney Channel star returned from Cannes Film Festival and went on a canoe trip with sulkin. At the Cannes Film Festival, surkin and Scott Disick had a good time
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Thorne shared a photo of a 25-year-old topless actress in the same suit she wore earlier on Sunday (described on her snapchat)
"Happy birthday, Greg!!"
"I love you," she added a caption to the picture
"It's always been such a great person:) I'm glad we've been able to pull through here."
"Let's revel together, old man!"



Number  305
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Me and Tristan will deal with this at a later time, because there are some things [that are] deeper than being documented.”
““He might not want to be as vulnerable as he normally would in private.”
““You’re experiencing a miracle take place,” she reflected afterward.”
“I don’t have to have a lot of interaction, I just have to be there for her.”When True was born at 4:00 a.m. — Kris delivered her, and Thompson cut the umbilical cord — Khloé was overwhelmed with emotion.”
“So I’m going to keep it cute.”
““As much as I want to go off, I just don’t think it’s the time.”
“I thought there would be way more tension,” said Kim, 38.”
““The vibe in the room is calm.”
“...relatively cordial...”
“Me and Tristan will deal with him and I at a later time when this isn t affecting our child Mom Kris Jenner and sisters Kim and Kourtney Kardashian flew in from Los Angeles and while there were certainly some tense moments in the delivery room everyone managed to remain...”


"Tristan and I will deal with this later because there are things that go deeper (than what is recorded)," he said
"He may not want to be as vulnerable as he is in private."
"You're going through a miracle," she thought later
"I don't need too much interaction, I just need to be with her." When Zhen was born at 4 a.m., Chris delivered her, Thompson cut the umbilical cord, and heloe was excited
"So I want to be cute."
"I want to go, but I don't think it's the right time."
"I thought there would be more tension," said Kim, 38
"The atmosphere in the room was calm."
“… More cordial... "
"Tristan and I will deal with him and me later, because it won't affect our children. Mom Chris Jenner and sisters Kim and Courtney Kardashian flew from Los Angeles. Although there must be some tense moments in the delivery room, everyone managed to stay..."



Number  306
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Alexus acknowledged that the solution for bullying comes from consequences and “at the end of Season 1, I think you kind of feel like people got away with it.”POPULAR ON VARIETY:”
“At the FYSee event, actress Ajiona Alexus said Season 2 will continue to explore her character’s damaged psyche as she grapples with the guilt and trauma of her secret.”
“...the series sophomore run...”
“The new season begins in the throes of a court case that forces its teen protagonists — and antagonists — to delve deeper into their inner struggles and actions that led up to Hannah’s suicide in the Season 1 finale.”
“Here’s everything we know about “13 Reasons Why” Season 2, streaming Friday.”
“Seven New Actors Joined the CastThe show’s ensemble cast expands in the second season to include seven new recurring characters played by Anne Winters, Bryce Cass, Chelsea Alden, Allison Miller, Samantha Logan, Kelli O’Hara, and Ben Lawson.”
“Winters plays Liberty High s newest head cheerleader and beautiful it girl Chloe Cass plays the edgy and mischievous Cyrus Alden plays Cyrus artsy witty and outspoken sister Mackenzie Logan plays respected track star Nina O Hara plays a passionate advocate for bullying victims named Jackie Miller plays a smart...”
“...and ambitious young litigator named Sonya and Lawson rounds out the newcomers as Liberty High s beloved baseball coach Rick...”
“Katherine Langford Returns as Hannah BakerWhile Langford’s character died by suicide in the Season 1 finale, Hannah will reappear in flashbacks and as a haunting figment of characters’ imaginations in the second season.”
“Earlier this month at Netflix’s annual FYSee Kick-Off event in Los Angeles, newcomer Lawson commented on Hannah’s role in Season 2.”


Alexis admits that the solution to bullying comes from the consequences. "At the end of the first season, I think you'll think people get away with it."
"At fysee's event, actress ajiona alexus said the second season will continue to explore the psychology of her character's damage as she struggles with her secret guilt and trauma."
“… Sophomore series
"The new season begins in the throes of a court case, forcing its young protagonist - and opponent - to explore the inner struggle and action that led to Hannah's suicide in the end of the first season."
"Here's what we know about the second season of 13 reasons, Friday streaming."
Seven new actors have joined the cast, which expanded its cast in the second season to include seven new roles, including Anne winters, Bryce CASS, Chelsea Alden, Alison Miller, Samantha Logan, Kelly O'Hara and Ben Lawson
"Winters plays freedom high school's newest cheerleader and beautiful it girl, Chloe Kass plays the impatient and naughty Cyrus Alden plays Cyrus' artistic witty and outspoken sister, McKenzie Logan plays the respected track star Nina O'Hara plays a passionate advocacy bullying victim named Jackie Miller plays a smart..."
“…… Ambitious young litigation lawyers Sonia and Lawson named the new candidate Rick, the beloved baseball coach of freedom high school. "
"Katherine Langford comes back as Hannah Becker, while Langford's character dies of suicide at the end of the first season, Hannah will appear again in the flashback and as an unforgettable fictional character of imagination in the second season."
Earlier this month, rookie Lawson commented on Hannah's role in the second season at Netflix's annual fysee conference in Los Angeles



Number  307
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So we would talk, like, on a daily basis about everything.”Too cute.”
“I was a little bit ahead of her, so we were both doing it for the first time and I would just like warn her of things that happened… the amazing things that are going on, and feeling the baby for the first time.”
“Instagram/KylieJenner“We would just experience everything together.”
“It was so much fun [being pregnant at the same time as Khloe],” she continued.”
“Everyone should have Khloe in their delivery room.”
“So she really helped me through the whole thing.”
““She's just very, very nurturing.”
“This comes as Kylie opened up to Evening Standard magazine about what it was like being pregnant at the same time as sister Khloe Kardashian: “I needed Khloé in the room with me... She was there for all my other sisters.”
“InstagramTaking to Instagram Stories on Saturday night, the 21-year-old edited two pictures together and added the caption: “My baby and me” to show fans how strong those Kardashian-Jenner genes can be.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star recently took the eight-month old to her first ever pumpkin patch with boyfriend Travis Scott and has now decided to share an image of herself at the exact same age.”


"So we talk about something every day." That's lovely
"I'm one step ahead of her, so it's the first time we've all done this. I just want to remind her of what happened Amazing things are happening, and feeling the baby for the first time. "
"Instagram / Kylie Jenner" we will experience everything together
"It's fun to be pregnant with Chloe at the same time," she added
"Everyone's delivery room should have Khloe."
"So she really helped me."
"She's just very, very cultured."
Kelly opened her heart to the standard evening news, telling how it felt to be pregnant with her sister, Carol Kardashian: "I need Carol in my room... She exists for my other sisters. "
"Instagram at the instagram news conference on Saturday night, the 21-year-old edited two photos and added the title:" my baby and I "to show fans how powerful Kardashian Jenner's genes are."
"The star who keeps in touch with Kardashian recently brought her 8-month-old daughter and boyfriend Travis Scott to her first pumpkin patch in history, and now she has decided to share a picture of her age."



Number  308
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ChoiceSummerGroup The Chainsmokers Coldplay Fifth Harmony Florida Georgia Line Imagine Dragons Little Mix For more celebrity news follow us on social media via Facebook and Twitter CelebMix...”
“See the complete list of Wave 2 nominees below.”
“Less than one month after event organizers announced the first round of nominations, Fox released the second one, which includes five new categories such as Choice Gamer, Choice Changemaker and Choice Latin Song.”
“Even though the music category is lead by Selena Gomez with a total of five nominations Choice Summer Song Choice Female Artist Choice Summer Female Artist Choice Song Female Artist and Choice Collaboration it also features such superstars as Ed Sheeran who scored another two nominations for Choice Pop Song...”
“...and Choice Summer song bringing his total to four this year Harry Styles and Miley Cyrus...”
“The movie categories include K.J.”
“Apa, Colin O’Donoghue, Lili Reinhart, Millie Bobby Brown, Chris Pine and many more.”
“The first wave of nominations for this year’s Teen Choice Awards was revealed in June, with Pretty Little Liars leading with seven nominations, followed by The Flash with four and The Arrow, Supergirl, This Is Us and The Vampire Diaries each receiving three.”
“Mark your calendars and get your popcorn ready!”
“The Teen Choice Awards airs Sunday, Aug. 13 at 8/7c on Fox.”


"Choicesummergroup the chain Coldplay fifth harmony Florida line imagine dragons little mix for more celebrity news follow us on social media through Facebook and twitter..."
"Please refer to the full list of nominees for the second wave below."
"Less than a month after the event organizers announced the first round of nominations, fox released the second round of nominations, including five new categories: choice gamer, choice changemaker and choice Latin song."
"Although the music category is led by Selena Gomez and has five nominations - selected summer songs, selected female artists, selected summer female artists, selected female artists and selected partners - it also has superstars such as ed Sheeran, and she has two other nominations for selected pop songs..."
“… Choosing summer songs brings his total to four this year, Harry stiles and Millie Cyrus... "
"The film category includes K.J."
"APA, Colin o'donohoe, Lily Reinhardt, Millie Bobbie brown, Chris pine and so on."
"The first wave of nominations for this year's Teen Choice Awards was announced in June, with the beautiful little liar leading with seven nominations, followed by the flash with four nominations," super girl, this is us "and" the Vampire Diaries "each with three nominations."
"Mark the calendar and get popcorn ready!"
"The Teen Choice Award was broadcast on Fox 8 / 7C on Sunday, August 13."



Number  309
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This is the content we Pump fiends crave.”
“#thekentuckycastle”Without further ado, please enjoy this video of a reality star who just booked the wedding venue of her dreams.”
“Vanderpump Rules stars Brittany Cartwright and Jax Taylor have booked their wedding venue, and the location is one fans should’ve seen coming 2,000 miles away.”
“Brittany has said time and time again that she has always wanted to get married at the Kentucky Castle in Versailles, Kentucky, and what do you know?”
“That is precisely where she and Jax will tie the knot.”
“As Jax shared on Instagram on Thursday, Brittany’s dreams of getting married at the Sexy Unique Spot are officially coming true.”
“And whew, the IG video of Jax and Brittany's wedding venue sure is something to behold.”
““Well venue set, deposit paid,” Jax wrote on IG.”
““Now I need a drink....bad.” He also posted a video to Instagram Stories he took while he and Brittany celebrated the financial commitment they just made.”
“"Just got the total of the wedding!!!"”


"That's what our demons crave."
"Kentucky Castle" watch this video of a reality TV star who has just reserved her dream wedding site
"Stars Brittany Cartwright and Jacques Taylor of the Vanderbilt rules have reserved their wedding site, which should be seen by fans 2000 miles away."
"Brittany said time and again that she always wanted to get married at Kentucky castle in Versailles, Kentucky. What do you know?"
"That's where she and Jax come together."
"As Jax shared on instagram on Thursday, Brittany's dream of marrying in this sexy and unique place has come true."
"Hey, the funny video of Jakes and Brittany's wedding must be very good."
"Good venue, deposit," Jax wrote on Ig
"Now I need a drink It's terrible He also posted a video on instagram about him and Brittany celebrating the financial commitment they just made
"Just got the total number of weddings!"



Number  310
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drake commented: “Wow the video is done.”The Suicide Squad actor is one of many famous faces to take on the latest dance social media sensation since its inception.”
“Haha #InMyFeelingsChallenge #DoTheShiggy.”Fans immediately declared Smith had “won” the challenge sweeping social media and quickly earned recognition from the Canadian rapper himself.”
“That’s why my dance moves is all STIFF!”
“I was TERRIFIED up there.”
“I woke up #InMyFeelings“I’ma Keep It 100..”
“At the end, he said: “I woke up this morning in my feelings and I was like, ‘I got to let them out!”Smith captioned the post: “Last day in Budapest.”
“In the video posted on his Instagram page, Smith admitted: “There’s no way…no way this is legal,” as he made his way to the very top of the bridge and copied the moves.”
“The Fresh Prince scaled a bridge in the Hungarian capital to show off his moves to Drake’s track, a dance craze started by comedian Shoker last month.”
“W ill Smith has become the latest celebrity to take on the In My Feelings challenge, taking the viral dance to new heights in Budapest.”


Drake commented, "Wow, the video is done." The suicide squad actor is one of many famous faces to take on the latest dance social media sensation since its inception
"Ha ha, in myfeelingschallenge, do the shiggy." Fans immediately announced that Smith "won" the social media challenge and soon won the Canadian rapper's own recognition
"So my steps are stiff!"
"I was scared up there."
"When I wake up, my feeling is" I want to keep 100 .”
Finally, he said, "when I wake up in the morning, I feel like, 'I have to let them out! "The last day of Budapest," Smith wrote in the title of the post
"In a video posted on instagram's website, Smith admitted:" it's impossible It can't be legal, "he went to the top of the bridge and copied the movements."
The new prince boarded a bridge in the Hungarian capital to show off his dance on the Drake track, a dance craze launched by comedian shack last month
"Weir Smith has become the latest celebrity to accept the challenge of" my feelings ", taking Budapest's viral dance to a new height."



Number  311
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And judging from her day out shopping on Friday, it appears her new-found wisdom has paid off as she looked great in her faded denim jeans.”
“Alba appeared at ease leaving the late-night meeting with a few male friends following closely behind.”
“And Jessica Alba looked ready for the business world as she left a late meeting at Scopa Italian Roots in the Venice Beach area of Los Angeles on Tuesday night.”
“The 37-year-old actress rocked a long striped blazer and denim pants for the meeting at the trendy eatery located on Washington Boulevard.”
“Out and about Jessica Alba looked ready for the business world as she left a late meeting at Scopa Italian Roots in the Venice Beach area of Los Angeles on Tuesday night Jessica showed off her effortless style wearing a cream and beige striped jacket which was hemmed across her...”
“...thighs...”
“A billowing white blouse peeked from underneath her long coat, which she paired with loose-fitting denim pants.”
“The mother-of-three rolled up the sleeves of her over-sized blazer and carried a massive brown leather bag in one hand with the other holding a white reusable cup from her company.”
“Talk about it: The 37-year-old actress rocked a long striped blazer and denim pants for the meeting at the trendy eatery located on Washington BoulevardHer caramel-colored hair was worn straight past her shoulders, with just a touch of makeup to accentuate her already stunning features.”
“Jessica's husband of 10 years, producer Cash Warren, was nowhere to be seen.”


From the day she went shopping last Friday, her newly discovered wisdom seems to have paid off because she looks great in faded jeans
"Alba seemed comfortable leaving the late night meeting, followed by a few male friends."
"Jessica Alba attended a late meeting at Scopa Italian roots in the Venice Beach area of Los Angeles on Tuesday night, and she left looking ready for business."
"The 37 year old actress, dressed in a striped jacket and jeans, had a meeting at a trendy restaurant on Washington Avenue."
Jessica Alba showed off her relaxed style in a cream and beige striped jacket with the edges rolled up at a late Conference on Tuesday night at Scopa Italian roots in Venice Beach District, Los Angeles
“… Thighs... "
A tumbled white top emerged from under her long coat and she paired it with baggy jeans
"The mother of three rolled up the sleeves of her oversized coat, carrying a huge brown leather bag in one hand and a white reusable cup provided by the company in the other."
"Tell me about it: the 37 year old actress wore a striped jacket and jeans at a conference at a trendy restaurant on Washington Avenue, her Caramel hair straight through her shoulders, and just a little make-up to highlight her already amazing look."
"Jessica's husband of 10 years, producer Cash Warren, has disappeared."



Number  312
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Another hint was the fact Bella frequently posts even more risque photos herself; she even wore the exact same revealing outfit in her depression post hours later.”
“If you are having sad thoughts call the suicide hotline they won’t Judge you.”
“However on closer inspection, both posts were promoting two of her movies.”
“The 20-year-old shared some heartfelt words with a picture of herself applying make-up in a mirror.”
“Ad: Bella Thorne appeared to suffer an Instagram hack and opened up about depression and suicide on Sunday, while promoting two of her movies'I’m up and down most of the time I’m sad and confused about everything but yet so certain.,' she said.”
“'I feel like my emotions are always all over the place and I can’t always contain them.”
“'I always wonder if I’ll find ME or is the person im looking at in the mirror..is that me?”
“Is that all I have?”
“Just me?”
“She continued: 'It’s not just me.”


"Another hint is that Bella herself often publishes more pornographic photos; she even wears exactly the same revealing clothes on the depression post a few hours later."
"If you have sad thoughts, call the suicide hotline and they won't judge you."
"But on closer inspection, both posts are promoting her two films."
"The 20-year-old shared some of her thoughts with photos of herself making up in the mirror."
Ad: Bella Thorne appeared to have been attacked by instagram hackers on Sunday when she was promoting her two films, revealing her depression and suicide experience. "Most of the time, I feel sad and confused about everything, but I'm so sure," she said
"I feel that my emotions are always everywhere and I can't always control them."
"I always wonder if I can find me or the person I see in the mirror Is that me? "
"Is that all I have?"
"Just me?"
She went on, "it's not just me."



Number  313
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of the Year edit Single of the Year edit Best New Hip Hop Artist edit Hustler of the Year edit Made You Look Award Best Hip Hop Style edit Best Mixtape edit Sweet 16 Best Featured Verse edit Impact Track edit I Am Hip Hop Icon edit...”
“Mix 3 by Erykah Badu Nominations and Winners edit Winners highlighted in Bold Best Hip Hop Video edit Best Collabo Duo or Group edit Hot Ticket Performer edit Lyricist of the Year edit Video Director of the Year edit DJ of the Year edit Producer of the Year edit MVP”
“Cyphers [ edit ]Beat and mix by DJ Mustard.”
“[3] XXXTentacion's mother accepted his award on his behalf since he had been murdered months beforehand.”
“XXXTentacion was the winner of Best Hip Hop New Artist.”
“Jay-Z and Beyoncé followed with three awards, including Album of the Year and Song of the Year.”
“[2]Cardi B was the biggest winner with four awards, including MVP of the Years and Hustler of the Year.”
“Under them Childish Gambino received six nomination, Travis Scott and Kendrick Lamar tied for five nominations, and Jay-Z (credited also as "The Carters" with Beyoncé in Album of the Year, Best Collabo, Duo or Group and Song of the Year categories) with four nominations.”
“[1]Drake led the BET Hip-Hop Awards 2018 with eleven nominations, followed by Cardi B with ten.”
“The nominations were announced on September 9, 2018.”


“… Best editor of the year best single editor of the year best new hip hop singer editor of the year best liar editor makes you look like the best hip hop style editor of the year best mix editor Sweet 16 best feature verse editor impact track editor I'm hip hop idol editor... "
"Mix 3 nominated by Erykah Badu and edited by winners best hip hop video editor best co OP duet or group editor hot ticket performance editor lyrics editor video director editor DJ editor MVP of the year"
"Cyphers [editor] stirred by DJ mustard."
"[3] xxxentacion's mother accepted the prize on his behalf because he was murdered a few months ago."
"Xxxentacion is the winner of the best hip hop Rookie Award."
"Jay-Z and Beyonce then won three awards, including album of the year and song of the year."
"Katie B is the biggest winner, winning four awards, including MVP of the year and swindler of the year."
"Under their leadership, the boyish Gambino won six nominations, Travis Scott and Kendrick Lamar tied for five, and Jay-Z (also known as" cartel "in album of the year, best collaborator, duet or group and song of the year categories with Beyonce) won four."
"[1] Drake led the 2018 best hip hop awards with 11 nominations, followed by caddy B with 10 nominations."
"The nomination was announced on 9 September 2018."



Number  314
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They really gave it another solid try.”Despite things not working out for Affleck and Shookus, the insider added the pair “will always have love for each other.”Scroll down to see the timeline of Affleck and Shookus’ relationship.”
“...to part ways...”
“She has a kid and an ex husband and a job in New York and Ben has his family and a job in L A and while they love and respect each other they just realized it wasn t going to work an insider explained to Us of their decision...”
“After briefly rekindling their romance in February 2019, multiple sources confirmed to Us Weekly that the two split for a second time in April.”
“The pair went public with their romance in July 2017, but they called it quits in August 2018.”
“The actor found love with the Saturday Night Live producer after his 2015 split from estranged wife Jennifer Garner.”
“It’s over for Ben Affleck and Lindsay Shookus.”


"They really made another solid attempt." Although the relationship between Affleck and shokus did not go well, the insider added that the two "will always be in love." Scroll down to see the timeline of the relationship between Affleck and shokus
“… Go our separate ways... "
"She has a child and an ex husband. She has a job in New York. Ben has his family and a job in Los Angeles. Although they love and respect each other, they realize that it won't work. An insider explained their decision to us..."
"After a brief rekindling in February 2019, a number of sources confirmed to us weekly that the two broke up for the second time in April."
"The two had a public relationship in July 2017, but announced their separation in August 2018."
"The actor found love with the producer of Saturday night live after breaking up with his separated wife, Jennifer Garner, in 2015."
"Ben Affleck and Lindsay schokus are over."



Number  315
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Camila Cabello, Nick Jonas, Sugarland and Britney Spears (via satellite from her Piece of Me show in Las Vegas) are also scheduled to appear on the Ryan Seacrest-hosted special.”
“This year’s Rockin’ Eve performance will follow the template of Carey’s recent Las Vegas residency, where the singer is accompanied by a full band and dancers, Variety reports.”
“However, Carey has since parted ways with that management team and is now repped by Roc Nation, who championed the “redemptive” performance.”
“At the time, Carey’s management was also upset that Dick Clark Productions didn’t withhold the performance from the West Coast feed.”
“Instead of singing along with her “Emotions” and “We Belong Together,” Carey spoke to the crowd about her technical difficulties while still following the planned choreography.”
“A faulty in-ear monitor was ultimately blamed as the cause for the nightmarish performance, with Carey unable to hear the backing music among “all the noise, the freezing cold, the smoke from the smoke machines, and thousands of people celebrating,” the singer said.”
“See you in Times Square!”Carey will once again perform at 11:45 p.m. EST on the special despite blaming Dick Clark Productions for turning the New Year’s show into “an opportunity to humiliate me,” the singer said after last year’s mishap.”
“Eve with Ryan Seacrest 2018”
“In a joint statement Carey and Dick Clark Productions said We can all agree that last year didn t go exactly as planned and we are thrilled to move forward together to provide America with an incredible night of music and celebration on Dick Clark s New Year s Rockin...”
““Take 2,” Carey tweeted after her return performance was announced.”


"Camilla Cabello, Nick Jonas, Scotty and Britney Spears (via her satellite on" part of me "in Las Vegas) are also planning to appear on Ryan Seacrest's special."
According to variety, this year's rock and roll Eve show will follow Kelly's recent residence in Las Vegas and be accompanied by a complete band and dancers
However, Carey later parted ways with the management team and is now represented by the Republic of China, which advocates "Redemption"
"At the time, Carey's management was also upset that Dick Clark didn't take the show off the West Coast feed."
"Instead of singing along with her" emotion "and" we belong together, "Kelly told the audience about her technical difficulties while still following the plan."
"A problematic in ear monitor was eventually thought to be the cause of the nightmare performance, Kelly couldn't hear the background music," the singer said. "All the noise, the cold, the smoke from the smoke machine, and thousands of people were celebrating."
"See you at times square! Kelly will perform again on the special at 11:45 p.m. EST, though he accused Dick Clark of turning the new year's show into "an opportunity to humiliate me," the singer said after last year's disaster
"Ryan Seacrest night 2018"
"In a joint statement, Kelly and Dick Clark production said that we both agreed that last year was not exactly as planned, and we are happy to move forward together to provide an incredible music night for the United States and celebrate Dick Clark's new year's rock music..."
"Shoot 2," Kelly tweeted after her comeback



Number  316
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Lambert posted a photo with one of the dogs Thursday, promising an additional progress update coming soon.”
“On Tuesday, she shared that they had rescued 72 dogs, and on Wednesday, she said they sent 70 to safe shelters.”
“Through her organization MuttNation Foundation, which she founded with her mom Bev Lambert in 2009, Lambert is taking in dogs in need.”
“Over the course of the week, the organization has rescued over 200 dogs, cats and other pets, working to find them food and shelter.”
“The effort began on Monday, when trucks from the foundation left for Houston to start the rescue mission.”
“"It was important to our AMAZING founder, @mirandalambert that we do our part for her home state!"”
“MuttNation Foundation wrote on Instagram.”
“Lambert joined the team to help with relief efforts, and has posted social media updates throughout the week.”
“"My roommates tonight!"”
“Finding homes for lost dogs from Texas flood," he wrote.”


Lambert posted a picture with one of the dogs on Thursday, promising new progress soon
"On Tuesday, she said they saved 72 dogs, and on Wednesday, she said they took 70 dogs to a safe shelter."
"Through her organization, the music foundation, she co founded the foundation in 2009 with her mother, Bev Lambert, who is receiving dogs in need."
In the past week, the group has rescued more than 200 dogs, cats and other pets in an effort to find food and shelter for them
"This effort started on Monday when trucks from the base went to Houston to begin the rescue mission."
"We do our part for her hometown, which is very important for our amazing founder @ Miranda Lambert!"
"The mutton foundation wrote on instagram."
"Lambert joined the team to help with the disaster relief work and posted social media updates throughout the week."
"My roommates tonight!"
"Looking for homes for dogs lost in the flood in Texas," he wrote



Number  317
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch all the cuteness in the video above.”
“Rules are rules.”
“Poor Jenner only scored two of these furry angels before she had to give them up for losing the final round.”
“Fallon quizzed his guests on things like the name of a dolphin-whale hybrid and the number of pigeons in New York City.”
“Regardless of your Franco fan status, it was hard not to crack a smile when one of his precious prizes lay on some wet, sloppy puppy kisses.”
“Franco, promoting his dual performance on HBO’s The Deuce, piled on the pups early and kept getting more until he claimed all the Golden Retrievers and Golden Doodles.”
“James Franco and supermodel Kendall Jenner hit up The Tonight Show on Friday for the latest round of Fallon’s Pup Quiz, an animal trivia game in which the celebrity players score puppies instead of points.”
“The Tonight Show (TV Show) Close Streaming OptionsThere’s nothing like watching a handsome gent playing with puppies to brighten your day, and Jimmy Fallon has you covered.”


"Look at the cute in the video above."
"Rules are rules."
"Poor Jenner only got two hairy angels and had to give up because he lost the last round."
"Fallon asked his guests about the names of dolphin whale hybrids and the number of pigeons in New York City."
"Whether you're a Franco fan or not, it's hard not to laugh when one of his prized prizes is a wet puppy kiss."
Franco promoted his double performance on HBO's "draw" show, early crowding the dogs together and getting more until he got all the golden retrievers and graffiti
"James Franco and supermodel Kendall Jenner are on Friday's" Tonight Show "for Fallon's latest round of dog quiz, an animal trivia game in which stars score dogs instead of scoring them."
"There's nothing better than watching a handsome gentleman play with a dog tonight when streaming is off. Jimmy Fallon is covering for you."



Number  318
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The family was enjoying some quality time together while perusing the art at the Louvre.”
“The other five children, Pax, 15; Zahara, 14; Shiloh, 12; and twins Knox and Vivienne, 10, all look markedly older as well, though it is worth noting they all were decked out in A-list event attire.”
“...crew in tow...”
“(No sign of Brad Pitt, though.)”
“And my-oh-my, do they look grown.”
“Anyone who's followed the star's career can likely remember when Maddox, who is now 17 (!)”
“...was just a tiny tike who Jolie would tote around in her arms and shield from paparazzi photos.”
“Time flies, folks.”
“For instance, Zahara wore a sleek black dress, while the others wore different suit variations with their own personal touches.”
“As such, Jolie was recently spotted in Paris during an outing with all six of them during a break from her Guerlain campaign.”


"The family enjoyed a good time together while enjoying art in the Louvre."
"The other five kids, parks, 15; Zahara, 14; Shiloh, 12; the twins, Knox and Vivian, 10, all look distinctly old, but it's worth noting that they're all wearing top event clothes."
“… Crew in the back... "
(no sign of Brad Pitt, though.)
"Oh, my God, do they look grown up?"
"Anyone who has followed the star's career may remember Maddox when he was 17 years old (!)"
“… It's just a little guy. Julie will hold it in her arms and avoid paparazzi photos
"Time flies, guys."
"For example, Zahara is wearing a smooth black dress, while others are wearing different suits with their own personal style."
"Because of this, Julie was recently found in Paris with six of them during an outing from her Guerlain sport break."



Number  319
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Toby dies, and his organs are used to save Spencer's life.”
“And then there's Spencer's Radley connection: All of the previous A's have ties to the mental institution, and she's the only liar who spent time there as a patient.”
“This is it, friends.”
“After these 10 episodes, there will be no more shirtless Toby makeout scenes, no more Hanna one-liners—and no more fan theories.”
“Fan theories have become a very important part of the Pretty Little Liars universe.”
“The PLL army uses the gaps between seasons to hypothesize future storylines, romances, and villains.”
“Right now the biggest mystery is unmasking Uber A, but there are other questions PLL needs to answer before the final season ends.”
“Does Toby live?”
“Who is the father of Alison's baby?”
“Do Aria and Ezra get married?”


Toby died, and his organs were used to save Spencer's life
"And the relationship between Spencer and Radley: all a's had to do with mental hospitals before, and she was the only liar to be a patient there."
"That's it, my friends."
"After these 10 episodes, there will be no topless Toby, no Hannah, no fan theory."
"Fan theory has become a very important part of the little liar world."
"The PLL army uses the interval between seasons to speculate about future storylines, romances and villains."
"The biggest mystery at the moment is the unveiling of Uber a, but PLL needs to answer other questions before the end of the last season."
"Is Toby still alive?"
"Who is the father of Alison's child?"
"Are aria and Ezra married?"



Number  320
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“‘Stranger Things’ is not reinventing television, but it does once again provide a highly entertaining, extremely bingeable, and even surprisingly heartwarming viewing experience.””
“But in the end, it’s still a hell of a lot of fun to watch.”Collider’s Allison Keene:“The Duffer Brothers have again managed to wield their particular alchemy and create a follow-up worthy of the hype created by its predecessor.”
“The show took 2016 by storm, drawing audiences in with its ’80s nostalgia, lovable cast, and eerie story, and fans have waited for more than a year to binge watch their way back to Hawkins, Ind.”
“Currently at 96% with 23 reviews on Rotten Tomatoes, “Stranger Things” seems to have captured the same spooky magic in its sophomore season.”
“For those who need a recap, here’s where the first season left off (spoiler alert!”
“): Mike, Lucas, and Dustin successfully brought their friend Will back from the alternate dimension known as the Upside Down.”
“Unfortunately, their psychic friend and ex-government lab rat Eleven vanishes while protecting her friends from the monstrous Demogorgon, leaving audiences to wonder if she died or was sucked into the Upside Down.”
“Life seems to return to normal for the young heroes — however, Will coughs up a black, worm-like creature into his sink, indicating that he’s not out of the woods yet.”
“Here’s what the critics are saying about the new season:Variety‘s Maureen Ryan:“Until ‘Stranger Things 2’ really gets going — and that takes a while — it trails an air of self-consciousness that veers into strained fan service at times.”
“The good news is the show s core cast remains an extremely versatile and effective ensemble and once the story kicks into a higher gear about halfway through the nine episode season a lot of the old magic returns Uproxx s Alan Sepinwall The whole thing could very easily fall...”


"Strange things is not a copy of TV, but it does provide a kind of highly entertaining, extremely Carnival and even surprising warm watching experience once again."
"But in the end, it's still a lot of fun to see in hell," collider's Alison Keane: "the duffer brothers once again managed to brandish their special alchemy, creating a successor worthy of hyping it."
"The show has attracted audiences with its nostalgic, lovely cast and weird stories of the 1980s. It has been popular in 2016, and fans have been waiting for more than a year to watch them return to Hawkins, Indiana."
"At present, 96% of people have published 23 reviews on rotten tomatoes, and strange things seems to have grasped the same terrible magic power in sophomore year."
"For those who need to review, this is where season one ends (spoiler alert!"
"): Mike, Lucas and Dustin have successfully brought their friend will back from another dimension called inversion."
"Unfortunately, their psychic friend and former government lab mouse 11 disappeared while protecting her friend from the terrible evil, leaving the audience wondering whether she was dead or sucked in."
"The lives of the young heroes seem to be back to normal - however, will coughs a black wormlike creature out of the sink, indicating that he is not out of the forest yet."
"Here's what critics think of the new film: before strange thing 2 actually hits the screen - it's going to take a while - it's going to shift an atmosphere of self-awareness from time to time to intense fan service
"The good news is that the core actor of the play is still a very versatile and effective ensemble. Once the story goes into a higher gear, about half of the nine episode season, with the return of many old magic tricks, such as Alan sabenwall, the whole thing may easily fall behind..."



Number  321
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related:”
“It takes some killer confidence to work a red lip while you're sweating it out, especially considering Tracy Anderson Method is known for its dance cardio-infused classes (which can already feel pretty vulnerable to many people).”
“...your workout looks like...”
“In an interview with InStyle, the Black-ish star says she rocks a red lip at the gym, which is a seriously bold, amazing move.”
“"I do the Tracy Anderson Method, so there's a lot of mirror work involved," she told InStyle.”
“"When I see my red lips reflecting back at me, I'm like, 'Yeah, girl, that's right!'"”
“Yeah girl, indeed.”
“This isn t the first time Ross has made her affinity for wearing red lipstick while working out known she posted a video of some booty exercises at a Tracy Anderson studio in March with the hashtag redlipfit and some...”
“...incredible sparkly leggings...”
“But it sounds like Ross is leaning right into it with her red lipstick look, and straight-up owning that pop of color.”


Related:
"When you sweat, you need some deadly self-confidence to practice red lips, especially given that Tracy Anderson's approach is known for its aerobic dance classes (which are already fragile for many people)," he said
“… Your training looks like... "
In an interview with InStyle, the black star said it was a very bold and amazing move for her to shake her red lips in the gym
"I use Tracy Anderson's method, so it takes a lot of mirror work," she told InStyle
"When I see my red lips reflect on me, I say, 'yes, girl, that's right!"
"Yes, girl, really."
"This is not Ross's first contact with red lipstick, because she knows that she released a video in March Tracy Anderson studio with red lips and some..."
“… Incredible shinning tights... "
"But it sounds like Ross is tilting inside with a red lipstick and having that color directly."



Number  322
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please email us at corrections@wearemitu.com...”
“Or as Longoria so eloquently put it: “If we unite and create opportunities for each other and pull each other up, there could be a lot more success for representation on TV.”Notice any needed corrections?”
“Latinos make up 18% of America’s population but only 5% of the number of speaking roles in movies in 2019 according to the USC Annenberg Inclusion Initiative.”
“Hollywood seems to be late to the party when it comes to Latino representation onscreen.”
“But luckily, there are a handful of Latino artists and creators out there who are taking the fight to appear in front of the screen to behind the camera.”
“Take for example Eva Longoria who was just announced to be directing and co starring in the new action comedy film Spa Day Eva Longoria to Direct Action Comedy Spa Day at Sony Pictures EXCLUSIVE https t co FaP3GgE0yj via variety Eva Longoria Baston EvaLongoria September 25 2020 This marks...”
“...the third movie the Mexican American actress will be helming and the first Latina to ever direct more than one major studio film...”
“The other films on Longoria’s roster include a vehicle for her and Kerry Washington tentatively titled “24/7”, as well as the upcoming biopic “Flamin’ Hot”–a movie centered around Richard Montañez, the man who invented Flaming Hot Cheetos.”
“Longoria has been candid about how the decision to move into directing and producing has been a strategic one.”
““One of the reasons I went into producing and directing was I wasn’t going to sit back and wait for somebody to create a role I wanted to do,” Longoria told Variety in 2018.”


"Please email us for correction@ wearemitu.com 。。。”
Or as langelia so eloquently said: "if we unite, create opportunities for each other, draw each other, the representatives on TV may achieve greater success." Notice what needs to be corrected? "
"Latinos make up 18% of the U.S. population, but according to the USC Annenberg inclusion initiative, in 2019, only 5% of Latinos will speak in movies."
"When it comes to the Latino representatives on the screen, Hollywood seems to be late."
"But fortunately, there are a small number of Latino artists and creators struggling to be in front of the screen and behind the camera."
"Take Eva Longoria as an example. She has just been announced that she will direct and co star in the new action comedy" spa day ". Eva Longoria will direct the action comedy" spa day ". Sony Pictures will have the exclusive rights of HTTPS t Co fap3gge0yj via variety, Eva Longoria barston, Eva Longoria, September 25, 2020, which marks..."
“…… The third film to be directed by Mexican American actresses is also the first Latin American to direct more than one major film studio. "
Other films on Longoria's list include her and Kerry Washington's tentatively titled "24 / 7," as well as the upcoming biographical film "flaming fire," a film centered on Richard montanes, the inventor of the flaming Chido
"Langlia said frankly that the decision to enter the directing and production industry is a strategic decision."
"One of the reasons I'm in the production and directing industry is that I don't wait for someone else to create a character I want to be," Longoria told variety in 2018



Number  323
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“...audience really likes her and I think she and Savannah make a great team Emma Dibdin Contributor Emma Dibdin writes about television movies and podcasts with coverage including opinion essays news posts episodic reviews and in depth interviews with creatives...”
“Yes there were men but I think they were all afraid of me On the subject of Hoda Kotb s promotion to co anchor alongside Savannah Guthrie Couric enthused I m really happy for Hoda I think she s a great person and her goodness shines through I think the...”
“...of relative power pretty early on in my career...”
“That s why I think so many people on the show were stunned when they heard about this other life he was leading Asked whether she had ever encountered inappropriate behavior in the workplace Couric said that she had been very lucky I think because I was in a position...”
“I never had an issue, never experienced anything, never witnessed anything like that.”
“I guess I made [the joke] because it was, again, so contrary to the relationship I had with Matt which was respectful, and professional.”
““That was a complete joke, because it was so contrary to our relationship, and it was on a late night lightning round.”
“...which resurfaced in the wake of the allegations in which Couric says that Lauer pinches her on the ass a lot she clarified that she was joking...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
“…… The audience really likes her, and I think she and Savannah are a great team. Emma dibuddin, the writer, wrote about TV movies and podcasts, including review articles, news posts, plot reviews and in-depth interviews with creative people... "
"Yes, there are men, but I think they are all afraid of me, because Hoda Kotb has been promoted to co anchor of Savannah Guthrie Couric. I'm really happy for Hoda. I think she is a great person, and her kindness shines. I think..."
“… I had relative power early in my career... "
"That's why I think many people are shocked when they hear about the other kind of life he leads on the show. When asked if she has ever experienced inappropriate behavior in the workplace, Couric said that she is very lucky, I think it's because I am in a position..."
"I've never had a problem, I've never experienced anything, I've never witnessed anything like that."
"I think I'm joking because, again, it's the opposite of my relationship with Matt, it's a respectful and professional relationship."
"It's a complete joke, because it's totally against our relationship, and it's a lightning round in the middle of the night."
“…… It came to light again after Couric accused Raul of pinching her ass a lot. She clarified that she was joking... "



Number  324
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Foo’s are currently on tour and will play two dates in London this week on June 22-23 at London Stadium.”
“...guy and that they didn t have a terrible time...”
“If we were singing Queen songs or Led Zeppelin songs or Beatles songs it would have been fine but to sit there and sing your own songs we felt weird about it Advertisement Grohl added that Corden was a sweet...”
““What we were trying to say was it was uncomfortable to sit in a car and try to sing our own songs.”
“'”Grohl told The Sun that he tried to explain his thoughts to Corden more clearly.”
““[James] was like, ‘What the fuck, dude?’ I was like, ‘Oh my god, oh my god, oh my god!”
““I got a fucking text from him [the next day],” the frontman said.”
“I don’t know why.”Now, in an interview with The Sun, Grohl revealed that Corden sent him a text soon after the show about his comments.”
“We did The Ramones, and Rick Astley, but they didn’t use it.”
“Afterwards, Smear said “singing other people’s songs would have been easier.”AdvertisementGrohl added: “I could do that all day.”


"Fox is currently on tour and will have two dates at London stadium this week, from June 22 to 23."
“… Man, they don't have a hard time... "
"If we're singing the Queen's song, the Zeppelin airship's song, the Beatles' song, that's fine, but it's strange to sit there and sing our own song." Groal added that Corden was a sweet girl
"What we want to say is that it's uncomfortable to sit in the car and try to sing your own songs."
"GroEL told the sun that he was trying to explain his ideas more clearly."
"(James) it's like," Damn it, man? "I thought," oh my God, oh my God, oh my God! "
"I got his fuckin 'text message [the next day]," the team leader said
"I don't know why." In an interview with the sun, Mr. groal revealed that Mr. cordon sent him a text message shortly after the show ended about his comments
"We did ramons and Rick Astley, but they didn't work."
Later, smalle said, "it's easier to sing other people's songs." "I can do it all day," groal added



Number  325
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Canales, who has worked with everyone from Jennifer Lopez to Emily Ratajkowski, died at the age of 62 after has suffered liver and kidney failure in a hospital after going to New York for cancer treatment last month.”
“'The first time we met in Miami with my @laurielynnstark,I was a baby and completely in awe of his presence/spirit & forever will be,' she added. '”
“Bella Hadid was spotted rocking a crop top in NYC on Wednesday despite the chill in the air.”
“Cameras snapped the 22-year-old 'it girl' as she headed out to a photo shoot in the out of season look.”
“Doing it for fashion: Bella Hadid braved frigid temps in a belly baring crop top on Wednesday as she stepped out in NYCThe beauty donned a matching cropped charcoal denim jacket and cargo pants with her white crop top.”
“Bella reportedly regretted her outfit choice and laughed as she told the paparazzi she was cold.”
“The star paired her look with a chunky pair of white high top sneakers and some tiny grey sun glasses.”
“Her brown tresses were pulled casually back into a claw clip with her side bangs left out to from her beautiful face.”
“Chic!”
“The supermodel flaunted her rock hard abs while rocking a white crop top and denim pants Brr Bella reportedly quipped to the paparazzi that she was cold Bella kept a white one strap back pack slung over her shoulder and she carried a handful of items including a laptop phone...”


Kaners, who has worked with everyone from Jennifer Lopez to Emily latajkovsky, died of liver and kidney failure in a hospital after going to New York for cancer treatment last month at the age of 62
"When we first met my @ laurielynnstark in Miami, I was a baby, totally in awe of his presence / spirit & always," she added
"Bella Hadid was found rocking a jacket in New York on Wednesday, despite the cold air."
"The camera captured the 22-year-old 'it girl' going out to take photos in off-season style."
"Do it for fashion: on Wednesday, Bella Hadid braved the cold in an open top, dressed in the clothes of the New York Times. The beauty was wearing a short charcoal denim jacket and pants to match the white jacket
"Bella is reported to have regretted her dress choice and told the paparazzi with a smile that she was cold."
"The star matched his look with a pair of chubby white high top sneakers and a pair of small gray sunglasses."
"Her brown hair was randomly pulled back into the claw clip, and the side bangs came out of her beautiful face."
"Chic!"
"The supermodel showed off her hard abs while rocking her white jacket and jeans. According to reports, BRR Bella teased the paparazzi that she was cold. Bella hung a white one strap backpack on her shoulder, and she also brought a handful of things, including a mobile phone... "



Number  326
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Vergara has yet to update fans on the situation.”
““Hello guys!”
“The “Modern Family” star took to Twitter to warn her fans that someone has taken control of her Instagram account and is trying to get information out of unsuspecting fans.”
““Guys my instagram got hacked,” she wrote Tuesday.”
““Dont ansewer [sic] those idiots.”
“Dont send them any info.”
“We r after them,” she wrote.”
“Throughout the day, Vergara’s Instagram continued to post the same image of text encouraging users to follow a link in her Instagram Story for a free iPhone X, Apple Watch or gift card.”
“I am giving away 1000 FREE IPhone X’s and Apple watches on my Instagram stories right now!!!”
“However, as of this writing the posts have finally gone away.”


"Villa haven't updated the fans yet
"Hello everyone
"The modern family star warned her fans on twitter that someone had taken control of her instagram account and tried to get information from unsuspecting fans."
"Guys, my instagram has been hacked," she wrote on Tuesday
"Don't answer those idiots."
"Don't send them any messages."
"We're chasing them," she wrote
"Throughout the day, Vergara's instagram continued to post the same images, encouraging users to follow the links in the instagram story and buy iPhone x, apple watch or gift cards for free."
"I'm giving away 1000 iphonex and apple watch for free on instagram now!!"
"However, by the time of writing this article, these posts have finally disappeared."



Number  327
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  328
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[4]Winners and nominees [ edit ]”
“[3] They have won the award for four consecutive years since then.”
“[2] His winning streak was broken as of the 2017 ceremony by BTS, who were the first K-pop group ever to be nominated for and win a Billboard Music Award.”
“Bieber is also the most awarded nominee with six consecutive wins.”
“[1]The award was first won in 2011 by Justin Bieber, who is the most nominated artist in the category with eight nominations, followed by Ariana Grande with six, while BTS, Rihanna and Taylor Swift each have four.”
“It is awarded based on major fan interactions with music including streaming and social engagement, together with the global online voting results.”
“...award show...”
“Billboard Music Award for Top Social Artist Country United States Presented by Billboard First awarded 2011 Last awarded 2020 Currently held by BTS Most awards Justin Bieber 6 Most nominations Justin Bieber 8 The Billboard Music Award for Top Social Artist is one of two fan voted categories in the...”


"[4] winners and nominees [editor]"
"Since then, they have won awards for four years in a row."
"[2] at the 2017 awards ceremony, BTS broke his winning streak. BTS is the first K-pop band ever nominated and won the Billboard Music Award."
"Bieber is also the most nominated person, winning six awards in a row."
"[1] in 2011, Justin Bieber won the award for the first time. He was the most nominated artist for the award, with eight nominations, followed by Ariana Grande, with six nominations, and BTS, Rihanna and Taylor Swift each with four nominations."
"The award is based on major interactions between fans and music (including streaming and social engagement) and global online voting results."
“… "Award ceremony..."
"Billboard Music Award for the best social artist in the United States is presented by billboard for the first time in 2011 and for the last time in 2020. At present, BTS holds the most awards, Justin Bieber 6 nominates the most, Justin Bieber 8 nominates the most. Billboard Music Award is one of the two fan voting categories..."



Number  329
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Beauty and the Beast hits Blu-ray on June 6.”
“Anyhow!”
“Surely they wouldn’t, I mean…Then again, the Beast’s household employees remained weirdly, almost aggressively hospitable despite their cursed state.”
“…Which leaves us with even more questions, like if the toilets are also enchanted castle staff members, where do Belle and the Beast, you know, go?”
“...voiced by the great Stephen Merchant...”
“Dreams really do come true or they almost did until Condon inexplicably cut the scene from the film a decision made all the more confusing when EW reveals that this brave vigilante toilet named Monsieur Toilette but of course was...”
“...bathroom and tormented by an enchanted CG toilet It s cinematic justice for everyone who finds Gad vaguely annoying despite his pleasant antics...”
“This whole time we ve been missing out on some of the sweetest schadenfreude a fictional family film can offer Courtesy of Entertainment Weekly behold the glorious scene in which one of the most insufferable actors is locked in a...”
“That sneaky dude has been holding out on us.”
“But in the latest clip, director Bill Condon reveals a scene that was unjustly deleted from the film.”


"Beauty and beast go blue on June 6."
"Anyway!"
"Of course they won't, I mean Again, the beast's domestic employees are still eccentric and almost hospitable, despite their cursed state
“…… This leaves us with more questions. For example, if the toilet is also the staff of the magic castle, you know, where are bell and the beast? "
“…… Voiced by the great Stephen merchant... "
"The dream really came true, or almost came true, until Condon somehow deleted the scene from the movie - when EW revealed that the brave volunteer police officer's toilet was called" Mr. makeup ", the decision became more complicated, but of course it was..."
“… The bathroom and the torture of a charming CG toilet, this is the movie justice for everyone who finds Gaddafi vaguely annoying despite his delightful antics... "
"We've missed out on some of the sweetest schadenfreudes of the time, a fictional family movie that can offer entertainment weekly the courtesy of seeing one of the most intolerable actors locked in a box
"That sneaky guy kept it from us all the time."
"But in the latest clip, Director Bill Condon reveals a scene that has been unfairly removed from the film."



Number  330
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“...at 9 p m...”
“Swanson dished via a video message on the Duggar family website that she was totally shocked when Duggar showed interest in courting her because at the time they were still learning more about each other and putting God first and ourselves second TLC s Counting On returns Monday July 30”
“I’m especially looking forward to spending the rest of my life with him!”Back in January, Us broke the news that the pair were courting after years of friendship.”
“Everything about engagement was such a special moment for me.”
“There’s a lot of family history on this property, making it a special place for Lauren.”Swanson added: “I’m really excited to be getting married to Josiah.”
““The place where I proposed to Lauren is the exact spot where her parents were engaged.”
““This is an exciting, big step in our lives and the whole thing was very meaningful,” the Counting On star, 21, said at the time of popping the question to Swanson, 18.”
“We are so thankful the Lord has brought us to this place and we can’t wait to begin our journey as husband and wife!”Us exclusively revealed the duo’s engagement in March.”
“What was even more perfect was to see my beautiful bride walking down the aisle.”


"Wait a minute."
“… 9 pm... "
"Swanson said through a video message on the Dagar family website that when Dagar showed interest in pursuing her, she was completely shocked, because they were still getting to know each other better, putting God first and ourselves second, and they were looking forward to the return of Monday, July 30."
"I'm looking forward to spending the rest of my life with him! "As early as January this year, it was reported that the two fell in love after years of friendship in the United States."
"Engagement is a special moment for me."
"The land has a long family history, which makes it a special place for Lauren," Swanson added. I'm really excited to be married to Josiah. "
"The place I proposed to Lauren was where her parents were engaged."
"It's an exciting big step in our lives, and the whole thing is very meaningful," the 21-year-old "star of hope" said in raising the question to 18-year-old Swanson
"We are very grateful to God for bringing us to this place, and we can't wait to start our journey as husband and wife! "The United States exclusively disclosed the news of their engagement in March."
"It's more perfect to see my beautiful bride walking down the aisle."



Number  331
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When you're told to get back to work... #VeryCavallari pic.twitter.com/2xwv0sGypX — Very Cavallari (@verycavallari) July 9, 2018”
“...she was only 17 and said she cringes when she watches reruns...”
“...may have noticed that although she and her husband, former NFL quarterback Jay Cutler, talk a lot about their children, the kiddos were not featured in Sunday’s episode.”
“And there’s a reason for that.”
““My kids will not be on it,” the mother of three told People in last week’s issue.”
““They would love to watch the monitors and they were around sometimes when we would film, but we want to keep them kids.”
“... We want them to grow up as normal as possible.”
“And so when they re old enough to decide they want a camera in their face that s one thing but for now we just want to keep them kids The actress who starred in The Hills doesn t even like to expose her children Saylor James 2 Jaxon Wyatt...”
“4 and Camden Jack 5 on social media...”
“She told People in May If I post them it s of the back of their head or something to that degree A post shared by Kristin Cavallari kristincavallari on May 13 2018 at 7 32am PDT The 31 year old starred on her first reality show Laguna Beach when...”


"When you're told to go back to work... #Veronica varari pic.twitter.com/2xwv0sGypX -Very kawalari (@ verycavalari) July 9, 2018 "
“…… She's only 17 years old, and she says she cringes when she watches the replay. "
“…… It may have been noted that although she and her husband, former NFL QUARTERBACK Jay Cutler, talked a lot about their children, they didn't show up on Sunday
"There's a reason for that."
"My children won't participate," the mother of three said in people magazine last week
"They'll like to watch the monitors and sometimes they'll be around when we shoot, but we want them to have children."
"... we want them to grow as normally as possible."
"So when they grow up, they decide to put a camera on their face. It's one thing, but now we just want their children to play in the mountains. The actress who stars doesn't even like to expose her child, sailor James 2, Jackson Wyatt..."
"4 and Camden Jack 5 on social media..."
"She told people in May that if I put it on the back of their heads or something like that, it was a post by Kristin Cavallari at 7:32 a.m. on May 13, 2018, 31 year old Kristin Cavallari on her first reality show Laguna Beach At that time... "



Number  332
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is best known for his roles in "Interstellar," "Mud," "Tropic Thunder" and "The Lincoln Lawyer."”
““I think it’s kinda scientific and here’s kind of living proof of it right here this morning.”McConaughey posted several videos of the event on Facebook, including one of him delivering a turkey to a group of women.”
“...on Facebook Saturday...”
“Thanksgiving gratitude we believe in our family that the more you re thankful for the more that you show gratification the more that you re gonna create in your life to be thankful for McConaughey said in a video posted...”
“He is a celebrity spokesman for the bourbon brand.”
“News reports.”
“McConaughey helped deliver the turkeys as part of a Wild Turkey initiative, E!”
“LAWRENCEBURG, Ky. -- Actor Matthew McConaughey spent his birthday giving back to others by delivering 4,500 free turkeys to families in Kentucky.”


He is best known for his roles in interstellar, mud, tropical thunder and lawyer Lincoln
"I think it's a bit scientific, and there's living evidence here this morning." McConnell posted several videos of the event on Facebook, one of which was a video of him delivering turkeys to a group of women
“… On Facebook, Saturday... "
"Thanksgiving gratitude we believe in our family, and the more satisfaction you show yourself, the more gratitude you create in your life," McConnell said in a video released
"He's a celebrity spokesperson for the Bourbon brand."
"News coverage."
McConnell helped deliver the turkeys as part of the wild turkey program, e! "
"Lawrence, Kentucky - actor Matthew McConnell gave back on his birthday, sending 4500 free turkeys to families in Kentucky."



Number  333
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“John is scheduled to continue his Vegas residency until May 19, 2018.”
“...pic.twitter.com/Cdd7jqjPZt — Elton John (@eltonofficial) March 3, 2018Last month, the “Tiny Dancer” singer announced he is retiring from live-touring after his Farewell, Yellow Brick Road World Tour, which will run until 2020.”
“A statement from Elton.”
“You f***ed it up.”John elaborated on the incident in a statement shared on his official Twitter on Saturday.”
“John later returned to continue the show but told those in attendance there would be, “No more coming on stage during ‘Saturday Night’.”
“David Furnish Talks Elton Johnâ€™s Retirement And The Royal WeddingThe fans returned to their seats, many of them confused over what had happened.”
“John eventually gets up and exits the stage as his live band continues playing in the background.”
“The iconic British singer tries to continue unfazed, but as the touching persists, he becomes increasingly agitated, repeatedly screaming “F*** off” at the touchy-feely concertgoer.”
“In a video obtained by TMZ, you can see the “Rocket Man” hitmaker lean over and yell, “F*** off” off-mic.”
“Everyone seemed to be having a good time until an overzealous fan reached over to touch the singer as he was singing the 1973 hit.”


"John plans to stay in Las Vegas until May 19, 2018."
“... pic.twitter.com/Cdd7jqjPZt -Elton John (@ eltonoffical) March 3, 2018 last month, the "little dancer" singer announced that he would withdraw from the live tour after saying goodbye to the Yellow Brick Road World Tour, which will last until 2020
"Elton's statement."
"You screwed up." John detailed the incident in a statement on Saturday's official twitter
John came back later to continue the show, but he told the audience, "it won't be on Saturday night."
"David Elton John" ™ His retirement and royal wedding fans are back in their seats, many of whom are confused about what happened
"John finally got up and left the stage, and his live band continued to play backstage."
The iconic British singer tried to keep calm, but as the move continued, he became more and more excited, shouting "go away" to the sentimental concert audience
In a video obtained by TMZ, you can see the killer of "rocket man" bending over and shouting, "f * * turn off" the microphone
"Everyone seemed to have a good time until a fanatical fan reached out and touched the singer while singing a 1973 pop song."



Number  334
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Watch Blake Shelton Fail to Name One of Gwen Stefani's Biggest HitsBlake Shelton, Keith Urban and More to Perform at the 2018 ACM AwardsGwen Stefani and Blake Shelton Not Ready to Get Married, Source Says (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The unlikely duo filmed themselves getting their palms read during Tuesday’s Tonight Show and they naturally had some fun while doing it.”
““You have a wonderful long life line.”
“He’s got a very nice heart line and that means you would give things to charity,” the palm reader said told Shelton at the start.”
““Me being on your show to try to help it, that kind of charity,” Shelton quipped to Fallon.”
“The palm reader also noted You have a nice physique but this part of the hand is a little fleshy so that means you might be overdoing something in the physical realm too much eating too much drinking too much sex When Fallon indicated that Shelton was clearly boozing too...”
“...much the country singer instead focused on the final option...”
“Later it was Fallon’s turn to have his palms read.”
““Can you tell by looking at his hands that he’s never worked a day in his life?” Shelton quipped.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Watch Black Sheldon not say the names of one of Gwen Stephanie's most popular works, such as Lake Sheldon and Keith Urban, which will be performed at the ACM award ceremony in 2018. Wen Stephanie and black Sheldon are not ready to get married yet. The source said that (exclusive) related galleries.... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The unlikely couple filmed their palmprint on Tuesday's tonight show, and they were naturally happy in the process."
"You live a long life."
"He has a very good heart line, which means you'll give something to charity," said palm reader Sheldon at the beginning
"I try to help it on your show, that kind of charity," Sheldon quipped Fallon
"Palm readers also notice that you have a good physique, but this part of the hand is a little fleshy, so it means that you may have done something excessive in the physical field, eating too much, drinking too much, having too much sex, and Fallon points out that Sheldon is obviously drinking too much..."
“… Country singers focus on the final choice... "
"Then it was Fallon's turn."
"Look at his hands. Can you see that he hasn't worked a day in his life? "Sheldon joked



Number  335
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Plus it's the thought that counts.”
“I think I could get over it.”
“"It was weird at first but we were buddies for a long time.”
“"That was the most awkward date because we were just like fireworks coming across," Ryan told Entertainment Weekly's SiriusXM show.”
“Weird, right?”
“A year later, when they were both single and ready-to-mingle, the pair went on a double date (but with other people).”
“Although they were both in relationships at the time, their first encounter was on the set of the movie Green Lantern.”
“So how did such a compatible power couple meet?”
“Following both of them on social media and watching them drag each other in the comments is pure comedy.”
“Obviously they bring out the best (troll) in each other.”


"In addition, the important thing is thought."
"I think I can overcome it."
"It was strange at first, but we were good friends for a long time."
"It was the most embarrassing date, because we came face to face like fireworks," Ryan told Entertainment Weekly's Sirius XM show
"Strange?"
"A year later, when they were both single and ready to go out, they went on a double date (but with other people),"
"Although they were both in love at that time, the first time they met was on the set of the film Green Lantern."
"So how did such a close and powerful couple meet?"
"It's comedy to follow them on social media and watch them drag and drop each other in comments."
"Obviously, they showed each other their best."



Number  336
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...awareness and inspire people all over the world to get out there and make a difference for animal rights...”
“I have so much love and respect for all of the amazing women in my life and I m so thankful and honored to be having a baby girl thefutureisfemale Weber is the founder and creative director of Satao s Keeper a women s apparel brand that aims to promote...”
““Happy International Women’s Day,” he captioned the tearjerker Instagram clip.”
“Image zoom Stephanie Weber and Parker Young | Credit: Stefanie Keenan/GettyFollowing the couple’s gender reveal on the beach — where they each set off pink smoke cannons while surrounded by their loved ones — Young got down on one knee and proposed to Weber.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“I am excited to have a daughter on the way.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““Watching him as a husband and father to my sister was so incredibly valuable.”
““As a man who has been raised by an amazing mother, I cannot express how much I love and respect the women in my life.”“But I really need to give credit to my dad, too,” adds the actor.”
““The news breaking today has so much meaning since it’s International Women’s Day,” Young tells PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


“… Recognize and encourage people all over the world to go out and contribute to animal rights... "
"I'm full of love and respect for all the amazing women in my life. I'm very grateful and honored to have a baby girl. The future is a woman. Weber is the founder and creative director of satao s keeper, which is a promotion project
"Happy international women's day," he wrote in a tearful instagram video
"Zoom in and out Stephanie Webb and Parker young | source: Stephanie Keenan / Getty following the couple's gender on the beach - they fire pink smoke cannons surrounded by their loved ones - Yang kneels down to propose to Webb."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"I'm happy to have a daughter on the way." Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"It's worth watching him become my sister's husband and father."
"As a man raised by a great mother, I can't express my love and respect for women in my life." "But I really need to give credit to my father as well," the actor added
"Today's news is meaningful because it's International Women's day," young told people exclusively
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  337
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The viewers are desperate for the second season of The Arrangement!”
“We hope there isn’t much danger for Megan in the next season.”
“Why?”
“Sunday’s season finale of The Arrangement sees Megan escape and seek revenge on IHM.”
“The episode brought every audience to the edge of their seats.”
“Let us find out more about the season finale of The Arrangement!”
“The final episode of the first season of The Arrangement began drastically with Megan (Christine Evangelista) escaping.”
“In the episode, Megan climbs out of the back of the car when the driver of the IHM van is away.”
“However, she then ends up right in the doorsteps of a lady who was involved with the IHM.”
“We then saw all the IHM employees taking Megan out and gave her a shot.”


"The audience is eager for the second season!"
"We hope Megan won't be in too much danger next season
"Why?"
"In the last season of this arrangement on Sunday, Megan fled and took revenge on IM."
"This episode brings everyone to their seats."
"Let's learn more about the arrangements for the last episode of the season!"
"The last episode of the first season starts with Megan's escape (Christina Evangelista), and the plot is dramatic."
"In this episode, Megan climbs out of the back seat when the driver of the IHM van is away."
"In the end, however, she was at the door of a woman associated with IHM."
"Then we saw all the IHM staff take Megan out and give her a chance."



Number  338
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Podcast of 2018 Amy Schumer Presents 3 Girls 1 Keith Scrubbing in With Becca Tilley Tanya Rad Anna Faris Is Unqualified LADYGANG Chicks in the Office...”
“Ellen DeGeneres Chrissy Teigen BTS Taylor Swift Selena Gomez Comedy Act of 2018 Kevin Hart Tiffany Haddish Ali Wong Marlon Wayans Amy Schumer Style Star of 2018 Zendaya Blake Lively Emma Watson Beyoncé Harry Styles Game Changer of 2018 Colin Kaepernick Serena Williams Cristiano Ronaldo Aly Raisman Nia Jax Pop...”
“Well, Sunday's People's Choice Awards may be the ceremony for you.”
“Honoring popular film, TV, music and even podcasts, this is the award show where we, the people, determine the year's best in entertainment.”
“After airing more than three decades on CBS, the People's Choice Awards have a new home at the E!”
“...network.”
“You can watch the ceremony live on E!, beginning at 9 p.m. EST Sunday, November 11.”
“Check out the full list of nominees below.”
“Movie of 2018 Black Panther Avengers Infinity War Incredibles 2 Fifty Shades Freed A Quiet Place Comedy Movie of 2018 Love Simon Blockers The Spy Who Dumped Me Mamma Mia Here We Go Again Crazy Rich Asians Action Movie of 2018 Black Panther Avengers Infinity War Deadpool 2 Jurassic World...”
“Fallen Kingdom Ocean s 8 Drama Movie of 2018 Fifty Shades Freed 12 Strong Red Sparrow Midnight Sun A Quiet Place Family Movie of 2018 Incredibles 2 A Wrinkle in Time Hotel Transylvania 3 I Can Only Imagine Christopher Robin Male Movie Star of 2018 Chris Hemsworth Avengers Infinity War...”


"2018 podcast Amy Schumer introduces three girls 1 Keith and Becca Tilly Tanya rad together. Anna Faris is an unqualified lady in the office..."
"Ellen DeGeneres Chrissy Teigen BTS Taylor Swift Selena Gomez comedy performance 2018 Kevin harttiffany haddish Ali Wang Malone Wayans Amy Schumer style 2018 zendaya Blake Lively Emma Watson Beyonce Harry style 2018 game changer Colin kapenick Serena Williams Cristiano Ronaldo alilesman NIA Jax popular..."
"Well, Sunday's people's choice award may be your ceremony."
"This is an award ceremony for popular movies, TV, music and even podcasts, where our people decide the best entertainment of the year."
"More than 30 years after CBS broadcast, people's choice award is in E!"
“… Network. "
"You can live the ceremony online! From 9 p.m. on Sunday, November 11, EST. "
"Please see the full nomination list below."
"Movie 2018 Panther Avenger Infinite War incredible 250 shadows liberate a quiet place comedy movie 2018 love Simon blockade who dumped my spy Mamma Mia here we go crazy rich Asian action movie 2018 Panther Avenger infinite war dead pool 2 Jurassic world..."
"The ocean of the fallen kingdom in 2018 the eighth drama movie" Fifty shadows "released 12 strong red sparrows" midnight sun "quiet place in 2018 family movie" incredible "2" wrinkles in time "Transylvania Hotel 3 I can only imagine Christopher Robin, actor Chris Hemsworth in 2018, endless war of Avengers..."



Number  339
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What a reprieve.”With a clean bill of health, Wood will join the Rolling Stones on their upcoming European tour.”
“I didn’t know I was going to be given the ticket to last this long.”
“Wow!”
“I’ve had a great life and I was all ready to go.”
““I was prepared to remain positive to my dying breath.”
““Just be strong and remain positive,” he said.”
“Wood also doled out some advice for those dealing with cancer.”
“Wood has since quit his nicotine habit.”
“There was none in the rest of my body so I didn’t require chemo,” Wood added, marveling that his lungs didn’t “explode” after smoking cigarettes for over 50 years.”
“Luckily, all mine was contained within the left lung and I was fortunate enough to get shot of it, bang.”


"What a good probation." With a clean health certificate, wood will join the rolling stones on their upcoming European tour
"I didn't know someone would give me this ticket to hold on for so long."
"Wow
"I'm living a good life and I'm ready to go."
"I'm ready to be optimistic about my last breath."
"As long as you're strong, stay positive," he said
"Wood also has some advice for those who are treating cancer."
"Wood got rid of nicotine from then on."
"I don't have any other parts of my body, so I don't need chemotherapy," wood added, surprised that his lungs didn't "explode" after more than 50 years of smoking
"Fortunately, all my lungs are in my left lung, and I was lucky to get shot, bang."



Number  340
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...wet n wild MegaGlo Highlighting Powder, $3.99Image zoom Credit: wet n wild...”
“It also has unimaginable staying power, so if you have oily skin or have issue with your product tending to run, this one’s for you.”
“Maybelline Face Studio Master Strobe Stick, $7.99Image zoom Credit: MaybellineHonestly, is there anything easier to use than makeup in stick form?”
“You can definitely use them separately, but this product really packs a punch when you swirl all the colors together for a customized glow.”
“The Touch of Glow Palette is a small square compact with four shades of shimmering powder: champagne, pink, light gold, and a soft bronze.”
“That one’s great, but we find that it works more like a bronzer, adding warmth more than a glow.”
“Physicians Formula Nude Wear Touch of Glow Palette, $14.95Image zoom Credit: Physicians FormulaSome people swear by PF’s Mineral Glow Pearls Powder Palette, a small circular compact with bronze-y “pearls” of color.”
“The liquid formula also makes it easy to mix in with your body lotion to create a glow on your collarbone, shoulders, and legs.”
“It’s a liquid formula and comes in four shades that you can mix and match together, wear alone, or combine with your foundation for an all-over strobed effect.”
“They brought it back in 2014 due to customer demand, giving it a new name and reformulating it so it has better texture and consistency than the older version.”


“… We n wide megaglo, 3.99 USD image zooming L / C: We n wide... "
"It also has unimaginable durability, so if you have oily skin or have problems, your product tends to run this one for you."
Maybelline face studio master strobe stick, $7.99 image scaling credit: to be honest, is there anything easier to use than stick makeup? "
"You can use them alone, of course, but when you mix all the colors together to create a customized halo, this product is really powerful."
"The touch of the glow palette is a small square compact with four tones of shimmering powder: Champagne, pink, pale gold, and soft bronze."
"This one is great, but we find it's more like bronze, adding warmth rather than light."
Doctor formula nude wear touch glow palette, $14.95 image scaling credit: Doctor formula some people swear pf's Mineral Glow pearl powder palette, a small round compact bronze Y "Pearl" color
"Liquid formulations can also easily mix with body lotion to make the clavicle, shoulders and legs glow."
"This is a liquid formula with four tones. You can mix it collocation, wear it individually, or combine with your foundation to achieve a comprehensive effect."
"Due to the needs of customers, they brought it back in 2014, gave it a new name and redesigned it to give it better texture and consistency than the old version."



Number  341
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Like so many rappers—you’ll look at a video of Snoop Dogg loving Trump but then he get in the office and now they don’t want to love him.”“Trump is one of rap’s favorite people,” he concluded.”
““That’s my boy.”
““I just love Trump,” West said.”
“Prison is something that unites as one race, blacks and whites, that we’re the human race.”West also further explained his support of President Donald Trump on the show after tweeting a picture last week of him wearing a “Make America Great Again” hat.”
“Slavery is to blacks as the Holocaust is to Jews.”
“I like the word ‘prison’ because ‘slavery’ goes too direct to the idea of blacks.”
“It’s like we’re mentally in prison.”
“You was there for 400 years and it’s all of y’all.”
“That sounds like a choice.”
“For 400 years?!”


"Like a lot of rappers, you watch a video of Snoopy dog loving trump, but then he comes into the office, and now they don't want to love him." "Trump is one of rappers' favorites," he concludes
"That's my child."
"I just love trump," West said
"Prison is something that unites black people and white people as a race. We are human beings." Last week, West tweeted a picture of President Donald Trump wearing the "make America great again" hat, further explaining his support for president Donald Trump on the show
"Slavery is to black people what Holocaust is to Jews."
"I like the word 'prison' because 'slavery' is so direct to the idea of black people."
"It's like we're in prison mentally."
"You've been there for 400 years, and that's all of you."
"It sounds like a choice."
"400 years?"



Number  342
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m blown away,” Dickinson says of 21-year-old Henry, who calls himself a “clairvoyant medium.””
“1982”
“I have chills on my chills RELATED VIDEO After Janice Dickinson Details Alleged Sexual Assault by Bill Cosby His Attorney Denies Dickinson says she was away on a shoot for American Bazaar when the comedian died of a drug overdose at the Chateau Marmont Hotel in West Hollywood California in...”
““I have chills,” Dickinson, 62, tells Henry in the clip after he alludes to the fact she was away when Belushi died.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“'I Have Chills': Janice Dickinson Connects with Late Friend John Belushi on Hollywood Medium with Tyler HenryJanice Dickinson was looking to get in touch with an old friend.”
“ET) on E!”
“Season 2 of Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry airs Wednesdays (9 p.m.”


"I was blown away," Dickinson said of 21-year-old Henry, who claimed to be a "clairvoyant medium."
“1982”
"After Janice Dickinson detailed Bill Cosby's sexual assault charges, I was chilled by my shivering video. His lawyer denied that Dickinson said that when she was filming for the American market, the comedian died of drug abuse at the Marmont Castle Hotel in West Hollywood, California... "
"I'm cold," Dickinson, 62, tells Henry in the clip, hinting that she wasn't at home when she died
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm chilly": Janice Dickinson and her late friend John Burroughs perform with Taylor Henry in Hollywood. Janice Dickinson wants to get in touch with an old friend. "
"ET) on e!"
Taylor Henry, the second season of Hollywood media, will air on Wednesday (9pm)



Number  343
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I can’t say I didn’t have it coming,” he said.”
“Malina did get one more surprise as he left to face Kimmel’s cameras, and that was a firefighter spraying him with a hose.”
““That is the worst thing anyone has ever done to me,” the actor laughed.”
“It wasn’t until Kimmel emerged as an EMT that Malina realized this whole thing was staged.”
“Breathe,” Malina said as he grabbed the fake grandma’s hand and she started to cry.”
“We’re here for you.”
“I’m so sorry.”
““I’m sorry to scare you.”
“Meanwhile, Scandal creator Shonda Rhimes and the rest of the series cast cracked up watching pre-recorded footage of the prank from the Jimmy Kimmel Live stage on Thursday night.”
“Malina began to panic as Lowes came to her aid and the producers called an ambulance.”


"I can't say I didn't come," he said
"When he left the camera facing Kimmel, Marina did get another surprise. It was a fireman spraying water on him with a hose."
"This is the worst thing anyone has ever done to me," the actor said with a smile
"It wasn't until Kimmel became a paramedic that Marina realized that the whole thing was going on."
"Breathe," said marina, as he grabbed granny's hand and she began to cry
"We'll wait for you here."
"I'm sorry."
"I'm sorry to scare you."
Meanwhile, gossip creator shoda rimes and the rest of the cast collapsed on Thursday night as they watched the prank prerecorded footage on Jimmy Kimmel's live channel
"When Ross came to help marina, Marina began to panic and the producer called an ambulance."



Number  344
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“000 year old monarchy...”
“...courtesy Teampriyankachopra courtesy VivienneWestwood Britain s Prince Harry and American actress Meghan Markle were pronounced husband and wife on Saturday by the Archbishop of Canterbury in a glittering union that brought a measure of modern Hollywood glamour into the 1”
“Take a look.”
“The actress, who was photographed walking into the ceremony alongside actress Abigail Spencer, rounded off her look with on point makeup and statement earrings.”
“Priyanka, whose appearance was a much-awaited one, managed to impress fashion connoisseurs with her interesting, chic and royal outfit choice.”
“Her outfit was hand-crafted in a light heather grey summer tweed, with a soft pearlescent sheen.”
“...skirt and a fascinator hat courtesy Philip Treacy...”
“Quantico star Priyanka Chopra who is a longtime friend of Meghan Markle arrived at the royal wedding at the St George s Chapel on Saturday looking chic in a custom Vivienne Westwood single breasted blazer teamed with a matching pencil...”


"Millennium monarchy..."
“… Prince Harry of England and American actress Megan markel were declared husband and wife by the Archbishop of Canterbury on Saturday. This shining combination brings the charm of modern Hollywood into history. "
"Have a look."
The actress, who was photographed walking into the wedding with actress Abigail Spencer, perfectly embellished her look with eye makeup and personalized earrings
"The emergence of Priyanka is long-awaited. She has impressed fashion connoisseurs with her interesting, chic and noble clothing choices."
Her dress is hand sewn with light grey summer tweed, with a soft pearlescent luster
“… The dress and a glamorous hat are provided by Philip Tracy... "
"Quantiko star Priyanka Chopra, an old friend of Meghan Markle, wore a custom Vivienne Westwood single breasted jacket with a matching pencil and went to the royal wedding at St George s Chapel on Saturday. She looked very fashionable..."



Number  345
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I don’t want to say she’s a needy girlfriend, but …””
“This is just a commitment ceremony,” she whispers urgently to Kylie’s assistant Victoria Villaroel.”
“ET on E!”
“Kylie Jenner and Jordyn Woods Get 'Married' — and Kris Jenner Is Freaking Out About the PrenupHere comes the brides!”
“On Sunday’s season finale of Life of Kylie, Kylie Jenner and her bestie Jordyn Woods cap off their trip to Peru and take their relationship to the next level in one fell swoop with a traditional commitment ceremony.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a sneak peek at the episode, the two make their way into the room dressed in head-to-toe white, with Kylie, 20, carrying a baby goat and Woods, 19, holding a bouquet of roses.”
“As they turn to face the man presiding over the ceremony, he starts reciting the “rites to be married” — and momager Kris Jenner starts to grow concerned.”
““What?”
““Does he know that?” she continues.”


"I don't want to say she's a girlfriend in need, but..."
"It's just a commitment ceremony," she whispered to Kelly's assistant, Victoria Villarreal
"Wait!"
"Kelly Jenner and Jordan woods are" married "- Chris Jenner is very afraid of the prenuptial agreement. Here comes the bride!"
"At the end of Kelly's life on Sunday, Kelly Jenner and her good friend Jordan woods finished their trip to Peru and took their relationship to a new level through a traditional commitment ceremony."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"While peeping at the episode, they walk into the room from head to toe dressed in white, with 20-year-old Kelly holding a little goat and 19-year-old woods holding a bunch of roses."
When they turned to face the wedding host, he began to recite "wedding ceremony" - mother Chris Jenner began to worry
"What?"
"Does he know? "She continued



Number  346
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...comfortable in your own space especially that far away...”
“Ladies Linked to Justin Bieber Through the Years Bieber told Access Hollywood at the time that the nude photos being leaked made him feel super violated and Like I feel like I can t step outside and feel like I can go outside naked He added that You should feel...”
“The NSFW pics of the "Sorry" singer are the same images that images that were published after the pop star's trip to Bora Bora with beauty blogger Jayde Pierce two years ago.”
“It may be just a coincidence but right around the time of the hacking, the 23-year-old "Love Yourself" singer posted an unhappy looking image of himself on his Instagram Stories.”
“Despite the invasive hack, the "Come and Get It" singer's Instagram was only offline for a few minutes and when her account came back the graphic images of the Canadian pop star had been deleted.”
“Gomez's Instagram account is now back on line — minus her ex-boyfriend's naked pics.”
“Gomez, who is the most followed person on Instagram, got hacked and her Instagram account was briefly taken down after the profile posted a triptych of nude photos of her ex Justin Bieber from a previous vacation that the he took in 2015.”
“Selena Gomez, Justin Bieber and her 125 million Instagram followers had a doozy of a day on Monday.”


“… It's comfortable in your own space, especially so far away... "
"The woman who has been associated with Justin Bieber for many years told Access Hollywood at that time that the leaked nude photos made him feel super violated. I think I can't go out. I think I can go out naked." he added, "you should feel..."
"The nsfw photo of the 'sorry' singer is the same as the one released two years ago after the pop star and beauty blogger Jayde pierce traveled to bora."
"It may just be a coincidence, but just before and after the eavesdropping incident, the 23-year-old" love yourself "singer posted a picture of herself looking very unhappy in the instagram story."
"Despite being hacked, the singer's instagram was only offline for a few minutes. When her account came back, the picture of the Canadian pop star had been deleted."
"Gomez's instagram account is now online again - minus the nude photos of his ex boyfriend."
"Gomez is the most watched person on instagram. Her instagram account was hacked. Her instagram account was temporarily cancelled after her profile released the nude photos of former Justin Bieber during her 2015 annual vacation."
"Serena Gomez, Justin Bieber and her 125 million instagram fans had a bad day once a week."



Number  347
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I was never a secret.””
“They were separated living in separate homes.”
“And recently, I didn’t.”
““And because of that I should make smart decisions.”
“Image zoom Eniko Parrish | Credit: Instagram“I’m at a place in my life where I feel like I have a target on my back,” Hart, 38, said in the clip.”
“Hart Apologized for His ‘Mistakes’ in an Emotional VideoBefore news of the alleged extortion broke, Hart shared an Instagram video in which he revealed that a person was trying to make “financial gain” off of his past misbehavior and apologized to his family.”
“The person also claimed to have seen Hart partying in Las Vegas last month, and accused the actor of cheating on Parrish with several women.”
“The alleged extortionist reportedly told TMZ that he or she was trying to get money and expose Hart for cheating.”
“Officials have reportedly identified the woman in the alleged footage, and believe she or someone else attempted to blackmail the star.”
“...with a woman at a club and then in a bedroom...”


"I've never been a secret."
"They live in separate homes."
"Lately, I haven't."
"That's why I should have made a wise decision."
Image zooming Eniko Parrish | image source: instagram Hart, 38, said in the clip: "I live in a place and feel like I have a goal on my back."
"Hart apologized for his" mistake "in an emotional video. Before the news of alleged extortion came out, Hart shared an instagram video in which he revealed that a person tried to gain" economic benefits "through his past misconduct and apologized to his family."
The man also claimed to have seen Hart partying in Las Vegas last month and accused him and several women of cheating on Parrish
"It is reported that the alleged blackmailer told TMZ that he or she was trying to get the money and exposed Hart's cheating."
"It is reported that officials have confirmed the identity of the woman in the so-called video and believe that she or others are trying to blackmail the star."
“… In the club with a woman and then in the bedroom... "



Number  348
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“When you put a women like Viola Davis on the screen and say, “This is our beauty icon, this is beautiful.” The world stops and says, “Yes, we've been waiting for this.”This content is imported from Instagram.”
“To be put in that group of women and be thought of in that way, I'm just so immensely, overwhelmingly happy and honored to be counted amongst them.”
“All of those women evoke such elegance and style and they all have qualities of effortless beauty around them.”
“I'm so honored.”
“Oh, my gosh, it’s amazing.”
“What’s it like to join the ranks of Julianne Moore, Susan Sarandon, Naomi Watt, Camila Cabello, Blake Lively, and Maria Borges?”
“Congrats on the new L’Oreal Paris spokesperson role!”
“Read on to learn about the new beautiful talented #lorealista.”
“Ahead of the first kickoff campaign with Aja for the True Match Lumi Collection, we jumped on the phone to talk beauty, Viola Davis and Shonda Rhimes, being seen, and beauty secrets from the set of How To Get Away With Murder.”


You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"When you put a woman like Viola Davis on the screen and say," this is our beauty idol. This is so beautiful. " The world stopped and said, "yes, we've been waiting for this." This content was imported from instagram. "
"I'm very, very happy and honored to be included in this group of women and treated like this."
"All of these women can evoke such elegance and style, and they are surrounded by effortless beauty."
"I'm honored."
"Oh, my God, it's amazing."
"What's it like to join Julian Moore, Susan Sarandon, Naomi Watt, Camilla Cabello, Blake Lively and Maria Borges?"
"Congratulations on becoming the new spokesman of L'Oreal in Paris!"
"Read on and learn about the new beautiful genius lorelisa."
"Before the first kick-off with aja for the true match Lumi series, we talked over the phone about beauty, Viola Davis and Sunda Rhimes, being seen and how to escape murder."



Number  349
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Revenge Body star opted for bold eyelashes, shimmery eye shadow and a nude lip, finishing the look with long, curly locks.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Khloé Kardashian is proving that she won’t be trading her glam style for mom jeans when she becomes a first-time parent this year.”
“The reality star shared another baby bump photo on Instagram in which she is styled for an evening out — a look presumably worn for her New Year’s Eve celebrations with boyfriend Tristan Thompson.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The pregnant 33-year-old wore a curve-hugging, ruched mesh black dress with a fur coat sliding off her shoulders.”
“Alongside the image, she revealed that she’s “Officially 6 months” into her pregnancy.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“In another photo, Kardashian revealed more of her look as she shared a smooch with Thompson, 26, who placed his hand on her growing belly.”
“She looks amazing and loves her life.”RELATED VIDEO: Pregnant Khloé Kardashian Spends New Year’s Eve with ‘Sooooo Handsome’ Boyfriend Tristan ThompsonAhead of Sunday evening’s festivities, Kardashian used Instagram to share her pre-party primping with her followers.”


"Avenging stars choose bold eyelashes, shiny eyeshadow and nude lips, with long curly hair to make up the finishing touches."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Khlo é Kardashian is proving that when she was a parent for the first time this year, she would not trade her dazzling style for her mother's jeans."
"The reality star shared another picture of a baby bulge on instagram that she designed to go out at night - a look she might have worn with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson to celebrate New Year's Eve."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 33 year old pregnant woman was wearing a curvy, tight, pleated mesh black dress with a fur coat sliding off her shoulders."
"In addition to this photo, she revealed that she was six months pregnant."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"In another photo, Kardashian showed more expression when taking a group photo with Thompson, 26, who put her hand on her growing stomach."
"She looks great and loves her life." Related video: pregnant khlo é Kardashian and "handsome" boyfriend Tristan Thompson spend New Year's Eve Sunday evening celebration, Kardashian uses instagram to share with her followers her dress before the party



Number  350
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Battle of the Sexes” opens Sept. 22.”
“There’s a journey here, and it’s about, as Billie says, uniting.”Read the entire Out Magazine article here.”
““In my career so far, I’ve needed my male co-stars to take a pay cut so that I may have parity with them,” she said in an interview with Andrea Riseborough and Billie Jean King.”
““And that’s something they do for me because they feel it’s what’s right and fair.”
“That s something that s also not discussed necessarily that our getting equal pay is going to require people to selflessly say That s what s fair If my male co star who has a higher quote than me but believes we are equal takes a pay cut so that...”
“I can match him that changes my quote in the future and changes my life Riseborough and Stone star in the upcoming film Battle of the Sexes based on the legendary 1973 tennis match between King and Bobby Riggs played by Steve Carell...”
“King has been a supporter of women’s equality throughout her career, earning her the Presidential Medal of Freedom.”
“In the interview, the three women also discussed how the themes of the film are still relevant today — including the current administration.”
“Also Read: Donald Trump May 'Cherish Women' But Pays Them a Lot Less“The parallels in this movie are pretty fascinating,” added Stone.”
“We began shooting in the spring of 2016 when there was still a lot of hope in the air and it was very interesting to see this guy this narcissistic self focused constantly stirring the pot kind of guy against this incredible qualified woman and at the same time me...”


"Battle of the sexes" will be released on September 22
"There's a journey here, as Billy said, it's about unity." Read the whole article in the magazine here
"So far in my career, I need my male partners to take pay cuts so I can be on an equal footing with them," she said in interviews with Andrea riseborough and Billy Jean King
"It's what they do for me because they think it's right and fair."
"There's no need to discuss this. Our equal pay for equal work requires people to selflessly say that it's fair. If my male partner's offer is higher than mine, but I believe that we are equal, take a pay cut so that..."
"I can compete with him in the upcoming film battle of the genders, which changes my future quotes and my life. This film is based on the legendary tennis match between Steve Carell's king and Bob rigs in 1973..."
King has supported women's equality throughout her career and won her the Presidential Medal of freedom
"In the interview, the three women also discussed the significance of the film's theme today - including this administration."
Stone added: "it can also be read that Donald Trump may" cherish women "but pay them much less."
"We started shooting in the spring of 2016, when there was still a lot of hope in the air, to see this guy, this narcissistic self absorbed guy, constantly stirring the pot guy, fighting against this incredible qualified woman, and I was also very interesting..."



Number  351
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Aside from her beef with Glanville, Portwood will spend her time in the reality series to deal with her issues with her mother Tonya and her fiancé at that time, Matt Baier.”
“Whatsapp Google Reddit Digg Stumbleupon Linkedin Comment A new season of Marriage Boot Camp Reality Stars Family Edition is about to begin and it seems to be more explosive than ever...”
“In the trailer released by WE tv that was posted by E!”
“News, two reality stars who were known for their fierce attitude were seen in a heated conversation.”
“Based on the trailer, "Teen Mom: OG" star Amber Portwood was having a shouting match with former "The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills" star and current "Celebrity Big Brother" houseguest Brandi Glanville.”
“"You drunk f--king b--ch," Portwood told Glanville in the trailer.”
“The ex-Housewife also replied angrily, saying: "Shut the f--k up."”
“But the MTV reality star refused to back down and said: "Do something before I drop kick you in your motherf--king head."”
“According to reports, Portwood and Baier will also have an intense confrontation in front of the camera where she accused him of beating her.”


Submit
"In addition to the dispute with Granville, Portwood will also spend time in the reality show series dealing with her problems with her mother Tonya and then fiancee Matt Bayer."
"WhatsApp Google reddit digg stumpon LinkedIn commented that the new season of marriage training camp reality TV star family edition is about to start, it seems more explosive than ever before..."
"In the trailer we TV released, e!"
"As soon as the news came out, two reality TV stars who are famous for their fierce attitude had a heated dialogue."
According to the trailer, young mom: og star amber porterwood has a shouting match with former Beverly Hills real housewife and current celebrity big brother tenant brandy Granville
"You drank f-king b-ch," Portwood told Granville in the trailer
The former housewife also angrily replied, "shut up."
But the MTV reality star refused to back down, saying, "do something before I kick your mother, the king's head."
"It is reported that porterwood and Bayer will also fight fiercely in front of the camera, and she accused him of beating her."



Number  352
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Of the troubled reality star, a Bachelorette source previously told PEOPLE that the spotlight of the show had weighed heavily on Nance.”
“Officials at the time said they did not expect foul play.”
“...at the time of his death PEOPLE confirms...”
“Nance had ingested cocaine, heroin, Clonazepam and Gabapentin shortly before his death, according to an autopsy report obtained by PEOPLE from the Travis County Office of the Medical Examiner.”
“It also stated Nance had a history of opiate abuse and anxiety.”
“His death has been ruled an accident.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Nance — who competed on Emily Maynard‘s season 8 of The Bachelorette in 2012 — was found unresponsive in Austin, Texas, on May 28.”
“He was rushed to a local hospital where he was pronounced dead.”
“He was 31.”


"About the troubled reality star, a single person told people earlier that the spotlight on the show is putting a lot of pressure on Nancy."
"Officials at the time said they didn't expect fouls."
“… At the time of his death, people confirmed that... "
According to an autopsy report from the Travis County coroner's office, NANs took cocaine, heroin, clonazepam and gabapentin shortly before his death
"The report also said NANs had a history of opium abuse and anxiety."
"His death was judged an accident."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Nancy - who took part in Emily Maynard's season 8 Bachelor in 2012 - was found unresponsive in Austin, Texas, May 28."
"He was rushed to a local hospital and declared dead."
"He was 31."



Number  353
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Kar-Jenners rule: Kylie posed up with big sister Kim KardashianFancy!”
“She'll be flaunting her progress more and more.'”
“Stormi s mom returned to red carpet in peekaboo dress with boyfriend Travis Scott at Met Gala Mom s night out Kylie was zipped into her black trailing gown While the theme of the gala was Heavenly Bodies And The Catholic Imagination Kylie and her beau did not take the...”
“Online detectives: The mysterious nature of the mark seemed to capture the imagination of many fans as they took to Twitter to discuss its meaning and originsKylie Jenner's comeback!”
“The reality star picked the most public arena possible for her big reveal, strutting alongside boyfriend Travis as she made her way into the Met Gala.”
“And after shunning the limelight during her pregnancy, Kylie made her red carpet return on Monday night.”
“Meanwhile, she welcomed her first child, baby daughter Stormi, just three months ago.”
“One fan humorously wrote: 'I saw Kylie Jenner with a bandaid mark, so I got a bandaid mark (sic)'.”
“Fans were ultimately not so concerned with the meaning of the mark and instead thought it might just be a cool trend they could jump on.”
“Or was it simply an unexplained phenomenon?”


"Carl Janus rule: Kelly and sister Kim Kardashian
"She will show off her progress more and more."
"Tommy's mother is dressed in hide and seek clothes, and her boyfriend Travis Scott returns to the red carpet at the metropolitan party. On the night when mom goes out, Kelly is wearing a black mop robe, and the theme of the party is celestial bodies. The Catholic imagination, Kelly and her boyfriend do not accept..."
"Online detective: Mark's mysterious nature seems to attract the imagination of many fans, who discuss its significance and the comeback of origins Kelly Jenner on twitter!"
The reality star chose the most open stage and strutted into the metropolitan party with her boyfriend Travis
"Kelly avoided the spotlight during her pregnancy and returned to the red carpet on Monday night."
At the same time, she had her first child three months ago, her youngest daughter, Tommy
"I saw a bandage on Kelly Jenner, so I got a bandage," one fan wrote humorously
"Fans didn't really care about the significance of the logo in the end, but thought it might be just a cool trend they could jump on."
"Or is it just an unexplained phenomenon?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Julia reveals all of this to Quentin, as well as what Reynard did to her.”
“He repaid them by killing almost every member, save for Kady, who is able to flee thanks to Julia’s protection.”
“Unfortunately, everyone still hates one another, and they’re not too pleased to see Julia, either, after almost killing Quentin earlier in the season.”
“She helps them along their way to the present, where they reunite with Quentin’s friends in a rundown, hollowed-out shell of Fillory.”
“Yes, the great villainess of the books is actually a good friend (who they have to break the news to that she has died in her 40th time loop, each a separate attempt to slightly alter the world and hopefully kill the Beast).”
“Luckily, he agrees, helping the duo to make further progress, only to run into the Watcherwoman…who is actually Eliza…who is, of course, also Jane Chatwin..”
“Martin helps them create the very blade that will be required to fell the Beast, but it will require ages to cobble.”
“Quentin and Julia even learn that they themselves are in the Fillory and Further books, helping Jane out of a trap and discovering Martin Chatwin has followed them.”
“While most of the Brakebills students take a path via the fountains of the Neitherlands, Quentin and Julia head back in time to 1942, following Jane Chatwin into the magical land they once thought was the stuff of fiction (and where the air is 0.2 percent opium).”
“They all don’t arrive together, of course.”


"Julia told Quentin all this and what Renard had done to her."
"To repay them, he killed almost all the members except Katie, who was able to escape because of Julia's protection."
"Unfortunately, everyone still hates each other, and they're not happy to see Julia, after almost killing Quentin earlier this season."
"She helped them all the way to the present, where they were reunited with Quentin's friends in a dilapidated, hollowed out philoli shell."
"Yes, the villain in the book is actually a good friend (they have to tell him that she has died in the 40th cycle, each time in order to change the world a little bit, hoping to kill the beast)
"Fortunately, he agreed and helped them make further progress. As a result, he met the woman who was on the watch She's actually Eliza Of course, she is also Jane Chatwin... "
"Martin helped them build a blade to make the beast fall, but it took a long time to break in."
"Quentin and Julia even know that they are also in philoli and later books, helping Jane out of a trap and finding that Martin Chatwin is with them."
"When most of brakbill's students took a path through the Netherland fountain, Quentin and Julia went back to 1942 and followed Jane chatterwin into what they once thought was a magical land of fiction (where there was 0.2% opium in the air)."
"Of course, they didn't come together."



Number  355
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Noelle Devoe Entertainment Editor When I'm not holed up in my room going on a completely unproductive Netflix binge or Tumblr stalking Timothée Chalomet, I'm searching for awesome celeb news stories that Seventeen readers will love!”
“Follow her on Twitter and Instagram!”
“Noelle Devoe is the Entertainment Web Editor at Seventeen.com.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“Check out the trailer now!”
“I'll have nightmares forever starting RIGHT NOW.”
“Somehow, this all culminates with Lucy's character, Olivia, strangling Tyler's character, Lucas, with a murderous grin on her face during a hookup.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Noelle Devoe entertainment editor when I'm not hiding in my room for a fruitless Netflix carnival or Tumblr following Timothy é e chalmet, I'm looking for wonderful celebrity news stories that 17 readers will love!"
"Follow her on Twitter and instagram!"
Noel devo is the 17th net. "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from YouTube."
"Now look at the trailer!"
"From now on, I will always have nightmares."
"Somehow, it all ends up with Lucy's character Olivia strangling Taylor's character Lucas with a ferocious smile in a collusion."



Number  356
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the full music video below.”
“1, which is set to release on June 30.”
“Feels is a track off of Harris’s new album Funk Wav Bounces Vol.”
“Written in part by Perry, Williams and Big Sean, the song was produced by Harris and the video was directed by Emil Nava.”
“Although the video doesn’t follow any particular storyline (it’s a montage of the artists chilling on a small private beach), the colorful, almost psychedelic imagery and tropical setting perfectly match the catchy summer tune.”
“Sara M MoniuszkoUSA TODAYCalvin Harris’s new music video could have been called “vibes.”The video for Feels, released Monday night, will take you on a vibe-y island getaway with your favorite artists including Katy Perry, Pharrell Williams and Big Sean, who are featured on the track.”


"Watch the full music video below."
"1, to be released on June 30."
"It feels like a follow-up volume of Harris' new album funkpo bounce."
"Part of it was written by Perry, Williams and Shawn the big, the song was made by Harris and the video was directed by Emile Nava."
"Although the video doesn't follow any particular storyline (it's a montage where artists chill on a small private beach), the colorful, almost psychedelic images and tropical background perfectly match the fascinating summer tune."
Sara m moniuszkousa todaycalvin Harris's new music video can be called "vibes.". The feels video released on Monday night will take you on holiday with your favorite artists, Katy Perry, Pharrell Williams and big Sean, who are the main characters on the track



Number  357
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She later suffered a panic attack, which resulted in her voluntary check-in to rehab.”
“Close friends: Selena and Taylor are seen in Pasadena, California in MayShowing her support: The beauty sported a black hoodie from the country-turned-pop singer's Reputation tourHer look: The raven-haired star completed her look with black sneakers and shades.”
“And on Friday, Selena Gomez proved her friendship with Taylor Swift was still going strong, during a hike in Los Angeles.”
“The 26-year-old sported a black hoodie from the country-turned-pop singer's Reputation tour.”
“Close knit: On Friday, Selena Gomez proved her friendship with Taylor Swift was still going strong, during a hike in Los AngelesSelena paired the oversize piece with a set of matching leggings.”
“The raven-haired beauty completed her look with black sneakers and shades.”
“Selena appeared to be make-up free.”
“The star pulled her hair back in a low bun, making sure to keep it away from her face.”
“Selena appeared to be make-up freeEffortless: The Back to You singer pulled her hair back in a low bun, making sure to keep it away from her faceIn October, Selena reportedly checked herself into rehab for her mental health.”
“The site said that the star 'was hospitalized twice in late September for a low white blood cell count in the wake of her 2017 kidney transplant.'”


"Then she got panic attack, so she volunteered to go to rehab."
"Close friends: Serena and Taylor showed up in Pasadena, California, in May to show their support: the beauty wore a Black Hoodie from a country pop singer's famous concert tour. Her look: the crow hair star finished her look with black sneakers and sunglasses."
Last Friday, Selena Gomez proved that her friendship with Taylor Swift was still strong when she was hiking in Los Angeles
"The 26 year old is wearing a Black Hoodie for a country pop concert tour."
"Connect: last Friday, Selena Gomez proved that her friendship with Taylor Swift is still strong, and she paired this oversized piece with a matching pair of tights on a hike in Los Angeles."
"The beauty with crow's hair finished her look with black sneakers and sunglasses."
"Serena doesn't seem to have makeup."
"Stars comb their hair back into a low bun. They must keep their hair away from their faces."
"Serena looks effortless in makeup: the singer with her back to you combs her hair in a bun to make sure it's away from her face. It is reported that in October, Selena checked her mental health at the rehabilitation center
"According to the website, the star" was hospitalized twice in late September after kidney transplantation in 2017 due to low white blood cell count. "



Number  358
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
“I’ve lost eight pounds.”Jill also revealed that she reconciled with Ramona Singer; saying that Ramona has been by her side non-stop during Bobby’s hospitalization.”
“...current Housewives including a few of her Real Housewives of New York friends like Cindy Barshop Tinsley Mortimer Luann de Lesseps and Kelly Bensimon...”
“Others haven t called but I m blessed I m so lucky I m surrounded by friends For now Jill says she and Bobby are taking things one hour at a time Adding He had a good day yesterday At her Luxury Luncheon Jill was surrounded by many former and...”
““The past doesn’t mean anything; it doesn’t mean anything to us.”
“She’s been emailing me and texting me every day,” said Jill.”
“Ramona came to the hospital and sat with me for a few hours.”
““It means everything to me.”
“I haven’t eaten in days.”
“Like AllAboutTRH On Facebook.”


"Follow allaboutthh podcasts on iTunes and Soundcloud - remember ratings, reviews and subscriptions!"
"I lost eight pounds." Jill also revealed that she had made up with Ramona Singh; she said Ramona had been with her all the time while Bobbie was in hospital
“… Today's housewives, including some Real Housewives of her New York friends, such as Cindy bashop Tinsley Mortimer Luan de Lesseps and Kelly Ben Simon... "
"Other people didn't call, but I'm so lucky, I'm so lucky, friends around me, because now Jill says that she and Bob are taking things one hour at a time, adding that he had her Deluxe lunch yesterday and Jill was a good day by many before and..."
"The past doesn't make any sense, and it doesn't make any sense to us."
"She sends me emails and text messages every day," Jill said
"Ramona came to the hospital and sat with me for hours."
"It means everything to me."
"I haven't eaten for days."
"It's like allaboutthh on Facebook."



Number  359
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:John Cena and Nikki Bella Spotted Together After Their SplitWatch Nikki Bella Make John Cena Incredibly Uncomfortable With Talk of Babies on 'Total Bellas'Nikki Bella Reveals What She and John Cena Need to Get Back Together (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“"You miss that person because you shared so many wonderful moments."”
“In the hours leading up to couple's engagement party, the bride-to-be was feeling a little anxious about the event.”
“"So the engagement party is here.”
“I feel so overwhelmed," she shares in a preview for Sunday's upcoming episode of Total Bellas.”
“"I honestly feel like I'm about to have an anxiety attack.”
“There's just so much going on.”
“I just feel like I'm on this roller coaster of emotions and I feel like I'm going to explode.”
“It's just all too much for me."”
“When Cena, 41, asks Bella, 34, to try and enjoy the day she explains that even though she's excited, she's also sad that not everyone she loves can make it.”


"Embedded code restart" content: after John senna and Nicky Bella found out together, their split watching Nicky Bella made John Senna incredibly uncomfortable, what Nicky Bella revealed in 'total Bellas', she and John Senna need to come back together (exclusive) related gallery
"You miss that person because you've shared so many wonderful moments."
"In the hours before the couple got engaged, the bride to be felt a little anxious about it."
"So here comes the engagement party."
"I'm at a loss," she said in the trailer for Bellas' complete works, which will be released on Sunday
"I really feel like I'm about to have an anxiety attack."
"There are too many things."
"I just feel like I'm on this emotional roller coaster and I feel like I'm going to explode."
"It's too much for me."
"When 41 year old Senna let 34 year old Bella enjoy the day, she explained that although she was excited, she was also sad because not everyone she loved could succeed."



Number  360
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And the depression is gone.””
““I felt very conflicted about it because I didn’t really feel like I had anything to be depressed about.”“Now I take a medication called Pristiq, which I thought just sounded like a good mood,” he added.”
““After 14 years together we have decided that ending our marriage is the best decision for our family,” Dane, 45, said in a statement to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We will continue our friendship and work as a team to co-parent our two beautiful girls as they are the most important thing in the world to us.”
“We kindly ask that you respect our privacy during this time as we navigate the next phase of our lives.”Gayheart, best known for films such as Jawbreaker and Scream 2, filed for divorce on Friday in Los Angeles according to court documents obtained by The Blast.”
“Gayheart cited irreconcilable differences as the reason for their split but did not say when they separated instead the date of separation was listed as TBD The actress 46 is requesting joint legal and physical custody of the couple s two daughters 7 year old Billie and 6 year old...”
“Georgia...”
“The Jawbreaker star is also seeking spousal support, according to the divorce documents.”
“Gayheart and the former Grey’s Anatomy star married in 2004 and have faced a number of challenges since then.”


"The great depression is over."
"I feel very ambivalent about this because I don't really feel depressed." "Now that I'm taking a drug called pristiq, I think it sounds like a good mood," he added
"After 14 years together, our decision to end our marriage is the best decision for our family," the 45 year old Dane said in a statement
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We will continue our friendship, as a team, to raise our two beautiful girls together, because they are the most important in the world to us."
"We urge you to respect our privacy during this time and let us pass the next stage of our life." Gayhardt, known for the movies jaw breaker and scream 2, filed for divorce in Los Angeles on Friday, according to court documents obtained from the bombings
"Gayheart cited irreconcilable differences as the reason for their breakup, but did not say when they separated. Instead, she said that the date of separation was pending. The 46 year old actress asked for joint custody of the couple's two daughters, 7-year-old Billy and 6-year-old body..."
"Georgia..."
"According to the divorce documents, the star with a broken jaw is also seeking the support of his spouse."
"Gayheart and the former anatomy of grey star got married in 2004 and have faced many challenges since then."



Number  361
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  362
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But if you needed any other convincing of Chastain’s awesomeness, there’s always this scene from Zero Dark Thirty.”
“If anything, her vocal presence on Hollywood’s sexual harassment issues, as well as the gender wage gap and other divisive topics, have made her even more popular with fans.”
“What she is not is a prepackaged product put together by the public relations firms that work for the major studios.”
“That’s quite the admirable path to take in today’s 24/7 Twitter-verse where you’re constantly on guard against the leering public.”
“But even Chastain would admit that the choice to be a voice of truth in the entertainment industry did not come easily for her.”
“In a recent interview with the New York Times, Chastain admitted to being shocked that she received a Golden Globes nomination for Aaron Sorkin’s Molly’s Game.”
“She thought her career may actually be in peril after speaking out against the deluge of sexual misconduct allegations being flung around Hollywood.”
““To be honest, I’m mainly surprised about my nomination,” she told the outlet.”
““As an actor, I have a lot of fear, thinking that if I speak my mind, or something that feels like it deviates from the norm as a woman, am I going to be made to disappear in my industry?”
““When the article came out about Weinstein, I immediately started tweeting.”


"But if you need any other convincing evidence to prove what's amazing about chastan, there's always a scene that starts with zero dark thirty."
"If there's any difference, it's her stance on sexual harassment in Hollywood, as well as the gender wage gap and other divisive topics that make her more popular with fans."
"She's not a prepackaged product, it's a patchwork of PR companies working for major film companies."
"It's a very admirable Road, and on twitter 24 / 7 today, you should always be on guard against the public eye."
"But even chastan will admit that it's not easy for her to choose to be a real spokesperson in the entertainment industry."
"In a recent interview with the New York Times, chastan admitted that he was shocked that he was nominated for the Golden Globe for Aaron Sorkin's" Molly's game. "
"She thinks her career may actually be in danger because she publicly opposes Hollywood's overwhelming accusations of sexual misconduct."
"To be honest, I was surprised by my nomination," she told the media
"As an actor, I have a lot of fears. I wonder if I say what I think, or feel something that deviates from the norms of being a woman, will I disappear in my industry?"
"When the article about Weinstein came out, I immediately started to tweet."



Number  363
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s What Can Be Done About It”,”reading_time”:12}]};”
“\u201cI knew that they were going to have to downsize, and I knew that because I was the last one hired, I was going to be the first one […]”,”hub”:{“hub_title”:”In the Americans Are Still Struggling to Get Their Benefits.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports the time Grace Williams was let go from her job as a financial aid counselor last fall, she had seen the writing on the wall.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Bet Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“This NFL Pro Has Some Financial Advice for you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”
““,”hub”:{“hub_title”:”In the Bowl LV Winners Got a Cash Bonus.”
“...const FP = you\u2019re an NFL player signing multi-million dollar contracts or earning a normal salary, Brandon Copeland says this is what you should do.”


"Here's what you can do", "reading time: 12};"
"I know that they will have to lay off their staff, and I also know that because I am the last one to be employed, I will be the first [...] ]In the United States, they are still trying to get benefits
"Here's what we know about legal sports. When grace Williams was relieved of her position as financial aid adviser last fall, she saw the handwriting on the wall."
"Here's what you should know about the Super Bowl LV bet."
"This NFL professional gave you some financial advice to make money from sports betting before the super bowl?"
"," hub ": {" hub / u title ":" Lv winner in the bowl gets cash bonus. "
“… Const FP = if you're an NFL player, signed a multimillion dollar contract, or earned a regular salary, Brandon Copeland said, "that's what you should do."



Number  364
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A lot of change, but you go with it'”
“'This year has just been a really incredible year in a lot of ways.”
“But Jenna Dewan looked beyond confident as she danced her way down the red carpet at the Billboard Awards on Sunday in Las Vegas.”
“The 37-year-old actress went gladiator chic for the event as she debuted a short, dramatic bob.”
“Scroll down for videoHot mama: Jenna Dewan attended the Billboard Awards in Las Vegas on Sunday in a gladiator-inspired leather dressChopped: The 37-year-old actress debuted a short, dramatic bobJenna chopped her locks off just before the award show.”
“'Byeeeee hair,' she said on her Instagram story.”
“She traded her normally textured tresses for a chin-length cut styled super straight.”
“Byeeeee hair she said on her Instagram story as she traded in her normally textured tresses for a chin length cut Strike a pose Dewan teamed the strapless mini dress with gold embellished heels Red carpet ready Jenna s glam included a smokey eye and bold eyebrows The World Of...”
“Dance judge arrived in a gladiator inspired leather dress that showed off her long and lean legs...”
“She teamed the strapless, mini-dress with gold embellished heels and a clutch.”


"There are a lot of changes, but you have to go with the flow"
"This year has been incredible in many ways."
"But Jenna Dewan looks confident as she dances on the red carpet of the Billboard Awards in Las Vegas on Sunday."
The 37 year old actress showed her gladiatorial demeanor in the competition, as she launched a short, dramatic Bob for the first time
Hot Mom: Jenna Dewan attended the Billboard Awards ceremony in Las Vegas on Sunday, wearing a gladiator style leather dress: the 37 year old actress showed off a short and dramatic Bobbie Jenna cut her hair for the first time before the ceremony
"Goodbye hair," she said on instagram
"She changed her usual hair to a super straight one with a long chin."
"Byeeee hair she said in instagram's report that she replaced her usual textured hair with a long chin hairstyle. Dewan paired the strapless miniskirt with gold decorated high heels on the red carpet to prepare Jenna's charm, including smoky eyes and a bold eyebrow world..."
"The dance referee wore a gladiator style leather dress and showed her slender legs..."
"She paired her strapless, miniskirt, high heels with gold embellishments and a handbag."



Number  365
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Still, he walked away from the accident with bruises and zero broken bones.”
“He went flying, nearly 20 ft into the air, before slamming down to the ground.”
“TMZ broke the story ... George slammed into a car going 60 mph in Sardinia.”
“He was also lifting props without a problem.”
“George is filming "Catch-22" -- he's directing and acting in the miniseries -- and Friday he was moving quickly on set ... so quickly, it didn't even seem like there was a limp in his step from the accident.”
“Play video content MEGAGeorge Clooney's looking as good as new on set in Italy, and it's nothing short of a miracle ... considering his head-on scooter collision from less than 2 weeks ago.”


"Nevertheless, he left the scene with bruises and zero fractures."
"He flew up, nearly 20 feet, and fell to the ground."
"TMZ broke the story... George ran into a 60 mph car in Sardinia
"He's also raising the prop without a problem."
George is shooting Catch-22 - he's directing and acting in a miniseries - he's fast on set on Friday... So fast, he didn't seem to be lame at all in the accident
"It's a miracle that Mega Giorgio Clooney looks as good as the new one on the Italian set... Considering that he ran head-on into a motorcycle less than two weeks ago. "



Number  366
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The reality TV star said, 'It wasn't important to me, it was important to them.”
“The cable channel is behind her series Dance Moms.”
“Bye: After she leaves prison she will check into a halfway house in Van Nuys, California.”
“That means she is serving less than half of her sentence.”
“The star will be a free woman on February 20, according to the site.”
“But on Friday Deadline reported the Dance Moms star will be released early for good behavior.”
“Abby Lee was sentenced to 366 day prison sentence after being charged for fraud.”
“'I am feeling great and ready to turn over a new leaf thank you so much to everyone for your support especially my nearest and dearest I love you all ( and yes this is me in prison.)'”
“Transformation: The star has trimmed down during her time behind barsShe was cautious about word of an early release, writing: 'All the press stories and speculation are not entirely correct however, I am feeling hopeful but no dates have been confirmed at this time.'”
“She continued: 'I have made friends with both inmates and staff, I’ve tried to better myself, participated in anything offered to me and I am a better person for this experience.'”


"Reality TV stars say it's not important to me, it's important to them."
"The cable channel is behind her dance mom series."
Goodbye: after she gets out of prison, she will live in a shelter in vannius, California
"That means her sentence is less than half."
"According to the website, the star will become a free woman on February 20."
"But last Friday's deadline reported that the dancing mother star will be released early because of her good performance."
"Abby Lee was sentenced to 366 days in prison after being charged with fraud."
"I feel very good and ready to turn a new page. Thank you very much for your support, especially my dearest friends. I love you (yes, this is me in prison)" "
"Transformation: the star's time after Barcelona has shrunk. She is cautious about the news ahead of time, writing:" all the news reports and guesses are not completely correct, but I feel hopeful, but there is no definite date yet. "
"She went on to say:" I have made friends with prisoners and staff. I have worked hard to improve myself and participated in any activities offered to me. I am a better person for this experience. "



Number  367
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“New episodes air Mondays on Facebook.”
“More recently, celebrities like Halle Berry and Kristen Bell have fought for the privacy of all celebrity children, according to USA Today.”
“But this week, Instagram queen Jennifer Garner explained why her kids are off limits on social media.”
“Though she shares everything from the strange contents of her bag to photos from her own childhood, the 13 Going on 30 star has fought to keep her children away from the Hollywood spotlight, and she extends that policy to herself when she makes choices about what to post.”
“Garner has three children from her relationship with ex-husband Ben Affleck — Violet, age 12, Seraphina, age 9, and Samuel, age 6 — and while the paparazzi manage to snap an occasional pic of the family, both Garner and Affleck have refrained from making their kids part of their public lives.”
“While speaking with E!”
“News about her new movie Peppermint, the actress explained that it’s a conscious decision.”
“In the recent interview, Garner responded to a question about how she decides what to share on her Instagram account.”
““Well I would never share my kids,” she told E!”
“News.”


"The new episode is on Facebook on Monday."
Celebrities like Halle Berry and Christine bell recently fought for the privacy of all their children, USA Today reported
"But this week, Jennifer Garner, Queen of instagram, explained why her children are not restricted on social media."
"Although she shared everything from strange things in her bag to photos of her childhood, the star of" Thirteen hairpin 30 "has been trying to keep her children away from the spotlight of Hollywood. When she chooses what to publish, she extends this policy to herself."
"Ghana and her ex husband Ben Affleck have three children: Violet, 12, Serafina, 9 and Samuel, 6. Although the paparazzi occasionally took a picture of their home, neither garner nor Affleck made their children part of their public life
"While talking to e!"
On the news of her new movie "mints," the actress explained that it was a conscious decision
"In a recent interview, Ghana answered a question about how she decided what to share on her instagram account."
"Well, I'll never share my child with anyone else," she told e! "
"News."



Number  368
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Your ‘stunt’ theories are just ludicrous and a bit weird,” she said in February.”
““She is a wonderful, wonderful person and it’s amazing to have someone who can relate to so much of things — someone who’s taken greater steps than me,” Payne told U.K.’s Rollacoaster magazine of Cheryl.”
“The couple — who first went public with their romance in 2015 — announced their split on Twitter Sunday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Cheryl and I are sad to announce that we are going our separate ways,” wrote Payne, 24.”
““It’s been a tough decision for us to make.”Mentioning their son Bear, who celebrated his first birthday on March 22, Payne continued, “We still have so much love for each other as a family.”
“Bear is our world and we ask that you respect his privacy as we navigate our way through this together.”At the same time, Cheryl, 35, posted a similar announcement on Twitter.”
“Payne and Cheryl’s romance owes its origins to the X Factor U.K.”
“The pair first met while Cheryl was a judge on the show, and Payne a contestant, in 2008.”
“The “Strip That Down” singer was paired with Harry Styles, Niall Horan, Louis Tomlinson and Zayn Malik on the reality competition series to create former boy band One Direction.”


"Your stunt theory is ridiculous, a little weird," she said in February
"She's a great, wonderful person, and it's amazing to have someone who can relate to so many things - someone who's bigger than me," says Cheryl of rollascoaster magazine in the UK.
"The couple - their relationship was first made public in 2015 - announced their breakup on twitter on Sunday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Cheryl and I are sad to announce that we will go our separate ways," Penn, 24, wrote
"It was a difficult decision for us." Referring to their son bear, who celebrated his first birthday on March 22, Penn continued, "as a family, we still love each other so much."
"The bear is our world, and we ask you to respect his privacy, because we walked this road together." Meanwhile, Cheryl, 35, made a similar statement on twitter
"The relationship between Penn and Cheryl originated from the X-factor Britain".
The first time they met was in 2008. Cheryl was the judge of the show and Penn was the contestant
The talk show singer teamed up with Harry stiles, Neil Holland, Louis Tomlinson and Zane Malik in the reality show competition series to create the former boys' band one direction. "



Number  369
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"#bliss," she captioned the photo, while Khoury shared another shot of his wife enjoying Hawaii's nature.”
“The Twilight star took to Instagram on Friday to share a sexy snap from her and Khoury's vacation in Hawaii, where they appeared to visit a nude beach.”
“Greene looked away from the camera as she posed in her birthday suit, with waves -- and a couple other (clothed) beachgoers -- in the background.”
“"He keeps me wild and free.”
“#nudebeach #whiteboycray #honeymoon," she wrote alongside the pic.”
“Pubic nudity is illegal on beaches in state parks in Hawaii, though there are several places where people still get naked.”
“"Clothing optional.”
“We chose none obviously," Greene wrote in the comments, adding that her husband "obvi" chose to strip down as well.”
“The 31-year-old actress documented her and Khoury's racy trip on her Instagram Story, revealing that they chose to celebrate the last day of their honeymoon on the nude beach.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Great," she wrote under the title of the photo, and Corey shared another photo of his wife enjoying nature in Hawaii
"The Twilight star shared on instagram last Friday a sexy snapshot of her and Kouri vacationing in Hawaii, where they visited a nude beach."
"As green poses in his birthday suit, he looks away from the camera with waves and a few other dressed beach visitors in the background."
"He kept me wild and free."
She wrote next to the photo: "nudebeach, whiteboyray, honeymoon."
"It's illegal to be naked on the beach in Hawaii State Park, although there are several places where people are still naked."
"Clothes are available. “
"We obviously don't have a choice," green wrote in the comments, adding that her husband "obvi" also chose to undress
"The 31 year old actress recorded her and Corey's crazy journey on instagram, revealing that they chose to celebrate the last day of their honeymoon on a nude beach."



Number  370
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Teen Mom OG airs on MTV Mondays at 9 p.m.”
“Farrah Abraham revealed to Us Weekly that she hasn’t repaired her relationship with her Teen Mom OG costars Amber Portwood, Maci Bookout and Catelynn Lowell.”
“While celebrating her 26th birthday at NYC’s Beautique Restaurant on Saturday, June 3, Abraham said that the season 7 reunion — which was taped that day — was “emotional,” but she’s still not on speaking terms with the other ladies.”
““I do not share my stage,” she says.”
“The My Teenage Dream Ended author once again slammed Portwood and her fiancé, Matt Baier, for trying to emulate her.”
““I mean, I don’t give a s–t about either of them, and I’m sick of them trying to be like me.”
“They’re obsessed with me,” she claims.”
““I sent them a cease and desist so they need to leave me out of their books, out of their interviews, and I don’t want anything to do with them.” (A source close to Portwood and Baier says the couple never received a cease and desist letter.)”
“Abraham claims that the couple are “just jealous or envious” of her.”


"Wait a minute."
"Young mothers broadcast og on MTV at 9pm on Monday."
"Farah Abraham told us weekly that she has yet to repair her relationship with her teenage mother, og's partners amber porterwood, Macy Bok and Caitlin Lowell."
"On Saturday, June 3, while celebrating her 26th birthday at the beauty restaurant in New York, Abraham said the seventh season reunion recorded that day was" emotional, "but she still didn't speak to the other women."
"I don't share my stage," she said
The author of "the end of my teenage dream" once again criticizes Portwood and her fiance, Matt Bayer, for trying to imitate her
"I mean, I don't judge either of them. I hate them. They want to be like me."
"They're crazy about me," she said
"I sent them a stop letter, so they need to exclude me from their books, from their interviews, and I don't want to have anything to do with them." (a source close to porterwood and Bayer said the couple had never received a stop letter.)
Abraham claimed that the couple were "just jealous or jealous" of her



Number  371
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bam!””
“It just hit me.”
“...on The Real Housewives of New York City but the former Countess found herself experiencing a first this season when she got very drunk and fell twice during a group trip to Mexico...”
“It’s a scene that’s already become one of the most iconic in Housewives history.”
“And no one is laughing harder that D’Agostino herself.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It was too funny,” D’Agostino told PEOPLE at ACE’s Third Annual Foodie Ball — a charity event to raise money to help the homeless find full-time housing, employment, and economic independence.”
“Image zoom Credit: SplashThough D’Agostino is known for being able to hold her alcohol, the tequila ended up getting the best of her in Mexico — and into the shrub she went.”
““I don’t drink tequila,” she said.”
““Understand we’d been traveling all day, and you know when it just hits you?”


"Bang!"
"It hit me."
“… About the real housewife of New York City, but the former Countess finds herself going through the first time of the season, getting drunk and falling twice on a group trip in Mexico... "
"This scene has become the most iconic one in the history of housewives."
"No one laughs more than dagostino himself."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's so funny," dagostino told people at ace's third annual gourmet ball. It's a charity activity that aims to raise money to help homeless people find full-time housing, employment and financial independence
"Image scaling credit: Although dagostino is known for her ability to hold alcohol, tequila finally got her best in Mexico - she walked into the bush."
"I don't drink tequila," she said
"Understand, we've been traveling all day. Do you know when you suddenly think of it?"



Number  372
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They have also been spotted together over the past few months and attended the Life Ball together in Vienna in June.”
“Jenner and Hutchins, who are 47 years apart in age, have yet to confirm their relationship, but DailyMail.com says the pair is living together at Caitlyn's Malibu pad.”
“Life is good!”Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“Bringing back old memories of my first public outing.”
“Caitlyn also shared an Instagram pic, writing, “Sophia and I off to the ESPY's.”
“Caitlyn looked sophisticated in a little black dress by Giorgio Armani, paired with black Barollo pumps, while Sophia stunned in a dark blue Alice + Olive knee-length dress and gold Stuart Weitzman heels.”
“Photos of the pair were snapped inside the show as they sat side by side.”
“GettyCaitlyn Jenner, 68, and Sophia Hutchins, 21, fueled dating rumors on Wednesday when they attended the 2018 ESPY Awards in L.A.”


"In the past few months, they have also been found together and participated in the life ball held in Vienna in June."
Jenna and Hutchins are 47 years old apart, and they haven't confirmed their relationship, but the Daily Mail says they live in Caitlin's Malibu apartment
"Life is beautiful! "Waiting for your permission to load instagram media."
"Recalling my first public trip."
Caitlin also shared an instagram photo, which read: "Sophia and I went to espy."
"Caitlin looks exquisite in a small black dress designed by Giorgio Armani and black Barolo high heels, while Sophia looks stunning in a dark blue Alice + olive knee length dress and gold Stuart Weitzman high heels."
"When they sat side by side, they took pictures in the program."
"Getty Caitlyn Jenner (68) and Sophia Hutchins (21) sparked rumors of a date when they attended the 2018 ESPY awards in Los Angeles on Wednesday."



Number  373
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(She obviously couldn't go through with it: she was in love with brown M&M's enthusiast Matthew McConaughey!)”
“Justin Chambers character in a simple courthouse ceremony...”
“And Twitter users couldn t help but feel like they had seem the dress before on Jennifer Lopez In her 2001 rom com The Wedding Planner Lopez wore a very similar A line gown when her character went to marry...”
“!When Meghan married Prince Harry at St. George's Chapel at Windsor Castle on Saturday in front of many friends and family, she donned a modern Givenchy gown with a long sleeves and a shallow boat-neckline.”
“19, 2018 10:06 AMWPA Pool/Getty Images/Columbia PicturesDid we just find out Meghan Markles wedding dress inspiration?”
“Um, Did Meghan Markle Look Like Jennifer Lopez on Her Wedding Day?by TIERNEY BRICKER | Sat., May.”


"She can't stand it: she's in love with Matthew McConnell, a big fan of Brown's M & M!"
"Justin chambers' role in a simple courtroom ceremony..."
"Twitter users can't help thinking that they seem to have seen the dress on Jennifer Lopez's 2001 ROM com. The wedding planner Lopez wore a very similar A-shaped dress when her character got married... "
"! last Saturday, Megan was at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle（ St.George When she married Prince Harry in front of many friends and relatives, she put on a modern Givenchy robe with long sleeves and a shallow collar
"Amwpa pool / Getty Images / Columbia Pictures at 10:06 on September 19, 2018, have we just found the inspiration for Megan marks' wedding dress?"
"Well, did Megan markel and Jennifer Lopez look alike on their wedding day? Author: Tierney Bricker | sat, may



Number  374
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In addition to Isan, Idris also has a son named Winston, who was born in 2014.”
“Humbled The 44 year old spoke with The Kyle Jackie O Show on Friday about how his 15 year old daughter playfully keeps his ego in check My daughter is proud of me but at the same time she s like don t touch me don t come anywhere near...”
“But it appears Idris Elba's teenage daughter Isan isn't as impressed with her famous father's physique as his legion of fans worldwide.”
“The 44-year-old spoke with The Kyle & Jackie O Show on Friday about how the 15-year-old playfully keeps his ego in check.”
“Scroll down for videoTough crowd!”
“Idris Elba's teenage daughter Isan isn't as impressed with her famous father's physique as his legion of fans worldwideCo-host Jackie 'O' Henderson noted how Isan accompanied her dad to the premiere of his new film The Dark Tower and asked how she handles his fame.”
“'It's a really weird time,' he explained of his first-born becoming a teenager.”
“'Someone told me that having a teenage brain is akin to having Alzheimer's at 55.”
“Your brain just goes bonkers,' he described.”
“...me but I love you dad he continued...”


"In addition to Ethan, Idris has a son named Winston, who was born in 2014."
"The humble 44 year old talked to Kyle Jackie on Friday about how his 15-year-old daughter mischievously controlled himself. My daughter is proud of me, but at the same time she likes" don't touch me, don't get close to me... "
"But it seems that Ethan, Idris Elba's teenage daughter, is not as impressed by her famous father's physique as many of his fans around the world."
"The 44 year old told Kyle and Jackie on Friday about how the 15-year-old playfully restrained his self-esteem
"Scroll down to see the video, it's crowded!"
"The teenage daughter of Idris Elba, isan, doesn't have the same impression of her famous father's physique as his fan group. Worldwide co host jackie'o'henderson noticed how Ethan accompanied his father to the premiere of the new film the dark tower and asked her how to deal with his reputation."
"It's really a strange time," he explained, with his first child in his teens
"I've been told that having a teenage brain is like having Alzheimer's at 55."
"Your brain is crazy," he describes
“… But I love your dad, he went on



Number  375
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I don’t feel part of my family.””
“I just felt really left out.”
“The Made in Chelsea star took to social media on Thursday night to publicly blast her family members as poisonous and evil They never cease to amaze me good thing I always pray for my enemies A post shared by Stephanie Pratt officialstephpratt on Aug 4 2017 at 12 05am...”
“PDT On Instagram Stephanie shared a quote that read Some of the most poisonous people come disguised as family They never cease to amaze me good thing I always pray for my enemies she wrote alongside the photo...”
“Stephanie, 31, then changed social media platforms and began tweeting about her family.”
““I have protected people over the evil things they have done - & I’m tired of it – tired of my parents living in denial.”
“Time 2 tell the truth,” she tweeted.”
“I have protected people over the evil things they have done - & I'm tired of it- tired of my parents living in denial.”
“Time 2 tell the truth — Stephanie Pratt (@stephaniepratt) August 4, 2017Although Stephanie refrained from directly mentioning her brother and Montag directly in her initial tweets, she bashed him while responding to a fan.”
““I just hope this isn’t about your brother.”


"I don't feel like I'm part of the family."
"I really feel left out."
"The star made by Chelsea publicly attacked her family members on social media on Thursday night for being poisonous and harmful. They will never stop surprising me. I always pray for my enemies. A post from Stephanie Pratt official stepratt's distribution sheet at 12:05 a.m. on August 4, 2017..."
"PDT Stephanie on instagram shared a sentence that some of the most poisonous people disguised as family members. They would never stop surprising me. I always pray for my enemies," she wrote next to the photo
"Stephanie, 31, then changed her social media platform and started talking about her family on Weibo."
"I've protected people from the bad things they do - I'm tired of - I'm tired of my parents living in denial."
"Time 2 is telling the truth," she said on her micro blog
"I've protected people from the bad things they do - I'm tired of - I'm tired of my parents living in denial."
"Time 2 to be honest - Stephanie Pratt (@ Stephanie Pratt) August 4, 2017 although Stephanie didn't directly mention her brother and Montague in her initial tweets, she attacked him in response to fans."
"I just hope it's not your brother's business."



Number  376
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Today Show made a big deal of Pitt’s 50th back in 2013.”
“AdvertisementIt turns out that they do.”
“Julia Roberts landed on the scene as a thin, charismatic force with the most killer smile and bubbly aura.”
“She transformed from 80’s ingenue to a full-fledged movie star in the 90s.”
“At a certain point in her career, she was the highest paid actress.”
“She’s been in blockbuster after blockbuster and even some cult classics.”
“In honor of her milestone birthday, she is the cover girl on InStyle where she gets candid about specific aspects of joy.”
“Roberts has been married to her husband, Danny Moder for 15 years and they have three children together, Phinnaeus, Henry, and Hazel.”
“During the interview, she admitted three keys to joy she’s fortunate to have: “Marry the right person, give birth to a redhead, and have great girlfriends.”The redhead is oldest son Phinneaus, who is called Finn.”
“He and twin sister Hazel are 12 years old.”


"In 2013, the today show made Pete's 50th big success."
"It turns out to be."
"Julia Roberts comes in with a fine, glamorous force, with the most lethal smile and foam aura on his face."
"She went from a genius in the '80s to a mature movie star in the' 90s."
"At some point in her career, she was the highest paid actress."
"She has acted in one blockbuster after another, even some cult classics."
"In honor of her landmark birthday, she was the cover girl of fashion magazine, where she spoke frankly about the specific aspects of happiness."
Roberts and her husband, Denny Maud, have been married for 15 years. They have three children, Phineas, Henry and hazel
In the interview, she admitted that she was lucky to have three keys to happiness: "marry the right person, have a red hair, and have a good girlfriend." The redhead is his eldest son, Phineas, named Finn
"He and his twin sister hazel are 12 years old."



Number  377
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared on PEOPLE.”
“Fortunately for him, a decorative pot saved him from revealing more than he already had.”
““Feel comfortable in your own skin.”
“No one can take that away from you ❤,” she wrote in the caption of the short video.”
“But, in the now-deleted video, as Gonzalez showed off her body in the mirror by moving the camera around to highlight her physique she showed off more than just her body.”
“As she did, in the far corner of the reflection a man, who appeared to be Duhamel, could be seen briefly.”
“The man then pulled down his pants and struggled briefly to get them off one of his legs.”
“Hopping out of his pants, he turned towards the camera and it did not seem like he had underwear on.”
“As fans started to take notice, Gonzalez deleted the video and re-posted a cropped version.”
““They seem very happy.”Duhamel and his ex Fergie — with whom he shares 4-year-old son Axl Jack — confirmed to PEOPLE exclusively that they were splitting up after 8 years of marriage in September 2017.”


"This article first appeared in people magazine."
Fortunately for him, a decorative jar kept him from exposing more than he already had
"Feel comfortable in your own skin."
"No one can take it from you ❤ "She wrote in the title of the short film."
"But in the video now deleted, when Gonzalez shows her body in the mirror, she moves the camera to highlight her body, showing more than just her body."
"Just as she did this, in the other corner of the reflection, a man who looked like Duhamel appeared."
"Then the man pulled down his trousers and struggled for a while to take them off one leg."
"He jumped out of his pants and turned to the camera as if he wasn't wearing underpants."
"As fans began to notice, Gonzalez deleted the video and re released a clip."
"They look happy." Duhamel and his ex girlfriend faggie, who shares their 4-year-old son, Akers jack, exclusively confirmed to people in September 2017 that they are about to break up after eight years of marriage



Number  378
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hadid’s gown was designed by Tommy Hilfiger, while Malik wore a Versace tuxedo with metal-plated sleeves.”
“Last year, he and Hadid, 22, wore matching metal-esque ensembles to the swanky party.”
“It’s unclear if he plans to attend this year’s Met Gala slated for Monday, May 1.”
““Zayn injured his foot but is fine,” a rep for the star told Page Six but would not elaborate on further details.”
“His left pant leg was rolled up to show his injured foot, which was covered in a white and blue sock.”
“Malik, 24, wore a black Cartoon Network t-shirt and light-color ripped jeans.”
“Someone pushed him onto the sidewalk and into girlfriend Gigi Hadid’s apartment building.”
“On Saturday, the former One Direction singer appeared in New York City’s NoHo neighborhood sitting firmly in a black wheelchair.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Zayn Malik mysteriously hurt his foot and is now using a wheelchair to get around.”


"Hadid's dress was designed by Tommy Hilfiger, while Malik wore a Versace tuxedo with metal plated sleeves."
"Last year, he and 22-year-old Hadid went to a trendy party in matching metal ensemble."
"It's not clear if he plans to attend this year's Metropolitan party, which is scheduled for Monday, May 1."
"Zane's foot is injured, but it's fine," the star's representative told page 6, but declined to give more details
His left trouser leg was rolled up to reveal his injured foot, wrapped in a blue and white sock
"Malik, 24, was wearing a black cartoon Internet T-shirt and light, perforated jeans."
"Someone pushed him onto the sidewalk and into his girlfriend Gigi Hadid's apartment building."
"Last Saturday, the former one-way singer showed up in New York City's Noho community, sitting firmly in a black wheelchair."
"Click send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) zayn Malik mysteriously hurt his foot and is now walking around in a wheelchair."



Number  379
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Facebook post that announced his death asked for donations to his favorite charities in Troyer’s name in lieu of sending flowers.”
“'”Myers also mentioned that Troyer would travel to different countries for charity work.”
“How’s Mini-Me?”
“How’s Mini-Me?’ Then I met Trudeau and he said, ‘Hey buddy, how’s it going?”
““I went up and met President Obama and he said, ‘Mike, so glad to see you.”
““I went to the White House — President Obama’s White House — because it was a state dinner for Justin Trudeau of Canada,” Myers remembered.”
““We just ended up giving him more and more stuff to do.”Myers recalled that Troyer was loved by so many that wherever “The Gong Show” host traveled, fans referenced the Mini-Me character.”
“But he brought it up off the page, better than written,” Myers said.”
“They also appeared together in the 2008 comedy “The Love Guru.”“As written, Mini-Me is almost a prop.”
“I miss him.”Myers said he worked with Troyer for a long time, adding that he was “a great comedian.”Myers and Troyer shared the screen in all three “Austin Powers” films, with Troyer starring as the iconic Mini-Me.”


"The Facebook post announcing his death asked for donations in the name of Troyer to his favorite charity, not flowers."
"Miles also mentioned that Troy will go to different countries to do charity work."
"What about me?"
"What about me? "Then I met Trudeau and he said," Hey, man, how are you doing? "
"I went to see President Obama and he said," Mike, nice to meet you. "
"I went to the White House - President Obama's White House - because it was Justin Trudeau's state dinner in Canada," Miles recalled
"We finally gave him more and more things to do." Miles recalled that Troy was so popular that fans would mention the role of "mini me" wherever the host of "Gong show" went
"But he took it out of the paper, better than what he wrote," Miles said
They also starred in the 2008 comedy master of love. "As written, mini me is almost a prop."
"I miss him very much." Miles said he had worked with Troy for a long time and that he was "a great comedian.". Miles and Troy share a common screen in all three spy movies, and Troy stars in the iconic mini me



Number  380
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez each donated $25,000.”
“(Hart is at $50K.)”
“Jumanji co-stars Kevin Hart and Dwayne Johnson have led a star-stuffed challenge to give to the Red Cross.”
““Having someone like Sandra Bullock make this kind of commitment, it helps bring people together and open their hearts and be even more generous.”The gift is a step up even from generous celebrity donations.”
“"Especially during times of disaster, people see what’s happening in Texas and our hearts all go out to them,” Penniman told People.”
““There are human beings in eight feet of water.”Elizabeth Penniman, vice president of communications at the Red Cross' national headquarters, called it "an incredible gift."”
““There are no politics in eight feet of water,” Bullock said.”
““We all have to do our part.”Bullock, who has a home in Texas and who is a longtime supporter of the Red Cross, told the magazine that it was crucial to look above the heated political rhetoric around the devastating storm and urged fellow Americans to give.”
““I’m just grateful I can do it,” Bullock said.”
“The actress, 53, donated $1 million to the American Red Cross for its efforts in devastated regions of Texas, according to People magazine.”


"Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez each donated $25000."
(Hart's price is $50000.)
"Jumanji, CO starring Kevin Hart and Dwyane Johnson, led a star filling challenge for the Red Cross."
"Having someone like Sandra Bullock make such a commitment helps to bring people together, open up and become more generous." Even if it's a generous donation from a celebrity, the gift is a step forward
"Especially in times of disaster, when people see what's going on in Texas, we pour our hearts on them," Penniman told people
"There are people in eight feet of water." Elizabeth Penniman, vice president of communications at the national headquarters of the Red Cross, called it "an incredible gift."
"There's no politics in eight feet of water," Bullock said
"We all have to do our part." Bullock, who has a home in Texas and a long-time supporter of the Red Cross, told the magazine it was important to face up to the intense political rhetoric surrounding the devastating storm and urge fellow Americans to help
"I'm grateful that I can do it," Bullock said
According to people magazine, the 53 year old actress donated $1 million to the American Red Cross to support its efforts in the disaster stricken areas of Texas



Number  381
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… It was fabulous.””
“I have to actually keep the beard now for the whole show.”
“The 45-year-old actor recently revealed that the Cake actress, 48, can only take his beard for so long before she asks him to get rid of it.”
“See what he had to say in the video above!”
“Theroux opened up about his new facial hair during a Monday, April 10, appearance on The Ellen DeGeneres Show.”
““I’ve had the beard back.”
“I grew it back for The Leftovers season 3,” he told the talk show host.”
““And I’m kind of growing it back again.”
“I like it now.”Asked if Aniston is a fan, the Girl on the Train star replied, “She likes it up to a point.”
“Like, she’ll like it for about a month and then she’ll be like, ‘OK, you have to get rid of it.’ And then I’m like, ‘No.”


“… That's great. "
"I'm really going to keep my beard on the show now."
"The 45 year old actor recently revealed that the 48 year old cake actress could only grow a beard for so long that she would let him get rid of it."
"Look what he said in the video above!"
On Monday, April 10, on Ellen DeGeneres, seru unveiled his new haircut
"My beard is growing back."
"I planted it for Season 3 of leftovers," he told the talk show host
"I started planting again."
When asked if Aniston was a fan, the girl on the train replied, "she likes it to a certain extent."
"For example, she'll like it for a month, and then she'll say, 'well, you have to throw it away.' And then I say, "No."



Number  382
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More on this story:Best of Beauty 2017: Skin:Follow Rosemary on Instagram and Twitter.”
“Through a spokesperson, Weinstein has denied the sexual assault allegations, as well as any allegations of sexual harrassment.”
“That same day, the New York Times reported that Gwyneth Paltrow, Angelina Jolie, and other women alleged that Weinstein had sexually harassed them.”
“Twitter was having none of Lindsay's defense of the former studio head, who has been accused of rape by at least three women, The New Yorker reported on October 10.”
“So stand up."”
“We've done several movies together and so I think everyone needs to stop, I think it's wrong.”
“"He's never harmed me or done anything wrong to me.”
“"I think Georgina needs to take a stand and be there for her husband," she said.”
“Notably, the video was posted shortly after news broke that Weinstein's wife, Georgina Chapman, is leaving him, which Lindsay also commented on.”
“In the video, she put an angel emoji under the name Harvey, a strange choice regardless of circumstance.”


"More about this story: the best beauty 2017: skin: follow rosemary on instagram and twitter."
Weinstein, through a spokesman, denied the sexual assault charges, as well as any sexual harassment charges
On the same day, the New York Times reported that Gwyneth Paltrow, Angelina Jolie and other women accused Weinstein of sexually harassing them
"Twitter didn't have Lindsay's defense of the former studio director, who was accused of rape by at least three women," the new Yorker reported on October 10
"So stand up."
"We've made several films together, so I think everyone needs to stop. I don't think it's right."
"He never hurt me or did anything bad to me."
"I think Georgina needs to stand up for her husband," she said
"It's worth noting that this video was released shortly after the news that Weinstein's wife Georgina Chapman was leaving him, and Lindsay also commented on it."
"In the video, she put an angel emoticon under Harvey's name, which is a strange choice regardless of the environment."



Number  383
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The road to their "Fuller House" is a show we can't stop watching!”
“We can only imagine the beautiful babe these two will make ... and the elaborate social media post they'll make to announce his or her birth.”
“The exciting journey for the couple is enough to make us say, "Have mercy!"”
“In fact, he revealed, the news prompted him to make their relationship engagement-official.”
“Stamos explained to People magazine that McHugh became pregnant shortly before the pair were engaged.”
“Rachel Murray / Getty ImagesIn December, the couple shared the happy news that they were expecting a baby.”
“Could they be any cuter?”
“The "Fuller House" star got engaged to McHugh in October and later declared their intention to start a family, saying it would be "a tragedy" if they didn't have kids together.”
“If that's not the very definition of glowing, we don't know what is!”
“"Good morning baby of mine," McHugh wrote, captioning the photo apparently taken by Stamos.”


"The road to their fuller house is a show we can't stop watching!"
"We can only imagine that these two people will become a beautiful baby... And the elaborate posts they will post on social media announcing his or her birth. "
"The couple's exciting journey is enough to say: 'be merciful!"
"In fact, he revealed that the news prompted him to make their relationship a formal engagement."
"Stamos explained to people that McHugh was pregnant shortly before their engagement."
Last December, the couple shared the good news that they were pregnant
"Can they be more lovely?"
"The star of Fuller's house got engaged to McHugh in October this year, and later announced that he planned to start a family, saying that if they didn't have children together, it would be" a tragedy. "
"If that's not the definition of luminescence, we don't know what luminescence is!"
"Good morning, my baby," McHugh wrote, noting in the title that it was apparently Stamos



Number  384
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Is There a Pre-Show?”
““iHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so to get to be part of this celebration is a huge honor,” the deejay previously told iHeartRadio.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will broadcast live from the Forum in Los Angeles on Sunday, March 11th at 8 p.m.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTVEverything You Need to Know About the 2018 iHeartRadio Music AwardsGet ready to pop off your couch and dance the night away right from your living room!”
“The iHeartRadio Music Awards celebrates the most popular artists and biggest hits over the past year as determined by listeners tuning into iHeartMedia radio stations nationwide and on iHeartRadio, iHeartMedia’s digital music platform.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTV.”
“Here’s everything you need to know.”


"Is there a preview?"
"IHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so it's a great honor to be able to participate in this celebration," the host told iHeartRadio earlier
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will be broadcast live on the forum in Los Angeles at 8pm on Sunday, March 11."
"About TBS, TNT and truTV, everything you need to know about the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards, please be ready to jump off the sofa and dance in the night away from the living room!"
"The iHeartRadio music award is to celebrate the most popular artists and songs of the past year, which is decided by the audience listening to iheartmedia National Radio and iHeartRadio, iheartmedia's digital music platform."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Et on TBS, TNT and truTV."
"That's all you need to know."



Number  385
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s also completely made up, but hey, that’s apparently what we’re all doing in 2018.”
“States...”
“...he took the late night stage for his interview but if we re telling tales here Kimmel has a real tall one about a bucket of chicken Zach Braff a single occupancy bathroom and the 45th president of the United...”
“We all know even the people who like the president know he makes things up but still it s weird to hear him tell a lie that specifically involves you Kimmel denies seeing or talking to Trump at all before...”
““It’s a funny thing.”
““That never happened,” Kimmel said.”
“...like the sycophant of somebody s dreams when the then Celebrity Apprentice host visited his show...”
“On Monday night s episode of Jimmy Kimmel Live the ABC host denied the president s South Carolina rally claim that no talent terrible Kimmel had waited for Trump on Hollywood Boulevard opened his car door and fawned over him...”
“...host and hey probably more to come...”
“If you just woke up out of a three year coma congratulations and maybe spend some time with your friends and family before trying to catch up on Donald Trump s ongoing feud with basically every single working late night...”


"It's all made up, but hey, it's obviously what we're all doing in 2018."
"State..."
“…… He's on stage late at night for an interview, but if we're here to tell a story, Kimmel has a very high story about a barrel of chicken, Zach Braff, a single bathroom and the 45th president of the United States... "
"We all know that even those who like the president know that he has made up some things, but it's still strange to hear that he told a lie involving you in particular. Kimmel denies that he has seen trump before and that he has talked to trump..."
"It's an interesting thing."
"That never happened," Kimmel said
“… It's like the star apprentice host's flattery to someone's dream when he visited his program at that time. "
"On Monday night's Jimi Kimmel live show, ABC's host denied the president's claim at a rally in South Carolina that there was no genius. The terrible Kimmel was waiting for trump on Hollywood Avenue. He opened the door and courted trump..."
“… Host and hey, there may be more people coming... "
"If you've just woken up from a three-year coma, Congratulations, maybe spend some time with your friends and family, and then try to catch up with Donald Trump's old grudge with almost everyone working late into the night..."



Number  386
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s so important to understand that not everyone on the street is a drug addict.””
“...any way that I can she continued...”
“According to the reality star, a November episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians that focused on homelessness in Los Angeles has inspired major donations to the Alexandria House, a longterm shelter for women and single mothers, which was featured on the show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Just got off the phone w/ our show producers who informed me that since our episode on homelessness aired @ahouse_la have been flooded w/donations from people who were so moved!” she said.”
““One person even donated $1mil.”
“THANK U to those who have helped to make a difference!”
“#AlexandriaHouse.”The hourlong episode focused almost entirely on Kim’s mission to raise awareness about the issue of homelessness, starting with a drive through Skid Row with sisters Khloé, 33, and Kourtney, 38.”
““I am just at a point in my life where I don’t want to be naive anymore,” admitted Kim, 37.”
““And I want to use my platform to get other people involved.”


"It's important to understand that not everyone on the street is a drug addict."
“… Anything I can do, she continued
Last November's "keep in touch with the kardashians" episode, which focused on homelessness in Los Angeles, inspired massive donations to the Alexandria house, reality show magazine reported. Alexandria house, a long-term shelter for women and single mothers, has appeared on the show
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I just got on the phone with our program producers. They told me that since our homeless program was broadcast, @ ahouse / u LA has received donations from many people, who are very moved!"! "She said
"One person even donated a million dollars."
"Thank those who helped us change the status quo!"
"Alexander house." The one hour episode focused almost entirely on Kim Jong Il's mission to raise awareness of homelessness, starting with Carol, 33, and sister Courtney, 38, driving through the slums
Kim, 37, admits: "I'm at a time in my life when I don't want to be naive any more."
"I want to use my platform to get other people involved."



Number  387
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related content:”
“ET on Freeform.”
“...and Halle Bailey as twins and sporty savants Jazz Forster and Sky Forster Luka Sabbat as mellow and fashion forward Luca Hall and Deon Cole as eccentric and unpredictable Professor Charles Telphy Grown ish returns Wednesday January 2 at 8 p m...”
“The show s second season will feature the return of your favorite characters with Shahidi returning as Zoey Trevor Jackson as socially conscious Aaron Jackson Francia Raisa as outspoken conservative Latina Ana Torres Emily Arlook as openly and actively bisexual Nomi Segal Jordan Buhat as troublemaker Vivek Shah Chloe Bailey...”
“Spoiler: They will quickly be proven wrong.”
“In fact, they might be a bit too confident, thinking that they know exactly what to expect.”
“After surviving freshman year, season 2 will follow Zoey and her friends as take on sophomore year at CalU with a renewed sense of confidence.”
“EW can exclusively announce that the black-ish spin-off — which follows Zoey Johnson (Yara Shahidi) as she embarks on her college journey — will return to Freeform with back-to-back episodes on Wednesday, Jan. 2.”
“Grown-ish type TV Show network Freeform genre SitcomThe wait for Grown-ish‘s second season is almost over!”


Related content:
"Free form et."
“…… Halle Bailey as twins, master sportsman Jazz foster and sky foster Luca Sabat as sleek and fashionable forward Luca hall, Dean Cole as eccentric and elusive Professor Charles talfe, coming back at 8pm on Wednesday, January 2.... "
"The second season of the show will feature the return of your favorite characters, with shahidi playing Zoe Trevor Jackson, socially conscious Aaron Jackson Francia Riza, outspoken conservative Latin Anna Torres Emily aruk, open and active bisexual nomy Segal Jordan BURHART and troublemaker Vivek ·Shah Chloe Bailey... "
"Spoiler: they will soon be proved wrong."
"In fact, they may be a little too confident that they know exactly what's going to happen."
"After graduating from freshman year, the second season will follow Zoe and her friends to a sophomore at the University of California with new confidence."
"EW can exclusively announce that after Zoe Johnson (Yara shahidi) embarks on the University journey, the black derivative drama will return to the free form in the form of a series on January 2 (Wednesday)"
The second growing season is coming to an end



Number  388
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The Stranger Things star turned 21 on Saturday and got a special birthday message from her boyfriend and co-star, Charlie Heaton.”
“"Happy 21st birthday!”
“@nattyiceofficial I hope it’s a great one and I’m stoked to be working on this new series with you.”
“I think it’s gonna be great.”
“?????”
“P.S - Not feeling too well but I still wanna meet you at piedmont park tonight x," Heaton, 23, wrote on Instagram alongside an adorable pic of Dyer bundled up in a jacket, scarf and yellow beanie, holding a piece of cake.”
“Dyer responded to the actor's post, writing, "see you there x."”
“The twosome put their romance rumors to rest and made their red carpet debut as a couple at the 2017 British Fashion Awards on Dec. 4.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The star turned 21 on Saturday and received a special birthday message from her boyfriend and co star Charlie Heaton."
"Happy 21st birthday!"
"@ nattyiceofficial I hope it's a great work and I'm very happy to work with you on this new series."
"I think it will be great."
“?????”
"By the way, I don't feel very well, but I still want to see you tonight in Piedmont Park, x," the 23-year-old wrote on instagram In the photo, dale is wrapped in a jacket, scarf and yellow beans, holding a piece of cake
"See you there," Dell wrote in response to the actor's post
"The couple quelled their romantic rumors and made their debut on the red carpet at the 2017 British Fashion Awards on December 4."



Number  389
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You've done amazing work for elephants and you can just continue and support whatever you want to do."”
“...to which Ellen replied, "60th."”
“Feb 2, 2018AceShowbiz - Happy 60th birthday to Ellen DeGeneres!”
“"The Ellen DeGeneres Show" host received a lot of love and surprise in Thursday, February 1 episode of the morning talk show, including one from Jimmy Kimmel.”
“During the episode, Ellen played "Show Did/Show Didn't" in which she guessed if something happened on her show in the past or not.”
“One of the questions was whether or not Jimmy had appeared on "The Ellen DeGeneres Show" while donning an Olympic figure skater costume.”
“"That sounds like he would for sure do that," Ellen said.”
“She was wrong though, as Jimmy didn't do that in the past.”
“Instead, the "Jimmy Kimmel Live!"”
“...host dressed as Olympic figure skater in that episode.”


"You've done a great job for the elephant, and you can continue to support whatever you want to do."
“… Allen replied, "60th. “
"Aceshowbiz, February 2, 2018 - Happy 60th birthday to Ellen DeGeneres!"
"The host of the Ellen DeGeneres Show got a lot of love and surprises on Thursday, February 1, morning talk show, including an episode by Jimmy Kimmel."
In this episode, Ellen plays "show did / show not," guessing if something had happened to her show in the past
One of the questions is whether Jimmy appeared on the "Ellen DeGeneres Show" in Olympic figure skating costume
"It sounds like he'll do that," Allen said
"But she was wrong, because Jimmy didn't do that in the past."
Instead, "Jimmy Kimmel live!"
"In that episode, the host dressed up as an Olympic figure skater."



Number  390
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“People reported Grande had Davidson’s father’s badge number tattooed to her foot.”
“Following their engagement announcement, the two have been spotted together.”
“Davidson, 24, posted a picture on Instagram on Saturday of Grande, 25, wearing the FDNY badge that belonged to his late father, Scott.”
“PETE DAVIDSON'S EX CAZZIE DAVID SHOWS OFF REVENGE BODY AFTER ARIANA GRANDE ENGAGEMENT"She's the greatest person I know.”
“I gave it to her because she has my heart and that is the most precious thing I own.”
“My dad would be so happy and love her so much,” Davidson said of his fiancée to his followers.”
“However, some social media users claimed Davidson also gave the same necklace to his ex-girlfriend Cazzie David.”
“"It's so ridiculous that he gave it to his ex and said the same thing,” one person commented.”
“Davidson shut down the claims explaining that he did give David a pendant but it was a replica of his father’s.”
“"Actually, I didn't give that to my ex.”


"It's said that grand's feet are tattooed with Davidson's father's badge number."
"After they announced their engagement, they were found together."
Davidson, 24, posted a photo on instagram on Saturday showing Grande, 25, wearing the FDNY badge belonging to his late father Scott
Peter Davidson's former Katie David showed a vengeful body after Arianna grand's engagement: "she's the greatest person I know."
"I gave it to her because she has my heart, which is the most precious thing I have."
"My dad will be happy and love her," Davidson told his followers of his fiancee
"However, some social media users claim that Davidson gave the same necklace to his ex girlfriend, Katie David."
"It's ridiculous that he gave it to his predecessor and said the same thing," one commented
"Davidson closed the statement, explaining that he did give David a pendant, but it was a copy of his father."
"Actually, I didn't give this to my ex boyfriend."



Number  391
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I think the fact that you could love a person more than you ever thought,” Prinsloo told PEOPLE in August of what surprised her most about becoming a mom.”
“She was sporting a noticeable baby bump, and captioned the photo, “ROUND 2 …”FROM PEN: Former Bachelorette Emily Maynard Johnson Says She Wants 2 More Kids to Up Her Total to 5Dusty — who just celebrated her first birthday — has stolen her parents’ hearts in the year since she arrived.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“OMG I have the best husband Behati Prinsloo wrote on Instagram sharing a snap of herself dipping a Fatburger french fry into a milkshake Adam Levine Helps Indulge Pregnant Wife Behati Prinsloo s Cravings as She Shows Off Her Bump Not many are immune to the infamous pregnancy craving not...”
“...even Behati Prinsloo...”
“The expectant 28-year-old Victoria’s Secret model got candid on her Instagram Stories over the weekend, sharing two photos of her snacks of choice — and her bare baby bump.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoomImage zoomOne unique food combination for the second-time mom-to-be?”
“Apples with Tajín seasoning.”
“Another, favored by the pregnant and non-pregnant alike?”


"I think, in fact, you can love someone more than you think," prinslow told people in August. What's her biggest surprise about being a mother
"She has an obvious baby lump, and in the title of the photo," second round... " From pen: former bachelor Emily Maynard Johnson said she wanted to have two more children, and her total increased to 50 dust - who just celebrated her first birthday - stole her parents' heart as she came to the year. "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Oh, my God, I have my best husband, Beth prinslow, who wrote on instagram that she shared a picture of herself dipping French fries in a milkshake. Adam Levin helped to indulge in the desire of her pregnant wife, Beth prinslow, because she showed off her lumps. Not many people are immune from the infamous desire to be pregnant. Isn't it..."
“… Even Beth prinslow... "
The 28 year old "Victoria's Secret" model to be told her story candidly on instagram last weekend, sharing two photos of her favorite snack - and her naked little lump
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The unique food combination of being a mother for the second time?"
"Tiger flavored apple."
"On the other hand, do pregnant women and non pregnant women like it?"



Number  392
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They really gave it another solid try.”Despite things not working out for Affleck and Shookus, the insider added the pair “will always have love for each other.”Scroll down to see the timeline of Affleck and Shookus’ relationship.”
“...to part ways...”
“She has a kid and an ex husband and a job in New York and Ben has his family and a job in L A and while they love and respect each other they just realized it wasn t going to work an insider explained to Us of their decision...”
“After briefly rekindling their romance in February 2019, multiple sources confirmed to Us Weekly that the two split for a second time in April.”
“The pair went public with their romance in July 2017, but they called it quits in August 2018.”
“The actor found love with the Saturday Night Live producer after his 2015 split from estranged wife Jennifer Garner.”
“It’s over for Ben Affleck and Lindsay Shookus.”


"They really made another solid attempt." Although the relationship between Affleck and shokus did not go well, the insider added that the two "will always be in love." Scroll down to see the timeline of the relationship between Affleck and shokus
“… Go our separate ways... "
"She has a child and an ex husband. She has a job in New York. Ben has his family and a job in Los Angeles. Although they love and respect each other, they realize that it won't work. An insider explained their decision to us..."
"After a brief rekindling in February 2019, a number of sources confirmed to us weekly that the two broke up for the second time in April."
"The two had a public relationship in July 2017, but announced their separation in August 2018."
"The actor found love with the producer of Saturday night live after breaking up with his separated wife, Jennifer Garner, in 2015."
"Ben Affleck and Lindsay schokus are over."



Number  393
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The reality star spent Thanksgiving with her famous family in California, and could be seen striking a pose that had fans questioning whether she had a fourth child on the way in a video shared by sister Kendall Jenner.”
“You did the same with Mason.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star, 39, who frequently shares photos on social media of all three of the children she shares with Scott Disick, came under fire on Sunday, after posting a photo with her 3-year-old son.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the image, Kardashian wears a bikini while doing some Christmas shopping on her laptop, as her son, also wearing a swimsuit, stands nearby.”
““Christmas shopping,” she captioned the image.”
“Although many fans simply commented on the photo by asking whether the reality star could also pick up something for them, some social media users took the opportunity to mom-shame Kardashian over her son’s long locks.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Parents newsletter.”
““Cut his hair.”


"The reality TV star spent Thanksgiving with her famous family in California, and in the video shared by sister Kendall Jenner, you can see her pose to make fans question whether she has a fourth child on the road."
"You did the same to Mason."
The 39 year old Kardashian star, who regularly shares photos of her three children with Scott disc on social media, came under fire after she released a photo of her three-year-old son on Sunday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In this picture, Kardashian is wearing a bikini and buying Christmas presents with her laptop, while her son is standing by in a swimsuit."
"Christmas shopping," she wrote under the title of the picture
"Although many fans simply commented on the photo and asked if the reality star could pick something for them, some social media users took the opportunity to make Kardashian feel ashamed for her son's long hair."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's parents newsletter."
"Cut his hair."



Number  394
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And while a show like Total Bellas may not see a similar pop in viewership—the inaugural season averaged just over 640,000 viewers—it can certainly expect to grow its viewership in the likelihood that it continues to broadcast such intriguing life events.”
“The episode, which occurred in Season 11, drew an impressive 2.28 million viewers.”
“Credit: Eonline.comBrie Bella has adapted quite well to life after WWE as the Divas-era star has been featured in Total Divas, Total Bellas and the popular Bella Twins YouTube channel which, in partnership with WWE, has amassed a staggering 500,000 subscribers in just under a year.”
“The newest addition to the Bella dynasty could be its most important in terms of furthering a brand that has could one day put the Bella Twins on equal footing as some of the biggest giants in both reality television and digital media.”
“Baby Bella Raises Profile of WWE's Reality TV PortfolioIn its Q4 2016 earnings report, WWE singled out the Bella Twins YouTube channel and Total Bellas as highlights of its growing presence in digital media and reality television, respectably.”
“On the strength of reality shows like Total Bellas, WWE was able to increase its television revenues by 23 percent, compared to Q4 2015, with revenues of $68.6 million.”
“With the first Bella baby now conceived, Nikki Bella, Brie Bella, John Cena and Daniel Bryan stand to reap the benefits of surging interest in their monetized post-WWE lives.”
“Credit: WWE.comBirdie Joe Playlist will Attract Millions of Viewers on YouTubeSpecial events have translated to large viewership numbers on the Bella Twins YouTube channel.”
“All four of the aforementioned stars are either retired or part-time performers.”
“The Bella Twins YouTube channel has allowed fans continued access to their lives while they spend time away from the world wide leader and its famed squared circle.”


"Although programs like total Bellas may not have a similar popularity trend in ratings, the average ratings in the first quarter are only more than 640000, and its ratings will certainly increase, because it is likely to continue to broadcast such interesting life events."
"This episode took place in Season 11 and attracted 2.28 million viewers."
"Credit: Eonline.comBrie Bella has been well adapted to the life after WWE, because the star of the divas era has appeared in total divas, total Bellas and the popular Bella twins YouTube channel, which has cooperated with WWE and accumulated an amazing 500000 subscribers in less than a year. "
"The latest members of the Bella dynasty may be one of its most important brands. One day, the Bella twins will become some of the biggest giants in the field of reality TV and digital media."
"Baby Bella has increased the popularity of WWE reality show portfolio. In its Q4 2016 earnings report, WWE specifically pointed out that Bella twins YouTube channel and total Bellas are its growing highlights in digital media and reality TV, which are worthy of respect."
"With reality shows like total Bellas, WWE's TV revenue grew 23% to $68.6 million from the fourth quarter of 2015."
"With the birth of the first baby Bella, Nicky Bella, bribella, John Seine and Daniel Blaine will benefit enormously from their monetized life after World War II."
"Credit: WWE.comBirdie The company, Joe playlist, will attract millions of YouTube viewers, especially on the Bella twins YouTube channel
"These four stars are either retired or part-time."
"The Bella twins YouTube channel keeps fans in touch with their lives as they move away from the global leader and his famous square circle."



Number  395
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of people wants to kill you they re going to do it Tweet This...”
“Miller’s lawyers argued for probation, saying her creditors were made whole after the fraud was discovered.”
“The former Dance Moms star was serving her 366-day sentence for bankruptcy fraud at the Victorville Federal Correctional Institution in California since July.”
“Miller’s June 21 release date was moved up to May 25, but now it’s expected she’ll serve the remaining two months of her sentence at the halfway house, according to E News.”
“READ MORE Abby Lee Miller is petrified of prison If people want to kill you they ll do it She was transferred to the Residential Reentry Center in Long Beach which is a facility that provides a structured and supervised environment where she ll be given employment counselling a job...”
“...placement and financial management assistance...”
“She is expected to adhere to specific conditions tethered to her supervised release, including refraining from unlawful possession of a controlled substance or committing another federal, state or local crime, according to court documents obtained by E News.”
“Story continues below advertisementShe also cannot have access to any dangerous weapons or communicate with someone she knows is engaged in criminal activity.”
“READ MORE: Abby Lee Miller of ‘Dance Moms’ speaks out after jail sentencingMiller pleaded guilty to bankruptcy fraud in June 2016.”
“Miller also took $120,000 worth of Australian currency into the United States without reporting it, to which she also pleaded guilty in 2016.”


“… A lot of people want to kill you, they will kill you, tweet this... "
Miller's lawyer claimed a suspended sentence, saying her creditors were compensated after the fraud was discovered
"The former dancer star has served 366 days in prison for bankruptcy fraud at the Federal Correctional Institution in Victorville, California, since July this year."
According to e-news, Miller's June 21 release date was advanced to May 25, but she is now expected to serve the remaining two months in the halfway room
"To learn more, Abby Lee Miller is afraid of going to jail. If someone wants to kill you, they'll kill you. She was transferred to the residential reentry center in Long Beach, which provides an organized and supervised environment where she will get employment advice and work... "
“… Resettlement and financial management assistance... "
"According to court documents obtained by e-news, she will comply with specific conditions for her release under supervision, including avoiding illegal possession of controlled substances or other federal, state or local crimes."
"The story goes on under the ads, and she can't get in touch with any dangerous weapons, or with people she knows who are engaged in criminal activities."
"What's interesting: in June 2016, Abby Lee Miller of" dancing mother "was outspoken after he was sentenced to bankruptcy fraud."
"Miller brought $120000 worth of Australian dollars into the United States before reporting the case, and she pleaded guilty to the United States in 2016."



Number  396
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Performers on the day included Andra Day and Jennifer Hudson.”
“...with the words March For Our Lives Los Angeles...”
“And Leona Lewis revealed that she felt compelled to count herself among the hundreds of thousands of people who stepped out across the US for the March For Our Lives anti-gun violence rallies on Saturday.”
“Standing before a heaving crowd of fellow protesters gathered in downtown Los Angeles, the 32-year-old London native added a British voice to the event - and revealed her own experience with gun violence.”
“Standing in solidarity Leona Lewis threw her support behind the March For Our Lives anti gun violence rally in Los Angeles on Saturday The Bleeding Love hitmaker who was was forced to back out of a scheduled performance at the event after falling ill said Nothing was going to stop...”
“...me from coming here and using my voice to support these incredible and inspiring young students showing such bravery at a time of such indescribable sorrow...”
“'Their strength in pushing for real change to end the atrocious gun violence in this country is why I stand here today to support them, side by side and hand in hand to say, enough.”
“'I was personally touched by gun violence several years ago when a 17-year-old boy was shot and killed in my community.”
“I witnessed the devastation this caused his family and us his peers.'”
“Voices: The British beauty joined local student Rachel Iribe, who she introduced on stageShe continued: 'I spend much of my time in this country and, although I may not be a citizen, I want you to know that the UK hears you.”


"The performers of the day included Andra day and Jennifer Hudson."
“… It says, "march into Los Angeles for our lives..."
"Leona Lewis revealed that she felt it necessary to count herself among the hundreds of thousands of people at the" March for our lives "anti gun violence rally held across the United States on Saturday."
The 32 year old Londoner, who stood in front of a large crowd of protestors gathered in downtown Los Angeles, added a British voice to the event and revealed his experience of armed violence
"In support of Leona Lewis, she supported the" March for our lives "anti gun violence rally in Los Angeles on Saturday. The bloody love killer was forced to withdraw from the original performance after her illness. She said that nothing would stop... "
“…… I don't want to come here and support these incredible and inspiring young students with my voice. They have shown such bravery in such an indescribable time of grief... "
"Their power to push for real change to end the brutal gun violence in this country is why I'm here to support them today, side by side and hand in hand saying, enough."
"A few years ago, a 17-year-old boy was shot dead in my community, and I was personally touched by the shooting."
"I've witnessed the disaster this has brought to his family, to us and to his peers."
"Voice: this British beauty joined local student Rachel Iribe and introduced her on stage. "I spend most of my time in this country, and although I may not be a citizen, I want you to know that the UK has heard your voice," she added



Number  397
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I don’t know where he stands with me,” she responded.”
“I don’t know what that was.”
“...said the Mad Men actressMuch like many Bachelor Nation fans, January Jones can’t quite decide how she feels about Nick Viall.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“You don t know if you like him or if he s a scumbag and I think that s why I m attracted to him maybe said Jones of Viall who announced his split from fiancée and Bachelor finalist Vanessa...”
“Grimaldi in August five months after the season finale aired...”
“So what exactly did Viall, 37, have in mind with Jones?”
““He asked me to battle him on Lip Sync Battle,” said the actress.”
““So is that like, his way of asking me out, or does he have a problem with me?”
“But I declined because I don t need to be humiliated Host James Corden asked if Viall circled back with an offer for a real date afterwards and Jones 39 said he didn t which says a lot Fellow guest...”


"I don't know where he and I stand," she replied
"I don't know what that is."
“…… Like many fans of bachelor countries, the heroine of mad men says January Jones can't completely determine how she feels about Nick vial. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"You don't know if you like him or he's a scum. I think that's why I'm attracted to him. Maybe Jones of Villar said that he announced that he broke up with Vanessa, fiancee and bachelor finalist..."
"Grimaldi in August, five months after the end of the season..."
"So what does the 37 year old Villar think of Jones?"
"He asked me to fight with him," the actress said
"Is that the way he asked me out, or does he have a problem with me?"
"But I refused, because I didn't need to be humiliated by the host James Corden to ask vyar if he would come back and make a real date invitation. Jones 39 said he didn't, which means a lot of other guests..."



Number  398
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kardashian West's lawyer, Shawn Holley, told the publication at the time that Johnson "has been a model prisoner and has the support of the warden, government officials and a host of others in her bid for release."”
“The following month, the New York Daily News reported that Kardashian West had enlisted her lawyer to "help the clemency campaigns" of Johnson and Cyntoia Brown.”
“"This is so unfair," Kardashian West wrote to her Twitter followers.”
“Kardashian West first publicly discussed Johnson's case back in October 2017 when she tweeted an article about her imprisonment.”
“She continued, "I became involved in a drug conspiracy."”
“I felt like a failure, I went into a complete panic and out of desperation, I made one of the worst decisions of my life to make some quick money."”
“"I struggled financially, I couldn't find a job fast enough to take care of my family.”
“Kourtney Kardashian Meets With Congressional Leaders About Cosmetics Reform"I had been in management for 10 years when I lost my job," Johnson says in a Mic video explaining her case.”
“It's been more than 20 years since she began her sentence in federal prison in October 1996.”
“Johnson is currently serving a life sentence for a first-time, nonviolent drug offense.”


Shawn Holley, a lawyer for Kardashian West, told the media at the time that Johnson "was a model prisoner who had the support of the warden, government officials and many others in his fight for release."
The next month, the New York Daily News reported that Kardashian West hired her lawyer to "help" Johnson and Cynthia Brown's "Leniency movement"
"It's not fair," Kardashian West wrote on twitter
"Kardashian West first discussed Johnson's case publicly in October 2017, when she tweeted an article about her imprisonment."
She went on, "I'm involved in a drug conspiracy."
"I felt like a failure, I was in complete panic, and out of desperation, I made one of the worst decisions of my life, trying to make some quick money."
"I'm financially strapped and can't find a job fast enough to take care of my family."
"Courtney Kardashian met with congressional leaders on cosmetic reform," Johnson said in a mic video explaining her case. "I worked in management for 10 years when I lost my job."
"She has been in federal prison for more than 20 years since October 1996."
"Johnson is currently sentenced to life in prison for his first use of nonviolent drugs."



Number  399
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While their shows of affection have slowed a bit since they said “I do,” the world is certainly not starved for witnessing these tender moments – most recently, they were seen holding hands while on their first overseas royal tour in Ireland.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex have made waves as one of the more unconventional royal couples, often being spotted clasping hands, holding each other’s backs or looking longingly into each other’s eyes.”
“Because royal public displays of affection are generally frowned upon, it makes these instances that much more special for fans to witness.”
“Almost every year Diana and Charles were spotted together at a polo match, they were seen locking lips – some private kisses behind the scenes, others in the middle of the field while Harry’s dad was accepting a trophy.”
“It’s one of the Royal Family’s unofficial royal traditions, though it is certainly not expected for a royal couple to share a kiss!”
“...pic.twitter.com/CdHcFeX3NT — Emily Nash (@emynash) July 26, 2018The photo is bound to go down in history.”
“The Duchess of Sussex hands over the winning trophy to the Duke’s @Sentebale team!”
“VIDEO: A kiss for her Prince!”
“After she handed the trophy to Nacho and gave him a kiss on each cheek, the former actress sidled up to Harry to congratulate him with a royal smooch, a follow up to their first public kiss on their wedding day on May 19.”
“...the Sentebale Polo 2018 trophy...”


"Although their emotional performance has slowed down since they said 'I do,' the world certainly doesn't want to see these tender moments - recently, they were seen holding hands during Ireland's first overseas royal tour."
"As a relatively unconventional royal couple, the Duke and Duchess of Sussex are often found holding hands tightly, holding each other's backs, or gazing at each other's eyes eagerly, causing a stir."
"Because it's usually unpopular for royalty to show their love in public, it makes these events more special for fans."
"Almost every year Diana and Charles are seen playing polo together, and people see them with their lips closed - behind the scenes kissing in private, in the middle of the field, and Harry's father is accepting the trophy."
"It's one of the unofficial Royal traditions of the royal family, but of course the royal couple don't want to share a kiss!"
“... pic.twitter.com/CdHcFeX3NT -Emily Nash (@ emynash) on July 26, 2018 will go down in history. "
"The Duchess of Sussex gives the victory trophy to the Duke's @ Sentebale team!"
"Video: give her prince a kiss!"
"After she handed the trophy to Nacho and gave him a kiss on the cheek, the former actress quietly came up to Harry and gave him a royal kiss, after their first public kiss on May 19 wedding day."
“… Centbell Polo 2018 trophy... "



Number  400
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.22391857506361323
Correct number is  88
Total number is  393
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
